Can you find me one-way Economy class flight tickets on Delta Airlines?
Sure. Where are you going to and where will you be flying from?
I'll be travelling from Paris, France to Philadelphia.
Do you have any departure dates in mind?
I'll be departing on March 10th.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 5:35 pm, has 1 stop and is priced at $364.
That sounds like a good flight to me.
Do you want me to buy tickets for you?
No. Hold on. Not now.
Can I assist you with anything else?
No. Thank you for the information.
Have a great day!
I need to travel in Economy class in a one-way flight? Can you find the one for me?
When and where are you leaving from to which place?
I have planned to visit Seattle, WA from Vancouver on 9th of March.
Found 3 flights. An outbound flight in Air Canada Airlines which leaves at 4:45 pm with 1 stop and the ticket cost will be $263.
Can you search for a flight in Delta Airlines?
Yes, found 1 outbound flight in Delta Airlines which leaves at 2:50 am with 1 stop and the price is $309.
this will perfectly suit to me. thanks, that's all.
Have a happy journey.
Can you find me some one-way flights leaving this Sunday?
Where are you leaving from?
From Las Vegas.
Where are you planning to visit?
I am traveling to San Francisco.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:55 am, has 0 stops and costs $96.
That sounds good, That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I have a trip which will be happening soon. Would it be possible for you to help me with finding an one way flight?
Do you have the date when you plan to leave? What place are you planning to visit? Which will be your departure location?
I will be departing on the 13th from Mexico City and I will be traveling to Philly.
I see that there is an American Airlines flight. The departing flight will be at 12:05 pm with 1 stop. The ticket will cost $208.
That flight seems as a good choice to me. That would be all.
Have a good day.
I want an urgent flight. can your look for one-way flights?
Can you give embarkation time and place with destination?
Surely, I am leaving to Sydney, NSW on 13th of this month from LAX.
I think American airlines leaving at 5:05 am will be suitable for you. It has 0 stops and fare is $182.
No I wish to leave from Chi-town and search for a flight for 4 people.
Alaska airlines leaving at 4:20 pm with 0 stops will be comfortable then. The ticket fare is $168
ok. any other flights available.
Delta airlines leaving at 1:40 pm with 0 stops is available. its fare is $180
That sounds fine for me.
Have a great day sir.
I need a one-way flight, can you locate one for me?
What day do you want to depart, where will you depart from and where do you want to go?
I am going to SFO and will be leaving March 10th. I will depart from Sydney, Australia.
I have located 2 flights for you. One is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 5:50 pm and it has 1 stop. It costs $295.
Are there other flights I can get? I am going to Seattle and have 3 people in my group.
I have 1 flight that will work for you. It is on United Airlines, departing at 10:05 pm, with 1 stop. The price is $324 for the ticket.
What is the departure airport of the flight and is the ticket refundable?
The flight leaves from Kingsford Smith International Airport. I'm sorry but the ticket is not refundable.
That flight sounds fine. That's all I needed.
Have a great day.
I'm taking a trip soon and want a one way flight. Departure date is the 12th and would like to go on Delta Airlines.
Which city are you departing from? And where are you intending to go?
I will depart from Atlanta, GA, and heading to Delhi.
Delta Airlines do have a flight. It leaves at 7:50 am and has just 1 stop. The ticket price is $334.
That sounds great.
Do you want to go ahead and purchase?
No thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I need some help regarding an upcoming trip that starts on the 5th of March. Can you find a one-way flight for me?
What is your planned destination, and your planned site of departure?
I am going on a trip from Philadelphia to New York City. It'd be ideal if I travel in Premium Economy.
I found an American Airlines flight, which the outbound flight for leaves at 4:45 pm, has 0 stops, and a ticket for which costs $100.
Sounds fine with me.
Would you like to purchase a ticket for it?
I don't have any interest in buying a ticket. That's all the help I need from you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find me a oneway flight for my trip coming up for one person?
When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving from Los Angeles on March 5th.
Where are you planning to visit?
I am traveling to Portland, OR and would prefer American Airlines.
There is 1 American Airlines flight for $129 with 0 stops that leaves at 11:15 pm.
That flight sounds good to me. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me oneway flights for my upcoming trip?
What destination are you planning to visit?
I am planning to travel to SFO.
And when will you be leaving?
I will be traveling on 10th of this month.
Where will you be leaving from?
I will be leaving from San Diego.
There are 5 suitable flights for you; Alaska Airlines is one of them. The departure time for the outbound flight is 11:10 am with 0 stops and is priced at $102.
Can you look for any other available flights on the 2nd? The seat should be in Economy. I like it.
According to your preference there are 4 suitable flights and American Airlines is one of them. The departure time of outbound flight is 9:20 pm with 0 stops and is priced at $99.
I may change my plans. So can you look for any other flights with refundable tickets only.
I found 1 suitable flight which is Delta Airlines. The departure time is 5 pm with 1 stop and is priced at $161.
It sounds good to me. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day ahead.
I need a oneway flight.
When? And to where?
Tomorrow. From ATL to Los Angeles.
I see a 9:35 am American Airlines flight with 0 stops for $177.
From what airport? For both ends please.
From Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport to LAX International Airport.
I like the sounds of that. That'll be all.
Take care then.
I have a trip and I need a one way flight.
When are you planning to leave? Where will you be leaving from and where are you visiting?
I will be leaving on the 1st. I would like to travel with Air Canada. I am going to New York City from Vancouver.
I have 1 flight for you. Air Canada, leaving at 2 pm with 1 stop and the price is $295.
Is this a refundable ticket?
Yes, it is.
That sounds great to me.
Do you want to buy the tickets?
No, I don't.
Can I help with anything else?
No. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
I need oneway flights for a trip from Vancouver
For what date and traveling where?
The 10th of March, going to Atlanta.
I have 2 possibilities. First, there is Air Canada leaving 9:45 am with 0 stops for $159.
That works for me!
Great, have a nice day.
Find me a one way flight for my trip.
Where are you going and when?
Going from Las Vegas to Mexico City on March 5th, traveling economy.
There's an American Airlines flight, with 1 stop leaving at 9:30 am. It costs $209.
Sounds good to me.
Should I buy the ticket?
No, I just needed the information.
Have a good day.
I have a vacation on the way, can you find me a one way flight? Departing from SF.
Where do you want to go?
I am going to Chicago, I prefer Premium Economy.
When do you plan to depart?
I plan to leave on the 13th of this month. I prefer Alaska Airlines.
I found 1 flight for you with Alaska Airlines leaving at 1:35 pm with 0 stops, the price of the ticket is $283.
Sounds great! Thats all I need to know!
Have a great day!
I have a trip coming up and I will need a one way flight.
Where will you be leaving from? When would you like to depart?
I will be leaving from Los Angeles on the 13th of this month.
Where are you planning to visit?
I am traveling to CDMX.
I found 4 flights for you. American Airlines has a flight with 0 stops for $162 leaving at 2:45 pm.
Are there any other flights? I am traveling to Atlanta, GA.
Alaska Airlines has a flight with 0 stops leaving at 9:25 pm, and the ticket is $162.
Are there any Delta Airlines flights?
Delta Airlines has a flight with 0 stops for $173 leaving at 9:20 am.
Which airport does the flight depart from? When does the flight land?
The flight departs from LAX International Airport. It arrives at 5:19 pm.
That flight sounds great. I'm all set, thank you!
Have a wonderful day!
Can you help me find oneway flights for my upcoming trip?
Certainly, but I need some information first. What city are you departing from, on what date and where are you flying to?
On Monday next week I plan to depart LA for Portland, OR. Just one person on trip.
Alaska Airlines has an available flight. It departs at 7:25 am with 0 stops. Ticket price is $127.
What time does the flight arrive in Portland?
It arrives in Portland at 9:55 am.
That flight will work for me. That is all I need.
Have a lovely day.
Could ypu find me oneway flights for a trip I have, leaving on march 1st?
Could you tell me your departure and arrival destinations please?
I'll go from SF to Vegas
There's a flight with Alaska Airlines departing 8:15 pm with 0 stops. The price is $87
When is the arrival time? Which airport does the flight arrive to?
The flight arrives at McCarran International Airport 9:50 pm
That sounds good
Do you want me to buy tickets for you?
No, thanks. That was all I needed
have a good day
I have a trip coming up. Can you find me oneway flights?
where are you planning to visit? When do you plan to leave?
I am planning my trip to LAX on March 8th.
Where will you be leaving from
Our group has 4 members and we plan to depart from Delhi, India.
There is an availability in American Airlines flight, an outbound flight at 7 pm with 0 stops. The ticket price is $297.
That flight sounds good to me. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I have a trip coming up and I need oneway flights.
Where are you leaving from and where are you going?
I leave on the 7th of this month from Chi-town. I'm traveling to Phoenix, AZ.
I found 3 flights. The first is American Airlines, leaves at 4:30 am and has 1 stop. The price is $256.
That sounds good. That's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I would like a one way Economy flight for a trip coming up.
From where and when do you want to leave and where are you going?
Going from Chicago to Vancouver on March 2nd for 2 people.
I have a flight on American Airlines with 0 stops leaving at 11:55 am That costs $161.
What else is there please?
I have a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8:30 am with 1 stop for $302.
That will work.
Would you like to book that?
Not right now, I'm all set.
Have a great day.
I need to find a one-way flight for a trip that I am about to take.
That's great. When will you leave and what airport will you be flying from?
I will leave on the 4th of March from Delhi. I would like to fly on United Airlines.
Where are you going to fly to?
I want to fly to Seattle. There are three people in my group. I prefer buying Economy seats.
Great! There is 1 flight that meets your needs. It is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 1:10 am and has 1 stop. The price per ticket is $410.
That sounds perfect.
I hope that your trip is wonderful.
I'm going on a trip soon. Can you get me a one-way flight which leaves from Phoenix?
What day is your trip?
It's on the 9th of this month.
What city are you going to?
Seattle.
There 4 flights on the 9th. There is one from American Airlines which leaves at 8:40 am but has 1 stop. It costs $226.
Sounds great.
Would you like to get the tickets now?
No, not now.
Do you want anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I am looking for a one way Economy trip for an upcoming flight.
When are you leaving ? What is your Destination.
I would like to go to San Francisco on the 12th.
Where are you departing from.
There is 4 of us leaving from London, England.
There is 4 available flights available flights One is American Airlines, which leaves at 3:05 pm with 1 stop for $341.
Are there any others?
Yes British Airways that leaves at 9:15 am with 1 stop. It costs $374.
Any others.
Yes. Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 8 am with 1 stop. It costs $355.
I like that one, I am all set.
Have a nice day.
I am looking for a oneway flight for my trip coming up in the near future.
Ok. What time are you looking at leaving and where from?
I'm planning to depart from Chi-town the day after tomorrow.
Alright, sounds good. Where are you wanting to go?
I would like to travel to New York City. I usually like to fly with Delta Airlines. Economy seating works just fine for me.
Ok. I was able to pull up 1 Delta Airlines flight which leaves at 9:15 am on that day. There will be 0 stops on the way, and the cost is $128.
Great, that will work just fine.
Would you like to make the purchase now?
That's okay, thank you. I should be all set for the time being.
Alright then. Take care.
I have an upcoming trip, are there any one way flights available?
Where do you plan to visit? What location will you be leaving from? What date would you like to leave on?
I plan to travel to Portland, my group has three people. We would be leaving out of Las Vegas on March 13th.
I have found 4 flights that would be suitable for your trip. There's an American Airlines flight leaving at 7:15 pm outbound with 1 stop. This flight would cost $247.
That flight will work! I don't need any thing else.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for oneway flights.
Where and when are you going?
I'm going to ATL on March 6th.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from San Fran.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 1:35 pm with 1 stop for $239.
Where does the flight land?
The flight goes to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
When does the onward flight arrive?
It arrives at 0:51 am.
Are there any flights to Phoenix?
There are 3 flights. One is with Delta Airlines, leaving at 9:35 am. It has 0 stops and the cost is $115.
That flight is good.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
No. But thank you.
Have a great day.
I am going on a trip soon. Can you help me find a flight there?
What city are you currently in and what city will you be visiting?
I am currently in San Fran and will be visiting Chi-town. I like traveling in Economy, and I will be leaving on the 10th.
Okay, I found 5 flights that are within those specifications. I found an Alaska Airlines flight that is $183. It leaves at 1:35 pm and has 0 stops along the way.
I am traveling with someone else, so I will need two tickets. What are the other flight options.
There are 4 other options, including an American Airlines flight for $170. It departs at 3:20 pm and has 0 stops.
What other options are there?
Additionally, there is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:05 pm. It has 0 stops and cost $183.
That sounds perfect!
Would you like to purchase tickets for this flight?
No, thank you. This is all the information I need.
Okay, have a nice day.
I've got a trip coming up so can you help me book a oneway ticket? I'm leaving on the 6th of this month.
Where will you be leaving from?
LA.
What's your destination?
SD.
I've found an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 7:30 am and has 0 stops. It'll cost $70.
Are there any other flights? I'm fine with either business of economy class.
Then there are 3 possible flights. I suggest an American Airlines flight at departs at 7:40 am that also has 0 stops. It'll cost $69.
Is there anything else? I'd prefer to go on Southwest Airlines.
There is 1 available Southwest Airlines flight. It leaves at 3:25 pm and has 0 stops. It'll cost $58.
That one sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy a ticket for it?
No thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, I'm good. Thanks for all the help.
No problem. Have a wonderful day.
Hey, can you help me find a flight. I am going a trip soon.
Sure. Where are you leaving from and where are you going?
I'll be taking off from Ciudad de Mexico and going to Philadelphia.
When are you leaving?
I need to leave Saturday this week.
Ok, I found 2 flights. One is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 12:05 pm and has 1 stop. It is going to be $212.
Any other flights?
Yes, there is an United Airlines flight that leaves at 8:25 am and has 1 stop. It would be $210.
Is it refundable?
No, its not.
What airport does it leave from? What time does it arrive?
It leaves Benito Juarez International Airport and arrives at 7:46 pm.
Great! That flight will work. Thanks.
Have a great day!
I am planning for a trip. Can you get details about oneway flights?
When are you leaving from and where are you going to?
leaving on the 12th and go to London, UK.
Where are you leaving from?
from Washington and Economy class travel is okay for me
whether American Airlines outbound flight leaves at 2:50 pm with 1 stop and the ticket price is $359 is okay for you?
When does the flight arrive from which Airport?
It arrives at 10:14 am to the destination Heathrow International Airport.
Any other flights?
Southwest Airlines outbound flight leaves at 3:35 pm with 1 stop and the ticket price is $339. Is that convenient to you?
Any flights from Seattle?
Yes, Alaska Airlines outbound flight leaves at 3:45 pm with 1 stops and the price ticket is $404.
That is good. Thanks
Have a good day.
I am planning a trip in the future. Can you help me find oneway flights to Paris?
Where will you be departing from?
I am leaving from LAX. I hope to travel Economy.
When is your departure date?
I am planning to leave Thursday next week. I need four tickets.
Alaska Airlines has a 0 stops flight that leaves at 1 pm. Ticket rates are currently $250.
I think that flight might work.
Did you want to purchase tickets for this flight?
No, I changed my mind. I do not want to buy a ticket.
Can I help you with anything else today?
No, thank you for your help.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you find me oneway flights?
Where will you be flying from?
I am flying out of LA.
When do you want to leave?
I need to leave on the 10th of this month.
Where will you be flying too.
I am flying to Paris, France with 4 people. I prefer Delta Airlines.
There is a direct Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 8:25 am and has 0 stops for $255.
What airport does that flight depart from and is the ticket refundable?
It departs from LAX International Airport and the ticket is not refundable.
That sounds good. Thanks, that will be all.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a one way flight leaving from SD as I have a one way flight.
Where are you planning to go? and when are you planning on leaving?
I need to leave Friday next week. I would prefer to fly with United Airlines. I am travelling to Portland.
There is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 8:30 pm and has 0 stops. the price will be $119.
That sounds good to me. That;s all I need.
Have a wonderful time.
I want to take a trip soon. Can you find me a oneway flight to Ciudad de Mexico? I want to sit in economy.
When and where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Washington on the 4th.
I found 3 flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:10 AM. It has 1 stop and costs $225.
Where does the flight depart from, and when does it arrive?
The flight will leave from Dulles International Airport. It will arrive at 11:06 AM.
That sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy a ticket for this flight?
No, I don't want to buy a ticket. Thank you, that is all I need.
Ok, have a wonderful day.
I want to go on a trip. Can you find me one-way flights? I have four people in my group.
Where are you planning to visit? Which location will you be departing from? At what time do you plan to depart?
I want to leave on the 11th of March from Vegas. I am going to Seattle.
There is an American Airlines flight which matches what you are looking for. The outbound flight departs at 9:30 AM and has 1 stop. The price of the ticket is $214.
That sounds good.
Would you like to purchase flight tickets from this airline?
No, I do not want this ticket.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a fantastic day.
I have a trip coming up. Can you find me one way flights on Air Canada?
Where will you be leaving from and when do you plan to leave?
I'm leaving from Vancouver, and traveling to Seattle on the 8th.
I found 1 suitable flight for you. There's an outbound Air Canada flight with 1 stop, leaving at 2:05 pm. The ticket price is $239
When does the departing flight arrive?
It arrives at 10:56 pm.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No, I don't want to buy a ticket.
May I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you search for a one way flight for the up coming trip I have?
What is your destination and where are you traveling from? When is your departure date?
We are 2 people leaving from Vegas traveling to Toronto, Canada, Leaving next Thursday.
There is 2 flights available. There is American Airlines that leaves at 9:30 am and has 1 stop. The price is $260.
In which airport does this flight arrive in?
At the Toronto Pearson International Airport.
That flight is good.
Do you want to purchase the ticket?
No, I don't want to purchase a ticket, thank you for the information.
Have a wonderful day.
I have a trip coming up. Can you discover me oneway flights? There are 3 individuals in my gather. I am traveling to Delhi, India.
Where will you be taking off from?
I am clearing out from Phoenix.
When do you arrange to leave?
I am clearing out on Walk March 1st.
I found 2 appropriate flights for you. There's a Southwest Carriers flight. The outbound flight takes off at 6 am. and it has 1 stops. The cost of the ticket is $366 Southwest Airlines.
When does the forward flight arrive? Is the ticket refundable?
Shockingly the ticket isn't refundable. The ahead flight arrives at 4:07 pm.
Are there any other accessible flights?
There's a Joined together Aircrafts flight. The outbound flight takes off at 11:05 am. and it has 1 stops. The cost of the ticket is $359 United Airlines.
That flight sounds great to me.
Do you need to purchase tickets for it?
No I do not need to purchase a ticket. That's all I need.
Have a brilliant day.
Can you find me a one way flight for my upcoming trip?
Sure, where would you like to go? Where are you leaving from and when?
I am departing on the 14th of this month from Paris. I am going to Philadelphia.
I found 2 flights for you. There is a 4:05 am American Airlines flight with 1 stop. The price is $272.
Is there anything else available? I would prefer Delta Airlines.
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight. The outbound leaves at 5:35 pm and it has 1 stop. The price is $333.
Which airport does the flight depart from? And where does the flight arrive?
It departs from Charles de Gaulle International Airport. It will be arriving at PHL International Airport.
Sounds good!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Nope, thank you!
Have a great day!
I'm going on a trip and would like a one way flight from Atlanta, GA.
Okay, where is your destination?
I'm going to Chicago.
Okay, when are you leaving?
I head there on the 6th of March.
Okay, I found a one way trip through American Airlines, the flight has 0 stops in between. The flight leaves at 9:15 pm and the ticket price is $108.
I'm actually leaving the 2nd, are there any other flights for that day?
Sure, I have 3 flights for that day. One option has 0 stops between your destination. The flight is through Delta Airlines and leaves at 7:50 am. The price is $110.
Are there any other options?
Yes, there is a 4:35 am flight through Southwest Airlines making 0 stops in between. The price is $104.
That one sounds great.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
No thank you that's all I need.
Okay, have a nice day.
Can you please find a one way flight leaving from Philly?
What date would you like to leave?
On the 8th please.
What is your destination?
I'm going to Atlanta, GA and I prefer American Airlines.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am and has 1 stop, the price is $215.
That flight is good.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
No, I don't want to buy a ticket.
Do you need anything further?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a good day.
I have to go on a trip to SD. Can you please find me one-way flights for March 10th?
Which airport will you be leaving from?
I will leave from Delhi.
I found an outbound American Airlines flight that leaves at 7 pm with 1 stop. The ticket price is $323.
When does the outbound flight arrive?
It arrives in SD at 11:04 pm.
What is the departure airport and at which airport does to flight arrive?
The outbound flight departs fro,m Indira Gandhi International Airport and the destination airport is SAN International Airport.
That flight works perfectly.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets.
No, thank you - I do not want to buy a ticket. That's all.
Please enjoy your day.
Hi, I have an upcoming trip where I will be travelling on the 12th of March. Can you help me find oneway flights?
Sure, where are you planning to visit and where will you be departing from?
I'll be departing from Phoenix, AZ and I am going to Atlanta, GA.
I found an American Airlines flight that has 0 stops and it leaves at 11:25 pm. The cost of the ticket is $162.
What airport does the flight depart from and when does the onward flight arrive?
The flight leaves from Sky Harbor International Airport and the onward flight arrives at 6:37 am.
Is there anything else available?
I found a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 10:55 pm and has 0 stops. The cost of the ticket will be $163.
That sounds great.
Should I purchase the tickets?
No, I don't wish to buy it at this time.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's everything.
Enjoy your day.
There's a trip coming up soon for me. Could you look for oneway flights for me?
What places are you going to visit?
I an going to Vancouver.
What day do you plan to leave?
I'll leave on March 11th.
What location will you leave from?
I'll leave from Las Vegas.
There's an outbound flight with American Airlines that leaves at 9:30 am. It has 1 stops, and the ticket cost is $199.
That flight is perfect for me.
Would you like to buy tickets for the flight?
Nah, I don't want to purchase a ticket.
Can I assist you with anything else?
Nah. Thanks for giving me a hand.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I will be traveling soon. Show me any available one way flights.
What is the location you are going to? When are you planning to depart? What location is your departure from?
I will be leaving on the 11th from Portland. I will be going to Sydney, Australia.
Showing one flight from Alaska Airlines. The flight departure time will be 10:10 am. The flight will have 1 stop. The price for this flight is $323.
Which airport will this flight arrive at? Will my ticket be refundable?
Unfortunately this ticket will not be refundable. The flight will arrive at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Can you find me another flight? I would like to travel Economy through Delta Airlines.
Showing 1 matching flight from Delta Airlines. The departure time will be 8:45 am and will have 1 stop. The price for this flight is $303.
Okay that flight will work for me. I don't need anything else.
Have a good day.
I need to book a oneway flight in Economy.
Where and when are you leaving from? Where are you headed to?
I am leaving on March 4th from ATL to SF.
You have 4 options, one is flight from American Airlines, it leaves at 11:40 am and it makes 0 stops. The ticket is $176.
It's okay for me.
Have a nice day.
I have a trip coming up, could you find me one way flights?
Where are you leaving from and where do you want to go? When do you want to do this?
I want to go from Los Angeles to Atlanta on the 7th of March. Airline doesn't matter.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 8:15 PM and has 0 stops. It costs $176.
Which airport does it leave from?
It leaves from LAX International Airport.
That sounds good to me! That's all I need.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find oneway flights for an upcoming trip?
Where will you depart from? Where do you plan to visit?
I prefer American Airlines. I'm visiting Seattle, WA. I am departing from SD.
When will you leave?
I'll leave on the 12th of this month.
There's an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 4:10 am with only 1 stop. The ticket price is $195.
Sounds good.
Have a good day.
Can you help with finding me oneway flights?
Sure. Please tell me your departure time and location as well as your destination.
I plan to fly out of Toronto, Canada to Washington on the 3rd of this month.
I found 2 flights matching your criteria. I'd recommend Air Canada, taking off at 9:10 am, 1 stops, priced at $150.
Where does it land?
The flight lands at Dulles International Airport.
This one sounds perfect. That will be all.
Have a great one!
I will be moving soon and I need to find a one way flight.
Sure, I can help you. Can you tell me where you'll be flying from and where you'll be flying to? Also, what date would you like to travel?
I am looking for flights from San Francisco to Las Vegas and I would like to leave on the 8th of March.
Okay, I've found 4 possible flights for you. Would you be interested in flying with Alaska Airlines? The flight departs at 8:15 pm and has 0 stops. The cost is $103.
And where will the flight arrive?
It will land at McCarran International Airport.
I don't know if that will work. Can you tell me some other options?
There's also a flight on American Airlines for $102. It departs at 5:30 pm and has 0 stops.
No, I'll need a different itinerary. I also need to buy a total of 4 tickets.
No problem. There's another flight aboard Delta Airlines that departs at 10:50 am. It costs $105 and has 0 stops.
That might work. Can you tell me if this is a Premium Economy ticket?
It is actually in Economy class.
Okay, thank you for the information. That's all for now.
Have a good day!
I need a one way flight to LAX on any airline.
What city are you departing from? What date would you like to travel?
I'd like to fly from Atlanta, GA on 12th of March for Economy tickets.
I found a flight with American Airlines. The flight takes off at 2:30 PM and has 0 stops. It will cost $149. Is that okay?
No, find me something else. How about a flight for three tickets to Vancouver, BC.
I found 3 tickets from Delta Airlines. The flight would take off at 3:20 PM with 0 stops. Each ticket costs $196. Would you like to purchase these tickets?
Yes.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Nope, that's it.
Okay, have a good day.
I wanna find a one way flight.
Where do you want to depart from? Where do you wanna go, and what date would you like to travel?
I'm looking for a flight to ATL from New York on Monday next week.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight takes off at 11:45 am, has 0 stops, and costs $135.
When does the flight arrive to its destination? Is it an economy or a business ticket?
It is an Economy seat. It arrives at 2:07 pm.
Ok.
Do you need anything else?
Nope. Thanks a lot for your help.
Have a good one.
I will be taking a one way flight so I would like to have one ticket.
Can you please give me the date when you will be flying? Also I would like for you to give me the name of the city from where you will depart from. Where will you be having your destination?
I will be flying from Atlanta, and I will be visiting Chicago. I will be flying on the March 14th.
I can see that 4 flights suit what you want. Would you prefer to have American Airlines as your airline? The flight will be departing at 9:15 pm and it has 0 stops. The flight will be costing you $128.
Can you tell me if this is a redeye flight?
I can confirm that it is not an overnight trip.
Alright, seems fine.
Is there something else I can help you with?
No, that would be all. I appreciate your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Hi! I need to book a one-way flight, please.
Excellent! What city will you be leaving from? What's the departure date? What city would you like to fly to?
I want to fly with Delta Airlines in Economy class. I'm flying to Chi-town from Vancouver, BC. I'd like to leave on the 12th of this month.
Great! I have one flight available on that date with Delta Airlines. It takes off at 5:55 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $183. Would you like me to book that for you?
That would be great!
Okay, I've done that for you. Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Okay. I hope you have a great day!
Can you find me a one way flight?
Which city do you want to depart from?
Look for flights from Sf.
Where are you planning to go and what date would you like to travel?
I am flying to Ny on the 1st of this month. Find me economy class tickets.
Ho about Alaska Airlines? The flight takes off at 6:40 am and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $194.
When does the flight arrive at NY and is it a redeye flight?
It arrives at 4:06 pm and its not an overnight flight.
Find me something else.
How about an American Airlines flight that cost $191 and takes off at 8:30 pm with 0 stops.
Find me something else for the 9th of March.
How about a Delta Airlines flight that costs $200 and takes off at 10:55 am with 0 stops.
Ok thanks, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
Find me a one way flight departing from Toronto, Ontario.
Where would you like to go and on what day?
I'm flying to ATL and need 4 tickets for the 11th.
Would you like to fly with Air Canada? The flight takes off at 4:40 pm. The flight has 1 stop and the ticket cost $188.
Where does the flight land and is ti a redeye flight?
The flight will land at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. It is not a overnight flight.
OK
Anything else you need?
No that's all.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight from Las Vegas.
What is the location that you are planning to go to?
I will be flying to Toronto.
What is your travel date?
I want to travel on the day after tomorrow and fly with United Airlines.
I have found 1 flight. Would you like to use United Airlines? The flights leaves at 12:05 pm with one stop and the cost of the ticket is $259.
What is my destination arrival estimation?
The flight will get there at 9:54 pm.
All right, thank you, that's it.
Enjoy your day.
I want to find a one way flight for 1 ticket.
Where are you planning to go? Which city do you want to depart from? What date would you like to travel?
I am flying to London, England. I want to depart from Chi-town on March 12th.
Would you like to fly American Airlines? They have a flight taking off at 12:30 pm with 1 stop. The ticket price is $356.
Look for flights departing from Portland, OR. instead.
I found 1 flight for you. Would you like to fly with United Airlines? The flight departs at 12:05 pm with 1 stop, The ticket price is $406.
Ok.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
Can you find some one way flights to NYC?
When do you want to travel?
I want to fly on the 5th of this month.
Which city are you traveling from?
From Los Angeles.
I found a flight on Alaska Airlines. Departing at 9:30 am, and the flight has 0 stops. The ticket is $184.
That's perfect. Thank you.
Have a nice day.
I want to find a one way flight.
Where are you planning to go? Which city do you want to depart from?
I am flying to Phoenix, AZ. I want 1 ticket from Seattle, WA.
What date would you like to travel?I
I want to depart 11th of March. I don't care which airline.
I found 4 gliths for you. Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines. The flight takes off at 12 pm. The flight has 1 stop. The ticket cost $237.
A different airline please, in Premium Economy.
Would you like to fly with Delta Airlines. The flight takes off at 8:45 am. The flight has 1 stop. The ticket costs $307.
Find me something else. I want to fly with Southwest Airlines. Look for them from Atlanta.
Would you like to fly with Southwest Airlines. The flight takes off at 12:05 pm. The flight as 0 stops. The ticket cost $258.
Alright.
Can I help you with anything else?
No thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
I would like to find a one way flight. I am interested in flights from Vegas.
What is your destination? What is the date you will be doing your traveling?
I will be heading to Toronto, Canada. I would like to start my travel on the 13th of March.
I've located 1 flight for you. Would you like to use United Airlines? The flight will be leaving at 12:05 pm. There is 1 stop on the flight. The ticket price is $232.
What is the airport the flight will be landing at?
The flight is landing at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
What time does the flight get there?
The flight will land at 9:54 pm.
All right.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. I appreciate your help.
Have a nice day.
I need to find a one way flight.
Where would you be flying?
I will be going to Nairobi, Kenya.
For date will you be going on your trip?
I would like to fly out on the 14th.
What city are you departing from?
I will need flights from Los Angeles. Can you find me something with Alaska Airlines?
I have locate 1 flight with Alaska Airlines, it will be departing at 6:45 am and has 1 stop. The cost of the ticket is $416.
Do you know whether or not this is a redeye flight?
I see that is is an overnight flight.
Okay thank you anyways, that is all I need.
Okay enjoy the rest of your day.
I want to book 2 tickets for a one way flight.
What date would you like to travel? Where are you planning to go?
I want to fly to Vancouver, BC later today.
Which city do you want to depart from?
I want to depart from Phoenix, AZ in Economy Class.
I found 4 flights available on American Airlines. The earliest flight has 1 stop and leaves at 7:35 am at $228 per ticket.
Find me something else with United Airlines.
I found 1 flight for you with United Airlines that has 1 stop and departs at 7:15 am for $232.
Where does the flight land?
The flight destination is at YVR International Airport.
When does the flight arrive at my destination? Is this a redeye flight?
The flight is not a redeye flight and will arrive at 1:59 pm
Ok.
Can I help you with something else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
I want to find a one way flight.
What date do you want to schedule the flight and which city will you depart from?
I want to schedule the flight on the 8th. Look for flights from SD and book three tickets.
Where are you planning to go?
I am flying to Portland, OR.
I have found 4 flights. Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines? The flight departs at 1:20 pm, has 0 stops, and tickets will cost $132.
Find me something else.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight departs at 9:20 am, has 0 stops, and tickets will cost $144.
Find me something else.
Would you like to fly with Delta Airlines? The flight departs at 9:20 pm, has 0 stops, and tickets will cost $133.
Ok. Thanks, that is all I need.
Have a good day.
Hello. I'd like to find a one way flight, please.
Which city would you like to depart from? Do you have a preferred date that you would like to travel?
I would like to fly with United Airlines and leave on March 9th. I will be leaving from NYC.
Which city are you planning to travel to?
I will be flying to LAX and would like 4 tickets.
Would United Airlines be acceptable? They have a flight that departs at 12:10 pm with 0 stops. The ticket for the flight will cost $162.
When and where will the flight arrive?
The flight will arrive at LAX International Airport at 3:20 pm.
Okay, that sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you for your help.
You are welcome. Have a great day.
I need a one way flight.
Where are you departing from?
I need a flight out of Delhi.
What date will you be flying.
I need three tickets on Monday next week out of SF.
Where is your destination?
I am going to Ciudad de Mexico and want to travel on the 10th.
Search returned 4 flights. How about Alaska Airlines with 0 stops, a takeoff time of 1:10 pm and a cost of $155?
Try to find me something different. I would like 1 ticket with Southwest Airlines.
Search returned 1 flight. How about Southwest Airlines that has 0 stops, leaves at 6:40 am and costs $155?
Do you know if this is Premium Economy and what airport is this flight from?
It is departing from SFO International Airport and is an Economy seat.
All right. I see.
Do you need help with anything else?
No that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for one way flights from Las Vegas.
Where do you plan to go?
I'll be flying to Seattle.
On what date would you like to travel?
I'm looking for a flights next Wednesday for Premium Economy.
Would you like American Airlines? There's a flight that takes off at 6:40 am and stops 1 time. The ticket will cost you $358.
Can you find me something else?
There's also United Airlines taking off at 1:40 pm with 1 stop. The ticket will cost you $348.
Thanks, that will be all I need.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a one way flight on Southwest Airlines in Premium economy class.
What date are you planning this trip for? What city are you currently located in.
I'm looking for flight on this Sunday from Chi-Town.
What is your destination for this flight?
I want to fly to Washington.
How does Southwest Airlines sound? The flight is scheduled for 6:45 am. There is 0 stops on this flight. It costs $169.
That sounds good, thank you.
You are welcome, have a nice evening.
I need a one-way plane ticket.
Where do you want to go?
I need one ticket to Toronto, Ontario.
Okay, where would you be flying from?
I'd fly from Philadelphia.
When would you like to go?
This Saturday please. Oh, actually, change that to 3 tickets.
American Airlines has a flight this Saturday that takes off at 4:45 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $160. How does that sound?
That would be perfect! Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a great day!
I need a one way flight that leaves on the 2nd of this month.
What city are you departing from and where would you like to go?
I need to leave from SD and I'm flying to London.
I found 2 flights. One with Alaska Airlines that leaves at 8 am. There is 1 stop and the ticket would be $306.
That's good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
That is all. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I need an Economy class ticket for a one way flight.
When are you planning to travel? Where are you departing from and planning to go?
Please look for flights from Atlanta to New Delhi. I want to depart the 6th of March, if possible.
I have a 1 stop flight with American Airlines that takes off that day at 9:35 am. The price of the ticket is $428.
Thank you, that's all for now.
Good bye!
I'd like a one way flight.
On which date do you want to travel? Where will you leave from and where do you want to go?
I am flying to San Francisco from LAX and would like to leave on 12th of March.
I found 5 flights for you. Do you want to fly with Alaska Airlines? The flight leaves at 5:50 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $97.
Okay.
Would I be able to help with something else?
No, that is all.
Have a great day.
I want to search a one way flight. I want to travel on March 4th. I want to book one ticket.
At which city do you like to depart from?
Can you find Economy class tickets. I am looking for flights from Toronto, Ontario.
Where do you plan to go?
I am going to SFO. So I would like to fly with Air Canada.
I found 1 flight. Would you like to go by Air Canada? The flight will be taking off at 4:40 pm. It has 1 stop. The Ticket price costs $283
okay great.
Is there anything else you want to know?
No Thanks.
Have a Nice day.
I am taking a trip soon and I would like to find a one way flight.
What is your departure city?
I would like to fly out of San Francisco.
Where would you like to fly to?
I am traveling to New Delhi.
What date would you like a flight?
I would like to fly on the 3rd of March.
There is an available flight on Alaska Airlines. The flight is at 4:30 am and has 1 stop. The ticket price is $399.
Please look for another flight.
I have also found a flight on American Airlines. The flight is at 1:15 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket price is $292.
What airport does the flight land in? Is it a redye flight?
The flight lands in Indira Gandhi International Airport. The flight is an overnight flight.
Can you find me flights out NYC instead?
I have found 2 flights out of NYC. The flight is on Delta Airlines and is at 10 am. It has 0 stops and the ticket price is $226.
Thank you. That is all the information I need.
You are welcome. Have a great day!
I want to find a one way flight.
What date would you like to travel? Which city do you want to depart from? Where are you planning to go?
I will be flying to Philly. I want to star my traveling by the 13th of March. Look for flights from Toronto, Ontario
I found 1 flight for you. Would mind flying with Air Canada. The flight takes off at 4:40 pm. The flight has 1 stop. The ticket costs $208.
Is this an economy or business class ticket
It is an Economy ticket.
Ok.
Can I help you with something else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
I want to find a one way flight.
What is your destination and what date are you traveling?
I'm flying to Mexico City and want to go on the 14th of March.
What is your departure city?
Departing from New York City.
There is a Delta Airlines flight departing 8:45 pm with 0 stops. The price is $153.
Ok thank you.
Have a good day.
I'd like to buy a one-way flight.
Okay, when would you like to travel? And what city will you be departing from?
I'm gonna be travelling on March 6th, and I'll be leaving from Phoenix.
And where would you like to go?
I need a flight to Portland, OR.
I found 4 flights to choose from. How about American Airlines? Takeoff is at 1:05 pm, there are 0 stops, and the ticket costs $153.
Is it a redeye? And what time would I arrive?
It's not an overnight flight, and it arrives at 4 pm.
Great, thanks! That's all I needed.
Sure thing, enjoy your trip!
I want a one way flight to discover.
Where do you intend to go?
I fly to San Francisco.
Which town would you like to leave?
Search for Phoenix flights.
What date do you want to travel?
I want to begin my journey on 14th of this month.
I discovered for you 4 flights. You want to fly with American Airlines. The plane is starting at 6:15 am. There are 0 stops for the flight. The ticket costs $133
Something else to find me. On the 10th, I want to begin my journey.
I've discovered 3 flights for you. Want to fly with Delta Airlines. The flight will start at 11:55 am. There are 0 stops on the flight. The ticket is $130
Something else to find me.
Want to fly with Southwest Airlines. The plane will start at 7:15 pm. There are 0 stops for the flight. The ticket costs $99
Ok
With something else, can I assist you?
No. Thank you very much for your assistance.
Have a nice day.
I want 2 tickets for a one way flight.
Where are you going to and when will you leave?
The destination is Nairobi and I'll leave on March 1st.
What is your departure city?
Flight must leave fro Chi-town and the airline company must be Delta Airlines.
You want to book a flight with Delta Airlines. It leaves at 9:15 am and it does 1 stops. The ticket is $439.
When will I reach my destination?
The flight lands at 5:57 pm.
Is it a First Class ticket?
No, it's Economy.
Okay, great, I don't need anything else from you.
Have a nice day.
I would like a one way flight.
Where would you like to go? When would you like to leave and from where?
I would like to travel to San Fran on the 12th of this month from LAX
There is a flight available on Alaska Airlines. It leaves at 5:50 pm and there are 0 stops. The price is $97.
Sure
Is there anything else I could assist you with?
No. I appreciate your assistance.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Please book me a one way flight from Vancouver.
On which date will you be flying?
I will be flying on March 5th.
What is the destination?
The destination is Seattle.
There are 3 flights that match those details. There is an Air Canada flight that departs at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop. The flight costs $273.
Please show me other flights.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 5:05 pm with 1 stop. The flight costs $234.
Does this flight travel overnight?
No, there is no overnight travel.
Thank you.
Do you require any further assistance?
I do not, thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Find me a one way flight.
What city are you flying from?
I'd like to leave from NY on the 1st of March and fly Economy.
Where are you heading?
I'd like three tickets to London, UK.
I found a flight with American airlines that costs $203 and takes off at 6:15 pm with 0 stops.
I'd actually prefer Southwest Airlines.
I found 1 flight with Southwest Airlines that costs $267, has 0 stops, and takes off at 4:35 pm.
What time would I arrive in London?
It's a redeye flight that would arrive at 4:57 am.
Ok, thanks.
Take care.
Whether i could get 4 flight tickets?
which date would you like to travel and which place do you wish to go and from which city do you wish to depart?
I like to go Toronto, Canada. I wish to start my travel today. Please find any flights from Washington?
I found 2 flights to reach Toronto,Canada. Whether you wish to fly with American Airlines. The flight will depart at 5:40 pm. And it has 0 stops. The ticket costs $89.
ok , thank you for needful information
Can i help you with some other information?
No, thanks
take care have a good day
Im looking for a one way flight.
Where are you going to go? Where will you be departing from?
I;m flying to Chicago. Departing from Toronto, Ontario.
What date do you plan to travel?
I'd like to fly with American Airlines. Can we book the date on March 1st.
The flight is with American Airlines. Flight takes off at 5:55 am. Its a one way flight with 0 stops Total amount for the ticket will be $91
Alright all set then.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No that'll be it thank you very much for your help.
Thank you for calling and have a good rest of the day.
I am going to France but I need a one way flight.Can you please find me economy class tickets?
Well, I'm planning to go to France but ill leave Riverview on Saturday.
I'm leaving London, England in a couple day's. I only have money for two more people. we will be heading to New York.
I'd like to leave on March the 2nd.
ill start my travels on March 2nd. So can I get four tickets please?
I'd love to fly with British Airways, but I'm afraid I wont have the time for 9:15 am in the morning and I'm low on cash to pay $188. I have 0 ideas left so tell me the 2 out of your 3 flights.
Wonderful! Thank you, this is all I needed.
May you have good day.
I'd like a one way economy class ticket flight.
Which date do you want to travel?
I'd like to start travelling on March 13th.
Which city would you like to leave from?
I'd like to fly Air France from Paris.
Where'd you like to go?
I'd like to fly to Seattle, WA.
Do you want to fly Air France that leaves at 3:55 am and has 1 stop? The cost is $399.
Which airport is the flight from, and is it a redeye flight?
The flight isn't overnight and it leaves from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Ok. That will be all I need.
Have a great day.
I need to find a one-way flight.
Where are you flying to?
I'm flying to Chicago.
What city are you departing from?
I'm flying from SFO.
What date would you like to depart?
I want to leave on March 6th.
Would you like to fly on an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops, leaving at 1:35 pm for $142?
No, please find another flight.
Would you like to fly on an American Airlines flight with 1 stop, leaving at 4:25 pm for $257?
No, please find another flight.
Would you like to fly on a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops, leaving at 10:05 pm for $164?
Okay.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
I'm going to go on a business trip and need a one way flight.
When would you like to leave?
I'd like to fly out on March 9th.
What city would you like to fly out of? What is the destination?
I'm looking to fly out from Phoenix, AZ and go to ATL on Southwest Airlines, Economy seating.
I found 1 flight on Southwest Airlines for $146. Take off is at 10:55 pm and 0 stops.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a good day.
I'd like to locate a one way flight to Toronto, Ontario.
Which city are you departing from? What date would you like to travel?
I want to book my flight for this Saturday from Seattle, WA. Any ticket class works for me.
I have found 5 flights for you. Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines? That flight departs at 8:25 am. It has 1 stop. The ticket price is $262.
How many passengers did you book this for?
It is for 1 traveler.
Ok, thank you, that is all I need.
Have a good day.
Can you please get me a one way plane ticket?
Absolutely, where will you depart from? What is your destination and do you know the date you want to go?
I have to have 2 tickets to Las Vegas on 4th of March on Economy. I'll be leaving KL.
Simple enough. I have 2 options. How would you enjoy American Airlines? It takes off at 1:45 pm, has 1 stop but the cost is $415.
Is this one of those redeye trips? When will I arrive?
No, it's not an overnight flight. It gets there at 9:35 pm.
That's great information.
Good, have a good time.
I need a one way flight, preferably an Economy class ticket for the 3rd of March, please.
Which destination do you desire?
I need to fly from Chi-town to Paris, France and prefer to fly with United Airlines.
I have found 1 flight for you with United Airlines. It is for March 3rd at 3:15 pm with only 1 stop and is priced at $323.
Where would I be landing, and did I mention that I needed it for 5 passengers?
You would be flying into Charles de Gaulle International Airport, but is for only 1 passenger.
Okay, thanks.
Will there be anything else for you today?
No, thank you. I appreciate your assistance.
Have a great day!
I need a one way flight
Ok, which date and what is your departure location?
I want to travel on the 12th of this month from SD. Economy ticket please.
Where are you flying to?
Arrival into SF. 1 ticket please.
I have found a flight with Alaska Airlines. It leaves at 11:10 am with 0 stops. It costs $99
Ok, thank you. That's all.
Have a good day.
Where can I find a one way flight?
What cities do you plan to leave from and go to?
Look for a flight from Los Angeles to Portland, OR
What day do you want to travel?
I'll be leaving Los Angeles on the 6th
Alaska Airlines leaves at 7:25 am, has 0 stops, and costs $144. Does this sound good?
That's great. Thanks.
Have a good one.
I want to fly one way from Vegas on the 7th of March, can you help me find flights?
Where are you going?
I'm flying to Los Angeles.
I've found 4 suitable flights. How about an American Airlines flight at 9:30 am, with 0 stops, at a cost of $71?
What other options are there?
How about a Delta Airlines flight at 12:20 pm, with 0 stops, at a cost of $91.
I don't like that either.
How about a Southwest Airlines flight at 2:35 pm, with 0 stops, at a cost of $74.
That sounds good.
Anything else you need help with?
No, that's all for now, thanks.
Have a good day!
I planning a trip and I only want a one way flight.
Well where would you like to go? Also, have you figured out when you would like to depart?
I will be flying into SD next week so I would like to start my travel on the 4th. I'm fine with any ticket class.
What city will you be departing out of?
I will be leaving from Atlanta and if possible I would prefer to fly with Delta Airlines.
I found 1 flight that matches your criteria. The Delta Airlines flight takes off at 6:55 pm and has 1 stop. Would you like to take this flight? If so, the ticket cost is $258.
Possibly, what airport does the flight leave from?
Your flight will be departing out off Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Ok, that sounds great.
Can I assist you in any other way?
Nope, but thank you for your help.
My pleasure, have a good day.
can you find me a one way flight?
which date would you like to travel?
i want to fly to NY on 9th of march.
which city you want to depart from?
i want to depart from chi-town. i want two tickets and want to travel on march 14th.
i found 4 flights for you. there is a american airlines which takes off at 12:30 pm and it has 0 stops. the ticket price is $125.
ok thank you. that's all i need.
have a nice day.
I want a one way flight departing from San Francisco.
Where do you want to go and when?
I want to leave on Monday next week and fly to SD.
There are 4 available flights I found. There's a flight on Alaska Airlines with 0 stops that leaves at 6:10 am for $113.
Which airport does it fly out of?
SFO International Airport
Okay.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thanks again though.
Have a good day.
I need 4 tickets for a one way flight.
Okay, what date would you like to travel?
We want to travel to Portland, OR on the 11th.
Which city do you plan to depart from?
We are leaving from Phoenix and I would prefer to fly Premium Economy with American Airlines.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 1:05 pm with 0 stops. The ticket is $237.
Okay.
Can I help you with something else?
No, thanks.
Have a good day.
I want a one way flight to travel.
Form which city do you want to depart and when you have planned to go?
I want a flight to Paris, France. I want to start the journey on March 11th. And I want to depart from SFO
I have found 5 flights. Do you want to travel with Alaska Airlines. It takes off at 10:05 pm. It has 0 stops and the cost of the ticket is $255.
At which time it will arrive at my destination?
It will reach the destination at 8:13 pm.
At which airport the flight lands and how many passengers are travelling in that flight?
It lands at Charles de Gaulle International Airport. It is for 1 travelers
Okay. It sounds great. That's what I needed
Have a nice day.
I would like to find a one way flight.
What city would you be departing from and what date would you like to travel?
I would like economy class tickets for this Sunday. I would like a flight from Washington.
Where are you planning to travel?
I will be flying to Toronto, Canada and I would like to use Southwest Airlines.
I found 1 flight with Southwest Airlines that match your criteria. The flight takes off at 4:40 am and has 0 stops. The total cost of this ticket is $106.
Okay thank you, that is all I need right now.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
Can you look for a one way flight?
Where will you be going?
Las Vegas to Delhi, India.
When are you leaving?
There will be two people and we're leaving on March 4th.
I found 2 flights with 1 stop. It's with American Airlines and will take off at 10:55 am. It costs $321.
Okay. Thanks, that's all.
Have a good day.
I would like to find a one way flight please.
On what date would you like to travel on?
I would like to start my travel itinerary on the 1st of March.
An to what location are you planning to go?
I would like to fly with Southwest Airlines and I want to go to Phoenix.
Can you please tell me which city that you want to depart from?
Yes, I want you to loo for flights from Vegas.
And you would like to fly with Southwest Airlines? I have a flight that takes off at 6:25 PM. There are 0 stops with this flight. The ticket cost is $89.
At what time does the flight arrive at my destination?
The flight will arrive at 7:39 pm.
Ok, thank you, that is all I need for the moment.
Have a good day, bye.
I want to find a one way flight
What date would you like to travel?
the 10th of this month
Which city do you want to depart from?
I am flying from Vegas to LAX.
I found 4 flights for you. Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight leaves at 9:30 am. The flight has 0 stops. The ticket costs $80.
Ok.
Can I help you with something else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a good day
Can you get me a one way flight?
From where to where? What dates are you travelling?
From Philadelphia to Nairobi. I leave next Tuesday.
There are 4 flights available. American Airlines has a flight at 4:45 pm with 1 stop. It costs $346.
Find another ticket.
How about Delta Airlines? There is a flight at 4:40 pm with 1 stop. It costs $342.
Thanks. That is all.
Ok. Goodbye.
I want to find a one way flight to San Francisco in Economy class.
What city do you want to leave from?
I want to leave from Toronto, Ontario.
What date would you like to depart on?
I want to leave on the 7th of March. I'd prefer to fly with Delta Airlines.
I found a flight with Delta Airlines. It takes off at 7:15 am and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $237.
Ok, that's all I needed.
Alright, have a great day!
I need to travel to Seattle, WA on Thursday next week.
Where are you leaving from?
I'll leave from Atlanta, GA and I want to fly Economy with Delta Airlines.
Okay. I've found a Delta Airlines flight that takes off at 4:20 pm. I inform you that the flight has 0 stops and that the ticket is $197.
Which airport does the flight leave from?
It leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Good.
Do you need more assistance?
No, it's fine.
Have a great day.
Hello, I am wanting to book a one way flight.
Ok, I can help you with that. What city are you departing from?
I am leaving from Chi-town. I will need to book 3 tickets. My wife and son are coming with me.
Ok what date are you planning on flying? Also, I will need to know your destination.
We are flying Atlanta, GA on the 4th.
There is an American Airlines flight 8:40 pm with 0 stops that costs $108. Will that work for you?
I don't know. Is that a redeye flight?
No, it is not an overnight flight.
Which airport will that flight be departing from?
It takes off from O'Hare International Airport.
Can you find something else. I'm just wondering if there is something that will work out better for us.
Sure there is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves 8:30 am with 0 stops. This flight costs $100.
Maybe, are there any other flights. I want Economy class tickets. Is there anything leaving from San Fran.
OK, there is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 1:35 pm with 1 stop. This flight will cost $252 per ticket.
OK, that one will work.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thanks for your help.
No problem, have a great day.
I am looking for a one way flight that leaves later today.
Which city will you be departing from? Do you have a destination you would prefer to go?
I'll be leaving from New York and flying to Washington. I would prefer to fly with united Airlines.
I've found 1 flight for you. The flight will be via United Airlines and departs at 5:10 am with 0 stops. The cost for the ticket is $90.
Okay.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you for your help.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
I want to find a one way flight.
Where are you planning to go?
I'm looking for a flight from London to washington. Can you find me Economy Class tickets?
What date would you like to travel?
March 2nd is when I want to start my travel.
Found a ticket through British Airways that takes off at 9:15 am. The cost is $254 and has only 1 stop.
That is all I need. Thank you.
Have a good day.
I want to find a one way flight
Where are you leaving from?
I need 4 tickets from Philly
To which place?
To Nairobi, Kenya
What date do you want to leave?
I want to leave on the 12th
Would you like the American Airlines flight with 1 stop that leaves at 4:45 pm? It costs $340
Find me something else, Delta Airlines instead, economy tickets.
I found 1 flight with Delta Airlines with 1 stop for $338. It leaves at 4:40 pm
When does it arrive at my destination? Is this a red eye?
It is an overnight flight that arrives at 5:57 pm
Ok that's all, thanks
Have a good day
I want to buy a one-way flight ticket, can you help?
Where are you going?
I'm going to SD.
When did you want to go and where do you want to leave from? Do you have an airline preference? Like Delta Airlines, British Airways or any other carrier?
I want to leave on the 6th of this month, from Toronto. Delta Airlines would be good.
To verify: You want to go from Toronto to San Diego next Wednesday. You'd prefer Delta Airlines and you want 1 ticket in economy class.
Yes that's correct.
I have made your reservation.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a great day.
Could you help me purchase a one-way flight ticket?
What time do you anticipate leaving, and what location will you depart from?
I want Delta Airlines. I'm departing from Sydney, Australia on the 11th of this month.
What place do you plan on traveling to?
I am visiting London, England, and am departing from Washington.
Please verify the following information: A flight for 1 Economy seat departing from Washington via Delta Airlines on MArch 11th, headed to London.
Yup, that's perfect. What's its price?
I apologize, but but I could not reserve the ticket. Can I assist you with anything else?
Nope. Thanks for your assitance.
Have a wonderful afternoon.
Can you find me a one-way flight ticket through United Airlines?
Where are you going and where will you be leaving from?
I am going to Phoenix, AZ from LAX.
When is your departure date?
I want to leave on the 11th of March.
Please confirm: United Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Phoenix leaving on March 11th. 1 passenger in economy seating. Is this correct?
Yes, that's great. Can the ticket be refunded?
The ticket is non-refundable. Your one-way ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you assist me in purchasing a one-way flight ticket departing on 5th of March?
Where do you plan to visit?
I plan to visit Chi-town.
Where will you be departing from and do you have any preferred airlines?
I will be leaving from Philadelphia and would prefer to fly on United Airlines.
Please confirm your ticket reservation for 1 passenger from Philadelphia to Chicago on United Airlines next Tuesday. The flight seating class for this flight is Economy.
That sounds great! At which airport does this flight arrive?
Your one-way ticket reservation has been confirmed. The flight arrives at O'Hare International Airport.
Thank you very much!
Do you require further assistance?
No, thank you very much!
Have a great day ahead!
I need a ticket for a one-way flight
What is the departure date?
The 8th, from NYC
What is the destination? Do you have airline preferences?
The destination is SFO and I like Southwest Airlines. I'd like a refundable ticket for two people
Flight from New York to San Francisco, next friday with Southwest Airlines, seating class Economy for 2 people. Do you confirm?
Yes, exactly! I confirm.
Your ticket is booked
What is the time of the onward flight?
It departs at 1:30 pm
Thank you! It's all
Have a nice day!
I am leaving the country soon. Can you help me a one way ticket for the 12th of this month?
What airline do you want to use and from which airport? What is the destination?
I prefer taking Alaska Airlines in Economy, and I am leaving from Seattle and am traveling to NYC.
Please confirm the details for your flight. The flight is from Seattle to New York on Alaska Airlines leaving March 12th in Economy. The number of passengers is 1.
No, there are two people in my group and I would rather take Southwest Airlines.
Please confirm that you want a flight on Southwest Airlines for 2 passengers.
Yes, that is fine.
Your ticket to NYC is confirmed.
Thanks.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is fine.
Have a lovely day.
I'm looking to buy a one-way flight ticket on Delta Airlines. Can you help me?
Please tell me where you will be departing from and where you wish to fly to?
I'm going to be leaving Vancouver for a while to head to Vegas for my trip.
When would you like to leave for your destination?
If everything goes according to plan, I want to leave this Sunday coming up.
You wish to leave Vancouver for Las Vegas on Delta Airlines the day after tomorrow. This ticket will be for 1 passenger in Economy Class seating.
Yep. That's all correct.
Your booking is now confirmed.
Oh I forgot to ask. When does the flight take off and how much does it cost?
The flight will depart at 12:20 pm and has a price of $230.
Everything sounds good to me. Thank you for the help. That will be all for now.
Enjoy the rest of your evening.
We are a group of 3 who want to travel as soon as possible. Please help me to book a oneway ticket
Sure. Please tell me the date and time you want to leave. Where do you want to go? Would you prefer a particular airlines
Yes. I would like to travel with American Airlines. I want to travel to New York City for the 3rd of this month.
Which city will you be flying from?
I will be departing from LA
Allow me to confirm the flight details with you. The flight will take off from Los Angeles and land at New York. The airlines is American Airlines. You will be departing day after tomorrow. The number of passengers travelling is 3 and the seating class is Economy
Go ahead and book it please.
I have confirmed your oneway ticket
Thank you for helping me
Is there anything that I can help you with ?
Thanks that would be it for today.
you have a great day
Can you help me purchase a one way flight ticket? I would like to do some traveling.
I can assist you with that. First, I have a few questions. When would you like to depart and where will you be leaving from?
I'd like to depart from KL on the 3rd of March.
Do you have a preferred airline? Where would you like to visit?
I have a loyalty card for Delta Airlines. I would like to go to SFO.
Okay, you would like to depart from Kuala Lumpur the day after tomorrow. You are looking for a flight with Delta Airlines to San Francisco for 1 passenger in Economy. Is this correct?
That's correct. Can you tell me what the destination airport is?
Absolutely. You will arrive at SFO International Airport. Your oneway ticket has been confirmed.
Which airport does that flight leave from? Will there be any layovers or does it have zero stops?
The flight departs from KLIA International Airport and has 0 stops.
Great! That's everything I will need. Thank you for your help.
You are most welcome. Enjoy your trip!
I need a flight from Las Vegas
What is the destination? What is the departure date?
Phoenix on March 11th
Do you prefer United Airlines, Southwest Airlines or any other?
I prefer Delta Airlines. I need a refundable ticket
Flight from Las Vegas to Phoenix, with Delta Airlines; departure date March 11th, in Economy class, for 1 passenger. It's correct?
Yes, it is
Your flight is confirmed
Are there intermediate stops? What is the ticket cost?
0 stops. The ticket costs $80
Thanks
Can I help you again?
No, thanks
Have a nice day
I am about to go on a trip and would like to buy a oneway ticket.
When would you like to leave?
I would like to travel on the 1st of this month on Economy class.
Where would you like to go and where would you be traveling from? Is there any particular airline?
I would be leaving SD and going to CDMX. I would like a flight on Alaska Airlines.
I would like to confirm the following information: you would be flying from San Diego to Mexico City on Alaska Airlines. You leave today on Economy class. The flight is for 1 passenger.
That's incorrect. I want to travel Premium Economy and depart on the 10th.
I would like to confirm the following: you leave on March 10th, traveling via Premium Economy.
That would be awesome. The flight would be leaving which airport?
I have confirmed your oneway ticket. The flight leaves SAN International Airport.
What time does the onward flight depart?
It leaves at 3:20 pm.
I appreciate the assistance. I do not need anything else.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you help me buy a one way flight ticket?
Where will you be departing from? Were you wanting a flight from Southwest Airlines, Delta Airlines, or do you have any other preferred airline?
I prefer United Airlines, and I'm departing from Seattle.
When would you like to leave, and where will you be going?
It will be just one person to Atlanta, GA next Thursday.
Okay, the flight is from Seattle for 1 person on Economy with United Airlines, departing next Thursday to Atlanta. Is this correct?
Yes.
Your one way ticket has been purchased.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Soon I will be travelling. Can you please assist me in buying a oneway flight ticket?
Any preferred airline you are looking out for? What will be your place of departure?
I will be departing from SF. My expected date of departure is March 3rd and I would like to travel in Southwest Airlines.
Which place are you planning to visit?
I would like to travel in Premium Economy and I am travelling to Toronto, Canada.
I would like you to please confirm the following details. You are departing from San Francisco and will be Toronto. Your airline is Southwest Airlines and you are departing day after tomorrow. Your seating class is Premium Economy and total number of passengers is 1.
No. I would like to travel by Economy class and there are four people travelling in my group.
So, your seating class is Economy and there are total of 4 passengers.
Yes. Perfect.
Oneway ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks for your assistance.
is there anything else I can help you with?
Nothing at the moment. Thanks for your assistance.
Great. Have a nice day.
I want to travel. Can you help me find a one-way flight ticket?
When do you plan to depart? Do you have any preferred airlines, such as British Airways, Alaska Airlines or any other airline? From which location will you be departing from?
I am leaving from Atlanta and I want a flight with American Airlines. I plan to leave on the 9th.
Which location do you plan to visit?
I want to travel to SF and I want Economy class.
Please confirm the following information: The flight will depart from Atlanta. The flight will depart to San Francisco. The airlines is American airlines. The departure date is March 9th. The seating class is Economy. There is 1 passenger in your party.
No, I want to leave on March 10th.
Please confirm the following information: The departure date is March 10th. The seating class is Economy.
Yes, exactly.
Your airline ticket is confirmed.
Yes, thank you.
Have a fantastic day.
I want to go traveling soon. Can you help me buy a oneway flight ticket?
From where will you be leaving?
I want to leave from SD and fly to New Delhi. Are there tickets available for United Airlines?
When will you depart?
I plan to leave on the 6th of March and have three people in my group.
Just to make sure: You want a flight from San Diego to Delhi next Wednesday. You will be flying in a group of 3 on United Airlines in the Economy class.
Sounds perfect!
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you so much!
Can I assist you further?
Nope! That's all.
Have a great day!
I am traveling to Chicago soon. Can you please assist me in booking a one-way flight ticket?
What city will you be leaving from?
There will be two people in my group and we will be leaving from London, England.
What date do you plan on leaving? Do you have an airline you would prefer? May I suggest Alaska Airlines or Southwest Airlines?
We will be leaving later today. I'd really prefer Delta Airlines, please.
Please confirm the following details: Your flight will depart today from London, England and arrive in Chicago via Delta Airlines. The seating class will be Economy for a total of 2 passengers.
No thank you. I would greatly prefer Southwest Airlines and leave on March 2nd.
Please confirm the updated details: Your flight will be via Southwest Airlines and will depart tomorrow.
Yes, that's great. When will the onward flight depart?
I'm sorry I couldn't book the flight. Can I help you with anything else?
No, that is all. Thank you for your help.
Have a wonderful day!
Soon, I will be travelling. I would like you to please assist me in buying a oneway flight ticket. There are total of one people in my group.
Are you looking for any preferred airlines?
I would like to prefer United Airlines. For me economy or business,anything is fine.
What is your expected schedule for departure?
I would be travelling to sydney and would be leaving on 3rd of this month.
From which place are you leaving from?
I would be leaving from Las Vegas.
I would like you to confirm the following details. Your flight is from Las Vegas to Sydney. Your airlines is United Airlines and you are departing day after tomorrow. The airline class is economy and total number of people travelling is 1.
Perfect. Do flight has one stops? When is the next onward flight expected to arrive?
Oneway ticket has been confirmed. There are total of 1 stop in flight journey. The next onward flight will arrive at 1:32 pm.
Thanks for your assistance.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. I am good. Thanks for the assistance
Great. Have a nice day.
Can you help me buy a one way flight ticket to Sydney, Australia?
Where will you be leaving from, and what day will you leave?
I'd like a Premium Economy ticket from Las Vegas next Monday.
Do you have a preferred airline?
American Airlines.
Okay, the flight will be 1 Premium Economy ticket on American Airlines, from Las Vegas to Sydney, leaving next Monday. Is this correct?
Yes. Which airport is the flight arriving in?
Your one way ticket has been purchased, and will be arriving in Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Hey, I'm in Los Angeles and I need help booking a one-way flight. If you can I would prefer Southwest Airlines.
Okay I can help you but I need a few more details. What date are you looking to fly? Where are you headed?
Great, I need 3 tickets from LA to New York for the 9th.
Okay let me read this back to you-- 3 Southwest Airlines economy tickets from Los Angeles to New York on March 9th. Do you all wish to sit together?
No No No I have my travel schedule mixed up. I am leaving from Nairobi not LA.
Okay let me search again. Economy tickets for Nairobi to New York flights?
Yes that's it. What's the name of the Nairobi airport again? What are available flight times?
Sorry I can't find any available seats on Nairobi to New York flights on March 9th. Do you need help making other arrangements?
No don't worry about it. Thanks anyway.
Anytime, have a good one!
I feel like going somewhere soon. Can you help me buy a oneway flight ticket for four people?
When do you plan to leave and where are you visiting?
I would like to travel to Phoenix on the 8th of March.
Where are you leaving from and what is your preferred airlines?
I will be leaving from KL and I prefer Delta Airlines.
Please confirm that the Delta Airlines flight is from Kuala Lumpur and goes to Phoenix. Also confirm that the departure date will be next Friday and it's for 4 passengers in Economy.
Yes, sounds good. Can you tell me when the onward flight take off is and how many stops the flight has?
I've confirmed your oneway ticket. The onward flight will depart at 0:15 am and will make 1 stop.
Thank you for helping me, that will be all I need.
Have a great day!
I feel like traveling soon. Can you help me by a one way ticket to London?
Do you have a favorite airline? Maybe Delta Airlines or American Airlines? Where will you be leaving from and when?
I am leaving from Washington on Tuesday next week. I prefer Southwest Airlines.
Please confirm the following details: The flight is from Washington and goes to London, the airlines is Southwest Airlines with a departure date of next Tuesday and the number of passengers is 1 with a seating class in Economy.
No. There are four people and I actually prefer American Airlines.
Please confirm the following details: The airline is American Airlines and the number of passengers is 4.
Yes that is correct.
Your oneway ticket is confirmed.
How much is it? When does it arrive?
The price was $331 and the onward flight arrives at 1:37 am.
Thank you.
Shall I help with anything else?
No that is all.
Have a wonderful day.
I would like to travel. Can you help me buy a one way plane ticket on the 11th of March?
Do you have preferred airlines? Try Alaska Airlines, United Airlines or any other airline. Where are you planning to visit, and where will you be departing from?
My preferred airline is American Airlines. I'm leaving from KL and traveling to Atlanta, GA.
Please confirm: the flight is departing from Kuala Lumpur and traveling to Atlanta. You'll be flying on American Airlines, departing March 11th. You'll sit in Economy class. There is 1 passenger.
That sounds good. Which airport does the flight arrive at?
Your ticket is confirmed. The flight destination is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks for your help. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to travel soon. Can you help me buy a one way ticket?
Which airline do you prefer? Where do you want to visit?
I like American Airlines and I am going to LAX.
When do you want to leave? Where do you want to leave from?
I want to leave on March 5th from SF.
Please confirm that you want to leave next Tuesday on American Airlines from San Francisco and flying to Los Angeles. You need 1 ticket in Economy.
Yes, that is good. When does the flight depart? Is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket is confirmed but nonrefundable. The flight departs at 3:50 pm.
Thank you for your help. That is all I need.
Have a great day.
I want to travel soon, can you help me buy a one-way ticket?
Sure, where are you going?
I'd like to go to Washington.
Okay, which airline would you prefer?
I like American Airlines, if that's available.
Where are you flying from?
Portland, OR is the departure location.
Okay, and when are you leaving?
I'd like to leave on March 6th.
Great. Please confirm that you'd like to book 1 ticket from Portland to Washington via American Airlines next Wednesday in Economy class.
That's correct, sounds perfect.
Okay great. Your one-way ticket is booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
No thanks, that's all.
Great, see you.
I'd like to book a one-way flight.
Any particular airline?
Delta Airlines if possible.
Where are you leaving from?
From Vancouver, BC.
And where do you want to go?
Las Vegas, leaving on the 5th of March. Business or economy.
I have an Economy Delta Airlines flight leaving Vancouver for Las Vegas next Tuesday. Is 1 ticket enough?
Yes, that sounds good.
I have booked your one-way flight.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Can you assist me in buying a one way flight ticket? I feel like traveling soon.
Where will you be leaving from? Do you have a preferred airlines? Maybe American Airlines, Alaska airlines, or any other airline?
There are 3 people in my group. I am leaving from Seattle, WA. I prefer Southwest Airlines.
When do you plan to leave? Where are you planning to visit?
I am leaving on March 5th. I am traveling to Toronto.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Seattle. The flight goes to Toronto. The airlines is Southwest Airlines. The departure date is next Tuesday. The seating class is economy. The number of passengers is 3.
Yes that sounds good.
Your one way ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Hello. Can you please help me in purchasing a one way flight?
Yes, do you have a preferred airline? Maybe American Airlines, United Airlines or another one? Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from ATL and traveling to London, England. I prefer Delta Airlines.
When are you planning on leaving?
I am leaving this Saturday.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a one way flight from Atlanta to London on Delta Airlines departing tomorrow. The seating class is Economy and this is for 1 passenger.
No, there are 2 people traveling and I am leaving today.
Please confirm the following: The departure date is today and the number of passengers is 2.
Yes, that is correct. How much does the flight cost and what airport is the flight departing from?
The one way tickets are confirmed. The price per ticket is $242 and the flight is departing from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thank you, that is all that I need.
Thank you and have a wonderful day.
I would like to travel soon. Can you assist me with buying a one way flight ticket?
Where will you be leaving from and when do you plan to leave? Do you have any preferred airlines such as United Airlines, Air Canada, or any others?
I will be leaving from Seattle on the 6th. I prefer to use Southwest Airlines.
Where are you planning to visit?
I will be traveling to Las Vegas and I would actually prefer to use Delta Airlines.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Seattle to Las Vegas. The airline is Delta Airlines and the date of the departure is next Wednesday. The seating is economy class and there is 1 passenger.
Yes that sounds good. Which airport doe the flight arrive in and how much will the ticket cost?
I'm sorry, I couldn't book the ticket. Is there anything else I can help you with?
I want to continue to make the reservation. I will be leaving on the 8th of March.
Please confirm the following: the flight is from Seattle to Las Vegas. The airline is Delta Airlines. The departure date will be next Friday. The seating is economy class and there is 1 passenger.
Yes that sounds good.
Your one way ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that'll be all. Thank you again for your help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I want to travel soon. Maybe next Friday. Find me a one way ticket
Any preferred airlines?
I prefer Alaska Airlines
Where will you leave from?
I'll come from Portland
Where are you planning to go.
I'm planning to go to LA with 4 people
Confirming 4 economy tickets for next Friday from Portland to Los Angeles on Alaska Airlines.
Yes that's good. What airport do we leave from?
You leave from PDX International airport. Your one way ticket is confirmed
Thanks, that's all I need
Have a wonderful day
I'm going to travel soon, and I need a ticket for a one way flight from Phoenix.
Is there an airline preference? Maybe Air France, Alaska Airlines, or anything else?
I prefer American Airlines.
Where are you visiting? When will you leave?
I'm going to Seattle and I'm leaving on the 3rd.
Ok, please confirm the flight is from Phoenix to Seattle, on American Airlines the day after tomorrow. It is for Economy class with 1 passenger.
Yes that's all correct. When does the onward flight arrive? Is it a refundable ticket?
Your one way ticket is confirmed. The ticket is not refundable, sorry. The onward flight arrives at 2:47 pm.
Thank you, that's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me a oneway Delta Airlines flight ticket?
When do you plan to depart? Where do you plan to depart from? What is your destination?
I am leaving on the 13th of March from Atlanta, GA. My destination is London, England.
Please confirm the following information: The flight departs from Atlanta and has a destination to London. The flight will depart on March 13th. The ticket is Delta Airlines Economy for 1.
I am leaving from Phoenix.
Please confirm the following information: flight departs from Phoenix and includes 1 passenger.
Yes that is correct.
My apologies, I could not book this ticket. Is there anything else I can do for you?
I would like to still make a reservation. I am traveling to Seattle, WA.
Please confirm the following information: 1 Delta Airlines Economy ticket departing on March 13th from Phoenix with a destination of Seattle.
Yes that is correct.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you.
Have a great rest of your day.
I'd like to book a one-way flight.
Where are you leaving from and where do you want to go?
I'm going from San Francisco to San Diego.
When do you want to leave? And particular airline?
I want to leave Friday next week, preferably with Delta Airlines.
So you need 1 Economy ticket for Delta Airlines next Friday from San Francisco to San Diego?
Yes, that's right.
Okay, I've booked your flight.
Thank you very much.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can I get a flight ticket to ATL leaving soon?
Who do you want to fly with?
Can I 3 tickets from Vancouver flying with Delta Airlines.
When do you want to leave?
I want to fly on the 11th.
Can I just double check, you want to fly from Vancouver to Atlanta with Delta Airlines on March 11th. If that's correct I'll book 3 Economy class tickets.
No I want to leave Friday next week from Washington.
Can I just double check, you want to fly from Washington next Friday.
That's perfect.
I couldn't get that ticket unfortunately. Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks anyway.
Have a nice day.
I am taking a trip soon. Can you help me buy a one way flight ticket?
When would you like to leave?
I would like to fly on American Airlines. I would like to depart on the 1st of March.
Where would you like to fly out of?
I am traveling from Kuala Lumpur to Las Vegas.
You would like to fly from Kuala Lumpur to Las Vegas on American Airlines. You would like to leave today. The ticket is Economy class for 1 passenger. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct. Does the flight have 1 stop and is the ticket refundable?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. The number of stops on the flight is 1 but the ticket is not refundable.
Thank you. That was all I needed to do.
You are welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I would like to travel sometime soon. Can you assist me with buying a ticket for a one way flight?
Certainly. When do you plan on leaving?
I will be leaving on the 1st of this month and I will be traveling to Philadelphia. I would prefer United Airlines if possible.
Where will you be departing from?
I will be leaving from London, UK.
Please confirm the following details: The flight is from London to Philadelphia. The airline is United Airlines. The departure date is today. The seating is economy and the number of passengers is 1.
Yes that sounds good.
Your one way ticket is confirmed.
Which airport does the flight depart from?
The flight departs from Heathrow International Airport.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that will be all. Thank you again.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Hello! I am looking to travel with Delta airlines. Can you help me find a oneway ticket?
Absolutely. Where will you be departing from?? Do you have a date in mind? Which day are you interested in?
I'd like to depart from Atlanta, GA on the 11th of March to travel to San Francisco.
Is this correct: You'd like 1 Economy ticket on Delta Airlines for a March 11th departure from Atlanta to San Francisco. Is this correct?
That's correct. Can you tell me if there are any layovers or are there zero stops? What time can I expect to arrive in San Francisco?
Your ticket is confirmed. The ETA is 3:16 pm with 0 stops.
Sounds good. Thank you so much.
You are welcome. Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, that's everything.
Hope you have a pleasant day.
I am in a mood for holiday and want you to buy me a oneway flight ticket from Vancouver.
Would you tell me about the airlines you prefer, like Alaska Airlines, Air Canada or any other airlines? Also when are you leaving and where do you want to go?
We are three people and we leave on Monday next week. I would choose Air Canada and I am going to Vegas.
Help me verify these details. You are taking a flight from Vancouver to Las Vegas. You want to fly with Air Canada and the date of departure is next Monday. You will be flying Economy and the number of passengers will be 3.
No I want to go to Philadelphia instead.
Ok. So you want a flight to Philadelphia with Air Canada?
That is right. What airport is this flight be departing from?
I am so sorry that I couldn't book your ticket. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Thank you.
Have a nice day!
I'd like to take a trip soon and I need your help buying a one way plane ticket.
Is there any airline that you like?
I'm partial to Southwest Airlines.
What date will you be departing?
I'm going to leave on the 1st of March.
And where do you plan on going?
I'll be heading to LA. I want to leave on Tuesday next week.
And what city will you be departing from?
I'm going to be travelling from Portland, OR. Oh, I also want to travel Economy.
Okay, so you will be leaving from Portland to Los Angeles on Southwest Airlines next Tuesday. And you want 1 seat in Economy, is that correct?
Yeah, that's right. Can you tell me which airport I'll be leaving from, and what time is take off for my onward flight?
You'll be leaving from PDX International Airport and the flight departs at 4:55 pm. Your oneway ticket has been booked.
Cool, thanks for the assistance. That'll be all.
Okay, have a great day.
I want to travel soon. Can you help me buy a oneway flight?
Where do you want to go and where will you leave from? Do you have any preferred airlines?
I am leaving Sydney and traveling to SD. I prefer Delta Airlines if possible.
When do you want to leave?
I'm leaving March 12th.
Please confirm: 1 passenger flying from Sydney to San Diego on Delta Airlines, March 12th. sitting in Economy class.
Yes that's good. What airport does the flight arrive into?
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed. You will fly into SAN International Airport.
When does the onward flight leave and is the ticket refundable?
The flight departs at 5:50 pm and the flight is nonrefundable.
Thanks for your help, that's all.
Have a great day.
I want a oneway flight ticket to Seattle, WA. Can you please help me?
Sure. Which city would you be leaving from?
It's Portland, OR.
Do you have any specific airline in mind? Like Southwest Airlines, Alaska Airlines, etc. Besides, when will you be leaving?
I'll be leaving on 8th of March. I would like to travel by United Airlines.
Okay, let's confirm the details now. You want 1 Economy class ticket to travel from Portland to Seattle on next Friday by United Airlines.
That's correct. I'd like to know the cost of ticket and whether or not its refundable.
I was able to confirm your oneway ticket successfully. The ticket costs $67, but it is not refundable.
Okay, thanks for your help.
It was a pleasure to assist you. Have a great day.
I'm feeling up to doing some travel soon. Can you help me purchase a one-way flight ticket, ideally from Delta Airlines?
What is your location and time of departure? Where do you plan on going to?
I'm part of a group of 3 that, starting on the 9th of this month, will be traveling from New York City to Philly.
Is the following correct? You are going on a flight from New York to Philadelphia via Delta Airlines. You leave on March 9th, are seated in the Economy class, and are part of a group of 3 passengers.
That all sounds correct.
You now have a one-way ticket for the flight.
Happy you could help me out. That's all I needed from you.
Have a wonderful day!
I want to take a trip, can you help me to purchase a ticket for a one way flight?
Which day would you like to leave? What airport will you be flying out of and which airline would you prefer?
I'll be flying out from Toronto, Ontario on the 13th of this month. I would prefer to fly United Airlines.
What city do you want to go to?
I'm going to Washington.
I found a flight from Toronto to Washington on United Airlines. The flight leaves on March 13th and it's an Economy class ticket for 1 passenger. Would you like me to make the reservation?
Yes that flight will work for me. What time does the flight leave? Can I get a refund for the ticket if I decide to cancel?
I have purchased your ticket. The flight leaves at 11:25 pm. The ticket is non-refundable.
Thank you so much, you've been a great help.
Have a nice day.
I feel like travelling soon, can you help me get a one way ticket?
Where are you leaving from and where and when do you plan to leave?
I'll leave from Vancouver, BC travelling to Washington on the 7th of March
Do you prefer any airline? Maybe Alaska Airlines or United Airlines perhaps?
I prefer delta airlines, either business or economy is fine. I need four tickets
Please confirm that you need 4 economy tickets for next Thursday via Delta Airlines from Vancouver to Washington?
Actually I prefer American Airlines, and to leave from Vegas
OK so a flight from Las Vegas via American Airlines?
Yes, how much is that?
Sorry I couldn't book it, can I help with anything else?
No that's all
Have a wonderful day
I will be traveling soon and I'll need 2 one way flight tickets, Economy class.
I need to know when you plan to go and if you have a favorite airline. May I suggest Southwest Airlines, Delta Airlines or another?
My preferred airline is Southwest Airlines. I plan to leave on the 2nd of this month.
What are your departure and destination points?
I want to go to San Fran out of New York City.
I have 2 Economy tickets on Southwest Airlines from New York to San Francisco leaving tomorrow. Is that right?
Yes, sounds great. Are those tickets refundable?
The one way ticket is bought and yes the ticket is refundable.
When does the departing flight depart?
The flight departs at 1:30 pm.
Thank a lot that's all for now.
Enjoy your day.
I would like a one way from to NY please.
What is the date of the flight and where do you want to leave from? Is it ok a flight from United Airlines, Delta Airlines or other airlines?
I would like it to be from American Airlines for tomorrow. I would be leaving from Chi-town.
Please confirm 1 Economy class flight ticket to New York for tomorrow. Leaving from Chicago. The airline is American Airlines.
That is correct.
Your ticket is already booked.
That would be all.
Have a great day.
We, two of us would be leaving from SFO. Please can you help me in buying a one way flight ticket?
Do you need any particular airlines like British Airways, Air Canada or any other airlines?
Delta Airlines would be of my choice.
when are you planning to leave?
I will be leaving on March 13th.
Where you plan to visit?
I am planning to travel from New York City to LA.
Please confirm the booking details - You have booked in Delta Airlines in Economy class for 2 passengers that would fly from New York to Los Angeles and the departure date will be on March 13th.
Yup! Sounds good!
You are done with your oneway ticket.
Is it a refundable or nonrefundable ticket?
Sorry that it is a not refundable ticket.
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any further assistance?
Nope! Thank you so much.
Have a fantastic day.
I'm in the mood to travel. Do you know a good place i can buy a oneway ticket?
If you're coming over, did you have any preferred atilines? And when were you planning to leave?
I like traveling Economy especially American Airlines. I'm planning on traveling to Phoenix, AZ on 7th of this month.
Where will you be leaving?
I'm getting away from San Diego
There will be 1 passenger on the flight from San Diego to Phoenix.The economy class seating on American Airlines will leave next Thursday.
Sounds great.
You've been approved for your oneway ticket.
Which airport are you landing at?
we're headed to the Sky Harbor International Airport
Before we leave, are there going to be 0 stops?
There are 0 stops and we're leaving at 3:15 pm.
Thanks for everything. That'll be all.
Enjoy your day.
I'm feeling up to doing some traveling. Can you help me get a one-way flight ticket to Paris, France?
At what time do you plan on departing?
I will be leaving from San Francisco on the 9th of this month.
Do you prefer a specific airline?
I'd like it to be Alaska Airlines.
Can you confirm the following for me? Your Alaska Airlines flight for 1 passenger goes from San Francisco to Paris. It departs on March 9th, and is in the Economy seating class.
That all sounds good to me.
I have confirmed your one-way ticket.
Is it possible for me to get a refund on the ticket? At what time does the onward flight arrive.
I'm sorry to say you cannot refund the ticket. The onward flight will arrive at 8:13 pm.
Appreciate the help. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day!
I'm looking to go on vacation soon. Could you help me buy a one-way flight ticket?
Where would you like to travel to?
Paris, France.
When and from where are you leaving?
I'm leaving from Chi-town on the 9th of this month.
Do you have a preferred airline like Alaska Airlines or Southwest Airlines?
Yes, Delta Airlines.
I have found an Economy ticket for 1 passenger from Chicago to Paris on March 9th via Delta Airlines. Is this correct?
Yes.
Alright. I've purchased the ticket.
Thanks.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
You can help me to buy a flight ticket?
On what date and leaving from?
I would like to go from Phoenix, AZ in March 12th
You like Southwest Airlines, United Airlines or any other and where are you like to visit?
I want to go to Paris with American Airlines at Premium Economy
The flight is from Phoenix and go to Paris whit American Airlines on March 12th in class Premium Economy for 1 person
Yes is perfect .Tell me when will arrive?
Was successful confirmed ,will arrive at 11:18 am
Thank you very much!
Have a great day!
I'm in the mood to travel pretty soon. Can you help me to find a ticket to buy for a oneway flight?
What is your point of departure?
I will be flying out of Seattle.
Where is your destination? Is there one airline you would like to have most? What is the date of your departure?
I want to fly in Economy. My departure date is March 13th. I would like United Airlines. I will be going to San Diego.
Tell me if I have these details right: the flight leaves from Seattle. The flight ends up in San Diego. The flight will be on United Airlines. The date it will be leaving is March 13th. The seat is in Economy. There will be 1 passenger.
Yes, that sounds fine to me. Will the ticket be refundable?
The oneway ticket is confirmed for you. But sorry to say, the ticket is not refundable.
Thanks very much for helping me.
Is there anything else you need help with?
No that's all. Thanks very much for your help.
Have a great day.
I am planning to travel soon. I would like some help buying a one way flight ticket.
When would you like to leave? Is there a particular airline you prefer, for example Air Canada, British Airways, and so on?
Yes, I prefer Delta Airlines. I am leaving on March 12th.
Where will you be departing from, and where would you like to travel?
I am leaving from SD and traveling to London, UK.
You would like to book 1 Economy Class seat on Delta Airlines from San Diego to London on March 12th, is this correct?
Yes, that sounds good.
Sorry, I was not able to book the ticket. Is there anything else I can help you with?
I would like to continue trying to make the reservation, let's try a flight to SF. My plans may change, so I only want to find refundable tickets.
You would like to book 1 Economy seat on Delta Airlines from San Diego to San Francisco on March 12th, is this correct?
Yes, that sounds good.
Sorry, I could not get you a ticket. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Let's keep trying. Try American Airlines, I also like that one.
You would like 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines from San Diego to San Francisco on March 12th, is that correct?
Yes, that sounds good.
Your one way ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, I'm all set for now, thanks.
Have a great day!
Can you assist me in buying a one way ticket? I prefer Alaska Airlines.
When do you plan to leave? Where are you planning to visit? Where will you be leaving from?
I'm leaving on the 10th. I'm leaving for Seattle and traveling to La. I like traveling in Economy.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Seattle. The flight goes to Los Angeles. The airlines is Alaska Airlines. The departure date is March 10th. The seating class is economy for 1.
Yes that sounds good. Which airport does the flight depart from? How much does it cost?
Your one way ticket is confirmed. The price for the ticket is $197. The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thanks for your help. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to travel somewhere. Can you help me find a one-way flight ticket?
Where do you wish to depart from?
I am leaving from Seattle.
On which date do you plan to depart from Seattle?
I want to leave next Thursday.
What is your desired destination?
I want to go to Chicago and I want to go in Premium Economy, please.
Do you have a preference of airlines?
I want to go via Delta Airlines, please.
Please confirm the following information: The flight will depart from Seattle. The flight will arrive at Chicago. The airlines is Delta Airlines. The date of your flight is next Thursday. The seating class is Premium Economy. There is 1 person in your party. Is this correct?
No, I want to go to Portland, OR.
Please confirm the following information: The flight will arrive at Portland. The seating class is Premium Economy. Is this correct?
Yes, that is exactly what I want.
Your one-way flight ticket is now confirmed.
Thank you so much.
Have a wonderful day.
I feel like going on a trip soon, can you help me book a oneway flight ticket?
Do you have a preferred airline? It might be Air France, American Airlines, or another airline. Where are you leaving from?
I prefer American Airlines. I would like to travel economy class and am leaving from ATL.
When do you leave?
I am leaving on the 14th.
Where are you visiting?
I am traveling to San Fran.
Please confirm the following. One flight from Atlanta on March 14th to San Francisco. You will be traveling economy class via American Airlines for 1 person.
Yes sounds great!
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, thank you.
Have a great day!
I want to go travelling soon, can you help me buy a one-way flight?
Where will you depart from?
I'll depart from San Fran, in a group of three, and I need refundable tickets.
When and where will you go?
I'll travel to Las Vegas on Friday next week.
Any preferred airline?
I'll firstly travel to NYC, and I prefer Alaska Airlines.
So I can book a flight for 3 people in Economy class, going from San Francisco to New York with Alaska Airlines, departing next Friday. Is this okay?
No, I like to travel Premium Economy. Can you search for American Airlines flights?
I'll update my search details with American Airlines and Premium Economy, okay?
Yes, that sounds good. Which airport will I fly to first, and when will the onward flight arrive?
Sorry, but the selected flight was unavailable. Do you want any further help?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a wonderful day!
I think that I will be having a trip soon. Can you help me with buying a one way flight ticket? I think I will be leaving on the 10th.
Is there a specific airline your prefer? It can be something like Air France, Alaska Airlines or some other airline. Which is the destination you looking for? What location will you depart from?
I will be departing from San Diego to go to Las Vegas. I like the Alaska Airlines.
Can you please confirm to me that you want a flight from San Diego to Las Vegas with the Alaska Airlines and with a departure date of March 10th in the Economy class for 1 passenger?
No I will be departing from Washington.
Can you please confirm to me that the departure location will be Washington and you will be flying with the Alaska Airlines?
No there are four people with whom I will be traveling. Also I will be traveling to Seattle, WA.
Can you please confirm to me that the flight goes to Seattle and you want tickets for 4 people?
Yes that is good.
I apologize I couldn't buy the tickets. What else can I help you with?
Nothing. I appreciate your help.
Have a good day.
I need to travel soon. Could you help me find a oneway flight ticket?
Where would you like to go?
I'm going to Paris.
When would you like to leave?
I'd like to travel in Economy and leave on the 8th of March.
Would you prefer a flight from a specific airline?
Southwest Airlines would be great.
Where would you like to leave from?
I'll be leaving from SD.
Please confirm the following: the flight is out of San Diego, goes to Paris, on Southwest Airlines and leaves next Friday. There's just 1 passenger and you want to fly in Economy.
No, I'm leaving out of Vegas and going to Atlanta, GA.
Please confirm the following: You'll be leaving from Las Vegas and going to Atlanta.
Nope. I'm leaving on the 9th of this month.
Please confirm the following: you want to fly in Economy and leave on March 9th.
Yep, that sounds great. When does it leave?
Your oneway ticket has been purchased. It leaves at 2:35 pm.
Thanks!
Anything else for today?
Nope, thanks so much.
Have a great day!
Can you help me buy a flight ticket please? Am leaving from Philly.
When are you leaving?
Leaving on 12th of March to CDMX in Premium Economy.
Any preferred Airlines please?
I prefer Southwest Airlines.
The Southwest Airlines flight leaves Philadelphia to Mexico City on March 12th, 1 passangers in premium economy. Please confirm this details.
Yes, that's correct.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
That's all i need .Thank you
Have a great day.
I'm wanting to travel soon. Can you help me find a one way ticket for my flight?
Sure! When do you want to leave, and where will you be departing from?
I'll be departing from Toronto, Ontario. I need to leave on March 11th.
Sounds good. Where are you going? Do you have any preference on what airline you take?
I'm going to San Fran, and I prefer Air Canada if possible.
Of course! Just to confirm, you want to fly from Toronto to San Francisco. You'll be booking 1 Economy ticket on an Air Canada flight that departs on March 11th. Does that sounds correct?
No, actually, I'll be going to Atlanta. My bad.
Not a problem! So to confirm, you will be taking a flight to Atlanta on March 11th. Is that right?
Not quite. I'm actually going to be leaving from Paris on that day. And I'll have friends with me, so I actually need three tickets.
Okay! So you will be departing from Paris and need 3 tickets for your group. Did I get it right this time?
Yep! Thanks for working with me. How much will the tickets cost? Also, what is the name of the airport we'll arrive at?
Actually, I wasn't able to book a ticket. I think all the tickets out of Paris are booked that day. Sorry about that. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that was all. Thanks for trying.
Of course. Have a wonderful day!
I need to travel. Can you help me get a oneway plane ticket?
Where are you planning to go?
I'm going to Los Angeles
Is there an airline you prefer? I can suggest United Airlines, Delta Airlines or maybe another? Also when do you need to leave and where are you flying from?
I'm flying from Kuala Lumpur on the 4th of March. Delta Airlines would be best.
Please can you confirm these details: the flight is from Kuala Lumpur, going to Los Angeles. It will be on Delta Airlines, departing next Monday. There will be 1 passenger in Economy class.
That's great! Which airport am I flying from and how many stops?
It is 1 stop, flying from KLIA International Airport. I have confirmed your oneway ticket
Thank you, that's it.
Hope you have a nice day!
I'm going to travel soon. Can you help me find a one way plane ticket?
When are you going to leave, and where are you leaving from?
We have two people in our group. We are leaving from SF, and on the 13th of this month.
Where are you planning to go?
We are going to Sydney, Australia, and would prefer American Airlines.
Please confirm these details: you are flying from San Francisco, and going to Sydney. The airlines is American Airlines, and you're departing on March 13th. You're going to be flying Economy, and there are 2 passengers.
That sounds good. Which airport are we leaving from, and which airport will we be arriving?
You'll be leaving from SFO International Airport, and arriving at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Thank you.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me book a oneway flight ticket?
Where would you like to go?
I want to travel to Philly.
What airline would you like to fly with? I can book a flight with American Airlines, Air France, or any other airline. Which airport would you like to leave from? When do you want to leave? What type of ticket would you like?
I'd like to leave next Thursday from Washington. I prefer American Airlines. Both business and economy are fine.
We found a flight going from Washington to Philadelphia on next Thursday. You will be flying with American Airlines and the seating class is Economy. The total number of passengers on the flight is 1. Would you like to confirm this purchase?
I'd actually like to be seated in Premium Economy instead.
We found another flight going to Washington. The seating class is Premium Economy.
Alright, that sounds good. Is the ticket refundable? When does the plane take off?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. The ticket is refundable and the plane departs at 8 am.
Thank you.
Can I help you with anything else?
No; thanks for your help.
Ok, have a great day.
I want to travel soon, can you help me book a one way ticket to SD
When and where do you plan to leave from?
From Vancouver on the 1st of this month
Do you prefer a certain Airline?
Yes, Delta Airlines. I need 4 tickets.
Confirming 4 economy tickets for today from Vancouver to San Diego via Delta Airlines
Actually I am leaving from New York
Ok, so a flight from New York with economy class seating
Yes that's good
Your ticket is confirmed
Thanks, that's all
Have a wonderful day
I plan on traveling soon. Can you help me purchase a flight ticket that is one-way? I will need 4 tickets.
Where did you plan to travel to?
I plan on traveling to SD.
Where will you be departing from and do you have a preferred airline? When is your departure date?
I am leaving from LA on March 12th. I prefer to fly Southwest Airlines.
Please confirm the following details: The flight is departing from Los Angeles on March 12th and arriving in San Diego. You will be flying Southwest Airlines in an Economy seat. I have reserved 4 tickets.
Yes, that sounds correct.
Your four one-way tickets are confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you for assisting me.
Have a wonderful day!
I want to travel. Can you help me get a one way ticket? I'm leaving from CDMX.
Which airline do you prefer?
I prefer American Airlines, Economy if possible.
When are you planning on leaving?
The 6th.
Where are you going?
Paris, I'm leaving next Thursday.
Please confirm: Flight from Mexico City to Paris, American Airlines, Economy. Departure date is next Thursday. 1 passenger.
Yes, sounds good. When does the onward flight arrive?
Sorry, I could not book that flight. Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you for helping.
Have a nice day.
Hello! I need help purchasing a one-way ticket. I'd like it to be with Delta Airlines in economy, please.
No problem! Where will you be departing from, when is the departure date, and where are you planning to visit?
I need to book two tickets. My plans might change, so I need refundable tickets only. My departure location is Vancouver, BC. We'll be departing this Sunday, on our way to Phoenix, USA.
Wonderful! Can you confirm the following details, please? Your flight is from Vancouver and it goes to Phoenix. The airlines are with Delta Airlines in Economy seating. The departure date is the day after tomorrow. The number of passengers is 2.
Yes, that's all perfect.
Your one-way tickets are confirmed!
Thank you! That's all I need.
Great! I hope you have a wonderful day!
I want to travel soon. Please find me oneway flight tickets.
Where will you depart from? Any preferred airlines? For example, Air Canada, United Airlines or something else?
I will leave from Vancouver, BC. I like Air Canada.
Where will you travel to? What date will you leave?
I will travel to Atlanta and will leave on March 6th. I am looking for one ticket only.
Please confirm the following - Departing from: Vancouver, Arriving to: Atlanta, Airline: Air Canada, Departure Date: next Wednesday, Seating: Economy, Passengers: 1.
Yes that's correct. When does the departing flight take off?
Ticket purchase is confirmed. The departing flight takes off at 1:35 pm.
Does this flight have one stop? Is the ticket refundable?
There are 0 stops. The ticket can be refunded.
Thank you.
Do you need anything else?
No that's all.
Have a good day.
I am traveling soon, are you able to help me with an Economy flight to Las vegas?
Where are you going and what are your airline preferences?
Three of us are traveling to Phoenix, AZ , preferably on Southwest Airlines
When are you going?
Im going on the 13th
on March 13th, 3 people are going to Phoenix from Las Vegas on an Economy flight with Southwest Airlines
Thats correct. How much is everything?
The total for a one way flight is $86.
Are there any stops?
No theres 0.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that is all.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a oneway ticket for a trip.
Alright, when do you want to leave and where do you want to go? Do you have any preferred airlines?
I want to leave from Kuala Lumpur on the 10th of this month. I want to travel American Airlines in economy seating.
And where would you like to go?
I want to go to New York City.
Alright, I have a flight from Kuala Lumpur to New York, leaving March 10th. It's an Economy class ticket on American Airlines for 1 passenger.
Alright, that sound good. Is this refundable? When does the outgoing fight take off?
The onward flight departs at 1:45 pm. It is not refundable. I have confirmed your ticket.
Thanks, that's what I needed.
Have a good rest of your day.
I am looking for a oneway flight to NYC. I would prefer Economy.
What time frame are you looking for? and from where?
I'll be leaving from Paris on the 1st of this month.
Do you want a specific airline, like American Airlines or Air Canada?
I like Delta Airlines.
So, you would like 1 Economy ticket for a flight from Paris to New York on Delta Airlines leaving today?
Yes, and which airport is the flight going to?
The flight will be going to JFK International Airport.
Thanks, that sounds great.
Have a wonderful flight.
I was thinking about traveling soon. Would you help me with booking a one way flight ticket?
Of course. Did you have a destination in mind? When were you planning on leaving and where will you be leaving from?
I would like to leave on the 1st of March from SD and going to Chicago.
Did you have an airline in mind?
I prefer to travel with Delta Airlines.
Okay, I have a flight from San Diego, going to Chicago today with Delta Airlines. It is for 1 passenger with Economy seating. Does that work for you?
That sounds wonderful. Where will I be arriving in Chicago, and which airport will my flight depart from?
Your flight will depart from SAN International Airport, and your destination is O'Hare International Airport for your one way trip.
Thanks for everything. That will do it.
Have a great day.
I would like to travel soon. Please buy me a oneway flight to Phoenix, AZ.
When and where will you be leaving from? Do you prefer British Airways or Alaska Airlines?
I will be leaving Vancouver, BC on the 12th. I will be travelling with two other people. Either business or economy class is fine with Air Canada.
Please confirm the following flight information: Air Canada flight leaving on March 12th from Vancouver to Phoenix for 2 passengers in Economy class.
Yes, that sounds correct.
Your oneway flight is confirmed.
What airport does the flight depart from? What is the cost of the trip?
The flight departs from YVR International Airport. The total price of the trip is $204.
Thank you.
How else may I be of assistance?
No. Thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you help me get a oneway ticket from SFO with Alaska Airlines?
I can help with that. I just need to know where you would like to go and when you would like to leave?
Leaving on 12th of March and flying to London, England.
Perfect can I just double check, you would like to fly from San Francisco to London with Alaska Airlines on March 12th. If that's right I can book 1 Economy ticket for you.
Yeah that's great. Where does the flight leave from?
That's your ticket booked. You'll be flying from SFO International Airport.
Awesome, thanks for your help. That's all I need for now.
Enjoy your flight.
I feel like going on a trip somewhere. Can you help me book a one way ticket somewhere?
Sure, where will you be flying from and when? What's your preferred airline?
I'd be flying out of New York on the 14th of this month. I prefer Delta Airlines.
Where are you going?
I'd like to go to Sydney, NSW.
Ok, I'll go ahead and book a flight from New York to Sydney with Delta Airlines on March 14th. Is 1 ticket in Economy class ok?
Actually, can you change the flight date to the 3rd?
Sure, so I'm booking a flight to Sydney for the day after tomorrow. Is that right?
Yes, that's good. When does the flight take off and from which airport?
Sorry, I wasn't able to book the ticket. Can I find something else for you?
I still want to make a reservation. Can you try Alaska Airlines?
Sure. I found a flight from New York to Sydney with Alaska Airlines leaving the day after tomorrow. Is 1 ticket in Economy class ok?
Yes, that's fine.
I'm sorry, it looks like I am unable to book that ticket. What else can I help you with?
No, forget about it. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I am planning for a trip for which I need one-way flights, Can you help me to find one?
When and where will you leave from?
I am planning to leave on 5th of this month from Paris.
To which place do I search for the flight?
Please search for it to Seattle.
An outbound Air France flight leaves at 1:25 pm with 1 stop and the ticket price is $357.
Which is the destination Airport?
The destination port is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport
Can you check whether the ticket will be refundable? Please also let me know the origin Airport.
Sorry, the ticket will not be refundable and the origin Airport is Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Yes, this is okay for me.
Shall I book the tickets for you?
Yes, I need.
Please confirm to book Economy class ticket for 1 person in Air France flight from Paris to Seattle on next Tuesday.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your ticket was confirmed as per your requirement
Thank you for your work.
Any more help you need from me?
No, that's all I want.
Have a good day.
Can you find me a one-way flight for the 4th of March?
Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from Washington and there will be four people.
Where are you going?
I am traveling to LAX.
I found 4 flights. How about an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:45 am, has 0 stops, and costs $184 per ticket?
Are there any other available flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10 am, has 0 stops and costs $185 per ticket.
Which airport does it land in?
The destination is LAX International Airport.
That sounds good. Can you assist me in a buying a one-way ticket?
Please confirm 4 economy tickets for Delta Airlines flight next Monday from Washington to Los Angeles.
Yeah, that sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Which airport does it depart from and is the ticket refundable?
It departs from Dulles International Airport. Unfortunately the ticket is not refundable.
Thanks for the help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you help me find some one-way flights?
Where will you be leaving from?
Leaving from Philadelphia.
Where are you traveling to and when do you plan on leaving?
Traveling to London, England on the 2nd of March.
I found 4 flights. American Airlines has a flight leaving at 10:10 am with 1 stop for $314.
What is the departure airport and is the ticket refundable?
Departs from PHL International Airport but the ticket is not refundable.
Ok, that flight works for me.
Are you ready to purchase the ticket now?
Yes, I am ready.
Ok, you need 1 Economy ticket with American Airlines for tomorrow from Philadelphia to London. Is that correct?
Yes. When does the onward flight arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed and the flight arrives at 3:14 am.
Great. Thank you for your help.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
I would like to book a one way flight for 1 ticket in Premium Economy. Would you be willing to help me?
Where will you be flying and when would you like to leave?
I would like to travel to Seattle, WA on next Tuesday.
Where will you be leaving from?
I will fly from Toronto.
I found 2 flights for you. One is an American Airlines flight at 10:05 am and has 1 stop for $366.
Where does this flight leave from?
The flight departs from Toronto Pearson International Airport.
The flight sounds good to me. I am really looking forward to my trip. Will you help me purchase the ticket?
Please confirm that you would like to fly from Toronto to Seattle on American Airlines, next Tuesday. This purchase is for 1 passenger in Premium Economy.
Yes that sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else you need my help with?
No thank you. You have been a great help.
Have a wonderful day.
I have a trip coming up. Can you assist me in finding one way flights that depart out of ATL?
When do you plan on leaving? Where is the destination?
I am planning on leaving the day after tomorrow. I will be traveling to Los Angeles.
There is an available flight at 9:35 am out of ATL. There are 0 stops and the tickets start at $177. It will be an American Airlines plane.
If I changed my mind, would I be able to get a refund on my ticket? When does the onward flight arrive?
Yes, the ticket is refundable. The onward flight arrives at 11:34 am.
I think that flight will work for me.
Did you want to purchase tickets for it?
Yes, I would like to book a ticket for that flight.
Please confirm the following details: The flight will be departing Atlanta and arriving in Los Angeles. You will be flying American Airlines in Economy seating. You will need 1 ticket and will be leaving the day after tomorrow.
Actually, can I please book a Premium Economy seat?
Please confirm: You will be flying with American Airlines in a Premium Economy seat.
Yes, but I will only need 1 ticket for myself.
Please confirm: Your departure date is the day after tomorrow and you want to purchase 1 ticket.
Yes, that is correct.
Your airline ticket is confirmed.
Thank you for the help, that will be all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me any one way flights to San Francisco?
When do you plan on leaving?
I plan to leave the 14th.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Chicago. I prefer American Airlines.
There's 1 suitable flight. There's American Airlines flight leaving at 7:05 am with 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $191.
Where does this flight depart from? Also, is the ticket refundable?
The flight departs from O'Hare International Airport. Unfortunately there are no refunds.
That flight sounds good. Can you assist me in buying a one-way flight ticket? There will be 2 people in my group.
Just to confirm, the flight is from Chicago and goes to San Francisco. The flight is American Airlines and it will depart March 14th. It's economy and will be for 2 passengers.
No. There's one person in my group and I like to travel Premium Economy.
Just to confirm, It's premium economy for 1 passenger.
That sounds good. Which airport does the onward flight arrive?
You one way ticket is confirmed. It will arrive at SFO International Airport at 9:52 am.
Thanks for you help. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me a one way ticket?
Where are you leaving from?
I'll be flying from Seattle
But what are your travel dates and destination?
I wanna leave on March 8th and going to one of my favorite European cities, Paris
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:15 am and has 1 stop that will cost you $432
Anything else on those dates?
Well there's one Delta Airlines flight that also has 1 stop and leaves at 8:45 am and will run you $426
Which airport does it leave from? And when does that flight arrive in Paris?
It leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and will arrive in Paris at 11:18 am
What other options do I have?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 am and has 1 stop and will cost $384
That sounds perfect
Can I help you with anything else?
How about helping me fine a one-way economy flight
So a economy ticket for 1 from Seattle to Paris on Southwest Airlines leaving next Friday, that's right, right?
Yes that's good. When does that flight arrive, and which airport is it leaving from?
I've booked it! And it arrives at 7:58 am and leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport
Thanks for assisting me
Any more assistance needed?
No, we're good here
Great, I hope you enjoy your trip
I am going on a trip and need help finding oneway flights.
What's your location?
I am in Atlanta.
When are you leaving and where are you going?
There are four of us traveling to Toronto on March 4th.
I have an American Airlines flight with 1 stop for $204. It leaves at 3:25 pm.
Would I be able to cancel and get a refund? And when does the onward flight arrive?
Tickets are not refundable. The onward flight is scheduled to arrive at 8:28 pm.
That is just the flight we need.
Would you like to purchase tickets today?
Yes, please book the tickets for Economy.
Ok, just need confirmation. American Airlines flight with point of origin at Atlanta going to Toronto. Departure next Monday with 4 passengers in Economy class.
That's correct. What are the origin and destination airports?
Ticket confirmed. Destination will be Toronto Pearson International Airport. Flight leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks so much for your assistance.
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
No, that will be all.
Have a nice day.
Please help me find flights because I have a trip coming up, I prefer flights from Delta Airlines.
When are you planning to leave?
I would like to leave on the 12th.
Where will you come from?
I will be coming from Philly.
Where do you plan to go?
We are a group of two persons leaving to New York City.
I found a flight from Delta Airlines that departs at 4:40 pm with 0 stops. It costs $57.
Which will it arrive?
It will arrive at JFK international Airport.
When will be arrive at New York? Is it refundable?
No, sorry but it is not refundable. You will arrive at 5:31 pm.
Can you please check flight from Southwest Airlines?
I have found 1 flight that is best for you from Southwest Airlines, it departs at 7:45 am with 0 stops. It costs $73.
Okay, that sounds good. Please help me book one way flight ticket with Economy seating.
Please do confirm the following details: you will be leaving from Philadelphia to New York. Flight is from Southwest Airlines that will leave on March 12th. Tickets are for 2 persons, economy seating.
Yes, that is right.
Booking has been confirmed.
Thank you, that's all for now.
Have a good day.
I will be taking a trip with 2 people, departing on the 1st of March. Please find me a oneway flight.
What is the destination?
The trip will be to SD and I would prefer to travel Premium Economy. I need to depart the day after tomorrow.
What is the departure airport?
I need to depart from CDMX.
There are 2 flights that meet your needs. One is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 am with 1 stop and the cost is $348.
I would rather fly with Delta Airlines. Please check for any other options and find a refundable ticket.
I found a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 4:40 pm with 1 stop for $411.
Perfect. Please purchase the oneway ticket.
Ok, just to confirm the details. I will be purchasing a oneway Premium Economy ticket leaving the day after tomorrow on Delta Airlines from Mexico City to San Diego for 2 people.
That is correct. Please send me the departing airport and the arrival time.
I have confirmed the ticket from Benito Juarez International Airport arriving at 0:05 am.
I appreciate your help. That will be all.
Have a good day.
Can you get me info. on some flights?
When will you leave? Do you know where you'll go?
I am leaving 1st of this month to go to Nairobi.
From where will you leave?
I'm leaving Atlanta then.
Great, there are 4 choices. How about flying American Airlines, leaving at 3:25 pm with 1 stop? The price for that is $438.
Hmmm, I'm looking for something better, is there a better option?
How about Delta Airlines, leaving 2:10 pm, 1 stop. Their price is $448.
I'd like something different. I like Economy the best.
How would you like Southwest Airlines departing at 1:25 pm with one stop? The cost on that one is $423?
Is that ticket one I can get my money back on if I don't want to travel then?
Unfortunately no. You can't get a refund.
When does that plane arrive in Nairobi? Where will I depart from?
It arrives at 5:57 pm at the Jomo Kenyatta International Airport.
Ok, I think I'll lock in on that option. Get me a oneway ticket.
Fine, just to make sure I'm getting everything right: You'll leave Atlanta, 1 passenger, on Southwest Airlines today, going to Nairobi on Economy.
That's a winner, great.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Great, thanks.
Have a safe journey.
My friend and I want to take a trip. We'd only need a oneway flight for the two of us.
Where do you want to go? Where will you leave from? When would you like to go on your trip?
I am leaving March 9th for SF from Seattle. American Airlines would be my first choice.
There 1 American Airlines flight that fits your requirements. It has 0 stops and leaves at 10:25 pm. It costs $120.
That will work. I want to buy it now. Can you help me buy an Economy ticket?
Sure. Let me make sure I have this right- You'd like 2 Economy tickets on American Airlines that leave from Seattle and to go to San Francisco on March 9th.
Yes, that's correct.
Your ticket is all booked.
Which airport will I leave from for my trip?
You leave from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thanks! That's all I needed to do right now.
Have a great day!
I'm going on a trip soon, can you find me a one way flight?
When do you plan to leave and where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving Las Vegas on the 12th of March.
Where would you like to go?
I'm going to SD.
I found 4 flights that match your criteria. The first flight is an American Airlines flight. The flight leaves at 8:20 am and has 0 stops. The price is $98 dollars.
That flight sounds great. I'm going to be travelling soon, can you buy the ticket for me?
Could you please confirm that you would like a flight from Las Vegas to San Diego on American Airlines. You would like 1 ticket leaving March 12th in the Economy section?
That sounds great, which airport is the flight departing from and when does the flight arrive?
I have confirmed your ticket. Your flight is departing from the McCarran International Airport and you will be arriving at the SAN International Airport.
Thank you so much for your help!
Have a lovely day!
Can you find me one-way flights for a trip I have coming up?
When do you plan to leave and where are you planning to visit.
I am traveling to Sydney, Australia, and I plan on leaving on the 5th of March.
Where are you leaving from for your trip?
I am leaving from NY, preferably on a Economy flight.
There is an American Airlines flight, that leaves at 4:05 am and has only 1 stop, with a ticket price of $376.
Where does the flight arrive for its destination?
The flight will arrive at the Kingsford Smith International Airport.
That sounds all good.
Would you like to buy the ticket?
Yes, please book me the ticket.
Understood, you wish to fly from New York to Sydney on an American Airlines flight next Tuesday, and the ticket is an Economy seating for a total of 1 passengers correct?
Everything sounds good, but is the ticket refundable and where does the flight depart from?
The ticket has been confirmed, and can be refunded if needed. The flight will depart from JFK International Airport.
Thank you for that, much appreciated.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No, everything was answered thoroughly, thanks for the help.
Your welcome, have a wonderful day.
I have an upcoming trip. Can you find me one way flights?
Where are you leaving from? When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving from New Delhi and want to leave later today. I prefer United Airlines and want refundable tickets only.
Where are you planning to visit?
I am traveling to Philly with 4 people in my group.
I found 1 possible flight for you. It is a United Airlines flight that has an outbound flight leaving at 3:40 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket will cost $292.
Which airport does the flight depart from?
The flight departs from Indira Gandhi International Airport.
That flight sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets for it?
Yes, I would like to book the tickets. Either business or economy class are fine.
Please confirm these details: The flight is from Delhi to Philadelphia. The airline is United Airlines. The departure date is today. The number of passengers is 4 people with Economy class.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your one way ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm going on a trip, can you find me a one way flight from Portland, OR?
Where are you planning to go and when do you plan to leave?
My plans aren't solid, so I want refundable tickets only. I'm going to be leaving this Sunday to Vancouver.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:45 am with 1 stop. The price is $216.
What time does the flight arrive at the destination? And where does it depart from?
The flight departs from PDX International Airport and arrives at 3:32 pm.
That sounds great with me.
Shall I buy the tickets?
Yes, book an economy ticket please.
Please confirm these details: Flight from Portland to Vancouver with American Airlines. The departure date is the day after tomorrow for 1 passenger on Economy.
Yes that's great.
The ticket has been confirmed.
Which airport do I arrive at?
You arrive at YVR International Airport.
Thanks for the help.
Is there anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
Have a wonderful day.
I am going on a trip soon, can you find some one way flights?
Where are you traveling to?
I am traveling to Paris, France.
Where will you be departing from?
We are departing from LAX. There are 4 people in my group.
When are you leaving?
We will be leaving on the 11th of March. I prefer American Airlines.
I found 1 flight matching the criteria. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:40 am with 0 stops for $267.
That flight works for us. Can you book the reservation for the group?
Please confirm the following flight details. The flight is departing Los Angeles March 11th and arriving in Paris on American Airlines for 4 passengers in economy.
No, we want the Premium Economy class.
Confirm the following changes. The flight is departing from Los Angeles in Premium Economy.
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully confirmed the reservation.
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you!
Have a great day.
Please help me find one way flight for my upcoming trip on the 14th.
Where will you be coming from?
I will be leaving from Seattle, WA but I am not yet sure of the details so please book me refundable tickets.
Where do you plan to go?
We are travelling to SF and we're a group of 3 people.
I found a flight from Delta Airlines that departs at 7:45 am with 0 stops. It costs $117.
Please help me find flights from united Airlines.
I have found 1 flight that is best for you from United Airlines, it departs at 4:55 pm and returns with 0 stops. It costs $116.
Where will it aarive?
It'll arrive at SFO International Airport.
When will we arrive at the SFO International Airport?
You will arrive at AF at 7:06 pm.
Okay, that sounds good.
Do you want be to book the flight?
Yes, please.
Please do confirm the following details: the flight is from Seattle to San Francisco by United Airlines. You will be leaving on March 14th, 3 passenger in Economy seating.
Yes, that's right. What airport we will be leaving from?
Booking of one way ticket has been confirmed. You will be departing from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Alright, thank you! That's all for now.
Have a good day!
Can you find me oneway flights to Seattle, WA for my upcoming trip?
Sure, where will you leave from?
I'm leaving from Atlanta.
Okay, when will you be leaving?
I'm leaving on the 14th. I'd like to travel in Premium Economy.
Alright. I have 3 suitable flights for you, with the best flight being of American Airlines, leaving at 9:35 pm with 0 stops. The ticket price is $295.
Are there any other flights, preferably in Economy with United Airlines?
Yes, there's 1 flight by United Airlines that leaves at 5:20 pm and has 0 stops, with the price at $187
That sounds good to me. I'll be traveling soon, so can you assist me in buying a oneway ticket?
Sure. The flight leaves from Atlanta, heading for Seattle on March 14th. It's an Economy class seat with United Airlines for 1 passenger, is that right?
Yes, that sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks a lot.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No, that'll be all. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a oneway flight for a trip I have coming up.
What is your starting point?
Getting out of Washington for a bit.
Date of departure?
I need refundable tickets only, in case plans change. the 14th of this month is when I am leaving.
What is your destination?
Chi-town bound! Business or economy will work for me.
I found 1 flight for you. United Airlines outbound flight leaves at 1:30 pm and it has 0 stops. The cost is $117.
What is the arrival time?
2:28 pm is the arrival time.
Sounds good to me!
Want to buy tickets?
Yes, I would like to get a ticket please. 1 person in my group.
Please confirm: Flight from Washington to Chicago on United Airlines. 1 passenger, economy class, March 14th.
Nope. Need tickets for two people.
Please confirm: March 14th departure; 2 passengers.
Yes. Sounds good.
Oneway ticket is confirmed.
That covers it. Thank you for your help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I'm planning a trip pretty soon. Can you please help me book a oneway flight?
Where would you like to fly to and on what date?
I wanna travel to ATL on the 11th if it's posible.
And what is your departure date?
I'm going to be leaving San Francisco.
You have 5 possible options for your flight. One suitable flight is on Alaska Airlines at 3:55 pm and it has 0 stops. The flight will cost you $185.
Okay. That flight sounds like a good deal to me.
Do you want me to book the flight for you?
Please go ahead and book the flight for me.
Tell me if the following details are correct. You wish to travel from San Francisco to Atlanta on Alaska Airlines. The departure date is March 11th for 1 passenger in the Economy seating class.
All of that sounds correct. Can you tell me what airport the flight departs from?
Your confirmed flight departs from SFO International Airport.
Thanks for the help. I appreciate it.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
That will be all for today.
Thank you and have a good evening.
Can you look for oneway flights for my upcoming trip? Any airline is fine.
When do you want to leave and where are you going?
I am going to Atlanta on the 13th.
Where do you want to leave from?
I'm leaving from London, England. Business or economy is fine. There are 2 people traveling.
There are 4 flights that match your trip. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:35 pm and has 0 stops. The price is $210 per ticket.
Are there any other flights that match my requirements?
There is a British Airways flight that leaves at 9:15 am with 1 stop. The price is $339.
Are there other flights that match my trip? I'm leaving from New York.
There are 3 flights that match your trip. There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 11:25 am with 0 stops. The price is $124.
What airport does it depart from and when does the onward flight arrive?
It departs from JFK International Airport and the onward flight arrives at 1:47 pm.
Sounds good to me. Can you find oneway flight tickets?
Please confirm: the flight departs from New York to Atlanta via Delta Airlines. The flight leaves March 13th for 2 people in economy seating.
Sounds great. What airport does the flight arrive at?
Your ticket has been confirmed. The flight arrives at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, that's it. Thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you find a flight for my upcoming trip?
Where is your departure from?
I will be flying out of Portland, OR.
Where are you going?
I want to travel to San Diego on American Airlines.
When are you leaving?
I want to fly on the 12th.
There is a flight with 1 stop on American Airlines that leaves at 7:20 am and the ticket costs $208.
I like that flight.
Do you want to confirm it?
Yes, please buy the ticket.
Please confirm that you want 1 ticket for Economy class on the American Airlines flight on March 12th from Portland to San Diego.
Yes please, which airport does it fly from?
The ticket from PDX International Airport is successful.
Can the ticket be refunded, and when does it land?
The ticket is non-refundable and will arrive at 12 pm.
Thank you very much!
Can I provide further assistance?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I have a trip coming up, can you book me a oneway flight?
Where are you going?
I'm leaving from NYC to Chi-town with two people in my group
When are you leaving?
On March 1st.
I found 4 flights for you. There's an American Airlines flight that leves at 5:25 am and has 0 stops for $137.
When does the onward flight get there?
At 6:44 am.
Where does it depart from? and is it refundable?
It departs from JFK International Airport and it's not refundable, sorry.
Sounds good to me.
Do you need help with anything else?
I feel like traveling soon. Can you help me buy a oneway ticket?
Just to confirm, you want to get a flight for 2 from New York to Chicago from American Airlines today in the economy class?
Yes, which airport does the flight arrive in?
It's been booked. It arrives at O'Hare International Airport.
Thanks for the help.
Anything else?
No that's it.
Have a great day.
Hello, I am hoping to plan a trip for myself but may also arrange it for friends if it works out that there is enough room for everyone. So, I will need 1 oneway flight from NY.
OK, where are you planning on going?
I am going to Los Angeles, if possible I would make up to four reservations if they are available.
OK, what day are you wanting to leave?
We want to leave on the 6th of this month. If United Airlines has flights I would like to use them because I am a rewards member.
OK, it does look like there is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 12:10 pm with 0 stops. The ticket costs $220.
Ok, which airport does the flight depart from and what time does the flight arrive in LA?
The flight departs from JFK International Airport and arrives at 3:20 pm in LA. Does that work for you?
Yes, that works great! Are there enough seats for my group of 4?
Yes there are 4 available. Would you like to book?
Yes, I would. Thanks!
Ok, could you please confirm that you are booking a flight for 4 passengers from New York to Los Angeles with United Airlines departing next Wednesday. These are Economy class seats.
Yes, that sounds great! Also, I can't remember if you told me which airport the flight arrives at in LA. And are the tickets refundable?
Yes, the tickets are refundable and you will arrive at LAX International Airport. I have confirmed the tickets for you.
OK, thanks for your help!
Do you need anything else today?
No, that is all I needed.
Ok, please enjoy the rest of your day!
I need to find a oneway flight for an upcoming trip.
What is your departure and arrival locations and date of travel?
I will be travelling on the 13th from ATL TO Philly.
There are 3 flights matching your requirements. American Airlines has a flight departing at 6:25 am with 1 stop for $150.
Do you have any other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 3:40 pm with 1 stop for $184.
At which airport and at what time does the onward flight arrive?
That flight arrives at PHL International Airport at 8:31 pm.
Perfect. Can you help me book a flight in the near future.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 passenger on Delta Airlines depart from Atlanta and arriving at Philadelphia on March 13th on Economy class.
That sounds perfect!
Your flight is confirmed.
Thanks that is all for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I have a trip coming up, can you find me a one way flight?
Where are you leaving from?
From ATL. I prefet Delta Airlines by the way
When do you plan to leave?
On the 6th of this month
Where are you planning to go?
Going to Toronto
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight leaving at 3:40 pm with 1 Stop that costs $209
When does that flight arrive?
It arrives at 8:28 pm
Which airport does it leave from?
It leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport
That sounds good to me!
Do you want tickets for it?
Yes, just book for one
Confirming 1 economy ticket via Delta Airlines from Atlanta to Toronto next Wednesday
Yes that's right
Your one way ticket is confirmed
Thanks, that's all
Have a good day!
Can you find me a one way ticket on Premium Economy?
When are you leaving? where are you going? Where are you traveling from?
I am traveling from SFO to Toronto, Canada on the 4th.
Alaska Airlines leaves at 4:30 am with 1 stop. This cost $401
Are there any other flights? I want to leave on March 12th.
I found additional 3 flights that are on American Airlines leaving at 7:05 am with 1 stop. The cost is $441.
Any other flights available?
Southwest Airlines depart at 7:10 am with 1 stop cost $436
That sounds good to me. Can you book a one way ticket for me please?
Please confirm your booking detail: Traveling from San Francisco on Southwest Airlines to Toronto on March 12th. This will be on Premium Economy with 1 passenger.
This sounds good, What is the arrival time and what airport will i arrive
Your ticket is booked with destination Toronto Pearson International Airport. Your arrival time is 7:19 pm
Thank you
Anything else i can help you with?
No that is it
Have a nice day
I need a one-way flight.
What is the departure city and the arrival city, and for what date?
I will be going to Seattle, WA and I want to leave next Wednesday.
And what is the departure city?
I will be leaving from San Fran and I want to travel in Economy.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight from San Francisco to Seattle that departs at 2:55 pm with 0 stops. The price of the one-way ticket is $119.
How about the same day from San Francisco to London, England?
There is an American Airlines flight that departs San Francisco at 7:05 am to London, England with 1 stop. The price of the economy ticket is $395.
When does that flight arrive in London? And did you say it departs from San Francisco?
The flight arrives in London at 6:37 am. The flight departs from SFO International Airport.
Are there any other flights? Maybe something that departs a little later in the morning?
Delta Airlines has a flight that departs at 10:05 am. It has 1 stop. The price of the economy ticket is $370.
Yeah, that sounds good. I want to purchase that one-way ticket to London, England.
Please confirm the following: 1 economy ticket, Delta Airlines flight departing from San Francisco next Wednesday and arriving in London, England.
Did you say one ticket?
Yes, 1 economy ticket.
Okay. Just wondering, is that ticket refundable?
Your ticket has been purchased. No, the ticket is not refundable.
Okay. That will work. That's it.
Enjoy your trip.
I need to find oneway flights for a trip coming up.
Where are you planning on going for your trip?
I will be going to NY.
From what city will you be leaving?
I will leave from Seattle on March 8th.
Alaska Airlines has a flight with 1 stop. It leaves at 8:25 am and costs $271.
Is that the only flight? There is just 1 person in my group. Business class or economy are fine.
There are 4 flights I found. There is a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 4 pm with 1 stop. It costs $299.
Are there any flights with Southwest Airlines?
There is 1 flight with Southwest Airlines that leaves at 5:25 am. It has 1 stop and costs $312.
That flight will work. I would like to leave soon, can you help me purchase a oneway ticket?
Is this flight information correct? On Southwest Airlines, you will depart from Seattle and arrive in New York next Friday. You would like to purchase 1 Economy ticket.
That is correct. What airport will I be using for the outbound flight?
I have purchased your ticket. It will depart from the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thank you. That is all I will need now.
Have a good day.
I'd like to book a one-way flight for an upcoming trip.
Okay, when are you planning on leaving?
I'll be leaving on March 9th.
And where are you traveling to and from?
I'll be traveling to Los Angeles from Vegas.
I've found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:55 am. It has 0 stops, and the ticket costs $75.
What airport will the flight land at?
You'd be landing at the LAX International Airport.
Great, that flight sounds good to me!
Would you like to buy tickets for this flight?
Yes, please. I'd prefer Economy seating.
So you would like a ticket for the American Airlines flight on March 9th from Las Vegas to Los Angeles for 1 passenger, and you'd like that with Economy seating. Is that correct?
Yep, that's right.
Your flight has been confirmed!
That's all I needed, thank you!
No problem, enjoy your trip!
I need some oneway flights for an upcoming trip.
Where are you wanting to go?
Los Angeles is calling my name!
Where and when will you be leaving?
March 9th I am leaving from Washington.
I found you 4 of them. American Airlines has an outbound flight leaving at 9:45 am with 0 stops. Costs $221.
Are there any others?
Delta Airlines has an outbound flight leaving at 10 am with 0 stops. Ticket is $190.
When is the onward flight arriving and which airport will it be?
12:45 pm is the arrival and the destination is LAX International Airport.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like tickets?
I like Economy and I need 3 tickets.
Please confirm: Washington to Los Angeles on Delta Airlines. Departure date is March 9th. Economy class for 3 passengers.
Sounds good. Is it a refundable ticket?
Ticket is confirmed, but unfortunately not refundable.
Thank you for the help.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that was all. Thanks for your help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a oneway flight from Las Vegas
Where are you going and when?
I'm going to ATL on the 2nd.
A 1 stop ticket on American Airlines for 6:40 am costs $283
Which airports will you be at?
Leaving from McCarran International Airport and landing at Hartsfield-Jackson international airport
Sounds good to me!
Would you like to purchase?
Yes I would
Please confirm: 1 American Airlines economy ticket from Las Vegas to Atlanta leaving tomorrow
Yes that's great
Oneway ticket confirmed
What is the arrival time?
6:31 pm arrival time
Thanks so much
Is there nything else?
No thank you
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me oneway flights for my upcoming trip. My preferred airline is American Airlines.
Where are you departing from?
I will be departing from Paris, France.
And what date are you leaving and where is your destination?
I am leaving on March 10th and traveling to Los Angeles and I prefer to travel in Premium Economy.
I found 1 flight on American Airlines that leaves at 4:05 am and has 1 stop and cots $538.
That sounds good!
Do you want to buy the tickets?
Yes, I would like to book four tickets.
Please confirm that the flight is from Paris to Los Angeles on American Airlines departing on March 10th for 4 passengers on Premium Economy.
Yes, that sounds great. Will the ticket be refundable?
I've confirmed your oneway ticket but unfortunately is is not refundable.
Ok, thank you for all your help!
Do you need anything else?
No but thank you!
Have a great day!
I'm getting ready to take a trip. Can you help me find oneway flights please?
Sure! When are you planning to leave? Where are you going? Which city do you want to leave from?
I'm leaving from San Diego, on the 1st. I'll be visiting Phoenix, AZ.
Ok, great. There's an outbound Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 5:45 am. It has 0 layovers. The cost is $91.
Which airport does it leave from? When does it arrive?
It departs from SAN International Airport. The flight arrives at 7:05 am.
That flight sounds great.
Do you want the ticket for it?
Yes, I want to book the ticket for that flight.
Ok, great. Please confirm the following details: It's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves from San Diego going to Phoenix. Departure date is today. Number of passengers is 1, in Economy class seating.
Yes, that's perfect!
Ok, your oneway ticket is confirmed.
Which airport will I arrive at? Is my ticket refundable?
You'll arrive at Sky Harbor International Airport. Yes, the ticket is refundable.
Thank you for the help.
Can I help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a fantastic day and enjoy your trip!
I have a trip coming up. Could you find me a oneway flight?
When do you plan to leave? Where are you planning to visist?
I would like to take an Economy flight to Mexico City, leaving on the 13th of this month.
Where will you be leaving from?
I will be leaving from Portland.
I have found a flight with Alaska Airlines that leaves at 7:55 am and has only 1 stop. The price for the flight is $242.
Which airport does the flight depart from? Which airport does the flight arrive?
You will be flying to Benito Juarez International Airport and will depart from PDX International Airport.
That flight sounds good to me. I feel like traveling soon. Can you assist me in buying a oneway ticket? There are 4 people in my group, so i will need 4 tickets.
Please confirm the following details about your trip: you will be leaving from Portland and going to Mexico City, flying with Alaska Airlines which will depart on March 13th, with 4 passengers on an Economy flight.
Yes that sounds good. When does the onward flight arrive?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. The onward flight arrives at 6:53 pm.
Is the ticket refundable?
Unfortunately the ticket is not refundable.
Good to know, thanks for your help.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day, and thank you for booking your flight with us!
I have a trip coming up, can you find me oneway flights?
When and where do you plan to leave from? Where are you visiting?
I'm leaving from LA on the 8th of March and traveling to NY.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight, it leaves at 9:30 am. It has 0 stops and costs $195.
Which airport does it arrive at? And how about the onward flight?
It lands at JFK International Airport. The onward flight gets in at 6:40 pm.
Are there other available flights?
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:20 pm. It has 0 stops and costs $216.
What about other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:55 pm, it has 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $314.
That flight sounds good. Can you help me to buy a ticket.
Can you confirm the following details. The flight leaves fro Los Angeles, goes to New York and Delta Airlines. The departure date is next Friday for 1 passenger and Economy seating.
There are actually 4 people in my group.
Can you confirm that the departure date is next Friday, for 4 passengers.
That sounds good to me.
Ok, your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
Hi, can you help me find two one way tickets please?
Sure, on what date will you be taking this trip, and where are you departing from and where would you like to go?
I would like a flight from Philly to New York leaving the 14th of this month please.
I have located a flight that is through American Airlines. The outbound flight will be leaving at 4:45 pm. This flight has 0 stops and is $60 per ticket.
Are those tickets refundable and what apart are we departing from?
This flight departs from PHL International Airport, and sorry these tickets are not refundable.
Do you have any other flights available with Economy seats?
Yes, I also have a flight with Delta Airlines with 0 stops for $63 that departs at 7:25 pm.
Not a huge fan of Delta, are there any other flights? I am not really concerned about the time.
I have also located a flight with Southwest Airlines with 0 stops. These tickets are $61 and departure time is 7:45 am.
That is the flight I am more interested in.
Would you like for me to make your ticket reservations?
Yes please and thank you.
Okay, I would just need you to confirm 2 Economy class tickets with Southwest Airlines, that will be departing from Philadelphia and going to New York on March 14th?
Yes that is correct. Also are these tickets refundable and when does the onward flight arrive?
Okay, I have confirmed your ticket reservations. The onward flight will be arriving at 8:36 am, and sorry these tickets are not refundable.
Okay, thanks for the help.
Did you need anything else?
Nope, that would be it.
Thank you and have a safe trip.
I have a trip coming up on March 7th and need a oneway flight.
Where would you like to go and from which airport?
I'm going to London, England and I'll be departing from ATL.
We have found 4 options. An American Airlines flight is leaving at 8:40 pm. It is a direct flight with 0 stops and costs $269.
Is that refundable?
No. Unfortunately it isn't a refundable ticket.
What other options are there?
A Delta Airlines flight is leaving at 4:50 pm. It is also a direct flight with 0 stops and costs $283.
That one sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase tickets for this flight?
Yes. Please go ahead and make that booking.
Please confirm the following information: Flight departing next Thursday from Atlanta going to London. An Economy seat with Delta Airlines for 1 passenger.
Yes that works for me. What is the departure airport and when will the onward flight arrive?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. Your flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and the onward flight arrives at 6:54 am.
That's great thanks. I think that is everything I need.
Have a great day!
I would like to search for one way flights for an upcoming trip.
What day are you planning to depart and what is your final destination?
I will be leaving on the 9th of this month traveling to Atlanta.
Where are you departing from?
I will be flying from Toronto, Ontario.
I have located 4 available flights from Air Canada. It departs at 4:40 pm and has 1 layover. The total cost is $207.
That sounds good, can you assist me in purchasing a flight in economy?
Please confirm: Departure from Toronto leaving to Atlanta via Air Canada on March 9th. The number of seats reserved in economy is 1.
Sure that is fine.
Congratulations your seat has been confirmed!
Thank you for the assistance.
Is there anything else I can assist with?
No thank you.
Have a wonderful trip!
I would like to find some Oneway Flights for my upcoming trip.
Sure, Where are planning to make a trip, please mention the destination and departure points? When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving form Washington to Mexico city on the 10th.
There is search results for your requirement, American Airlines outbound flight is leaves at 10:15 am and it has 1 stop. The price of the ticket is $243.
Which Airport does the flight depart from? Does the Ticket refund option is available?
Unfortunately ticket refund option is not available for your trip and the flight departs from the Dulles International airport.
That sounds great.
Do you want tickets for it?
No, I don't.
shall I help you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to search for oneway flights for an upcoming trip.
Where and when are you going.
I'm traveling with 1 in my group on the 10th of this month to NY. I'd like to use Alaska Airlines.
From where are you leaving?
I'm leaving from Seattle, WA.
There is 1 flight on Alaska Airlines leaving at 8:25 am with 1 stop for a total of $283.
Where does the flight leave from? Is it refundable?
The flight leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport but it is not refundable.
That sounds great.
Is there anything else you need?
I'll be leaving soon. Can you help me buy a oneway ticket in Economy?
Sure. To confirm: this is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving from Seattle and going to New York on March 10th. The ticket will be for 1 passenger in Economy.
Yes that's right.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
I need a one way flight for a trip.
Where are you going?
I need to travel to LA.
Where are you leaving from and which date?
Leaving Atlanta, GA on the 1st of this month. But, I need a refundable ticket as this may change.
There are 4 flights. An American Airlines flight leaves at 9:35 am with 0 stops and the cost is $184.
When does the flight arrive?
Arrival is 11:34 am.
What is the departure and arrival airports?
Departure from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and destination is LAX International Airport.
That sounds great.
Shall I book the tickets.
Yes, please do.
Confirming information: 1 passenger for an American Airlines flight departing from Atlanta today and arriving at Los Angeles with seat in Economy.
There is one person in my group and I prefer Premium Economy.
OK, 1 passenger seating in Premium Economy.
That is correct.
Your flight is confirmed.
Thank you very much.
Have a nice day.
Can you find me oneway flights?
Where are you going?
I am traveling to Vegas. I'm not particulaur on the airline.
When do yo uplan to leave.
I'm leaving from Vancouver on the 10th.
I found 3 suitable flights for you. There is Air Canada flight. The outbound flight leave at 4:45 pm and it has 1 stop. The price is $221.
What about the other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leave at 12:55 pm with 1 stop. The price is $199.
How about the other flight?
There is a United Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 6:05 pm and it has 1 stop. The price is $232.
That flight sounds good.
Do you want to buy a ticket?
Yes I would. Make sure it's an Economy ticket.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Vancouver. The flight goes to Las Vegas. the airlines is United Airlines. The departure date is March 10th. the number of passengers is 1. The seating class is Economy.
Yes that sounds good. Whcih airport does the flight depart from?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed, the flight departs from YVR International Airport.
Thank you.
Do you need help with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Hi, can you help me find a flight for my upcoming trip? I would like to leave on Thursday next week and I would like to travel Premium Economy.
Where would you like to go?
I am departing from Seattle, WA. There are three of us traveling and we are going to Las Vegas.
I found 3 flights. Delta Airlines has an outbound flight with 1 stop leaving at 8:45 am. The price is $327.
Are there any other options? I am departing from Chicago and I like American Airlines.
I found 1 American Airlines flight with 1 stop departing at 7:05 am. The price is $398.
Ok, which airport does it depart from and where does it arrive?
It will depart at O'Hare International Airport and arrive at McCarran International Airport.
That sounds good.
Do you want to buy a ticket?
No, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, I'm all set.
Have a good day.
Can you find me a oneway flight to Las Vegas, where I am going on a trip?
Where are you planning on taking off from and what is your departure date?
I am departing from Chi-town on Wednesday next week.
I located 1 flight that meets your requirements. It is a United Airlines flight what leaves at 10:35 am and has 1 stop. The charge for the ticket is $243.
That will suit my needs. I would like to travel soon. Would you be able to help me buy a one way air ticket.
These are the details you need to confirm: The United Airlines' flight departs next Wednesday from Chicago to Las Vegas. Number of passengers is 1 and the class is Economy.
Great that sounds correct. Can you tell me if the ticket is refundable.
Your one way ticket has been confirmed and unfortunately, not refundable.
Thank you for your assistance with all my needs.
Have a lovely day.
Could you assist me in finding a one-way flight for my upcoming trip?
Where do you plan to visit?
I plan to visit Sydney, Australia and I will be departing from Portland on March 11th.
There are 4 flights based on your requirements, one of which is an Alaska Airlines flight which leaves at 10:10 am with 1 intermediary stop. The price of the flight ticket is $323.
At which airport does the flight arrive?
The flight will arrive at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Are there any other available flights for 3 passengers?
Alternatively, there is an American Airlines flight which departs at 7:20 am with 1 intermediary stop costing $328.
What time does the onward flight arrive and at which airport does the flight arrive at?
The onward flight arrives at 9:26 am at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
That sounds good!
Would you like to purchase the flight tickets?
Yes, could you help me to get Economy class flight tickets?
Please confirm your purchase of Economy class flight tickets for 3 passengers on the American Airlines flight departing from Portland and arriving at Sydney. The flight will depart on March 11th.
That sounds good! Is the ticket refundable and at which airport does the flight depart from?
Your reservation has been made. Unfortunately, the ticket is non-refundable. The flight departs from PDX International Airport.
Thank you, that's all the help I need.
You're welcome, have a great day ahead!
I have a business trip coming up soon. I'd like to get a one way flight for the 4th of this month.
Where will you be departing from?
I'm flying out of Vancouver.
Where do you plan to go?
I'm going to Atlanta, and I'd like to go on Air Canada.
There is an Air Canada flight for $201. The flight leaves at 1:35 pm and has 0 stops.
I like the sound of that.
Would you like to book the flight?
Yes, I'd like to book the flight.
Please confirm: departure from Vancouver on Air Canada for 1 passenger, Economy seating, arriving in Atlanta on next Monday.
Sounds good to me. What is the arrival time? Is the ticket refundable?
Your oneway flight is confirmed, with an arrival time of 10:16 pm. The ticket is refundable.
Thanks for your help, that's all I needed.
Have a great day.
I've got a trip soon. Can you find oneway flights? I might change my plans, so look for refundable tickets.
Where do you want to come and go from? When are you leaving?
There are four of us leaving from San Diego to Las Vegas. We want to leave Saturday this week.
There are 2 flights that work. The first is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:40 pm with 0 stops for $83.
What's the other one?
The other flight is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 6:45 pm with 0 stops for $79.
When will the onward flight arrive and what airport does the flight arrive in?
It arrives at McCarran International Airport and the onward flight will arrive at 7:59 pm.
That works.
Do you want to buy the tickets for it?
Yes, buy them for me. I prefer Economy.
Just to confirm, I'm getting 4 economy tickets for the Southwest Airlines flight from San Diego to Las Vegas that leaves tomorrow.
Yep, that works.
The oneway tickets have been confirmed
Thanks for the help. That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me oneway flights? I have a trip coming up and I will be leaving on Thursday next week. Business or economy tickets are fine with me.
Absolutely. Where are you taking the trip to?
I will be traveling to Sydney, Australia. Also, I prefer Delta Airlines.
Great. Where are you going to be leaving from?
I am leaving from New York City.
Alright. I found 1 Delta Airlines flight for you. The outbound flight departs at 7:30 am, with 1 stops. The price for this ticket is $372.
That flight sounds good to me! Are you able to help me with buying a oneway flight ticket?
Just to confirm the flight details: The flight is from New York going to Sydney, on Delta Airlines, in Economy class. The departure date will be next Thursday, for 1 passenger.
Yes, that sounds good! Also, which airport will I be arriving at and at what time?
Great! Your oneway ticket is confirmed! The arriving airport is Kingsford Smith International Airport and you will be arriving at 1:32 pm.
Perfect. Thank you for your help, that's all I needed.
Enjoy your trip and have a wonderful day.
I have a trip coming up. Can you find me some oneway flights? I'm traveling to SFO.
Sure. Where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from LA.
When do plan to leave?
I'll be leaving on March 12th.
There is a Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 5:50 pm and has 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $97.
When does the onward flight arrive? Which airport does the flight depart from?
The flight departs from LAX International Airport. The onward flight arrives at 7:15 pm.
That flight sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets for it?
Yes, there are 4 people in my group.
Please confirm: The flight is from Los Angeles. The flight is going to San Francisco. The airline is Alaska Airlines. The departure date is March 12th. The number of passengers is 4. The seating is Economy.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your oneway ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for you help. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to book a oneway flight for my next trip.
When are you leaving?
I'm leaving on 8th of this month and I wish to fly with United Airlines.
What is your departure city and where are you headed to?
I'm leaving from Philadelphia to Paris.
There's 1 United Airlines flight good for you, it leaves at 12:55 pm and it makes 1 stop. The ticket will cost you $288.
Which airports the flight leaves from and land to?
The flight leaves from PHL International Airport and land to Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
It works for me, can you help me during the buying procedure?
yes, tell me if I got this right. You want to book a flight for 1 passenger in Economy with United Airlines. It leaves from Philadelphia next Friday and it land in Paris.
Yes, you got everything right. What is the time on the landing in Paris?
The procedure is completed, the onward flight is scheduled to arrive at 6:17 am.
Thank you for your assistance. I'm done.
Have a great day.
I need a oneway flight for an upcoming flight.
When would you like to depart?
I would like a United Airlines flight to KL that is departing on the 11th of this month.
Where would you be departing from?
From San Francisco.
There is 1 flight available. It is 1 stop on United Airlines, leaving at 6:25 am. The cost of the ticket is $358.
It arrives at which airport and when does it arrive?
The flight arrives at 7:42 pm at KLIA International Airport.
That flight seems great.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
Yes, I want the tickets for Economy class.
I would like to confirm the following information: the flight leaves San Francisco for Kuala Lumpur via United Airlines on March 11th. The ticket is for 1 passenger in Economy class.
That's incorrect. There are two individuals in the group.
I would like to confirm the following information: the flight for 2 passengers leaves San Francisco.
That seems great.
The ticket has been confirmed.
I appreciate your assistance. That would be all for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I would like to book a one way flight on United Airlines for a trip coming up.
Where are you planning to go?
I am going to New York.
Where would you like to leave from?
I want to depart from Vancouver, BC.
When would you like to leave?
I want to leave on the 9th of March
I found 1 flight with United Airlines leaving at 3:15 am with 1 stop. The ticket costs $337.
When does the onward flight arrive, and at which airport?
The onward flight arrives at 3:12 pm. The destination is JFK International Airport.
That sounds good. Can you assist me in buying a one-way flight?
To confirm, you would like a one-way flight from Vancouver to New York on March 9th. The flight is for 1 passenger, Economy class, with United Airlines. Is this correct?
Yes, that's perfect.
Your flight has been successfully booked.
Thank you! That is all I need.
My pleasure, have a great day!
I'm planning to go on a trip. Can you help me book a one-way plane ticket?
Sure, where to and from? And when do you want to go?
I'm looking for a ticket from Portland to Vancouver on March 12th.
I found 2 options. There's an Alaska Airlines flight at 10:10 am with 1 stop for $221.
What else is available? This is for two people.
There's also a Southwest Airlines flight at 3:15 pm with 1 stop for $244.
How about flights to New York?
There's an American Airlines flight at 5 am with 1 stop for $307.
Which airport does that fly to and when does it arrive?
It would arrive at JFK International Airport at 6:01 pm.
Ok, that sounds good.
Should I buy tickets?
Yes, in Economy class please.
Ok, just to confirm, I'm buying 2 tickets in Economy with American Airlines on March 12th from Portland to New York.
Yes, that's right.
Ok, your one-way tickets have been booked.
Great, thanks for your help.
Need anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
I have an upcoming trip. Can you help me find one-way flights?
Where will you be leaving from? Where are you travelling to? When would you like to leave?
I am departing from Phoenix, AZ on the 13th of this month. I am traveling to Vancouver.
There is an American Airlines flight departing at 7:35 am with 1 stop. The price is $238.
Is the ticket refundable?
Unfortunately, the ticket is non-refundable.
Are there any other flights available? I prefer United Airlines and like traveling Premium Economy class.
I found 1 suitable flight. There is a United Airlines flight that leaves 11:05 am with 1 stop. The price for a ticket is $379.
Which airport will I arrive at?
The destination is YVR International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yes,I would.
Please confirm the following: the flight is from Phoenix to Vancouver and departs on March 13th. The flight is with United Airlines and you have 1 Premium Economy class ticket.
Yes that sounds good.
Your one-way ticket is confirmed.
Which airport will the flight depart from?
The flight departs from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a nice day.
Could you please help me in finding oneway flight for my upcoming trip?
What is your visiting plan? When will you leave and where from?
I am moving to Washington on 5th of this month from NYC.
It is an American Airlines flight leaves at 6:05 am and it has 0 stopping. The cost of the flight is $82.
What is the arriving time of onward flight.
The onward flight reaches at 7:15 am.
It is good for me. Please help me in buying oneway flight ticket for two people. I wish to travel in Economy.
Please ensure that, it is an American Airlines flight from New York to Washington. It departure on next Tuesday. It is for 2 people with Economy class.
Yes. It is good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other help from me?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
Can you find me a one-way flight for an upcoming trip?
When do you leave?
Next Thursday, to Washington.
Where are you leaving from?
KL.
I found 1 flight through American Airlines for $464 leaving at 1:45 pm.
Is the ticket refundable - where does it depart from?
It departs from KLIA International Airport, unfortunately it is not refundable.
That sounds good to be - can you help me get the ticket?
To review: The flight is from Kuala Lumpur to Washington, through American Airlines, you depart next Thursday and there is 1 passenger in Economy.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
When does the flight arrive?
It arrives at 2:55 am.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
I have a trip soon, can you get me some one way flights for March 1st?
Where are you leaving from and going to?
I'm leaving from Atlanta to Vegas. I prefer Economy.
How about a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 5:40 pm with 1 stop? It will cost $237.
Can I refund the ticket? When does the onward flight arrive?
Unfortunately, it's not refundable. The onward flight arrives at 9:35 pm.
Is there anything else?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 6:30 am with 1 stop for $282.
That works, I want to travel soon. Can you buy it for me?
Just to make sure, you want 1 Southwest Airlines Economy flight ticket from Atlanta to Las Vegas, leaving today?
Yep, that works.
Your ticket's been confirmed
Thanks for the help.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that's it for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Need oneway flights...going out of town.
Where and when will the flight leave from? What is your destination?
Leaving Phoenix, heading to Seattle on the 9th of March.
I found 4 that could work. American Airlines flight has a suitable flight. Outbound leaving at 8:40 am with 1 stop. Costs $226.
Are there any others? I am leaving Portland, looking to travel in Economy.
I found 3 s:uitable flights. Delta Airlines has an outbound flight leaving at 9:35 am with 0 stops. Costs $76.
Anything else? I am open to any airline.
I found 2 for you. Southwest Airlines has an outbound flight leaving at 4:40 am with 0 stops. Costs $68.
Is it refundable? Which airport is it at?
Seattle-Tacoma International Airport is the destination. The ticket is not refundable, unfortunately.
I feel like going soon and that flight sounds good. Can you help me buy a oneway flight ticket?
Please confirm: Flight from Portland to Seattle on Southwest Airlines. 1 passenger in Economy class on March 9th.
Need two tickets.
Please confirm: 2 passengers heading to Seattle.
Sounds good. When is the onward flight coming in?
Oneway ticket confirmed. Onward flight arrives at 5:38 am.
Which airport is the departure from?
PDX International Airport is the where the flight departs from.
That's all I needed. Thank you for your help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day!
Can you look for a oneway flight for me?
When do you want to leave and what is the desired departure and arrival location?
Leaving from London, UK on the 12th of this month and going to Seattle, WA.
There are 2 flights. One departs at 3:05 pm on American Airlines with 1 stop with a price of $406.
I prefer to travel in Premium Economy. Are there other flights and i need to leave this Sunday.
OK, there are 2 other flights. There is an 8 am departure ith 1 stop on British Airways with a price of $663.
Can you see if there are any other options?
There is an 8 am departure on Delta Airlines with 1 stop. The ticket costs $667.
That is the one I want.
Shall I purchase the tickets?
Yes, and there is only one in the group.
Confirming information, departing from London to Seattle on Delta Airlines the day after tomorrow. 1 passenger with a seat in Premium Economy.
Perfect, that is great.
You are confirmed.
Thank you very much.
Have a good day.
I need some oneway flights with refundable tickets. I have a trip coming up, but my plans may change.
Where were you wanting to go?
Portland is where I want to go.
Where will you be leaving from? When were you wanting to leave?
Saturday this week I am leaving from New York City. I like Economy.
Found an American Airlines flight outbound at 4:05 am with 1 stop. Ticket is $315.
When does the onward flight come in?
It arrives at 9:55 am.
That sounds like a plan.
Do you want to buy tickets?
Yes, let's book the ticket.
Please confirm: American Airlines from New York to Portland. Departing tomorrow. 1 passenger, Economy class.
No, I have four people going.
Please confirm: 4 passengers departing tomorrow.
Sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for the help.
Is there anything else you need help with?
No thank you. Your help is appreciated.
You are welcome. Have a wonderful day and enjoy your flight!
I am looking for a one way flight.
What is the destination of the flight?
The destination is Sydney, NSW.
When do you want the departure date of the flight and from where will it be departing?
The departure date will be the 4th of March and departing from Phoenix.
There are 3 flights that match your criteria. There is a flight from American Airlines with a cost of $289. The flight takes off at 7:35 am and it has 1 stop.
At what time does the flight arrive?
It arrives at 1:32 pm.
To what airport does it arrive?
It arrives at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
It sound great. I want to buy an Economy class ticket.
Please confirm: 1 Economy class ticket from American Airlines, departing from Phoenix with destination to Sydney. The departure date is next Monday.
I would prefer Premium economy class.
Please confirm: Premium economy class ticket to Sydney.
That is correct. Where does it depart from and is the ticket refundable?
The ticket has been booked. The ticket is not refundable and it departs from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Thanks a lot, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I need a oneway flight Economy.
Where are you flying from?
I am flying from NYC on the 1st of March preferably Southwest Airlines.
Where are you going?
Vancouver but I need a refundable ticket.
There is 1 flight on Southwest Airlines for $295 leaving at 3:10 pm with 1 stop.
I would like to travel soon. I need a one way flight ticket for 3 people.
So 3 are traveling Economy today from New York to Vancouver on Southwest Airlines, right?
Exactly.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Your such a great help.I don't need anything else.
Enjoy the day.
Can you look for one-way flights in Economy for my upcoming trip? I'd like to fly United Airlines.
From where to where?
I'm going from London, England to Atlanta.
On what date?
The 8th of March.
I found 1 United Airlines flight that leaves at 0:25 am. It has 1 stop and the ticket is $378.
Where does the flight leave from? Is the ticket refundable?
Sorry, but the ticket is not refundable. The flight departs from Heathrow International Airport.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to book the ticket?
Yes, please book the ticket.
Please confirm the following details: 1 economy class ticket for a United Airlines flight from London to Atlanta next Friday.
Yes, sounds good.
Your one ticket purchase is confirmed.
Thanks for your help. That's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Im seraching for one way Flights can you help me?
Where do you wanna visit and from where will you be leaving?
Im travelling to Atlanta, GA from London
On which date are you planning to leave?
On 13th of March I would like to take United Airlines in Economy
I saw 1 suitable flights for you which is an United Airlines flight which leaves at 10:25 pm and has 0 stops, costs $244
Which airport does it depart from?
The flight departing from Heathrow International Airport
Is there any refundable available ? WHen is the flight arrival?
No sir there is no refundable right now. The flight arrives at 4:29 am
Thats perfect for me. Can you help me to buy the ticket? I like travelling soon. There are three people in my group.
Please confirm this : The flight is from London to Atlanta , which is an United Airlines. The depature date is March 13th will be Economy class for 3 passengers.
No There are only 1 people
Oh Okay please confirm : The flight goes to Atlanta for 1 passenger
Yes perfect and great
Your one way ticket is reserved successfully.
Thanks a lot for that.
Is there anything should I assist?
No thats all for now.
Have a great day ahead.
Please find me oneway flights in Premium Economy.
When would you like to leave?
I leave on the 4th of this month and would like to fly Delta Airlines.
Please tell me the city you are leaving from and headed to.
I will be leaving from Philadelphia and headed to Atlanta, GA
I have found a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 4:40 pm. It has 1 stop and the price is $275.
What time does the flight arrive? Is that a refundable ticket or not?
The flight leaves at 9:47 pm and is not refundable.
That flight sounds perfect. Could you please buy a oneway flight for me?
I can help but but need to confirm details. You with to leave from Philadelphia and fly to Atlanta on Delta Airlines. You are leaving next Monday and wish 1 ticket in Premium Economy. Is that correct?
That is all correct.
I have purchased your oneway ticket and you are confirmed.
Thank you so much. I don't need anything else.
You are welcome. Have a great day.
find one way flights for my upcoming trip. It will just be me traveling
Sure, but first, can you tell me where you will departing from? and what travel dates did you have in mind and what locations should I search?
I will be traveling to Delhi, India on the 4th of March. I would like to depart form lAX.
i'm showing an Alaska Airlines flight leaving outbound at 5:35 pm with 0 stops for $259
What airport would i arrive at?
Your destination would be Indira Gandhi International airport.
I would like to travel very soon, and that flight sounds great. Can you please buy a oneway flight ticket for me?
Sure, to confirm the details, You will be departing Los Angeles and going to Delhi on Alaska Airlines. Your departure date is next Monday with only 1 passenger with economy class seating.
No. I would prefer Premium Economy seating please.
sure. Please confirm 1 passenger in Premium Economy class seating.
No, I would prefer traveling in Business.
sure thing. Please confirm, Alaska Airlines with seating in Business class.
Yes that is perfect
Your oneway ticket is now confirmed.
Which airport will my flight depart from?
Your flight will depart form LAX International Airport
Thank you. That will be all.
Have a wonderful day
Can you find me a one way flight for a trip I have coming up? I need to leave on the 13th of this month.
From where will you be leaving?
I'm leaving from Seattle, WA. And please find me an United Airlines flight.
Where would you like to travel?
I'm traveling to Atlanta. Also it should be noted that I prefer traveling Economy.
I have found 1 flight that matches your criteria. It is an United Airlines flight, and the ticket costs $303. The flight leaves at 6:15 am and has 1 stop.
Which airport does it take off from? I need it to be close by.
The flight will depart from the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
And which airport will I be flying into? I need to know so I can tell my friends where to pick me up.
The flight will arrive at the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That sounds perfect. Please buy that one way ticket for me.
Please confirm the following: 1 Economy ticket on United Airlines. The flight will go from Seattle to Atlanta on March 13th.
I confirm. Can you let me know if the ticket is refundable?
Your one way ticket has been confirmed, but I am sorry to say that the ticket is not refundable.
That's fine. When will the flight arrive at it's destination?
The flight should arrive around 6:41 pm.
Okay, cool. You've been a lot of help, I appreciate it.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No that will be all, thank you very much.
You're welcome, have a great day.
I have a trip coming up and I would like to book a ticket on a one way flight.
Certainly. Where are you planning to visit and where are you departing from?
I will be leaving from Atlanta, GA and traveling to San Diego.
When do you plan to leave?
I will be leaving on the 13th of March and I would prefer to use Southwest Airlines.
I found 1 Southwest Airlines flight matching your criteria. The flight leaves at 12:05 pm and the ticket will be $257.
Which airport does the flight depart from?
The flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
When does the onward flight arrive? Will I be able to refund the ticket?
The onward flight arrives at 3:45 pm. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
That flight sounds good to me. Can you assist me in buying a one way ticket?
Certainly. Please confirm the following details: The flight is from Atlanta to San Diego on March 13th. The airline is Southwest Airlines. The seating class is economy for 1 passenger.
Yes that sounds good.
Your one way ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for the help. That is all I need.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Are there any flights available for a oneway trip?
Where to? Do you have a particular departure date in mind?
I plan to depart from Phoenix, AZ on March 3rd and I'd like to go to Chi-Town.
One flight from Delta Airlines at 11:55 am departs for $270 and has 1 stop.
Sure that would work. I'll be going on a trip soon and there is only one person traveling oneway.
Just to confirm you would like a flight from Phoenix to Chicago via Delta Airlines and it leaves the day after tomorrow. There will be 1 passenger in the Economy class.
I want Premium Economy please.
Okay, flight from Phoenix in Premium Economy.
There are actually two in my group.
Okay, flight to Chicago with a total of 2 people.
Confirmed.
Your oneway ticket has been purchased.
Okay, great, thanks.
Do you need anything else?
That is all.
Enjoy the rest of your evening.
I have a trip on the horizon. Can you find me a oneway flight to Washington?
Where are you leaving from?
NYC.
When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving on the 9th of this month and there are 3 people in my party.
There is an American Airlines flight. It departs at 10:55 am and it has 0 stops. A ticket costs $85.
When does the flight arrive?
It arrives at 12:05 pm.
Are there other flights open? I am traveling to San Fran and leaving the day after tomorrow.
I found 3 flights. There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 2:35 pm and has 0 stops. A ticket is $219.
Is it refundable and when does it arrive?
It is not refundable and arrives at 6:01 pm.
Are there any other open flights?
A Southwest Airlines flight is open. It leaves at 1:30 pm and has 0 stops. A ticket is $193.
Sounds great! Can you purchase a oneway ticket? I might change my plans, so I want refundable tickets only. Also, I like traveling in Economy class.
Please confirm the flight details: The flight is New York to San Francisco through Southwest Airlines. It departs the day after tomorrow. This reservation is for 3 Economy tickets.
That works fine. What airport does it depart from and when does the flight arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. The destination is SFO International Airport and it departs from JFK International Airport.
Thank I for your help. That's all I need.
Have a nice day!
Got a trip coming up, can you find me a oneway flight refundable ticket.
Where you want to go, when you want to leave and where you leaving from?
Going with four people, I am leaving from KL and traveling to Premium Economy on 10th of this month to Seattle.
There is a outbound flight for American Airlines leaving at 5:05 am and has 0 stops. Ticket for it is $483.
Where would the airport arrive? Which airport it depart from?
Destination is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. Flight departs from KLIA International AIrport.
Sounds good to me.
Need a ticket?
No need for a ticket.
Need help with anything else?
No, I don't need help anymore.
have a great day.
Can you help me find a one way flight for my upcoming trip?
Sure, where are you departing from?
I am departing from Las Vegas.
When would you like to leave?
I would like to leave on the 5th of March. I am going to Los Angeles.
I found an American Airlines flight that departs at 9:30 am. It has 0 stops and the ticket price is $86.
Sounds good, can you help me buy a one way ticket? I would like to travel in Economy.
Okay, can you confirm these details? The American Airlines flight for 1 passenger departs from Las Vegas next Tuesday. It is Economy seating. It will arrive in Los Angeles.
Sounds great, is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket purchase is confirmed; unfortunately, it is non-refundable.
Thank you! That's all the help I need.
Have a good day.
I got a trip coming up and was wondering if you can help me find a oneway fight on Southwest Airlines.
Where are you leaving from and what time? Any plans when you get there?
I need it for today. I'm Leaving from Chi-town to Portland.
I found 1 flight on Southwest Airlines. Its $280 for the ticket and it'll depart at 2:50 pm.
That flight sounds perfect.
Did you want to book it?
Yes I'll take 1 ticket for me.
Can you confirm that you want 1 ticket leaving from Chicago to Portland on Southwest Airlines. You'll be departing today and have a Economy seat.
That sounds good to me. Do you know when the onward flight arrives and from which airport?
I confirmed your one way ticket. You'll be arriving at PDX International Airport around 9:40 pm.
thanks for the help
have a great day.
Can you please help me find one way flights?
Where are you flying from? What is your destination, and what date do you want to fly?
I want to fly from Toronto, Canada to Philly on March 8th.
I found 3 flights. The first is an Air Canada flight, which departs Toronto at 1:25 pm, and makes 1 stop en route to Philly. That ticket costs $151.
The Air Canada flight sounds good.
Would you like me to buy tickets for the flight?
Yes, please. Also, I prefer to fly Economy class.
Please confirm the following details. The Air Canada flight will depart from Toronto to Philadelphia next Friday. Only 1 Economy class ticket is needed. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct. Into which airport will the flight arrive?
The flight will land at PHL International Airport. Your one-way ticket is now confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me one way flights for an upcoming trip?
Okay, where are you leaving from and when are you leaving?
There will be 4 of us leaving from London, UK on the 14th of March.
Where do you plan on going?
I am going to ATL
There is an American Airlines flight with 0 flights that leaves at 8:35 pm for $234.
Are there other Economy flights?
There is a British Airways flight with 1 stop that leaves at 9:15 am for $350.
When does it arrive and which airport?
You will land at HArtsfield-Jackson International Airport at 9:47 pm.
What other flights are there? I prefer United Airlines
There is a United Airlines flight that has 1 stop and leaves at 0:25 am for $326.
That sounds good. Can you book this for me?
Please confirm the following details: 4 passengers flying Economy leaving from London to Atlanta on United Airlines on March 14th.
Sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks, that's all!
Have a great day.
I am planning a trip for a group of four. Can you help me find oneway flights for everyone in my group?
Yes, of course I can help you find oneway flights. I just have a few questions. First, where are you planning on visiting? When do you plan on leaving? Lastly, which airport will you be leaving from?
Great, thank you. We are traveling to Portland on the 7th of this month, and we will be leaving from CDMX. If possible I prefer to travel in Premium Economy.
I have found 3 suitable flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight with an outbound time of 7:25 pm with 1 stop for $461. Would you like me to book this flight for you?
I prefer traveling Economy, are there any other flights?
Yes f course, I have found 2 suitable flights for you. There is a Delta Airlines fight with an outbound time of 1:45 pm with 1 stop for $255. Does this flight work for you?
When does the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 9:33 pm
Are there any other available flights?
I have found a United Airlines flight with an outbound time of 8:45 pm with 1 stop for $267.
Which airport does the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at PDX International Airport.
This flight sounds good to me. I would like to book this flight as soon as possible, can you help me buy a oneway ticket?
Yes, I would be happy to help you. Please confirm the following travel details before we move forward: 4 Economy class tickets on United Airlines flight traveling from Mexico City to Portland with a departure date of next Thursday. Is this correct?
Yes, that sounds right to me.
Great, your oneway tickets are confirmed.
That is all I need. Thank you for your help,
You're welcome, have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for one way flights I'm not specific about airlines
When is the plan to leave
I will leave on 6th of this month
Where you wanted to visit and from where will you be leaving
I'm travelling to LAX from Chi-town
There are 4 flights in that American Airlines leaves at 4:30 am and has 0 stops which costs $157
Is there any other flights available?
There is one more Delta Airlines flight which leaves at 11:15 pm has 0 stops and $185
Is there any ticket refundable and when does the flight arrives?
No there is no refundable right now.The flight arrives at 1:47 am
That's perfect for me
Shall I buy tickets for it?
Yes please make it for 1 people in my group
Please confirm this : The flight is from Chicago to Los Angeles the name of airlines is Delta airlines, number of person is 1 date of departure will be next Wednesday and in Economy class.
That great for me
Okay ticket is reserved
Thanks for your help that's what I needed
Have a great day ahead
I have a trip coming up. Can you find me oneway flights? I like traveling Economy and I am traveling to SFO.
Where are you leaving from and when?
I am leaving from ATL next Thursday. Both business or economy are fine.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:40 am has 0 stops with a total cost of $308.
That sounds good to me, I feel like traveling soon. Can you help me by another one way flight ticket?
Please confirm the following details: The flight is from Atlanta and goes to San Francisco. The airlines is American Airlines with a departure date of next Thursday and it is an economy class ticket for 1.
Yes that is correct.
Your oneway ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help!
Have a wonderful day!
I want to go on a trip. There is 1 person and I would like to travel Premium Economy.
When would you like to leave?
The 12th of this month please.
Where would you like to go? Where do you want to leave from?
I am leaving from Chi-town. Can you look at Delta airlines? I am going to Mexico City.
I found 1 flight for you with Delta airlines. It leaves at 8:30 am. has 1 stop and the price is $356.
Can I get a refund if I need it?
No, I'm sorry. It's not refundable.
When does the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 2:04 pm.
Sounds great! Can we do it?
Do you want to buy the tickets?
Yes, book it for me please.
Ok. I have you down as leaving from Chicago to Mexico City. The airline is Delta Airlines. You will be leaving March 12th. There is just 1 person for Premium Economy.
Great! What airport am I leaving from?
Your flight leaves from O'Hare International Airport.
Thank you! That's all I needed.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you find me oneway flights leaving on the 13th?
Where are you heading?
To Chicago.
Where will you be departing from?
From San Fran
I found an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 1:35 pm for $168.
What is the arrival time? Which airport does the flight depart from?
The flight departs from SFO International Airport and arrives at 8:22 pm.
Sounds good to me
Do you want to book this flight?
Yes please. Book an Economy ticket.
Please confirm: Alaska Airlines flight from San Francisco to Chicago for 1 economy seat on March 13th.
Sounds good
Your ticket is confirmed
Thank you for your help
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No thank you
Have a wonderful day
I have a trip coming up. Can you find me one way flights?
When do you plan to leave?
There is one person in my group and I am leaving on the 7th.
Where are you planning to visit and where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from San Francisco and traveling to Portland.
I found 5 suitable flights for you. There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 12:20 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $119.
Are there any other flights? I leave on March 12th.
I found 4 suitable flights. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:05 am and has 0 stops. It costs $99.
That works. Can you purchase me a one way tickets?
Please confirm: the flight is from San Francisco to Portland on American Airlines, it leaves on March 12th, the number of passengers is 1 in economy.
That is correct.
It is confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else?
no that is it.
Have a wonderful day.
I would like to book a one way flight for an upcoming trip.
What is the expected date and location you plan to depart from?
I'll be departing from Paris, France on the 11th of this month.
Where is your final destination for this trip?
I'll be traveling to ATL and prefer to fly on Delta Airlines.
I found 1 flight that meets your criteria. Delta Airlines has a flight costing $321 that departs at 5:35 pm with 1 stop.
Is this a refundable ticket? Which airport will this arrive at?
This is a non-refundable ticket with the destination at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
This sounds like a good option.
Would you like to purchase tickets for this flight?
Yes, please book a ticket for this flight.
Please confirm that you'd like to book a flight from Paris to Atlanta on March 11th. This will be an economy flight with Delta Airlines for 1 passenger.
That sounds great. Which airport will the flight be departing from?
The one way ticket has been booked for you. This flight departs from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
What time will the onward flight arrive?
The flight arrives in Atlanta at 11:41 pm.
Thanks again for all your help.
May I assist you with anything else?
No, but thanks.
It is always a pleasure to serve you. Enjoy your day.
I'm looking to book a oneway flight
Where will you depart from?
I will be leaving from London, UK
When do you want to leave and where do you want to go?
I would like to leave on Tuesday next week, preferably with Delta Airlines to Washington
I found 1 flight available for you with Delta Airlines, it leaves at 8 am with 1 stop. The ticket price is $364
When will the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 5:48 pm.
Would the ticket be refundable?
The ticket is not refundable
Okay, that flight sounds good to me.
Would you like me to book the ticket for you?
Yes, I would like you to book the ticket.
Please confirm the following details: I have a flight for 1 passenger in economy seating from London to Washington with Delta airlines next Tuesday
Yes that sounds good. Which airport will I be flying into?
Your one way ticket is confirmed, you will be flying into Dulles International Airport.
Thank you, thats all I need.
My pleasure, have a wonderful day.
Can you find me one way flights? I like to travel in Premium Economy.
Where are you vist? Where will you be leaving from? When do you plan to leave?
Leaving from Kuala Lumpur on the 2nd to New York. I like to travel in Economy.
American Airlines leaves at 1:45 pm cost $530 and it has 1 stops
Which airport does the flight arrive? Is the ticket refundable?
Destination is JFK International Airport. Unfortunately the ticket is not refundable.
Sounds good
Do you want to buy tickets?
Yes book the ticket
Please Confirm. American Airlines Flight from Kuala Lumpur to New York tomorrow in Economy class. The number of passengers in 1
Which airport does the flight depart? When does the onward flight arrive?
Your One way ticket is confirmed. Flights departs from KLIA International Airport and onward flight arrives at 5:25 am
Thanks for your help. That's all i need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me oneway flights for a trip I have coming up?
When are you leaving?
Im leaving on the 11th, can you find me something from American Airlines.
Where are you going?
I am going to Seattle, WA.
And where are you leaving from?
From Mexico City, on the 9th of this month.
Found 1 flight for you. Its American Airlines. It leaves at 8:05 am, and has 1 stop. Its going to cost $268.
Is it refundable?
No, its not refundable.
Well that sounds good. Can you help me with buying the ticket?
Please confirm: a flight from Mexico City. The flight goes to Seattle, its from American Airlines, it leaves March 9th, number of passengers is 1, and the seat is in economy.
Thats right.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for the help.
Anything else I can help with?
No, that was it.
Okay, have a good day.
I will have a trip soon. I am looking for oneway flights.
Where do you plan to visit? What is the date that you want to leave?
I will leave from Phoenix, AZ this Sunday. I am traveling to SFO.
I found 4 flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:15 am and it has 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $123.
Is it refundable?
No, the ticket is not refundable.
It sounds good to me. I want to travel soon. Can you assist me buying a oneway flight ticket? There will be four people in my group.
Please confirm the following details: The flight is from Phoenix and it goes to San Francisco. The airlines is American Airlines and the departure date is the day after tomorrow. The number of passengers is 4 and the seating class is Economy.
Yes, it is correct. What are the departure and arrival airports?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. The arrival airport is SFO International Airport and the flight departs from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Hello, would you be able to assist me in finding a flight for my upcoming trip? I will be leaving on the 1st.
Where will you be departing from and where would you like to arrive?
My departing flight will be located in Vancouver and Im planning on arriving in Los Angeles.
I found you a Air Canada flight that leaves Vancouver at 8:05 AM and has 1 stop, for a price of $224
Are there any other flights available besides that one?
Yes, There is also an American Airlines flight that leaves at 11 PM with 0 stops, for a price of $130.
When does the onward flight arrive in Los Angeles?
The onward flight arrives in Los Angeles at 2:04 AM.
I would really like to travel soon, so the second option seems like a great deal. I will be flying alone. Would you be able to go ahead and assist me on buying a oneway ticket for one person?
I would love to help. Lets just confirm the details before I go ahead and book your flight: You will be purchasing a oneway ticket on American Airlines for 1 passenger, sitting in Economy, and you'll be leaving from Vancouver today and arriving in Los Angeles
Yes that sounds right. Which airport will my flight be departing from?
Your oneway ticket will be confirmed to depart from YVR International Airport.
Great, thank you for your help assisting me today.
Is there anything else I could help you with today.
No, that will be all. Thanks again.
No problem. Have a wonderful day and a safe flight.
Our vacation is coming up and I need help finding flights. Can you help me find a oneway flight on Air Canada ?
Where will you be leaving from? When do you plan to leave? Where are you planning to visit?
We will be flying out from Vancouver, BC. We plan on leaving on the 3rd of July. I am traveling to Atlanta.
I have found 1 suitable flights for you to Atlanta. There is a flight out of Air Canada. The outbound flight leaves at 1:35 pm, and it has 0 stops, so it's a non-stop flight. The current ticket price is $177.
Is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is refundable.
Which airport does the flight depart from? When does the onward flight arrive?
The outbound flight departs from YVR International Airport. The incoming flight arrives at 10:16 pm.
That flight sounds good to me.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets for you?
Yes, I would like to go ahead and book the ticket. I would like to select seats in the Economy section of the plane.
Please confirm the following details: Your outbound flight initiates from Vancouver, the flight goes to Atlanta, the airlines is Air Canada, and the departure date is the day after tomorrow, the number of passengers is 1. The seating class is Economy.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your oneway ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm heading out on a trip, can you find me a one way flight?
Where is your trip going to be?
I'm going to LA.
When would you like to leave, and where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Paris on March 8th. I'd prefer to fly with American Airlines, please.
I was able to find 1 suitable flight for you. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 4:05 am. There is 1 layover, and the price is $337.
Is the ticket refundable. Which airport will the flight arrive at?
The plane will arrive at LAX International Airport, but unfortunately the ticket is not refundable.
I'm in the mood to travel, and that flight sounds good. Can you help me book three oneway tickets?
Can you please confirm the following details: 3 Economy tickets leaving Paris, on next Friday March the 8th at 4:05 am with American Airlines. The flight will then arrive in Los Angeles, at LAX.
Yep, that's right.
Your one way tickets are confirmed.
Which airport will the flight be leaving from? When does the onward flight arrive?
The flight will depart from the Charles de Gaulle International Airport. The onward flight will arrive at 2:15 pm.
Thank you, that's all for now.
Have a nice day!
Can you find me one way Economy class flights for my upcoming trip?
Where are you planning to fly to? On what date are you planning to go and from where will you be departing?
I'll be flying to Vancouver, BC from Atlanta, GA on the 12th of this month.
American Airlines have a flight with 0 stops, priced at $198 with the outbound flight leaving at 2:25 pm.
When does the flight arrive at its destination and at which airport does it arrive?
The flight arrives at 5:06 pm at the YVR International Airport.
Are any other flights available?
Delta Airlines have a flight with 0 stops, priced at $196 and it departs at 3:20 pm.
That sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets for the flight?
Yes, please.
Please confirm that you need 1 Economy class ticket on Delta Airlines from Atlanta to Vancouver on March 12th.
Just a slight change. I need 2 tickets.
Please confirm that you need 2 tickets for the flight from Atlanta.
Yes. That's right. Is the ticket refundable? Which airport does the flight arrive at?
Your one way ticket has been booked successfully and it is not refundable. The flight lands at the YVR International Airport.
Thank you for the assistance.
Anything else I can help with?
No. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
I need to book one way flights for my coming trip for four.
When would you like to leave? What is your destination?
I'll be leaving on March 4th, and I'm going to London, UK.
Where is the flight leaving from?
I am going to be leaving from Atlanta, GA.
There are 4 flights that match that criteria. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 3:30 pm. It has 1 stop and is priced at $422.
I would rather fly Delta Airlines. Are there any other flights available?
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 5:30 pm, and it has 0 layovers. The price for that flight is $216.
Which airport is that flight departing from? Is the ticket refundable?
The flight leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. However, the ticket cannot be refunded.
That one sounds fine with me.
Would you like to buy tickets for that one?
Yes, I would like to go ahead and buy them now.
Would you confirm the flight from Atlanta to London, traveling Delta Airlines on next Monday? There are 4 passengers flying economy class.
Yes, that's right. When will that flight arrive in London?
Your tickets are confirmed. The Delta flight arrives in London at 7:34 am.
Thank you, that will be all.
Enjoy your day and thank you.
Find one way flights leaving NY
Sure thing, What date are you planning on leaving?
Leaving on March 13th.
Where are you traveling to?
I'll be visiting Vancouver, BC.
I found an American Airlines flight outbound leaving at 11:20 am with 1 stop. This ticket is priced at $296.
Which airport would i be flying out of? Which airport would I be arriving into?
Your flight will depart JFK International Airport and arrive at YVR International Airport
That sound great!
Shall I proceed and purchase the ticket?
My plans may change. Make sure the tickets are economy and refundable only.
got it! please confirm flight details: Leaving New York arriving in Vancouver on American Airlines. Departure date is March 13th on economy class with 1 passenger.
perfect, book it. When does the onward flight arrive?
Great, oneway ticket is purchased and confirmed. Your onward flight will arrive at 5:06 pm
That will be all. thanks
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me oneway flights from NYC for my upcoming trip next Thursday?
What will be your destination?
I prefer United Airlines. My destination will be Vegas.
There is 1 suitable flight which a United Airlines flight. The departure time for the outbound flight is 6:05 am with 1 stop and the ticket is priced at $292.
That sounds great and feel traveling soon. Can you help me in buying a oneway flight ticket?
Please confirm: You want me to book a flight ticket to Las Vegas from New York in United Airlines on next Thursday for 1 passenger in economy class.
No. There will be 3 passengers in my group.
Please confirm once more: The flight is from from New York for 3 passengers.
No. Book me ticket in Premium Economy. I like traveling there.
Please confirm once again: There will be 3 passengers and the ticket will be for Premium Economy.
Yes That sounds great.
Your oneway ticket is booked and confirmed.
Thank you for helping me. That will be all.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
I'm going on a trip soon. Can you book me a one way flight ticket?
Sure, when are you leaving?
I'll be leaving on the 12th of this month.
Where are you going?
I'm going to London. Just one person.
And where are you leaving from?
I'd be flying out from SF.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight at 4:30 am with 1 stop for $402.
What else is available? I'm going to book it for four people actually.
Ok, there's 4 possible options. There's an American Airlines flight at 7:05 am with 1 stop for $437.
Are there any other ones? I prefer flying Premium Economy with Southwest Airlines.
There's one Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 7:10 am with 1 stop for $515.
What's the arrival time?
It would arrive at 6:04 am.
That one sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No, not right now.
Ok. Need help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm planning on taking a trip soon. Can you help me find some one-way flights?
Sure. What city will you be traveling from? Do you have a destination and date in mind?
I'll be leaving from Delhi, India. I'm looking to leave on March 14th and travel to Seattle.
Okay. I found 2 flights for you. There is a flight via American Airlines that leaves at 1:45 pm with only 1 stop. The ticket price is $419.
That sounds good. There will be 2 people in my group.
Okay. Please confirm the following details: The flight is one-way from Delhi, India to Seattle via American Airlines and scheduled to depart on March 14th. The seating class is Economy for 2 passengers.
That sounds good to me.
Great. Your one-way ticket has been confirmed.
When will the onward flight arrive? Also, is the ticket refundable?
I'm sorry, but the ticket is not refundable. The onward flight is scheduled to arrive at 6:05 pm.
Great, thank you for your help.
My pleasure. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all.
Excellent. Have a wonderful rest of your day.
I am going on a trip soon. Can you help me find one way flights?
Okay. Where will you be departing from? When are you leaving?
I'm departing from Phoenix and I'll be leaving on the 8th of this month.
Where are you headed?
I'm going to Vegas.
Okay. I found 2 flights that might work for you. There is a flight on Delta Airlines that leaves at 3:05 pm and is a direct flight with 0 stops. The ticket costs $85
Yes, that flight should work for me.
Would you like to go ahead and buy the ticket?
Yes, I'd like to book the ticket. There will only be one person traveling.
Okay, let's confirm the details. Your flight will leave from Phoenix and goes to Las Vegas. The flight is aboard Delta Airlines and departs next Friday. The number of passengers is 1 and the seat is in Economy class.
Actually, I would prefer to travel in Premium Economy.
Okay, please confirm the flight details. The airline is Delta Airlines and the seat is in Premium Economy.
Yes, that'll be fine. When is the flight scheduled to arrive?
I've confirmed your ticket, the flight arrives at 4:19 pm.
Okay great, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with.
No that's all thanks.
Have a great day.
I plan on traveling soon. Can you find me a oneway flight?
Yes, I can. When would you like to leave? Where would you like to fly to?
I would like to fly on March 10th to Seattle.
Where would you like to fly out of?
I would like two tickets out of SFO.
There is an available flight on Alaska Airlines at 2:55 pm. It has 0 stops and the ticket cost is $145.
When does the flight arrive in Seattle?
The flight lands at 5:06 pm.
That is perfect. I would like to buy two Economy tickets.
I can help you buy the tickets. You want to fly out of San Francisco to Seattle on Alaska Airlines. The flight is on March 10th for 2 people on Economy class. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct. Thank you. Are the tickets refundable and which airport are we flying out of?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. The tickets are not refundable and you will be flying out of SFO International Airport.
Thank you. That is all that I needed.
You are welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Hey, I have a trip coming up. Can you find me one way flights, please? I like traveling in Premium Economy, and, if possible, on United Airlines.
When do you plan on leaving? Do have a destination in mind?
On the day after tomorrow, I want to go to Washington.
And where will you be despairing from?
From Delhi, India.
There is a United Airlines flight that may be to your liking. It leaves at 1:10 am and it has 1 stop. The ticket costs $700.
That sounds very good to me.
Would you like to book the ticket?
Yes, I would like that.
Can you confirm me the details? You will leave from Delhi to Washington on a United Airlines flight, You will departure in the day after tomorrow, just 1 passenger. And you will be traveling in the Premium Economy class.
Yes, awesome. When does the onward flight arrives in Washington? And in which airport it will arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. The destination airport is Dulles International Airport. Your flight will arrive there at 12:45 pm.
Thanks for the help.
Can I assist you in anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a great day,
I need to find some oneway flights for an upcoming trip.
Where are you going and where are you leaving?
I am going from Delhi, India to Chicago.
What day are you leaving.
I will be departing on the 4th of March.
I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 9:20 am and costs $263.
When does the flight arrive and what airport is it departing from?
The flight arrives at 9:04 am and departs from Indira Gandhi International Airport.
That works for me.
Do you need anything else?
I am looking for a oneway flight for 3 people in Economy.
You want 3 tickets in Economy going from Delhi to Chicago on American Airlines next Monday. Is that right?
No, I want Business seating.
You want a Business seat on your flight to Chicago. Is that right?
Yes, that is right. What airport does it fly into?
It goes into O'Hare International Airport and your booking is confirmed.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need something else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Please find me oneway flights for my upcoming trip.
Where are you departing from?
I am going to leave from Chi-Town.
When are you leaving?
I want to leave on the 9th of this month.
Where do you want to go?
I am going to Seattle with 3 people. I want to travel economy.
There are 4 flights that match. One is American Airlines that has 1 stop and leaves at 2:50 pm. The flight costs $307.
There are only two people in the group, any other flights?
I found 3 flights that match your request. There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3:35 pm with 0 stops. The flight costs $187.
What airport does the flight arrive at and is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is non-refundable and arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
What other flights are available?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 6:15 pm with 0 stops. The flight costs $153.
Sounds good. I want to travel soon. Can you find me a oneway flight?
Please confirm: the flight leaves from Chicago on March 9th via Southwest Airlines. It arrives in Seattle. The seating is economy for 2 passengers.
Yes, that's great. Is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is non-refundable. Your ticket has been reserved.
Thank you, that's all.
Have a good day.
Could you help me find one way flights to Atlanta, GA?
Where will you be departing from?
I will be departing from Toronto, Canada.
So when do you plan to leave?
I intend to leave on 8th of March.
There is an Air Canada flight departing at 1:25 pm, with 1 intermediary stop. The price of the ticket will cost $226.
Are there any other available flights? I prefer to travel in Economy class flights.
There are 3 suitable flights relating to your preference. There is an American Airlines flight departing at 10:05 am, with 1 intermediary stop. The price of the ticket will cost $225.
That sounds great! Could you help me make a reservation for 3 people?
Sure. Please confirm your flight reservation for 3 people from Toronto to Atlanta next Friday on American Airlines. This will be an economy flight.
That sounds good! What time does the onward flight arrive?
Your reservation is confirmed. The onward flight arrives at 2:56 pm.
Thank you for your assistance, that's all I require.
Thank you and have a great day ahead!
I am planning to book a flight.
What is your expected date of leave? Also where are you planning to visit and from where are you planning to leave from?
My departure will be from Los Angeles on 1st of this month and my arrival is for Toronto, Canada.
There are 4 suitable flights for you. One is Alaska Airlines with departure time at 9:30 am having 1 stop. The ticket price will be $277.
Are there other flights available?
One is Delta Airlines. It will be leaving at 4 am and it has 1 stop. Price of ticket will be $258.
The sounds good to me.
Should I buy ticket for you?
Yes. Please book the tickets.
Your flight is from Los Angeles to Toronto. The name of airline is Delta airlines. Departure is scheduled for today for total of 1 passenger. Flight is economy class.
Perfect.
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed.
Is the amount piad for ticket refundable? Also at which airport does flight arrive?
The destination will be Toronto Pearson International Airport. Unfortunately, the ticket booked is non-refundable.
Thanks for your assistance.
Do you need any other help?
Nothing as of now.
Have a nice day.
I have a tip to SF, can you find me a one way flight. Either Business or economy is good
When do you plan to leave? Where will you leave from?
There are four people in my group, we leav on the 12th of this month via Economy class from Toronto, Ontario
I found 4 flights. There is an Air Canada one that has 1 stop and costs $268 that leaves at 1:25 pm
That flight sounds good
Should I book tickets?
Yes I would like to buy tickets
Please confirm that it's for 4 economy seats on Air Canada airlines on March 12th from Toronto to San Francisco
Yes that's correct
Your one way ticket is booked
What airport does it come from? Is it refundable?
Unfortunately it's not refundable. It departs from Toronto Pearson International Airport
Thanks for your help, that's all
Have a wonderful day
I have a trip coming up. Can you find me oneway flights?
Where will you be leaving from and where are you planning to visit?
I'm going from ATL to London.
When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving Thursday next week and would like to travel in the Economy class.
American Airlines has an 8:40 pm flight with 0 stops for $269.
Which airport does that flight leave from?
Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport is the departing airport.
Is the ticket refundable? When does the onward flight arrive?
The ticket is not refundable for the class. The onward flight arrives at 10:44 am local time.
That sounds good. Can you assist me in buying the oneway flight ticket?
Yes I can. That will be American Airlines flight from Atlanta to London in the Economy class for 1 passenger, departing next Thursday.
Yes that sounds good. Which airport does the flight arrive at?
This flight lands at Heathrow International Airport.
Thanks for you help.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking to find a one way flight for an upcoming trip.
Where is your expected departure and arrival cities?
I'll be leaving Phoenix, AZ and going to Sydney, Australia.
What day will you be leaving?
I'll need to fly out on the 7th of this month.
I've found 3 options that may work for you. American Airlines has a $304 flight departing at 6:15 am with 1 stop.
What other flights do you have? I forgot to mention there will be 4 people in my group, and we prefer Southwest Airlines.
I found 1 flight that will work for your new situation. Southwest Airlines has a flight that departs at 7:05 am with 1 stop. These tickets are $299 per person.
What is the departure airport, and when does the flight arrive to the destination?
The flight will be departing Sky Harbor International Airport and arriving to the destination at 1:32 pm.
That sounds like a good option.
Can I assist you with anything else?
I'd like to travel. Can you help me book a one way flight?
Please confirm that you would like to book a flight with Southwest Airlines from Phoenix to Sydney. The departure date is for next Thursday for 4 passengers traveling economy.
That sounds good. What airport will this flight arrive into?
Your tickets for one way flight are now confirmed. The flight will arrive at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Thank you for helping.
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
No, but thank you.
Enjoy your day.
you can find me one way flights i go to grip
when you plan to leave will you be leaving from what place to visit?
I am leaving on March 8th.I go to London, UK.i travelling to SF.
The American Airlines flight leaves at 3:05 pm. it has 1 stops. this flight ticket cost $390 can i found 4 suitable flights for you.
Some flights available?
the British airways flight flight to leaves at 1:15 pm it ha s1 stops. this flight ticket price $429.
i like traveling soon you assist me in buying one way flight ticket this flight sounds good to me.
please London flight goes to San Francisco the airline sis British Airways the departure date is next Friday the passengers is 1 the seating class is Economy.
i don"t like traveling in Premium Economy.
please confirm the seating class is Premium Economy the airlines is British Airways
my group just three people
please confirm the 3 passengers flight from london.
good sounds
ticket is comfirmed
i want all . thanks
have a great day
I have to take a trip really soon, can you help me with a one way flight?
Do you know when you will be leaving?
I would prefer to use Alaska Airlines and I will be leaving on 6th of March.
Which is your departing location?
I will begin my journey from LA.
Which is the destination where you want to arrive?
I will be going to Delhi.
There is 1 flight which matches what you want and it is an Alaska Airlines flight. The outbound flight will be leaving at 5:35 pm and it has 0 stops. The ticket will be costing you $266.
Which is the time that the onward flight will arrive? Will it be possible for me to refund the ticket?
The ticket can not be refunded unfortunately and the onward flight will be arriving at 8:39 pm.
That flight suits what I need. I think I will be having a trip soon. Will it be possible for you to help me in buying a one way flight ticket?
Can you please confirm back to me that the flight you looking for is for 1 person in the Economy class and the departing location will be Los Angeles, with the arrival destination being Delhi? Also the airline will be Alaska Airlines and the departure will be next Wednesday.
I think not. There is one person in my group.
Can you please confirm to me that the airline you want is Alaska Airlines and you need ticket for 1 person.
Yes that suits me well. From which airport will the plane be leaving from and which is the airport where the flight will arrive at?
Your one way ticket has been booked. The destination of the flight will be Indira Gandhi International AIrport and the flight will be departing from LAX International Airport.
I appreciate your help. That would be all.
Have a very good day!
I have a trip coming up. Can you find me oneway flights? My plans might change, so I want refundable tickets only. I am traveling to Chicago.
Where will you be leaving from? When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving from CDMX. I am leaving on the 11th.
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 4:40 pm. and it has 1 stops. The price of the ticket is $304.
That flight sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets for it?
Yes I would like to book the ticket.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Mexico City. the flight goes to Chicago. the airlines is Delta Airlines. the departure date is March 11th. the number of passengers is 1. The seating class is Economy.
Yes that sounds good.
Your oneway ticket is confirmed.
Which airport does the flight depart from? When does the onward flight arrive?
The flight departs from Benito Juarez International Airport. The onward flight arrives at 4:07 am.
Thanks for your help. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to visit some friends out of town for my upcoming vacation. Can you suggest some one-way flights for me?
Sure. I'll be happy to assist you. When would you like to leave for your trip?
I want to catch a flight out on the 11th.
All right. In what city do you plan on catching your flight?
I'd like to leave from Kuala Lumpur on a Delta Airlines flight, please.
Okay, and what's your destination for this trip?
I'll be going to NYC.
Got it. I show 1 outbound flight on Delta Airlines, leaving at 0:15 am. There is 1 stop, and the ticket costs $511.
Nice. Can I get the ticket price refunded if I want?
No, the ticket is not refundable.
Okay, that flight does sound like what I want.
Do you want to purchase your ticket for the flight now?
Yes, thanks. Please book the flight now.
Okay. I'm reserving a flight for you, going from Kuala Lumpur to New York on Delta Airlines. You will depart on March 11th in Economy class. The ticket purchase is for 1 passenger. is that correct?
No, please make that 1 passenger.
Got it. Your flight destination is New York for 1 passenger. Please confirm.
Great. Confirm that please. At what airport will my flight arrive?
Your one-way ticket is now confirmed. Your flight will arrive at JFK International Airport.
Wonderful. Thanks so much for your assistance. That's it for now.
Enjoy your day.
Can you please find me a oneway flight for next Wednesday?
What area will you be leaving from and what is your final destination?
I'm traveling from SF to Seattle.
5 flights came up for you. There's a $119 Alaska Airlines ticket, with 0 stops, that leaves at 2:55 pm.
That one works with me. I need help finding a oneway ticket in Economy.
Please confirm this flight: 1 ticket for an Economy flight through Alaska Airlines that will leave from San Francisco and arrive in Seattle next Wednesday.
That sounds great. But can I return the ticket? When does the onward flight arrive?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. I apologize but the ticket is non-refundable. The onward flight arrives at 5:06 pm
Thanks for the help. That will be all.
Glad to help. Have a good day.
Can you help me find a one way flight?
Sure. Where are you going and when do you want to leave?
I want to leave the 11th of March. I just need one ticket to Toronto.
Where would you like to leave from?
Seattle.
I found 5 flights for you. The best price is $256 with Alaska Airlines. The flight leaves at 8:25 am and has 1 stop.
Is it refundable?
No, the ticket is not refundable.
The flight departs from which airport in Seattle? And arrives to which airport?
The flight will depart from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and will have a final destination of Toronto Pearson International Airport.
Perfect, I'll take it.
Would you like me to buy the ticket for you?
Yes
Ok. I will book you 1 ticket for the Alaska Airlines flight from Seattle to Toronto on March 11th. You will be sitting Economy. Does everything look correct?
Sounds great. When does the flight arrive?
You will arrive at 6:58 pm in Toronto. Your oneway ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you!
Have a great flight
I have a trip soon, can you find me some one-way flights?
Sure. Where are you leaving from?
From London.
Where and when do you plan to go?
I want to go to Seattle, WA on March 10th.
There's an American Airlines flight at 3:05 pm with 1 stop for $350.
Is there anything else?
There's also a $376 Delta Airlines flight at 8 am with 1 stop.
That one works. I want to travel soon, could you buy the ticket for me?
Just to make sure, you want 1 economy ticket on the Delta Airlines light from London to Seattle on March 10th?
Yep, which airport does it arrive in?
I've confirmed the ticket. It arrives in Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thanks, that's everything I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I will be traveling for a few days can you help me find a oneway flight to leave from Atlanta, GA
When do you want to leave?
That would be 5th of March
What is your destination?
I will be going to NYC. EiyEit business or economy is fine
I found an American airlines flight. The flight leaves by 6:25 am and it has 0 stops. The ticket price is $135
Can you find any other available flights? I have 1 person in my group
I found a delta airlines flight that leaves at 3:40 pm and it has 0 stops and the ticket price is $176
Any other available flights?
Southwest airlines leaves at 9:20 am and it has 0 stops and the ticket price is $121
Is the a refundable ticket?
It is not refundable unfortunately
The flight is good for me. Can you help me buy a ticket?
Please confirm these details: the flight is from Atlanta whichgoes to New York and the airline is Southwest airlines. The departure date is next Tuesday. The seating is economy class for 1
Yes that's great
Your ticket is confirmed
Thanks for helping
Do you need anything else?
No, thanks for helping
Enjoy your day
I need you to find a one way flight for my upcoming trip to San Diego.
When are you going?
I am going on March 1st.
Where do you need to depart from?
I will be flying in from Portland.
I found a flight with 0 stops that leaves at 5:40 pm with Alaska Airlines for $137.
At what time is the flight schedule to land at my destination? Can I get a refundable ticket?
A refundable ticket is not available. The flight should arrive at its destination at 8:24 pm.
That sounds like the flight I want. I need to leave soon can you get me a one way ticket?
Is this information correct? You would like to purchase 1 Economy ticket leaving from Portland today and landing in San Diego on Alaska Airlines.
No I want ticket for Premium Economy class.
Okay. Is this correct? You want Premium Economy Class on your Alaska Airlines flight.
Yes that's perfect. What airport will I be flying out of?
The flight you are on will be taking off at PDX International Airport.
What airport will I arrive at?
The plane will be landing at the SAN International Airport.
I appreciate the help.
Do you require my assistance further?
No thanks a lot though.
Have a stupendous day.
Shelby, could you find me one-way flights for my upcoming trip?
Of course, sir. When are you leaving?
I'm leaving on Saturday this week. I'd prefer American Airlines for my flight to Paris.
Departing from what location, sir?
I'm leaving from Vegas. Check on Premium Economy prices.
I found 1 suitable flight on American Airlines. It leaves Saturday morning at 9:30 am and has 1 lay-over. The ticket price is $536, sir.
What Vegas airport am I departing from, and, if I change departure dates, is my ticket refundable?
You'll depart from McCarran International Airport. Unfortunately your ticket isn't refundable, sir.
Okay. I need to get to Paris soon, anyway. Can you purchase me a one-way ticket?
Yes, sir. Confirming 1 Premium Economy ticket from Las Vegas to Paris on American Airlines tomorrow.
Shelby, there will be 2 of us flying to Paris.
Reserving 2 seats, sir, on American Airlines.
Shelby, I'm sorry, but it seems there will be 3 of us going to Paris, now.
Okay. Confirming 3 Premium Economy seats to Paris tomorrow.
Final answer: 3 going to Paris! Sorry for the confusion.
No problem, sir. Your 3 one-way tickets are confirmed.
Thanks for your patience, Shelby. Looks like this trip has become a family holiday.
Have a wonderful day, sir, and enjoy your stay in Paris!
I'm planning on going on a trip in the near future. Can you please find me oneway flights in Premium Economy?
No worries. Where were you planning on visiting and when do you plan to leave?
I plan on leaving on the 7th of this month to Phoenix, AZ. I also prefer to fly with Alaska Airlines. As my plans might change, can I please get refundable tickets only?
Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from San Diego with four people. Business or economy classes are fine.
Thank you! So, I have 1 suitable flight for you with Alaska Airlines that leaves at 5:45 am that has 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $98.
That flight sounds good to me.
Did you need help with anything else?
I'm thinking of travelling soon. Can you help me buy a oneway flight ticket?
So to confirm, you would like to book a flight from San Diego to Phoenix with Alaska Airlines next Thursday for 4 people in Economy.
Yes that sounds good? I have 2 more questions. When does the onward flight arrive and which airport does the flight arrive at?
You oneway ticket is now confirmed. The destination is Sky Harbor International Airport and arrives at 7:05 am.
Thanks for your help.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, that's fine. Thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm planning a trip and need a oneway flight.
What date would you like a flight for? Where are you going and where will you be leaving from?
I would be departing from Atlanta, GA going to Vancouver, BC on the 5th of this month.
I've found 4 different flights. one is American Airlines, The flight departs at 2:25 pm and has 0 stops the price is $187.
Can you tell about the other flights, there are three people coming with me. I'd like to travel Economy class.
I've found 3 flights matching your needs. There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 3:20 pm with 0 stops. The ticket price is $205.
Sounds good to me. I cant wait to go, can you help me buy the ticket?
Sure, flight details are as follows, Delta Airlines Economy class flight from Atlanta to Vancouver departing next Tuesday for 3 passengers.
Perfect, when and where will the onward flight be arriving?
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed, the onward flight will be arriving at YVR International Airport at 6:01 pm
Thank you so much, that was all.
Youre very welcome.
I have an upcoming trip that I would like a one way flight for. I'd like to leave on the 11th.
What is your destination?
I'm going to London, England.
Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Phoenix, and my party has two people.
I've found 2 flights for you. There is a American Airlines flight which departs at 7:35 am and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $321.
Are there other options?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight which departs at 7:05 am and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $320.
When does the flight arrive, and which airport does it deart from?
The flight departs from Sky Harbor International Airport and arrives at 6:04 am.
Sounds good. I'd like to travel soon. Can you help me book a ticket, in either business or economy class?
Please confirm these details: you would like 2 tickets going from Phoenix to London with Southwest Airlines. The departure date is March 11th and the seating class is Economy.
No, actually, I'd prefer Premium Economy.
Please confirm these details: you would like to fly from Phoenix in Premium Economy seats.
Yes, sounds good. Are the tickets refundable, and which airport does the flight arrive at?
Your tickets are confirmed, and they are unfortunately not refundable. The flight will land at Heathrow International Airport.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
I need to to find a one way flight leaving from London?
What date would you like to leave on?
I need to leave Thursday next week.
Where would you like to go?
I need to go to Atlanta.
American Airlines has a flight departing at 8:35 pm and has 0 stops for $228.
What other options do you have. I need one ticket going to Phoenix, AZ.
This is 1 option and that is British Airways departing at 8 am for $419.
What time does it arrive and at what airport?
It arrives at 8:07 pm at Sky Harbor International Airport.
That sounds good. Can you you purchase the tickets?
1 person flying from London to Phoenix on British Airways with economy seating departing next Thursday. Is that correct?
Yes that sounds good. What airport does that fly out of?
Heathrow International Airport and your ticket is confirmed.
Is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is a nonrefundable ticket.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No that will be all.
Have a great day.
I want to visit some friends in Phoenix for my upcoming vacation. Would you please assist me with arranging my flight and purchasing a one-way ticket?
All right. In what city do you plan on catching your flight?
I want to fly out of the main airport in Paris, France, please.
Okay, when you would like to embark on your flight?
Well, I need to schedule a flight for next Monday in Economy class.
I show a flight on Air France Airlines, leaving at 1:25 pm with 1 stop. The cost of the ticket is $367.
Wonderful. I'll take that flight, please. How soon can you book a reservation for me? I want 2 tickets for a one-way flight.
All right. I'm reserving tickets for 2 passengers, leaving on an Air France flight from Paris. The day of departure is next Monday in Economy class. Your flight destination is Phoenix. Please confirm.
Oh, sorry. Would you please change the reservation to a party of 4 passengers, please?
Your reservation is being made for 4 passengers in Economy class.
Great, that's exactly what I want.
The reservation for your one-way flight is now confirmed.
Thank you so much for your kind help. That's all the assistance I need for now.
My pleasure. Enjoy your day.
I'm planning on travelling soon. Could you please find me oneway flights for the 4th of this month?
Which city will you be leaving from, and where is your destination?
I will be travelling from SFO to Chicago.
I found 5 flights that might interest you. There's an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 1:35 pm. It has 0 stops, and the ticket costs $156.
I am interested in that flight.
Would you like to purchase tickets for it?
Yes, I would like the ticket booked.
Please confirm that it will be 1 Economy class passenger on Alaska Airlines from San Francisco to Chicago, departing next Monday.
Yes, sounds perfect.
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed.
I appreciate your help.
Will there be anything else?
No, thank you. You've been very helpful.
Have a great day.
I have a trip coming up soon. Can you help me find a one way flight from London leaving on the 13th of March?
Sure. Where are you planning to visit?
I would like to travel to Philly with American Airlines if possible.
I have found a flight with American Airlines for you. The flight is scheduled to depart at 2:05 pm with 1 stop. The ticket price is $338.
Okay. Which airport will the flight arrive at?
The flight is destined to land at PHL International Airport.
That sounds great.
Would you like to purchase a ticket for this flight?
Yes, I would like to.
Okay. Please confirm the following details: The flight is scheduled to depart on March 13th from London and arrive at Philadelphia via American Airlines. The seating class is Economy for 1 passenger.
That sounds great. Is it possible to refund the ticket?
I have confirmed your one way ticket. The ticket is not refundable, unfortunately.
That's okay. Thank you for your help.
It is my pleasure. Have a wonderful rest of your day.
I have a trip coming up, can you find me one way flights?
Where are you going, and when do you plan to leave, and from where?
I'm going from Las Vegas to Seattle, leaving on the 14th of March
I found 3 flights. There's a 1 stop American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:30 am and costs $211
Any other flights? How about ones leaving from Vancouver, BC. I prefer Delta Airlines
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3:20 am and has 1 stop. It'll cost you $284
When does that flight arrive?
It arrives at 2:47 pm
Is it refundable? What airport does it leave from?
It's non-refundable, and it departs from YVR International Airport
That sounds good
Shall I book it?
Yes book it.
Just confirming your flight from Vancouver to Seattle via Delta Airlines for 1, economy class, leaving March 14th
Yes that's right
Your ticket is confirmed
Thanks for your help!
Can I help with anything else?
No that's all thanks
Have a good day!
I have a trip coming up to see my family. Could you please find me oneway flights?
Where would you like to be leaving from and when do you plan to leave?
I am leaving from Seattle, I plan to leave on March 10th.
Where are you planning to visit?
I am planning to visit Portland, OR.
I found 1 suitable flight for you: there is a United Airlines flight outbound at 4:15 am with 0 layovers. The price of the ticket is $75.
I was wondering when does the flight arrive? Which airport will the flight depart from?
The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. The onward flight arrives at 5:13 am.
The flight sounds good to me. I feel like travelling soon. Can you assist with the purchase of a one way flight ticket?
Please confirm the following details: the United Airlines flight departs from Seattle, the flight goes to Portland. The departure date is March 10th. The number of passengers is 1. The seating class is Economy.
Yes, that sounds good. Which airport does the flight arrive? Is the ticket refundable?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. The destination is PDX International Airport. Unfortunately this ticket is not refundable.
Thank you for your help, that's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Please find me one way flights for a an upcoming trip I have.
When do you expect to leave?
I am planning on leaving the 12th.
Where is it that you are leaving from?
I am leaving from NY with 1 person in my group. I enjoy traveling in Economy.
Where is your visit destination?
I will be visiting London, UK.
I have located 4 acceptable flights for you. There's an American Airlines flight that has an outbound flight that departs at 6:15 pm. There are 0 stops and ticket costs $227.
At what airport does the flight arrive at? Will the ticket be refundable?
Sorry, the ticket isn't refundable. Heathrow International Airport is the destination.
That sounds like a pretty good flight to me.
Would you like to purchase a ticket for it?
I would like to go ahead and book the ticket.
Verify the following information: A leaving flight from New York and arrives at London with American Airlines. There is only 1 passenger in Economy class with a departure date of March 12th.
Right, sounds great. What is the airport for the flight departure?
JFK International Airport is the flight departure location. Your ticket for one-way has been verified.
When will the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 6:37 am.
Thanks for helping. That's it.
Enjoy your day.
I am planning to travel in the near future. Could you look for oneway flights for 4 people?
For which date? From which city will you be flying from? Which is your destination?
I am flying from San Fran on the 8th and my destination is Atlanta.
There are 5 flights that match your requirements. There is a Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 3:55 pm with 0 stops. It costs $169.
That flight would work.
Do you want to buy the tickets now?
Yes, please. Book the tickets.
Please confirm the following information: You want to book 4 flight tickets from San Francisco to Atlanta with Alaska Airlines. The departure date is next Friday. The seating class would be Economy.
That is all correct. Could you tell me the departure and landing airports?
Your tickets have been confirmed. The departure is from SFO International Airport and the destination is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks a lot for your assistance today.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you show me one way flights?
What date would you be leaving and what airport would you like to fly from?
Philadelphia on the 7th of March.
Where would yo like to fly too?
CDMX
There is an American Airlines flight that departs at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop for $202.
What time does it arrive and is the ticket refundable?
It arrives at 11:16 pm and the ticket is nonrefundable.
That gounds good.
Would you like to purchase tickets for it?
Yes I want too.
Flying from Philadelphia departing next Thursday going to Mexico City on American Airlines in Economy seating for 1 person. Is that correct?
No. I need 2 tickets.
You need 2 tickets in Economy seating. Is that correct?
Yes. Which airport does it fly from?
It departs from PHL International Airport. Your one way ticket is confirmed.
Which airport does it arrive.
It arrives at Benito Juarez International airport
Thanks that will be all.
Have a great day!
I need to go on a trip soon. Please find me oneway flights for that.
From where do you want to leave? When do you want to leave? What is your destination?
My journey should start at SFO and I want to leave on the 14th of this month. I want to travel to LA.
There are 4 flights you might find acceptable. You could take an Alaska Airlines flight that will leave at 7:10 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $103.
Are there other flight options? I am travelling in a group of four and I prefer traveling in Economy class.
There are 3 flights that might meet your needs. You could take an American Airlines flight which leaves at 3:50 pm. It has 0 stops and costs $90.
Would that ticket me refundable? And where does this flight depart from?
It would sadly not be refundable. It leaves from SFO International Airport.
How about other flights? I do prefer travelling with United Airlines.
How about a United Airlines flight that leaves at 9:15 am and costs $97? It has 0 stops!
That sounds great! I want to travel soon, so could you help me buy a oneway flight ticket?
Is it correct that you want to fly from San Francisco to Los Angeles with United Airlines on March 14th with a group of 4 people in Economy class?
Yes, that sounds perfect.
Your booking for a oneway ticket is completed!
Thank you for your help!
Can I help you with anything else today?
No, thank you, that's all.
Have a nice day!
I need a one way flight and prefer traveling in Premium Economy class.
What day do you plan on leaving.
I would like to leave next Friday.
What is your travel destination.
I am traveling to NYC from Seattle, WA. I prefer to travel on Delta Airlines.
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight that has 1 stop. It departs at 6:10 am and the ticket price is $514.
Is this a refundable ticket?
It is not refundable.
What is the arrival airport
The flight destination is JFK International Airport.
Sounds good to me.
May I assist you with anything else?
Yes, Can you assist me with buying the ticket.
Ok. Can you please confirm the reservation details. I have 1 passenger leaving Seattle and arriving in New York via Delta Airlines in Premium Economy class. The departure date is next Friday .
That is correct.
I have reserved your ticket.
That is all I needed. Thank you.
Your welcome. Enjoy your day.
Can you help me to find one way flights for my upcoming trip?
Where are you planning to go?
I'll be going to SF.
On what date do you plan to leave and where will you be flying from?
I'll be flying from Toronto, Canada on the 4th of this month.
Of the 4 suitable flights, an Air Canada flight priced at $283, with 1 stop seems to be the best option and it departs at 4:40 pm.
Are any other option available.
There is an American Airlines flight priced at $279 with 1 stop that leaves at 10:05 am.
Are there any other options? I need 4 tickets.
Delta Airlines has an outbound flight that leaves at 2:10 am priced at $276 and it has 1 stop.
Which airport does it depart from?
It is scheduled to depart from the Toronto Pearson International Airport.
That sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets for the flight?
Yes, please. Get me Economy class tickets.
Please confirm that you want 4 Economy class tickets from Toronto to San Francisco on Delta Airlines for next Monday.
Yes, that's correct.
Your tickets have been successfully booked.
Thank you for the help. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I am going on vacation soon, can you find me a ticket?
Where are you visiting? When would you like to leave, and from where?
I will be leaving from Washington on the 10th of March going to CDMX. I would prefer a business or economy seat.
I have 3 good options. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 10:15 am, but it has 1 stop. The ticket costs $243.
What airport is the flight leaving from? And can I get a refund on this ticket?
The flight is leaving from Dulles International Airport. Unfortunately, the ticket is non-refundable
Okay, this sounds okay for me.
Would you like to purchase the tickets?
Yes, I would..
So, you would like 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Washington to Mexico City on March 10th?
No, I need three tickets
So you would like 3 Economy tickets?
Actually, I only need 2 tickets.
So, you would like 2 tickets for the March 10th flight?
Yes, and when does the flight end, and at which airport?
Your ticket is confirmed. The flight will be arriving at Benito Juarez International Airport at 7:31 pm
Thank you. That's everything.
Have a great day.
Can you help me book a one way flight for a trip I have coming up?
Yes I can, where will you be departing from?
I will need 1 ticket leaving from Seattle, WA.
Where will you be going for your trip?
I would like a flight to Atlanta please.
What day will you be needing this flight for?
I will need the flight for the 12th of this month.
I have a $178 ticket with Alaska Airlines that leaves at 5:15 am with 0 stops.
Do you have any other available flights?
Yes, I also have a flight with American Airlines that has 0 stops and it leaves at 9:45 pm for $195.
Where would I be departing from and what time will the onward flight arrive?
The flight will arrive at 6:17 am and it departs form Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That's a plan. Can you help book another one way flight for another trip I want to take?
Yes, but first I would like to confirm I have you booked with American Airlines for 1 Economy class seat on March 12th departing from Seattle and going to Atlanta.
Yes that would be correct.
Okay that reservations has been confirmed.
Thank you so much.
No problem, did you still need my help with the other trip?
No, that will be okay. Thank you.
You are welcome, enjoy your trip.
I have a trip coming up, can you find me a oneway trip flight?
Where are you going?
I'm going to London.
When do you leave, and from what airport?
I leave from Atlanta, GA on the 2nd.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm and has 0 stops. It's $228.
Are there any other flights? I prefer Delta Airlines. I'm heading to NY.
I found 1 flight from Delta Airlines. It leaces at 3:40 pm and has 0 stops. It's $130.
When does the onward flight arrive?
It arrives at 6:02 pm.
That sounds good to me. I want to travel soon, can you help me buy a oneway ticket?
To confirm, you want a flight from Atlanta to New York from Delta Airlines for tomorrow, and just for 1 person in economy?
Yes, that's right.
It's been confirmed.
Which airport does it leave from?
It leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
What airport does it arrive at? Is it refundable?
It arrives at JFK International Airport, and no it's not, sorry.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
Hey, I am looking for a one way flight on the 3rd of this month.
Where are you leaving from?
From SD.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Portland. I would like an economy ticket.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 1:20 pm. It has 0 stops, the price will be $116
That sounds good to me.
Do you want tickets for it?
No I just wanted the information. thank you.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for one way flights.
What is your destination?
Paris, France.
Where and when are you departing from?
Leaving from Seattle on the 8th.
There's an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:15 am with 1 stop for $432.
From which airport?
Departing from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Sounds good.
Would you like to buy the tickets?
Yes book it please.
Please confirm: Flight for 1 in Economy departing next Friday from Seattle to Paris on American Airlines.
Sounds good.
Your ticket is booked.
Thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
No that's all thanks.
You're welcome.
I am going on vacation soon, so I need to find some one way flights. I will be leaving from Paris.
Where would you like to travel to?
I want to travel to Las Vegas. I want to leave on March 10th and don't care about the airline.
There are 2 flights that match your request. One is an Air France flight that leaves at 1:25 pm and has 1 stop, and would cost $381.
Where does that flight depart from and is the ticket refundable?
The flight would depart from the Charles de Gaulle International Airport. The ticket is not refundable.
Is there anything else available?
There is also a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 11:20 am and has 1 stop. That would cost $357.
Okay, that sounds good. I would like to leave soon, so could you help me with buying that one way ticket?
Okay, so you would like to book a flight for 1 person leaving from Paris going to Las Vegas on Delta Airlines in Economy class. You want to leave on March 10th. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct. What airport does that leave from?
Okay, your one way ticket is confirmed. Your flight will depart from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Okay, thanks for the help.
Would you like help with anything else?
No thanks, that's all.
Okay, have a nice day.
I need to find a one way flight.
What airport would you like to fly out of?
I will be flying out of Phoenix on March 8th. I would like something in Economy.
What will you be flying too.
Seattle and I need 1 ticket.
I have 4 flights for you. American Airlines departing at 12:40 pm with 1 stop for $218.
What time does it arrive and at what airport?
It arriver at 5:48 pm at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That flight works for me>
Would you like for me to buy the tickets.
Yes please book the ticket.
Flight departing Phoenix next Friday flying to Seattle on American Airlines economy seating for 1 person. Is that correct?
Yes that is good.
Your oneway ticket is confirmed.
What airport will I be flying from?
Sky Harbor International Airport
Thanks, that will be all.
Have a great day!
I have a trip coming up. Are there any oneway flights from New York?
When do you plan to depart?
There is only one person in my group. I am planning to leave on the 8th of this month.
Where would you like to visit?
I am traveing to San Diego.
There are 4 suitable flights. One is an American Airlines flight, which departs at 4:05 am and has 1 stop layover. The price of this flight is $228.
Which airport is this flight departing from? Also, is this ticket refundable?
The flight departs from JFK International airport. The ticket is refundable.
This flight sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yes, please book a flight for me. My plans might change, so please purchase refundable tickets only.
Please confirm the following: Purchasing 1 Economy class American Airlines ticket, from New York to San Diego, departing next Friday.
Yes, this sounds good. When does the onward flight arrive?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. The onward flight arrives at 8:24 am.
Thank you very much!
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thank you!
Have a wonderful day.
Please find a one-way flight from Paris, France.
When will you be leaving?
I'll be going on the 14th of March.
Where will you be visiting?
Actually, I'll be leaving from Ciudad de Mexico, and my destination is San Diego.
I've found an outbound flight on American Airlines, leaving at 8:05 am with 1 stop, for a ticket price of $218.
Great, that flight will do.
Would you like to purchase a ticket for that flight?
Sure, go ahead and buy a ticket for me.
Okay, please confirm that you want to buy an Economy ticket for 1 passenger on American Airlines, departing March 14th from Mexico City, to arrive in San Diego.
Yeah, that's perfect.
Confirmed. I'll purchase that one-way ticket for you.
Great, thanks.
Will you need anything else?
Nope, we're good. Thanks a lot for the help!
My pleasure! Enjoy your day.
I need to find round trip flights for 3 people travelling to Washington.
Where are you departing from and what dates are you leaving and planning to return?
I'm leaving for Philly next Thursday, returning on the 11th.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:45 am and returning at 5:10 pm. The cost for a ticket is $150.
That's great. I'm only going on a short trip. Can you book the tickets on my behalf?
Ok so you want to book an American Airlines flight from Philadelphia to Washington next Thursday returning on March 11th. The outbound flight leaves at 9:45 am returning at 5:10 pm. There are 3 people travelling in total in Economy class.
That's great.
Your booking has been made.
Thanks for your help. That's all.
Have a great day.
Can you look for round trip flights?
Sure, where are you departing from and what date would you like to return?
I am departing from Seattle, WA and would like to return on the 12th of this month.
Where is your destination and when do you plan to depart?
I am traveling to San Diego tomorrow.
Ok, there is an American Airlines flight for $205 departing at 8:15 am and returning at 4:10 am.
That sounds great. I'm planning a short trip, can you help me buy the tickets?
Please confirm that the flight is Seattle to San Diego on American Airlines leaving tomorrow at 8:15 am and returning on March 12th at 4:10 am for 1 passenger in Economy class.
There will be 1 person in my group and I prefer Premium Economy.
Please confirm that there is 1 person in the group for Premium Economy seating.
Yes, sounds great. Can you tell me if the ticket is refundable and if it has 1 stop?
I've confirmed your ticket. Yes, it has 1 stop but it is not refundable.
Thank you for all your help, that will be all I need.
Have a great day!
Can you look up some round trip flights for me?
When are you planning to leave? Where are you leaving from? Where are you going?
Monday next week. I'd be leaving from Las Vegas and going to SD.
When would you like to return?
The 11th of March.
I found 2 possible flights. The first is on Southwest Airlines. It leaves from Las Vegas at 3:10 pm. and the return flight is at 8:25 pm. The ticket is $84.
That sounds good, can you book the tickets?
Yes. To verify: You would be leaving from Las Vegas to San Diego next Monday at 3:10 pm on Southwest Airlines. You will return March 11th at 8:25 pm. The ticket is economy class for 1.
Perfect. What time does my return flight arrive. Also, is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is refundable and you will arrive home at 9:39 pm. Your flight has been confirmed.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a great day.
Can you find some round trips for me with American Airlines on the 2nd?
Where are you going and when do you plan to come back?
I want to go to SF on the 8th of this month.
Okay. Where do you plan to leave from?
I'll be leaving LA.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:05 pm and the return flight comes back at 3:50 pm on the 8th. It costs $95.
That flight sounds great.
Do you want me to order a ticket?
No, I just needed the information. Thanks!
Okay. Have a great day!
I need you to find me some flights.
Where would you leave from? Where are you going?
I'm going to Portland, OR and am leaving from Phoenix.
When will you leave and come back?
I want to leave on March 12th and return on 14th of march.
What about this American Airlines flight? It leaves at 12:40 pm. The return flight leaves at 6:20 am. The price is $189.
Are there zero stops?
There is 1 stop.
When will my return flight arrive? From what airport does the flight leave?
The return flight will arrive at 11:42 am and departs from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Are there any other available flights there?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight and the outbound flight departs at 4:20 am. The return flight leaves at 8:25 pm. It costs $189.
That sounds great. I want to go on a short trip. Can you help me get tickets?
Please confirm that your flight is from Phoenix to Portland on Southwest Airlines. You will leave March 12th and return on March 14th. The outbound flight leaves at 4:20 am and return flight leaves at 8:25 pm. The seating class is Economy for 1 passenger.
Yes, that sounds great.
Your ticket was confired.
Thanks for everything.
Have a great day.
Can you find me round trip flights?
Where will you be leaving from and when will you come back?
I want to come back on 4th of March and Im leaving from ATL
Where would you like to visit?
I want to fly to Seattle.
When do you leave?
I would like to leave on this Saturday
There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 9:35 pm and return flight leaves at 9:45 pm costs $206.
Thats great for me. Im planning to go for a short trip. Can you help me to get the flight tickets?
Please confirm this: The American Airlines flight is from Atlanta to Seattle. The departure date to tomorrow and returns on next Monday. The onward flght leaves at 9:35 pm and return flight at 9:45 pm for 1 passenger with Economy class.
Yes thats great for me. Which airport does the it depart from and when does the return flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 6:17 am from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport . Your ticket is reserved.
Thanks a lot for it
Shall I assist you on something else?
No Thats all for now. Thanks
Have a great day
Can you do a search for round trip flights?
Sure, where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Seattle.
Where are you going, and when are you coming back?
I'm going to Los Angeles and I'm coming back on the 12th of this month.
When are you leaving?
Leaving this Saturday.
I've found 5 flights. How about an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 3:45 pm and returning at 7:10 pm. It costs $151.
Does it have zero stops? What's the arrival airport?
Yes, it has 0 stops and it arrives in LAX International Airport.
What about the other flights? Look for three tickets. I prefer United Airlines
Okay, I found 1 United Airlines flight that leaves at 12:30 pm. The return flight leaves at 11:45 pm. The ticket is $136.
Sounds good, can you buy the tickets?
Yes, please confirm the details of your United Airlines flight departing tomorrow from Seattle at 12:30 pm. The return flight leaves from Los Angeles on March 12th at 11:45 pm. I'm buying 3 Economy tickets.
No, buy Premium Economy.
Okay, please confirm that I'm buying Premium Economy to Los Angeles.
Yup, sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks, that's great.
Anything else I can help with?
Nope, thanks again.
Have a great day.
I am looking to book a flight for Delta Airlines
where will you be flying out of.
I am going to fly from seattle.
when are you returning
I want to return on the 9th.
where are you planing to go and what date do you want to leave.
I am going to Vancouver want Premium Economy on March 2nd.
Ok I found 1 flight with Delta Airlines the flight departs 7:40 am and the return flight departs 3:20 am for $456.
when does the flight arrive?
the flight arrives 1:59 pm
That flight sounds great can you help me book the tickets. I am planning a short trip.
ok I am going to book a flight for 1 in premium economy with delta airlines leaving tomorrow at 7:40 am from Seattle arriving in vancouver and returning March 9th leaving at 3:20 am
that sounds great
OK your flight has been booked.
thank you for helping me
is there anything else I can help you with?
No that is everything thank you for your help.
Have a great day.
Please help me find flights from Southwest Airlines. I need to be back at my hometown.
When are you leaving and what specific place you wanted to visit May I also ask where will you be leaving from?
I need to leave on the 5th to attend a family gathering at Seattle. I will be coming from SFO.
When do you plan to return?
I need to be back at work on 12th of March.
I have found a flight for you from Southwest Airlines, it departs at 8:45 pm and returns at 1:05 pm. It costs $127.
Oh nice. But I just want to go on a short trip. Can help be buy my tickets?
Please do confirm the following details: you will be leaving from San Francisco to Seattle. Flight is from Southwest Airlines that will leave the next Tuesday and will return on March 12th. Departure time is at 8:45 pm and returns at 1:05 pm, economy seating for 1 passenger.
Yes, everything is right.
Booking has been confirmed.
Thank you very much, you're really a big help!
Do you need help with anything else?
No,that would be all. Thank you!
Have a good day!
Can you find me a round trip flight back on March 10th
where would you like to go and when are you planning on leaving
I am going to LA on March 5th
Where are you traveling from
I am leaving from Vancouver monday next week and i prefer Delta airlines
There is a delta airlines flight leaves at 3:20 am and return at 10:55 am for $152
When does the flight arrive?
The flight arrive at 6:24 am
When does the flight arrive and how many stops ?
The return flight is 1:59 pm 0 stop
that sounds good
should i book the ticket for you
yes please
Please confirm you flight from Vancouver to Los angeles with Delta Airlines for 1 passengers on Economy departing next monday at 3:20 am and return on March 10th at 10:55 am
yes please and what airport does it depart from and is ticket refundable?
Your ticket is booked. the flight will depart from YVR international airport
Thanks
anything else i can help you wtih
no thats it
have a nice day
Can you find round trip flights for me?
Yes I can. Where do you plan to visit and when do you plan to leave and return?
I am leaving on the 8th of March and want to get back on March 11th. I will be traveling to Ciudad de Mexico.
Where will you be leaving from?
I am traveling from Phoenix, Az.
I have found 2 flights for you. There is an outbound American Airlines flight leaving at 7:35 am with a return flight at 8:05 am. The total cost for the ticket will be $248.
I have 4 people in my group, are there any other flights available?
There is an outbound United Airlines flight that leaves at 11:05 am with a return flight at 8:45 pm. The ticket will cost $272.
How many stops does it have?
The flight will have 1 stop.
Ok, this flight sounds good to me.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets now?
Yes, I want to book the tickets.
Please confirm the following: Purchase 4 tickets for United Airlines. The flight will be departing from Phoenix next Friday at 11:05 am and arriving in Mexico City on March 11th at 8:45 pm. The seating is Economy class.
Yes, that sounds good. What airport will the flight be landing?
Your tickets have been confirmed. The destination will be in Benito Juarez International Airport.
Thanks for your help.
Your welcome, is there anything else I can help you with?
No thanks. that will be all.
Have a wonderful day!
I am looking for round trip flights just for one person.
Where are you interested in going and when?
I want to go next Monday to Chicago.
What will be your return date?
I need a return fight for the 12th.
What city will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from SF.
I found 4 options for you to conside. There is an outbound flight at 3:20 pm with American Airlines with the return fligh leaving at 12:30 pm. The total cost is $270.
Are there any other options?
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 10:05 pm and returning at 10:40 am costing $194.
Anything else available?
Yes there is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 5:50 pm and returning at 4:35 am. Tht total cost is $194.
That one sounds perfect.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
Yes please travelling Economy.
To confirm then you are flying from San Francisco next Monday at 5:50 pm, to Chicago with Southwest Airlines. It is for 1 passenger flying Economy and the return flight is at 4:35 am on March 12th.
That's correct. Which airports do I depart from and what is my arrival time ?
Your ticket is booked and you fly from SFO International Airport arriving at 0:37 am
Thanks for everything.
Can I assist you with anything else today?
No thank you.
Have a great day.
I would like to book a flight.
When is your departure and arrival?
Departure on the 3rd of March and return on the 10th.
Where are you traveling?
I'm going to Chicago.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Seattle.
There is 4 flights, american airlines leaves at 4 pm and the return leaves at 2:50 pm for $267
Tell me about another flight.
Delta Airlines leaves at 3:15 pm and return flight leaves at 9:15 am for $187.
Yes, you can book ticket.
1 Economy Delta Airlines leaves Seattle the day after tomorrow at 3:15 pm and return flight leaves Chicago March 10th at 9:15 am for $187.
Yes, that sounds good
Your ticket is purchased.
is the ticket refundable?
yes it is refundable.
thank you that is all.
have a good day
Could you please find Economy class flights for me?
When do you plan on leaving and where is your destination?
I plan to leave for Chicago on the 2nd of March.
What is your return date? What city will you be leaving from?
I would like to return from London, UK, on March 12th.
There's an outbound American Airlines flight leaving at 0:10 am, with a return flight leaving at 12:30 pm. The ticket price is $385
I am interested in that flight.
Shall I go ahead and buy a ticket for it?
Yes, please book the ticket.
Let's see if I got everything right: 1 Economy class passenger on American Airlines flight from London to Chicago, departing tomorrow, with a return date of March 12th. The onward flight will be leaving at 0:10 am and the return flight will leave at 12:30 pm. Is that correct?
Yes,that sounds perfect. What is the arrival time for my return flight?
I have confirmed your ticket. The arrival time for your return flight is 6:37 am.
Thank you, you've been very helpful. That will be all.
Have a great day.
Can you find me some round trip flights for my business conference?
What dates were you looking at? What about departure and arrival cities?
I'm going from CDMX to Chi-town and leaving on the 3rd.
What return date did you want?
I want to get back on the 8th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight for $320 that leaves at 8:05 am and returns at 1:20 pm.
Are there any other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight for $311 that leaves at 3 pm and returns at 5:25 pm.
How about any other flights? This is just for 1 person, and seating doesn't matter.
There is a United Airlines flight for $322 that leaves at 8:25 am and returns at 12:45 pm.
What time does the return flight arrive?
2:05 am.
Sounds good to me, since it's just a short trip. Can you help me buy the tickets?
Please confirm: United Airlines flight for 1 passenger in Economy seating for day after tomorrow, and returning next Friday. Departure is from Mexico City at 8:25 am and return is from Chicago at 12:45 pm.
That sounds good. What time does the plan arrive in Chicago? Is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket has been purchased. Chicago arrival time is 4:59 pm. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
Thanks for your help, that's all I needed.
Have a great day.
Could you please find round trip flights?
Where do you want to go?
I am moving to LA on 4th of March. It is ok with any class.
When will you return back?
I will be back on the 11th.
From which place will you leave?
I am moving from Chi-town.
I searched and found 3 flights for you. American Airlines flight leaves at 4:30 am and the return leaves at 8:30 am. The cost of the ticket is $196.
It is a good choice for me. could you book tickets for me?
Kindly ensure that, on next Monday American Airlines flight, Economy class from Chicago to Los Angeles at 4:30 am. It is for 1 person. On March 11th the return flight will be at 8:30 am.
Nope. Kindly book it for 2 persons.
Kindly ensure that, the onward flight starts at 4:30 am. The ticket is for 2 persons.
It is good. Whether the flight has 0 stops?
I booked your ticket. Yes it is a 0 stops flight.
From which airport the flight starts?
The flight starts from O'Hare International Airport.
Thank you so much for your help.
Anything else you need from me?
Nope. Thank you very much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
I am looking for round trip flights from Seattle leaving on Tuesday next week.
Where are you visiting and when are you returning?
I am traveling to SFO and returning on March 8th.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 12 pm and returning at 2:55 pm for $132.
What time does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 5:06 pm.
Are there any other flights available. I want to return on the 11th of March and I prefer Economy.
I found 4 flights that match. There is an American Airlines flight departing at 9:45 pm and returning at 7:40 pm for $152.
Is this ticket refundable?
No, the ticket is non refundable.
Are there any other available flights? It is for one person.
I found 3 flights that may work. There is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 6:10 am and returning at 8 am for $125.
That flight works for me, can you help me purchase the ticket?
Yes, confirm the reservation details. The flight is on Delta Airlines departing from Seattle on next Tuesday at 6:10 am arriving in San Francisco on March 11th at 8 am in Economy for 1 passenger.
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully confirmed the reservation.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a great day.
Could you find round trip flights for me?
Where will you leave from and where are you going? When will you return?
I will leave from LAX to Phoenix and want to return on the 14th of March.
When will you leave?
I will leave on the 11th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:15 pm and returns at 7:35 am. It costs $133.
When does my return flight arive?
It arrives at 9:03 am.
Is anything else available? I will leave from San Diego and I don't care about the airline.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 5:05 pm and returns at 10:45 pm. It costs $98.
Could you suggest other flights?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 1:20 pm and returns at 9:35 pm. It costs $105.
Which airport does the flight arrive to. Could I get a refund if I needed one?
No, the ticket is non refundable. The flight arrives at Sky Harbor International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Should I purchase tickets for it?
Yes, please book the ticket for one person.
So could you confirm that you need 3 tickets, and that you are taking a Southwest Airlines flight in Economy class? You will depart from San Diego and arrive at Phoenix on March 11th at 1:20 pm. You will return on March 14th at 9:35 pm.
No, there are actually 3 people in my group.
Just to double check, you need 3 tickets and are returning on March 14th?
Yes, that sounds good. Could you tell me when the outbound flight arrives?
Your ticket has been confirmed. To answer your question, the outbound flight arrives at 2:40 pm.
Thank you for helping. That is all I wanted.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for round trip airline tickets to San Francisco. Can you help?
Sure. Please tell me your departure date and location as well as the date on which you plan on returning.
I'd like to fly out of London on the 6th of March, returning on the 13th of this month.
I found a Delta Airlines flight for you, flying out of London at 8 am. The return flight takes of from San Francisco at 10:55 am. Total price is $473.
Can you please tell me the destination airport and the number of stops?
Sure. The flight has 1 stop and it lands at SFO International Airport.
This sounds perfect. Can you help me get tickets?
Sure. Please confirm that you would like tickets to the Delta Airlines flight leaving London towards San Francisco next Wednesday at 8 am, returning March 13th at 10:55 am for 1 passenger in Economy!
Yes, that's perfect.
I've managed to book your ticket.
Thanks so much for everything!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that will be all.
Have a nice day!
Can you please search round trip flights for two people?
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Portland.
Where are you planning to visit, when do you plan to leave and when are you planning to return?
I am traveling to LA, leaving on March 12th and returning on the 14th of this month.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am on the 12th and returns at 5:40 pm on the 14th. The price per ticket is $136.
When does the initial flight arrive, and does it have zero stops?
There are 0 stops on this flight and it arrives at 12:40 pm.
Are there any other available flights?
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6 am and returns on the 14th at 11:15 pm for a price of $181 per ticket.
Are there others available?
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 9:35 am on the 12th, departing the 14th at 6:50 am for a price of $191 per ticket.
That sounds good. Can you please reserve the tickets?
Please confirm the following details: Booking 2 economy tickets on Delta Airlines from Portland to Los Angeles departing March 12th at 9:35 am and return departure is 6:50 am on March 14th.
That is correct.
Your tickets are confirmed.
When does my return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 12:08 pm.
Thank you for all your help, that is all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you search flights for me?
Sure. Where would you like to go? When would you like to leave? Where will you be leaving from?
I'm traveling from NY to Chi-town on the 9th of March.
When will you return?
I want to return on March 14th and I prefer United Airlines.
There is an outbound United Airlines flight leaving at 2:40 pm, returning at 9 pm. The ticket price is $130.
Which airport does the flight depart from?
The flight leaves from JFK International Airport.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should I purchase the tickets?
Yes, please.
Please confirm the following details: 1 Economy class ticket to Chicago on United Airlines, departing New York on March 9th at 2:40 pm, returning March 14th at 9 pm.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks for your help. That's all I need.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Hello. Can you help me search for round trip flights?
Yes, I can do that. Where are you planning to go?
I am traveling to Seattle, WA.
OK, I need some details to complete that search. Where and when do you plan to leave? Also, when would you like to return?
I want to leave from ATL on the 1st of March, and return on the 12th of March.
I have an American Airlines flight for $197 that leaves at 9:35 pm. The return flight will leave at 9:45 pm.
Are there any other options? I have three people in my group, and we prefer economy tickets.
Yes, there is also a Delta Airlines flight for $193 that leaves at 4:20 pm. The return flight will leave at 11:50 pm.
That one sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy tickets now?
Yes, please book the tickets.
Please confirm these details. You are reserving tickets for 3 people in economy class on Delta Airlines. The outbound flight departs from Atlanta today at 4:20 pm. Your return flight will leave Seattle at 11:50 pm on March 12th.
Yes, that's it.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Is that ticket class refundable?
No, unfortunately it is not refundable.
What time does the outbound flight arrive in Seattle?
It arrives at 6:52 pm.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, that's it. Thanks for your help.
Have a great day.
Please look for round trip flights.
Of course. Where is the destination and what dates do you want to arrive and return?
I'm going to NYC. I want to leave on March 3rd and get back on the 14th of March.
Where are you departing from?
Leaving from Ciudad de Mexico.
Alright, I found 2 possible flights. There is a $174 Delta Airlines flight leaving at 3 pm and the return flight leaves at 8:45 pm.
What else is available?
A $223 United Airlines flight leaving at 8:25 am. The departing flight leaves at 7:25 pm. Would you like me to book this option?
Yes, that sounds good, I need four tickets.
Alright, please confirm the following. You want to book 4 tickets for the 8:25 am United Airlines flight from Mexico City to New York leaving day after tomorrow. Your returning flight leaves 7:25 pm on March 14th. All seats are Economy. Would you like me to go ahead and reserve?
Yes, that's right. Is this refundable? Also, when does the onward flight arrive?
The tickets are nonrefundable. The onward flight arrives at 12:56 pm. Congrats, your trip is booked.
Thanks for the assistance.
Is there anything else I can help with?
Nope, that's it.
Have a good rest of your day!
I would like to book a round trip.
When would you like to travel and what is your destination?
On March 12th to Vancouver and getting back on the 14th of this month.
Where are you departing from?
I am leaving from Seattle, WA.
There are 2 Delta Airlines flights, one leaves at 7:40 am and the return leaves at 3:20 am. The cost is $293.
That flight is good.
Do you want to purchase a ticket?
Yes, book the ticket for Economy class.
1 Economy flight with Delta Airlines from Seattle to Vancouver on March 12th leaves at 7:40 am and return leaves on March 14th 3:20 am.
Yes, that is good. What time does the flight arrive and which airport?
The flight is from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and the return flight arrives at 2:47 pm.
Thank you for your help.
Have a good day.
I want a list of round trip flights.
What is departure and arrival city and when?
Departure is LA and arrival is Seattle to return on the 10th of this month.
When do you depart?
I want to leave today.
There are 5 found. An Alaska Airlines flight departs at 5:15 am and returns at 12 pm for $205.
Are there others because I need four in any class.
There is a flight that departs at 11:45 pm and returns at 8:15 am on American Airlines for $150.
I accept this flight.
Do you want to purchase?
No I do not want yet.
Is there anything else you want?
No that is all.
Have a great day.
I want to look at some flights.
When do you want to leave?
Later today, and there are 4 people traveling with me.
Where will you be leaving from and traveling to? When is your return?
Leaving from SFO to Seattle. I need to return on the 14th of this month.
There are 5 options. An Alaska Airlines flight leaves at 6:20 am. The return flight departs at 12 pm. The ticket price is $138.
Is there anything else available in Economy?
I found 4 flights. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:15 pm and returning at 8:35 am. That ticket costs $162.
Are there any Delta Airlines flights?
Yes, there is 1 Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8 am and returning at 7:40 am. The price is $174.
Where does that flight leave from? Does it have 1 stop?
It has 1 stop and leaves from SFO International Airport.
Sound good.
Would you like to purchases tickets?
No thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all thank you.
Enjoy your day.
I need to go on a trip. Can you find a round-trip flight for me?
Sure. Where are you going to? Also, when are you leaving and when do you want to return?
I am going to Toronto, Canada. I want to leave on the 2nd and return on the 5th of March.
What city are you departing from?
I'll leave from New York City.
I found an American Airlines flight which leaves at 6:55 am and costs $98. The flight which brings you back departs at 12:50 pm.
What airport does this flight take me too, and which station does it leave from?
You leave from JFK International Airport and arrive at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
Sounds great. I'll only be gone a little while. Can you reserve tickets for 3 people?
Sure. For the American Airlines flight from New York to Toronto which leaves tomorrow at 6:55 am and has a return flight which departs next Tuesday at 12:50 pm, you want 3 Economy class tickets. Is that correct?
Everything sounds perfect.
The tickets have now been reserved.
Thanks a lot.
Do you want anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me find a round trip flight through Delta Airlines?
Yes, I can help with that. Where would you be traveling for your trip?
I would like a flight to LA please.
What date did you want to book your flight and what city would your be leaving from? What day would you like to select for your return home?
I would be flying out of Atlanta on the 3rd and I would like to return on the 9th of March.
I have found 1 flight with Delta Airlines. This flight will depart at 5:40 pm and will be returning flight departs at 8:40 pm. This ticket price is $184.
That's sounds perfect for my short trip. Can you reserve the ticket for 1?
Sure I can, I will be booking an Economy seat for 1 with Delta Airlines that will be leaving from Atlanta the day after tomorrow to Los Angeles, and will be returning March 9th. The onward flight departs at 5:40 pm and the return flight departs at 8:40 pm.
I am sorry can you see what is available with Premium Economy?
I have a flight that onward departure time is 5:40 pm that has Premium Economy seating.
I would like to book that one please.
Yes ma'am, your flight has been successfully confirmed.
I am sorry, can you please let me know the return flight arrival time, and is this ticket refundable?
The return flight will be returning 4:39 am and sorry this ticket is not refundable.
Thank you for all of your help, that will be all for today.
You are welcome and I hope you have a wonderful day.
Hey, I'm thinking of going on a trip. Can you search round trip flights for me?
When do plan to leave and return? What the destination?
I want to leave on the 3rd and get back on 11th of this month. The destination is Atlanta, GA.
Where will you be leaving from?
From LA. I want two tickets.
There is a American Airlines flight bound to leave at 5:25 pm and return at 2:30 pm on the 11th. The ticket cost $177.
Are there any Delta Airlines flights?
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight. You would be leaving at 8:40 pm and returning on 5:40 pm. The ticket will cost you $202.
In which airport will it arrive? Does it have 0 stops or more than that?
You will arrive at the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and there are 0 stops.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy the tickets?
Yes, in Economy, please.
Please confirm: you want a Delta Airlines fligh that will leave at 8:40 pm from Los Angeles to Atlanta on the day after tomorrow and that will return on March 11th at 5:40 pm. 2 passengers sitting in Economy.
Yes, that's exactly it.
Your ticket is successfully confirmed.
Thanks for the help.
Can I assist you in anything else?
No, that was all.
Thank you.
Could you help to search for round trip tickets departing from LA?
Where do you plan to visit? What is your preferred departure and return date?
I would prefer to leave on Monday next week to NY and return on the 14th.
Sure, I have found an American Airlines flight which departs at 6:20 pm, and the return flight which leaves at 7:45 pm. This will cost you $241.
Are there any alternative flights?
Yes there is. There is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 1:40 pm and returning at 7:30 am. This will cost you $267.
That sounds great!
Do you need me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, that will be great.
Please confirm your reservation for 1 passenger on the Economy Delta Airlines flight from Los Angeles to New York. The flight will depart next Monday at 1:40 pm and return on March 14th at 7:30 am.
That sounds great! What time does the onward flight, and is this ticket refundable?
Your reservation has been made! The departure flight will arrive at 0:19 am and unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable
Thank you very much! That's all the help I need.
No worries, have a great day ahead!
Please search flights for me.
Where will you be flying from when do you want to leave and come back?
I m leaving from Vegas on the 6th of this month and coming back on the 9th of this month.
Where are you going?
I am going to SD.
I found 2 convenient flights for your trip. The first one is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:15 pm with the return flight leaving at 4:40 pm. The ticket price is $96.
There is only 1 in my group. Are there any other available flights?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight. I leaves at 3:10 pm and the return flight leaves at 8:25 pm. The ticket price is $95.
That flight sounds good to me.
So should I buy the tickets for it?
Yes I would like to book the flights. Because my plans may change make sure to book only refundable tickets. Either business or economy is fine.
Please confirm the following flights: the flight is leaving Las Vegas and goes to San Diego on Southwest Airlines on next Wednesday AT 3:10 PM. The return flight is on March 9th LEAVING AT 8:25 PM. The seats are economy class and the number of passengers is 1.
That sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Please search the flights for me with return date of 7th of this month.
to which location you want to search flights for?
Please search for NYC to LAX.
When are you planning to leave?
I am planning to leave this Saturday.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 3:40 pm from NYC and leaving at 2:10 pm from LAX priced at $256.
what are the arrival schedules for both locations?
the onward flight to LAX International Airport arrives at 7:57 pm.
this flight looks good.
would you like to me to buy tickets for this flight?
Yes, book either business or economy tickets for this flight
the flight details are as follows: The American Airlines flight leaves from New York to Los Angeles tomorrow and return date is next Thursday. The onward flight flight leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 2:10 pm. Seating class is Economy for 1 passenger.
i think its fine.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you for your assistance.
Do you need my help with anything else?
No, this should be enough for now.
Have a very good day.
Can you search flights for me?
Where would you like to go, and where will you leave from?
I'm leaving from SF and traveling to Seattle, WA.
When do you plan to leave, and when would you like to return?
I'd like to leave on the 6th of March and return March 10th; this is for 1 person.
I've found 5 options: There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 2:55 pm and returning at 12 pm. The ticket costs $120.
What are some of the other flights?
There is an American Airlines flight outbound at 2:15 pm and returning at 10:25 pm for $129.
What flights are available for a group of four?
I've found 3 options: There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8 am and returning at 6:10 am. The ticket costs $122.
Is the ticket refundable? When does the onward flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 10:11 am, it is not refundable.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase the tickets?
Yes, I'd like to book the tickets.
To review: You are booking economy 4 tickets through Delta Airlines, departing next Wednesday at 8 am from San Francisco to Seattle and returning March 10th at 6:10 am.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your tickets have been booked.
That's all I need, thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you search some flights for me?
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving Chi-town via economy class
When do you plan to leave?
I plan on leaving next Thursday
When are you coming back?
I want to get back on the 10th
Where are you going?
I'm going to Seattle, doesn't matter what airline
I found 4 flights. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:50 pm and a return flight at 4 pm for $245
That sounds good, can you buy tickets for a short trip for 3 people
Confirming your flight from Chicago to Seattle via American Airlines next Thursday and returning March 10th. Your Departing flight is at 2:50 pm and return flight is at 4 pm. All economy class for 3 passengers
Yes that sounds right
Your tickets are confirmed
What time does the departing flight arrive, as well as the return flight?
The departing flight arrives at 10:03 pm and your return flight arrives at 10:30 pm
Thanks for your help
Is there anything else?
No that's all thanks
Have a wonderful day!
Please help me find a flight?
From what location?
The travel will be for two people leaving from Seattle
What time?
Leaving on March 3rd and going to Chicago
Returning when?
I like United Airlines and want to come back on the 8th of March
There is 1 flight on United Airlines. The departing flight leaves at 10:10 am and returns at 3:50 pm. That costs $263.
Is that ticket refundable and from what airports?
The ticket is non refundable and leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Great
Should I book the ticket for you?
Yes please and book it in Economy
The flight is going from Seattle to Chicago on United Airlines and departing the day after tomorrow. The return flight is next Friday which leaves at 10:10 am and get in at 3:50 pm. You have a seat in Economy for 2 people. Please confirm that works.
Perfect
The ticket is confirmed
Perfect, that's all I need
Have a good day
I would like to find 1 ticket for a flight.
Where would you like to go?
I want to travel round trip to Atlanta, GA and get back on the 9th.
Where will you be leaving from? When do you want to leave?
I'm leaving from San Francisco on the 2nd of March.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:50 PM. The return flight would leave at 11:40 am. The ticket costs $241.
That sounds good to me.
Should I buy these tickets for you?
No thanks. That's all I needed to know.
Thanks have a good day.
I'm thinking of traveling soon could you find me a flight?
Okay, please answer the following; where are you planning on going? Where are you leaving from and when do you plan on returning?
I'm leaving from San Francisco and am traveling to London, England. I plan on returning on the 6th of this month.
Okay, when would you like to leave?
I'm leaving tomorrow, could you find me a flight through American Airlines?
Okay, I have 1 flight that could work for you. There is a flight through American Airlines departing at 7:05 am and the returning flight departs at 3:05 pm. The price is $421.
Okay, when does the onward flight arrive?
It arrives at 6:37 am.
Does the flight only have one stop?
Yes, the flight has 1 stop.
That sounds perfect.
Would you like me to buy tickets for the flight?
Yes, please book a ticket.
Okay, please confirm the following; I have 1 ticket for an outward flight departing from San Francisco to London through American Airlines for tomorrow at 7:05 am. The return date is next Wednesday leaving at 3:05 pm. The seating class is Economy. Is that correct?
Yes that's correct.
Okay, your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything I can help you with?
No, that is all.
Okay, have a nice day.
Search flights leaving on the 8th of this month please.
Where do you plan on visiting? What date will you be returning? Where will you depart from?
I'll be leaving from London on the 10th of this month. I'll be traveling to ATL.
I found an American Airlines flight leaving outbound at 8:35 pm. There is a return flight leaving out at 3:30 pm. This ticket is $375
That flight will work
Would you like me to proceed and purchase tickets?
Yes, please book the flight.
Please confirm flight details, Departing London to Atlanta on American Airlines on next friday with a returning flight on March 10th with the onward flight leaving at 8:35 pm with a return flight leaving out at 3:30 pm. 1 passenger economy class.
Yes thats right. When would my return flight arrive?
your flight will arrive at 6:14 pm. Ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for helping me
Do you require anything else?
No that's all
Have a wonderful day
I'm planning a vacation. Would you mind searching some flights for me?
I'll be coming back the 13th and leaving from San Francisco.
I have work back so I want to leave San Fran on the 13th
When are you planning on leaving?
I'll be traveling to Chicago and leaving on March 9th.
There's an American Airlines outbound flight that leaves at 4:25 pm. The return flight would leave at 7:05 am and the price is $223.
Are there any other available flights? That time doesn't work for me.
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:05 pm with the return fight leaving at 10:40 am. The prices is $178 for that.
Which airport does the flight arrive at?
O'Hare International Airport.
That sounds good. Could you help me buy the tickets?
Sure, please confirm the details. A flight from San Francisco to Chicago on Delta Airlines with a departure date of March 9th and return date of March 13th. The onward flight leaves at 10:05 pm and the return flight leaves at 10:40 am. 1 passenger and the seating class is Economy.
Sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need help with anything else.
No, I'm all good.
Have a wonderful day.
I am traveling to Philadelphia, can you find me a flight?
Whats the departure city, and when is the return and when are you leaving?
I am leaving form SFO on March 7th and returning 12th of this month.
The Delta Airlines leaves SFO ta 10:55 am and returns at 2:20 pm and costs $298
Which airport does the flight leave?
It departs form SFO international Airport
Any other options for me?
The United Airlines leaves SFO ta 12:30 pm and returns at 9 pm and costs $281
That sounds good, the plan is small trip. Please buy me the tickets
Can you please confirm the following: The united airlines flight leaves San francisco to Philadelphia on next thursday 12:30 pm. The march 12th return flight leaves at 9 pm. Its s economy ticket for 1 passenger
Yes thats correct
ok, your ticket is booked
Thanks for the help
Have a good day
Please help me find flights.
When are you leaving?
Will be leaving on March 3rd.
Where will you be leaving from and where do you plan to go?
I will visit SF and I am from Las Vegas.
When do you plan to go back?
Plans to get back on March 14th and I would like to travel on Economy.
I have found 3 flights for you from American Airlines, it departs at 6:40 am and returns at 5:30 pm. It costs $108.
That sounds good but I am planning to go on a short trip. Can you help me book the flight?
Please do confirm the following details: you will be leaving from Las Vegas to San Francisco. Flight is from American Airlines that will leave the day after tomorrow and will return on March 14th. Departure time is at 6:40 am returns at 5:30 pm, economy seating for 1 passenger.
No, there's just 1 person.
Please do confirm the following details: flight us from American Airlines for 1 passenger.
No, I mean please book flights for 2 persons.
Please do confirm the following details:you will be leaving from Las Vegas for 2 passengers.
Yes, that right!
Booking confirmed.
When does we arrive upon departing?
It arrives at 8:15 am.
Alright, thank you!
Have a good day!
Would you be able to find me a flight?
What day are you leaving?
I want to leave on March 3rd.
Where are you going, when are you returning and where are you departing?
I will be departing from Atlanta, GA, returning on the 5th, and am going to Paris.
Search revealed 2 flights. An American Airlines flight leaves at 3:25 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:05 am. It costs $373.
Can you find something else specifically in Economy?
A Delta Airlines flight leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight departs at 5:35 pm. It costs $376.
That is good. Can you buy me tickets?
You want a flight from Atlanta to Paris on Delta Airlines for 1 passenger in Economy. The flight leaves the day after tomorrow at 3:40 pm and the return flight departs at 5:35 pm next Tuesday
That is great.
Your flight has been booked.
Thanks. That is all.
Have a great day.
Can you help me search for flights?
When are you returning? When do you want to leave?
On March 10th. I'm leaving on the 6th of March.
Where are you visiting?
I am heading to Atlanta, GA.
Where would you be leaving from?
I'm leaving from Delhi.
It's an American Airlines flight. It leaves at 9:20 am, the return flight departs at 3:25 pm, and the total price for the ticket is $367.
Which airport does the flight come? Also, is the ticket refundable?
It's Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. No, it's not refundable.
Okay, sounds good.
Do you want me to register the tickets?
No, I'm good for now. Maybe another time.
Okay, sounds great. Thanks for coming.
Can you find flights for me on American Airlines? I need to be back by the 11th.
On what date will you be departing and from where?
I'll be flying from Chicago on the 3rd of this month.
Where are you off to?
I'm going to New York.
There is 1 American Airlines flight priced at $138 where the outbound flight departs at 12:30 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:25 am.
When does the return flight arrive?
It arrives at 6:44 am.
And when does the outbound flight arrive at the destination?
It arrives at 3:49 pm
That sounds good to me.
Do you want me to buy tickets for the flight?
Yes, please. Get me Economy class ticket.
Please confirm that you want 1 Economy class ticket from Chicago to New York on American Airlines, to depart the day after tomorrow at 12:30 pm and return at 5:25 am on March 11th.
That's right. How many stops does the flight have?
There are 0 stops and your ticket is confirmed.
At which airport does the flight arrive? Is the ticket refundable?
Sorry, the ticket is not refundable. The flight arrives at JFK International Airport.
Thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I need you to look for some flights for me.
When are you planning to leave?
I plan to leave on the 5th of March.
Can you tell me you destination and where you will leave from? Do you also know when are you coming back?
I'm leaving from CDMX to Chicago and I'll be back on the 13th of this month.
I've found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:35 am, the return flight leaves at 7:50 am and the ticket is $276.
Fine, I'll take it.
Do you want me to buy it for you?
Yes, please.
Here's the recap. Flight is from Mexico City and goes to Chicago. The Airlines company is American Airlines, departure day is next Tuesday at 2:35 am. The return date is March 13th at 7:50 am. The seating class is Economy and this is all intended for 1 passenger.
Perfect.
Ticket is yours.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you search some premium economy flights for me?
For what date?
I want to leave today.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from San Fran.
Where are you going to and when are you coming back?
I'm going to Portland. I'm coming back on Tuesday next week.
There is an outbound Alaska Airlines flight at 12:20 pm. The return flight is at 7:55 am. It costs $189.
That sounds good.
No problem, please confirm: Alaska Airlines flight from San Francisco to Portland leaving today. You will return next Tuesday. You will leave at 12:20 pm and return at 7:55 am. It is a premium economy ticket for 1 person.
Yes, that's correct.
Your ticket has been booked.
When and where does the flight arrive?
You will land at 2:13 pm at PDX International Airport.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
No, that's it.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a flight?
What is your destination? When would you like to leave, and when do you plan on returning?
I'd like to leave on Monday next week to LAX and get back on the 14th of this month.
Where will you be departing from?
There's two people with me and we're leaving from Atlanta. If possible, I prefer Delta Airlines.
I was able to find 1 flight for your trip. There's a flight with Delta Airlines that departs at 5:40 pm, and the return flight departs at 8:40 pm. The price per ticket is $195.
Are tickets refundable? When does the flight arrive?
The ticket is not refundable, unfortunately. The flight arrives at 7:39 pm.
That sounds great.
Should I buy tickets for the flight?
No, thank you. That'll be all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you help me search for some flights?
What is your destination? When would you like to leave, and when are you coming back?
I'd like to leave next Wednesday on a flight to Phoenix, AZ and return on the 13th of this month.
Which airport would you like to depart from?
If possible, American Airlines since I'll be leaving from London.
I was able to find 1 flight for your trip. There is a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 3:05 pm, with a returning flight that leaves at 7:35 am. Ticket cost is $407.
Are tickets refundable? And where does the flight depart from?
Tickets are not refundable, unfortunately. The flight will depart from Heathrow International Airport.
That sounds great, this will be a short trip. Can you buy tickets for the flight?
To confirm: You'd like 1 Economy class ticket for the American Airlines flight to London, with a stop in Phoenix, departing next Wednesday at 3:05 pm on March 13th, with a returning flight at 7:35 am.
Incorrect. There will be 3 people with me total.
To confirm: You'd like to depart next Wednesday and the number of passengers with be 3, correct?
Yes, that is correct. Where does the flight arrive?
Your tickets have been purchased. The flight arrives at Sky Harbor International Airport.
When do the returning and onward flights arrive?
The returning flight arrives at 6:04 am, and the onward flight arrives at 1:18 am.
Excellent. Thank you so much for all of your help.
Enjoy your day.
Could you check flights for me with American Airlines?
Yes what is your destination? Where will you be travelling from and what will be your return date?
I am leaving from Philly to Chicago and I would like to return on 14th of this month.
What is your departure date?
The 9th of this month and I prefer to travel Economy.
I found 1 option for you with American Airlines. The outbound flight is at 10:10 am and the return light is 6:40 pm. The total ticket cost is $122.
Ok is the ticket refundable?
Unfortunately it is not
At what time does my onward and return flights arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 11:21 am and the return one arrives at 9:51 pm.
That all sounds good.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
Yes please.
To confirm then the flight is from Philadelphia to Chicago with American Airlines. The departure date is March 9th at 10:10 am and the return date is March 14th at 6:40 pm. The seating is Economy for 1 person.
Yes that is all corrct. Which airport do I arrive at and does the flight have any stops.
The destination is O'Hare International Airport with 0 stops. You ticket is booked.
That is everything thank you.
Have a great day.
can you search flights for me? i am travelling to los angeles
when area you coming back?
i want to get back on 11th of march and wish to traveling in economy class
where will you be leaving from?
i ama leaving from philadelphia
when do you plan to leave?
i am leaving on march 6th
i searched 2 convenient flights for your trip is delta airlines flight. the flight leaves at 10:45 am. the return flight leaves at 1:40 pm the price of the ticket is $282
that flight sounds good to me
should i buy the tickets for it?
yes i would like to book the ticket
the flight is from philadelphia and goes to los angeles, the airlines is delta airlines. departure date is next wednesday the return flight date is march 11th. the onward flight leaves at 10:45 am the return flight at 1:40 pm seating class is economy and number of passengers is 1
yes that sounds good.which airport does the flight arrive?
your ticket is confirmed. the destination is lax international airport the onwards flight arrives at 3:17 pm
thanks for your help
shall i help you
no thanks for your help
have a nice day
Will you search some flights for me?
When are you returning? From which airport are you departing from? When are you planning to leave?
I'll return on the 9th. I am departing from Chicago on March 4th.
Where will you be visiting?
I'm going to Mexico City.
I found an American Airlines flight which leaves at 5:20 pm. The return flight departs at 8:05 am. The cost of the ticket is $281.
Is anything else available? I prefer something in Premium Economy.
There's also a Delta Airlines flight: outbound flight departing at 9:15 am and return flight departing at 1:45 pm. This ticket costs $501.
What time does the return flight arrive and which airport does it depart from?
The time of arrival for the return flight is 0:37 am. This flight departs from O'Hare International Airport.
That flight works for me.
Shall I purchase the tickets for that flight?
Yes, please. I want to reserve the ticket, and I have 2 people in my group.
Please verify the trip details: flight departs from Chicago, going to Mexico City via Delta Airlines. The date of departure is next Monday, returning March 9th. The outgoing flight departs at 9:15 am, and the return flight departs at 1:45 pm. This is a Premium Economy seating ticket for 2 passengers.
That's right. What time does the outgoing flight arrive? And are there 0 stops on the flight?
Yes, ticket confirmed. The outgoing flight arrives at 7:31 pm. There is 1 stop on the flight.
Great, thanks very much. That will be all.
Have a great day.
I want you to find a flight for me.
Sure. When are you leaving and when do you want to return? Also, what city are you departing from?
I'm going later today and leaving from San Fran. I need to be back on 4th of this month.
Where are you going to?
Atlanta. I prefer economy class.
There are 4 possible flights. One is through American Airlines and costs $228. It leaves at 3:50 pm and the flight which brings you back leaves at 11:40 am.
What airport does that flight go to? And what airport does it leave from?
It goes to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and leaves from SFO International Airport.
Perfect. Can you buy the ticket for this trip?
Sure. So it is an economy class ticket for 1 and the flight is from San Francisco to Atlanta via American Airlines. You leave today at 3:50 pm and your return flight departs at 11:40 am and brings you back next Monday. Is this all correct?
Sounds great. Is is refundable? And when do I arrive in Atlanta?
I have purchased your ticket. It is not refundable. You arrive at 1:24 am.
Thanks.
Have a nice day.
Help me to find flights, please.
When do you plan to go back?
I plan to be back on 14th of March.
And where do you plan to visit?
I will go to Los Angeles.
When do you want to leave and from what airport?
I will be leaving from Vancouver, BC plans to travel on economy. I will be leaving on 6th of March.
I searched 2 flights for this trip from American Airlines. It will depart at 11 pm and return flight leaves at 4:50 pm. It costs $203.
Are there any other flights available?
There's one from Delta Airlines that leaves at 3:20 am and return flight leaves at 10:55 am. It costs $162.
That sounds good, can you help me buy the ticket?
Please do confirm the following details: flight is from Vancouver to Los Angeles. You prefer Delta Airlines that will depart next Wednesday and will return on March 14th. IT leaves at 3:20 am and return flight leaves at 10:55 am, Economy seating for 1 passenger.
No, please book for two persons.
Please o confirm the following details: You prefer Delta Airlines for 2 persons.
Yes, that's right.
Booking is confirmed.
Thank you!
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thank you!
Have a good day!
Can you find a flight for me?
When do you plan on coming back?
On the 13th of March.
Where are you departing from?
I am departing from SD. I may change my plans, so I want refundable tickets only.
Where are you leaving from and where are planning to visit?
Going to LA. I want Economy tickets and I am leaving on March 8th.
An American Airlines flight is available. It departs at 9:50 am and the return flight leaves at 7:20 am. A ticket costs $68.
When will my return flight arrive?
8:14 am.
Sound good to me.
Should I purchase tickets?
Yes, please book 4 tickets.
Please confirm the following: The flight is from San Diego to Los Angeles and is airline is American Airlines. Your departure date is next Friday. The return date is March 13th. The departing flight leaves 9:50 am. The return leaves at 7:20 am. You want 4 Economy tickets.
That works.
Your purchase is confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
May I help you with something else.
No, thanks.
Have an enjoyable rest of your day.
Can you find me some flights?
Sure. Where and when do you want to leave and return?
I want to head to Phoenix, AZ today, and hopefully return on March 7th.
Where are you leaving from?
From ATL airport.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:40 am and returns at 11:25 pm. It'll cost you $247.
Is there anything else available? I want to leave from Seattle, WA.
How about a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 am and returns at 8:20 am? It costs $302.
Is it refundable?
Unfortunately, it's not refundable.
Alright, that works.
Should I buy the ticket?
Yes please.
Just to make sure, you want 1 Economy ticket for the Southwest Airlines flight that leaves today at 5:25 am from Seattle to Phoenix, and will return next Thursday at 8:20 am?
Yep. that's good. When do the return and onward flights arrive?
The ticket has been confirmed. You'll be arriving home at 6:52 pm and the onward flight arrives at 10:13 am.
Thanks for the help. That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for some flights.
Where are you going to and leaving from?
I am going to Nairobi, Kenya. I am going from Philadelphia.
Where are you planning to leave and when are you coming back?
I want to come back on 10th of March. And, I am leaving on 5th of this month.
I have an American Airlines flight. It leaves at 4:45 pm. The return is at 5:35 am. The price is $385.
That sounds perfect to me. Can you buy flight tickets?
Let's confirm the details. Flight from Philadelphia to Nairobi with American Airlines next Tuesday at 4:45 pm. The return flight is on March 10th leaving at 5:35 am. They are economy. The number of passengers is 1.
Yes that is perfect.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your assistance.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that's it.
Have a great day.
Can you find a flight for me?
Where is your point of departure?
New York.
Where are you traveling and when would you like to return?
I am going to Chi-town, looking to return on the 11th of this month and I prefer Delta Airlines.
When would you like to leave?
The 1st of this month.
There is 1 Delta Airlines flight for $175 leaving at 5:05 am and the return leaves at 10 pm.
Which airport does it depart from? Does the flight have 1 stop?
There is 1 stop and the flight departs from JFK International Airport.
That flight works for me.
Should I purchase the tickets?
Yes, please do. I prefer Economy.
Please confirm the following: Economy flight for 1 passenger from New York to Chicago on Delta Airlines departing today at 5:05 am and returning on March 11th departing at 10 pm.
Yes, that works. Is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket is confirmed. Unfortunately, it is not refundable.
Thanks. That's all I needed.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a flight, can you search for me?
When are you departing?
I would like to be back on the 9th of this month. I want to leave on the 2nd.
Where are you going?
I'm going to San Francisco.
Where will you be departing?
I want to fly American Airlines. I'm departing from Seattle.
I see 1 American Airlines flight that fits your criteria. It departs at 9:45 pm and returns at 2:15 pm. The ticket will cost $131
Is it a zero stop flight and what time does the flight arrive at the destination?
There are 0 stops and the flight arrives at 11:56 pm.
That will work. Can you assist me in purchasing an Economy ticket?
Please confirm the details. The flight is in the Economy class with American Airlines. The flight departs from Seattle tomorrow at 9:45 pm and lands in San Francisco. The return date of March 9th T 2:15 pm. There is 1 passenger.
Yes everything is right.
Great, the ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you very much
Is there anything else I can help with?
Nope, thanks again.
Have a great day.
Can you search flights for me? I am leaving from the LAX.
Where are you planning to visit?
I am traveling to Portland, OR. There are two people in my group.
When do you plan to leave? When are you coming back?
I want to get back on the 8th. I am leaving on March 4th.
There is a Alaska Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 7:25 am. The return flight leaves at 1:55 pm. The price of the ticket is $173.
The flight sounds good to me.
Should I buy the tickets for it?
Yes I would like to book the ticket.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Los Angeles. the flight goes to Portland. the airlines is Alaska Airlines. the departure date is next Monday. the return date is next Friday. the onward flight leaves at 7:25 am. the return flight leaves at 1:55 pm. The seating class is Economy. the number of passengers is 2.
Yes that sounds good. Which airport does the flight depart from?
Your ticket is confirmed. The flight departs from LAX International Airport.
Thanks for your help.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Will you please help me find flights?
Sure, what date will you be coming back?
On the 8th.
What's your departure location and where will you be going? What day would you like to leave?
I'm leaving from SD on the 1st and want to travel to Sydney, NSW.
Thanks, there are 2 flights I've found. The Delta Airlines flight leaves at 11:05 am with a return flight that leaves at 5:50 pm for $290.
What time does the return flight arrive?
Your return flight would arrive at 8:34 am.
Please let me know if this flight has zero stops and when does the onward flight arrive?
There's 1 stop and the time for the onward flight is 4:01 pm.
Awesome, thanks.
Shall I book this ticket?
Yes, please.
Can you please confirm your flight details: The Delta Airlines flight from San Diego to Sydney departs today at 11:05 am and will return next Friday at 5:50 pm for 1 passenger in Economy.
Perfect, thanks.
Your booking is confirmed.
Wonderful, thanks for your help. That's all for now.
Have a great trip.
I need airline tickets.
Which dates and from where?
I'm planning on leaving the 2nd of this month from Seattle, Wa and returning the 11th of March.
Where are you going?
Phoenix, AZ, Economy class.
The first of 3 options is American Airlines leaving at 8:15 am with a return time of 8:40 am for $242.
That's perfect.
Anything else?
I need airline tickets for three.
I have a flight scheduled from Seattle to Phoenix leaving tomorrow, returning March 11th on American Airlines with an onward flight departing at 8:15 am with a return time of 8:40 am. This flight is scheduled for 3 people Economy class.
That's perfect.
The ticket is confirmed.
You are the best help.
Anything else?
No but thanks.
Enjoy your day.
I need to fly from LAX, please find a flight
Where are you going and when will your return be?
I'm going to Philadelphia and need to be back on the 13th of March
And what date are you leaving LAX?
I want to return on the 6th of this month, and I am leaving on the 2nd of March. There will be 3 of us in total.
I have found 1 good flight, on Southwest Airlines. It leaves at 1:40 pm and the return leaves at 8:35 pm. Per ticket it will cost $296
When does the onward flight get in, and to which airport?
It arrives at PHL International Airport at 0:16 am
That's good, can you help me buy tickets?
Please confirm these details: the flight goes from Los Angeles to Philadelphia on Southwest Airlines. It leaves tomorrow at 1:40 pm and returns next Wednesday at 8:35 pm. There are 3 passengers in Economy.
When does my return arrive and from which airport am I leaving?
It flies from LAX International Airport and arrives at 0:32 am. Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you
Do you need any other help?
No thanks.
Have a great day!
I would like to travel to Phoenix, AZ. Would you search available flights for me?
Where would you like to leave from?
I will fly out from Ciudad de Mexico.
When would you like to leave?
I am leaving on the 3rd.
When would you like to return?
I would like to leave San Fran and be home next Friday.
I found 2 flights for your trip on American Airlines with one leaving at 2:55 pm and returning at 1:20 pm. The price for this flight is $153.
Where does the flight leave from?
The flight departs from Benito Juarez International Airport.
I plan to be there for a short time and that flight sounds very good. Will you help me buy tickets?
Please confirm the following details: you will fly American Airlines from Mexico City to San Francisco on the day after tomorrow at 2:55 pm. You will return next Friday at 1:20 pm flying economy. This is for one ticket.
Everything sounds good; when does the flight arrive in San Francisco?
You flight arrives at 4:38 pm. Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you search for a flight for me?
What are the departure and arrival locations and when do you want to leave?
Friday next week I want to fly from SF to Los Angeles.
When do you want to return?
March 11th please.
There is an outbound Alaska Airlines flight at 7:10 PM. The return flight departs at 5:50 PM. The ticket price is $93.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like me to buy these tickets?
Yes please book it.
Please confirm the flight details: Alaska Airlines flight departs next Friday at 7:10 PM from San Francisco to Los Angeles. The return flight is on March 11th and leaves at 5:50 PM. It is for 1 passenger sitting in Economy.
No, I want Premium Economy.
Please confirm: Alaska Airlines flight sitting in Premium Economy.
Yes, good. What time do I arrive in Los Angeles and at which airport?
LAX International Airport at 8:35 pm.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a good day.
I want to go to London, England. Can you find me a flight?
What date are you coming back?
March 14th will be my due date.
Where and when are you leaving?
I want to leave on March 5th out of Philadelphia.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm and the return flight leaves at 2:05 pm. The cost is $322.
Can you find something else?
I found a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 2:20 pm and the return flight departs at 8 am. It costs $368.
Can you find something else for three people?
I found a United Airlines flight that departs at 11:30 am and the return flight departs at 0:25 am. It costs $301 per ticket.
That sounds great. Can you find me Economy tickets for my short trip?
Your flight is out of Philadelphia to London on United Airlines on Economy seating for 3 people. It leaves next Tuesday at 11:30 am. and the return flight leaves at 0:25 am on March 14th. Is that right?
Yes, that is right. What airport does the return flight depart from?
Your return flight is out of PHL International Airport and your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you with something else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
i am looking for Economy class flights?
Where do you plan to visit?
I am traveling to Portland.
When do you plan to return and leave?
I am leaving on the 7th and returning of 10th of this month.
From where are you leaving?
i am leaving from Vancouver, BC and would prefer United Airlines.
United Airlines flight is available and leaves at 6:05 pm. The return flight leaves at 10:35 am and which costs $233
When will my return flight arrives?
It arrives at 8:12 pm
that's great for me. I am planning to go for a short trio. Can you please help me to book the flight tickets for four people in my group?
Please confirm the booking details: The flight is from Vancouver to Portland. The airlines is United Airlines which departing on next Thursday and the return date is March 10th. The onward flight leaves at 6:05 pm and the return flight leaves at 10:35 am. The seating class is Economy which is for 4 passengers.
yes. That's great. From where the flight is departing? Is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is not refundable. The flight departs from YVR International Airport and the ticket is confirmed
Thank you so much. This is what i need
Have a nice day
Please find me a flight.
What is the destination? On which days do you which to depart and return.
I need a flight to San Francisco. I need to depart on Monday next week and return on March 11th.
From which airport will you be departing?
I need a flight for 1 person departing from LAX.
There are 3 flights that match those details. There is a flight that departs at 5:50 pm and returns at 8:20 pm. The ticket costs $115 and the flight is with Alaska Airlines.
That flight matches my needs, I would like to book the tickets. Business or economy class is fine.
Please verify the following details. A flight departing from Los Angeles next Monday at 5:50 pm. The return flight is from San Francisco on March 11th at 8:20 pm. The flight is Alaska Airlines, the seating is Economy and you require 1 ticket.
The details are correct. At what time does the return flight arrive?
The ticket has been confirmed. The return flight is scheduled to arrive at 9:45 pm.
Thank you.
Do you require further assistance?
I do not, thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you run a search for flights?
What is your destination and location of departure, and when do you plan on leaving?
I am planning on traveling to SFO, and I will be leaving from Delhi, India on March 4th.
When will you be coming back?
I plan on returning on the 6th.
I have an American Airlines flight, that leaves at 9:20 am for the outbound flight and returns at 1:15 pm. It has a ticket price of $376.
When will the return flight arrive?
The return flight will arrive at 4:07 pm.
That flight sounds perfect for me.
Shall I book you the ticket?
Yes, please book me the ticket.
The ticket is an American Airlines Economy flight for 1 person, it is from Delhi and will be going to San Francisco departing on next Monday. The return date is next Wednesday, the onward flight leaving at 9:20 am and arriving at 1:15 pm, is that all correct?
Everything sounds correct, thank you.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks for all your help.
Is there anything else you need of my assistance?
No, I am good for now.
Understood, have a wonderful day.
I have 4 people in my group and need a flight, can you do a search?
Where would you like to go?
I am wanting to visit Chi-town.
When do you want to leave?
I want to go on the 6th.
Where will you be coming and going from?
I am leaving from ATL and want to return on the 14th of March.
A ticket for $121 is on American Airlines. The outbound leaves at 9:15 pm and returns at 8:40 pm.
Are their any other options? I would prefer to fly Delta Airlines on either business or economy.
I see a Delta Airlines out bound flight leaving at 7:50 am. The return is at 8:30 am and costs $125.
That is great.
Can I help any further.
I want to plan a short trip can you assist me in buying an airline ticket?
The flight is from Atlanta to Chicago on Delta Airlines. Leaving next Wednesday and returning March 14th. The onward flight leaves at 7:50 am and returning at 8:30 am for 4 economy seats.
That is great but is the ticket refundable and when does the onward flight arrive?
I have confirmed your ticket however it is not refundable and arrives at 8:51 am.
Thank you, all done.
Have a great rest of the day.
I would like to book a flight.
What destination and when is your departure and arrival dates?
I'm traveling to SFO on the 13th of March from Seattle.
When is your departure date?
I would like to leave the 2nd of this month.
I found 4 flights. There is an Alaska Airlines flight at 12 pm and the return flight leaves at 2:55 pm. The cost is $136.
Are they any other flights available?
There is a flight with Delta Airlines that leaves at 6:10 am and returns at 8 am for $127.
That flight is good.
Would you like to book a ticket?
Yes, please book a ticket for Economy class.
Economy flight, tomorrow, on March 13th with Delta Airlines from Seattle to San Francisco, departure at 6:10 am and return at 8 am for 1 passenger.
Yes that sounds good to me.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you for your assistance.
Do you need any other information?
that is all, thank you.
Have a good day.
I need to take a flight soon. Can you help me find tickets? I usually travel Economy class.
I can help with that! What city are you leaving from, and when will you be coming back.
I'll be departing from Los Angeles, and I want to be home on the 13th.
Sounds good! Where are you going then? And when are you leaving?
I'll be going to Vancouver on business. I actually need to leave later today. Can you find me something?
Well, it looks like there's an American Airlines flight leaving at 4:50 pm today. You could take a return flight that leaves at 11 pm. It would cost $206 to book the round trip ticket.
Is that refundable if I change my mind on the return flight? Also, how many stops does the flight have?
Unfortunately, the ticket would not be refundable, but there is only 1 stop.
That's okay. This flight sounds okay, and it's just a short shift anyway. Can you help me buy the tickets. There will be 3 people in my group, including myself.
I can do that! Just to confirm, you will be departing from Los Angeles at 4:50 pm today, and returning from Vancouver on March 13th at 11 pm. The reservation will be for 3 people on an American Airlines flight in Economy seating. Does that sound right?
Yeah, that sounds good. Can you tell me the names of the departing and arrival airports?
Sure! Your destination is YVR International Airport, and you'll be departing from LAX International Airport. Your tickets have been confirmed, and your reservation is complete.
Great! Thanks for your help!
No problem. Can I help you with anything else?
No, not right now. Thanks again!
Of course! Have a great day!
Could you search for flights for me?
Where is it you would like to visit and when would your return date be?
I'm travelling to Chicago, I would like to come back on the 13th of this month.
When do you plan to leave?
I'm planning to leave tuesday next week.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'm leaving from Washington
There is an american airlines flight, the price for a ticket is $136. The outbound flight leaves at 9:55 pm and the return flight leaves at 2:50 pm
That would be great.
Should i book these tickets?
Yes please.
Please confirm the following details.You would like 1 seat, The flight is from Washington to Chicago with american airlines in economy class. The departure date is next tuesday at 9:55 pm. The return date is March 13th at 2:50 pm.
No, i need Three seats
Please confirm: You would like to go to chicago with 3 passengers?
Yes that sounds good.
Your tickets are booked.
Thank you, that is all.
Have a great day
Can you look for a flight for me to ATL?
Where will you be traveling from and what is your return date?
I am traveling from San Francisco. Please search flight leaving on Monday next week and return on 13th of March. There are only 1 people in my group
I found you a flight that is leaving at 3:50 pm and return at 11:40 am with American Airlines. The cost is $214.
I like to travel in Economy, any other available flights?
There is another flight leaves at 10:05 am and return at 12:50 pm with Delta Airlines. The cost is $201
How many stops are there?
The stop is 0
Can i refund the ticket if i cancel?
Sorry the ticket is not refundable
Ok thats fine, please book the ticket for me.
Please confirm your booking: Your flight will be leaving from San Francisco next Monday at 10:05 am to Atlanta on Delta Airlines Economy class and return on March 13th at 12:50 pm. This is a 1 passengers ticket.
Yes that sounds great.
your ticked booked
Thank you
have a nice day
I will be taking a trip Monday next week. Can you find a flight for me?
Where are you leaving from and where are you going?
I am leaving from Seattle and going to SF. I would prefer to use Delta Airlines.
When are you planning on returning?
I would like to return on March 7th.
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight for your trip. The flight from Seattle leaves at 6:10 am and the return flight leaves at 8 am. The ticket price is $125.
Are there any stops on the flight? When does the flight from Seattle arrive in SF?
There are 0 stops on the flight. The Seattle flight arrives in SF at 8:21 am.
Sounds good.
Would you like me to buy tickets for that flight?
Yes, go ahead and book the flight.
Please confirm the following details: 1 passenger flying Economy class on Delta Airlines leaving from Seattle next Monday morning at 6:10 am and arriving in San Francisco. The return flight is next Thursday with a departure time of 8 am.
Yes, that sounds good. Which airport in San Francisco? Is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket is confirmed. The destination airport is SFO International Airport. Unfortunately, your ticket is non-refundable.
Thanks for your help.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you search airline flights for me?
Sure. I need to know where you are planning to visit, your planned departure date, and your planned return date.
I want to go to Seattle, WA on the 8th, and be back by the 11th of March. Preferably with United Airlines.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from San Fran with two people. Can we get an Economy flight?
I have found an outbound United airlines flight at 3:05 pm with a return flight leaving at 8:30 pm for $128.
That flight sounds good to me. I plan to go on a short trip. Can you help me buy flight tickets?
Sure. I can buy you a United Airlines flight from San Francisco to Seattle. The departure date is next Friday at 3:05 pm, and the return date is March 11th at 8:30 pm. The seating class is economy, with 2 passengers.
Yes that sounds good. When does the onward flight arrive?
I have confirmed your ticket. The onward flight arrives at 5:16 pm.
Thanks for your help
Do you need any further assistance?
No. Thanks for the help.
No problem. Have a wonderful day.
I'd like a flight leaving on the 7th and coming back the 12th of this month.
Going from where to where?
I'm going to Paris from San Fran. There is one person.
I have a flight on American Airlines leaving at 10:45 am And returning at 4:05 am for $282.
At what time does the onward flight arrive?
That is at 8:53 AM.
I think that will work.
Would you like to book that?
Not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
Not right now.
Have a nice day.
Can you search for flights for me?
Sure, where are you planning to visit? Where will you be departing from, and when are you coming back?
I'm traveling to San Fran from Seattle, WA with 1 person. I want to get back on the 13th.
When do you plan to leave?
On the 3rd of March.
I found 4 convenient flights for your trip. There is an outbound Alaska Airlines flight at 12 pm, with a return flight at 2:55 pm. This ticket costs $138.
That flight sounds good, I'm only going on a short trip. Can you help me buy an economy ticket?
Sure. I can purchase an Alaska Airlines flight from Seattle to San Francisco that departs the day after tomorrow at 12 pm. The return flight is on March 13th at 2:55 pm. The seating class is economy, for 1 passenger.
Yes that sounds good.
Your ticket has been purchased
Is the ticket refundable? And when does my return flight arrive?
Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable. The return flight arrives at 5:06 pm.
Ok, thanks for your help.
Shall i assist you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
No problem. Have a wonderful day.
Please help me search flights.
Okay. Can you tell me when you plan to leave and when you are coming back?
I'm leaving from Philadelphia on March 2nd, and returning from my trip to Nairobi on the 8th of March.
Great. I found 1 flight that will work for you, on American Airlines. It flies out at 4:45 pm and returns at 5:35 am, and it costs $341.
I need to know when the onward flight arrives and which airport it arrives at.
The destination airport is Jomo Kenyatta International Airport, flying at 5:57 pm.
That will work for me!
Would you like me to go ahead and buy the tickets?
Yes, go ahead and book the tickets.
Just to confirm, the flight leaves from Philadelphia tomorrow at 4:45 pm, on American Airlines to Nairobi, and it returns next Friday leaving at 5:35 am. It's an Economy flight for 1 passenger.
No, actually there will be 2 of us flying.
Okay, so the flight's from Philadelphia with 2 passengers.
That's right.
Okay, the ticket is all confirmed.
Thanks so much for your help.
Is there anything else you need help with?
No, that's all. Thanks again.
You have a wonderful day.
Can you look for some flights for me?
What destination are you planning to visit and when? And where will you be leaving from?
The destination is Las Vegas. I will be leaving on the 5th and want to be back on March 9th. I will be leaving from San Francisco.
I found American Airlines. The departure time is 8:10 am. The departure time for return flight is 5:30 am. And the ticket is priced at $111.
It sounds good to me.
Do you want me to buy the tickets for you?
Yes please book the tickets for me.
Please confirm the details: You will be leaving from San Francisco to Las Vegas in the American Airlines flight next Tuesday at 8:10 am and will return on March 9th at 5:30 am. The seat will be in economy class for 1 passenger.
NO. There are one people in my group.
Please confirm the details once more: The return date is March 9th with 1 passenger.
Yes that is perfect.
You ticket is booked and confirmed.
Does the flight has one stop?
No the number of stops is 0.
Thanks for your help. That will be all.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Can you look flights for me? I am taking off on this Sunday.
Where will you be taking off from?
I am taking off from Seattle, WA.
Where are you arranging to visit?
I am traveling to SFO. I need to urge back on the 12th.
I found 5 helpful flights for your trip. There's a Gold country Alaska Airlines Carriers flight. The outbound flight clears out at 12 pm. The return flight clears out at 2:55 pm. The cost of the ticket is $132.
Are there any other accessible flights? There are 3 individuals in my gather
There's a American Aircrafts American Airlines flight. The outbound flight clears out at 10:25 pm. The return flight clears out at 2:15 pm. The cost of the ticket is $141.
That flight sounds great to me.
Ought to I purchase the tickets for it?
Yes I would like to book the ticket.
If it's not too much trouble affirm the taking after points of interest: the flight is from Seattle. the flight goes to San Francisco. the carriers American Airlines is American Carriers. the takeoff date is day after tomorrow. the return date is Walk 12th. the ahead flight March 12th. clears out at 10:25 pm. the return flight clears out at 2:15 pm. The seating course is Economy. the number of travelers is 3.
Yes that sounds great.
Your ticket is affirmed.
Much appreciated for your offer assistance. That's all I require.
Have a superb day.
Can you help me find flights ?
Sure. When were you planning to depart and return and where did you want to go?
I am traveling from ATL to London, England on 5th of March in Economy. I'd like to return on the 10th of this month.
I found 3 flights. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm and has the return flight leaving at 2:05 pm for $324.
That sounds good. Can you help me buy tickets? I am going on a short trip.
Please confirm you're looking for a flight from Atlanta to London on American airlines for next Tuesday, with a return date of March 10th, with an onward flight at 8:40 pm and return flight leaving at 2:05 pm, in economy for 1 passenger.
Yes, that sounds great. How many stops does the flight have and which airport is it arriving in?
The flight has 1 stop and the destination is Heathrow International Airport. Your flight has been confirmed.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
Can you search for flights?
Where are you going, and when do you want to leave and come back?
I'm leaving this Saturday to go to Seattle, WA. I want to fly back on the 7th of March.
Where are you flying from?
I'm leaving from Mexico City.
I found 1 American Airlines flight for your trip. The flight leaves at 8:05 am from Mexico City, and the return flight leaves at 8:15 am from Seattle. The ticket price is $274.
When and where does the onward flight arrive?
The flight arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport at 2:47 pm.
That flight sounds good.
Do you want me to buy a ticket for the flight?
No, I'm good.
Do you need help with anything else?
Nope, thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
Could you search all available flights?
Tell me the source and destination ?
I need to go to SFO on next Friday. I will be leaving from Phoenix
When are you planning to leave?
I like to leave on 2nd of March. I need Economy class for 2 people
One American Airlines flight leaves at 6:15 am and return flight leaves at 8:10 am. Ticket cost is $175
Is there any other flights available?
Yest. Delta Airlines leaves at 11:55 am and return flight leaves at 5:50 am. Cost is $113
That is good choice for me. Please book a ticket on that flight.
I like to confirm the following. You need Economy ticket for 2 passengers on Delta Airlines from Phoenix to San Francisco. Your travel date is tomorrow and return is next Friday. Flight leaves at 11:55 am and return flight leaves at 5:50 am
That's right. is it refundable? tell me the arrival time as well
Ticket is not refundable. flight arrives at 2:02 pm. Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you
Anything else I can help you with?
Nothing else. Thanks
Have a good day.
Can you find a flight for two people for me?
What is your point of departure, return date and destination?
I'm departing from New York City and traveling to Vancouver, BC. I'd like to return on the 10th.
When do you plan to depart for your trip?
I'll be departing on the 8th.
I found 1 convenient flight on Delta Airlines departing at 6 am. The return flight departs at 2:50 am and the total cost of the trip is $306.
What is the name of the departure airport, and at what time does the onward flight arrive?
The flight will leave from JFK International Airport and arrives at the destination at 1:41 pm.
That flight sounds like a good option to me.
Should I go ahead and purchase the tickets?
Yes, I would like to purchase that ticket as I enjoy traveling in Economy class.
Would you please confirm that the onward flight will depart from New York next Friday at 6 am, and the return flight departs on March 10th at 2:50 am from Vancouver. Both flights are via Delta airlines, and there are two seats reserved in Economy class.
Yes, that sounds great.
I have confirmed your ticket.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, but thank you for your help.
I hope you have a wonderful day.
I have to take a business trip, can you search flights for me?
Where will you be visiting?
I'll be flying into LAX.
Where will you be departing? When would you like to leave?
I'm leaving from NY on the 7th of this month.
When will you be coming back?
I'd like to get back on the 14th. I prefer American Airlines in Economy class.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:40 pm. The return flight leaves at 6:20 pm. The ticket is $271.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like me to buy the tickets?
Yes, please book the ticket.
Please confirm the details: You are flying from New York to Los Angeles on American Airlines. You will depart next Thursday at 3:40 pm and return March 14th at 6:20 pm. There is 1 passenger in Economy seating.
Yes that sounds good.
Your ticket has been booked.
Thank you, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
Can you find flights for me?
Where is your destination to visit?
I want to go for NY.
When are you returning back? When are you departing?
I will be returning back on March 11th. I want to depart on March 9th.
Where will you be departing from?
I want to go in American Airlines from Washington.
There is a American Airlines flight which departs at 6:05 am. The return flight departs at 10:55 am. The flight fare is $92.
This flight is good for me.
Do you require tickets for this?
Yes. I need tickets for this.
I want your confirmation for the American Airlines flight departing from Washington going to New York on March 9th at 6:05 am. The Return flight leaves on March 11th at 10:55 am. The seating class is Economy for 1 passenger.
Do you know which airport the return flight arrives? Do you know the time of arrival?
Your Destination flight going to JFK International Airport. The return flight arrives at 12:05 pm.
Thank you very much.
Have a nice day.
I need a flight please.
Please provide the destination, departure city and the dates for the trip.
I want to travel to New Delhi from ATl on March 4th.
What is the returning date?
I want to return on the 9th of this month.
American Airlines has a flight that departs at 2:30 pm and a return flight at 9:20 am. The price for the roundway ticket is $413.
is this a refundable ticket?
No the ticket is non refundable.
The flight times are good. Can you purchases tickets for three people?
Please confirm the following details: 3 Economy seats on American Airlines. Flight from Atlanta to Delhi next Monday at 2:30 pm. Return flight on March 9th at 9:20 am.
Yes that is correct! What are the arrival times for my flights?
Your ticket is confirmed. Your flight will arrive at 8:39 pm, and the return flight will arrive at 2:56 pm.
Thank you!
Can I assist you with anything else?
No thanks!
Ok, please have a nice day.
Can you look for flights for one?
When and where do you want to go?
I would like to go to CDMX and am going on the 10th of this month.
Where are you going from and when are you returning?
I would like to come back March 12th and am leaving from SF. I would like to travel Economy.
The American Airlines flight is leaving at 1:20 pm and returning 2:55 pm for a price of $166.
The flight works for me. I'd like to do a short trip. Can you help me buy tickets for the flight?
Please let me know if you'd like a flight from San Francisco to Mexico City via American Airlines departing March 10th and returning March 12th. The outbound flight is leaving at 1:20 pm and returning 2:55 pm. The seats are Economy for 1 passenger.
That is good. Which airport is the flight leaving from?
The flight is going from SFO International Airport. Your ticket has been confirmed.
Can the ticket be refunded? When is the return flight arriving?
The return flight is arriving at 4:38 pm, but isn't refundable.
Thank you for your help. That's all I want.
Have a great day.
I need help finding flights.
What are your departure and return dates? And where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from San Fran going to Phoenix. I will be leaving the 7th of March and returning on March 12th.
Okay, I have a ticket for $181 with American Airlines. That flight leaves at 8:10 am and returns at 7:35 am.
What time does the onward flight land? and is that ticket refundable?
It arrives at 12:49 pm, and is a non refundable ticket.
What else do you have?
I have a Delta Airlines flight for $126. That flight leaves at 5:50 am and returns at 11:55 am.
I would like to leave Friday next week. What else do you have?
I have a ticket for $127 with Southwest Airlines. That one departs at 11:10 pm and the return flight leaves at 7:15 pm.
That works, this is for a short trip. Are you able to book that for me?
Please verify your plans. You need 1 Economy ticket for Southwest Airlines. Leaving San Francisco next Friday at 11:10 pm for Phoenix and returning at 7:15 pm on March 12th.
Yes, that is it.
I have booked that for you.
Thanks for the assistance.
Anything else I can do for you today?
No, I'm all set, thanks.
Have a good day.
I need a flight for Saturday this week.
What are your travel details?
I'm leaving from London, traveling to Atlanta, and I want to return on March 12th.
I've found 3 possible flights; there is an American Airlines flight for $376 that leaves at 8:35 pm and returns at 3:30 pm.
I am the only one traveling, are there any other flights?
I've found 2 other flights; Delta Airlines for $304, outbound at 3:35 pm and returning 5:30 pm.
What airport does it leave from? Are there zero stops?
This flight leaves from Heathrow International Airport, with 1 stop.
I'm leaving today - are there any other flights available?
I found 1 United Airlines flight outbound at 10:25 pm and returning at 10:30 am for $237
That sounds good. It's a short trip, can you help me get the tickets?
To review: The flight is from London to Atlanta through United airlines. You depart today at 10:25 pm and return March 12th at 10:30 am. There is 1 passenger in Economy.
That sounds good - is it refundable?
The ticket is not refundable, it has been confirmed.
When do both flights arrive?
The departing flight arrives at 4:29 am and the return flight arrives at 0:34 am
Thanks for your help, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
I need a flight leaving on the 2nd.
Where will you be flying out of?
I am flying out of Atlanta, GA.
When will you be returning?
I will be flying to London and I need to come back on the 12th of this month.
I have 3 flight for your trip. American Airlines flight leaving at 8:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 0:10 am. The total price of the ticket is $353.
Is the ticket refundable?
Sorry that ticket is a nonrefundable one.
Ok that sounds good. Can you but the tickets for me?
Flying from Atlanta to London on American Airlines economy class parting tomorrow at 8:40 pm and returning on March 12th at 0:10 am for 1 person. Does that sound good?
Yep that sounds good. What airport will I be flying into and what time will it arrive?
You will be arriving at 10:44 am at Heathrow International Airport. Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Will there be anything else?
No, that will be all.
Have a great day!
Can you search for some United Airlines flights for me?
Okay. First, where will you be leaving from and where do you want to visit?
I'm leaving from Seattle and traveling to Portland, OR.
Got it. When are you coming back?
I'm leaving on March 7th, and want to come back on March 11th.
Here's what I found: this United Airlines flight is $71, and the outbound flight leaves at 5:30 am, then the return flight leaves at 10:45 pm.
Which airport is the flight leaving from?
It will be leaving from the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That sounds like a good flight.
Great. Should I buy the tickets?
Go ahead and book them.
Let me make sure I've got this right: this United Airlines flight is coming from Seattle and going to Portland, departing next Thursday and returning March 11th. The onward flight will be leaving at 5:30 am, and the return flight will leave at 10:45 pm. There will be 1 passenger sitting in the economy class. Is that right?
Sounds good to me.
Alright, your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you so much.
Do you need anything else?
No thank you.
Okay, have a great day!
Please find me a flight to book.
On which dates do you wish to depart and return? What is the destination?
I would like to travel to LAX from the 5th to the 8th.
From where will you depart?
I am flying from Portland, OR.
There at 5 flights that match your itinerary. There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am and returns at 5:15 am. The ticket costs $138.
That works for me. Please purchase tickets for 3 people.
Please verify the details. The flight departs from Portland at 10:10 am next Tuesday and arrives at Los Angeles. The return flight is next Friday at 5:15 am. There are 3 passengers flying Economy with Alaska Airlines. Is this correct?
Yes, the details are correct.
Your tickets have been booked.
Which airport am I flying into? Can I refund the tickets?
You are flying into LAX International Airport. The tickets are non-refundable.
Thank you, that's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Could you look up some flights for me?
When are you planning on leaving?
I'll need two tickets for the 6th of March.
What area are you leaving from?
I want to use Delta Airlines and I'll be leaving from Chi-town. I want to come back on the 10th of March.
What destination are you planning on visiting?
I will be visiting NY.
There is a $129 flight from Delta Airlines that will leave at 10 pm. The return flight is timed at 6 am.
Sounds alright with me. Can you help me buy flight tickets since I'm planning on making it a short trip?
Confirm if this flight suits you: 2 tickets for an Economy flight from Chicago to New York, through Delta Airlines, will leave next Wednesday. The return date is March 10th. The departure flight is at 10 pm and the return flight is at 6 am.
It's good with me. When does the onward flight arrive?
Ticket has been confirmed. The onward flight arrives at 1:19 am.
Thanks for helping me. That will be all.
Have a good day.
Could you find a flight for me? I need to go to Seattle, WA.
Sure! But first I need some more informations: when are you leaving, when are you returning and where are you flying from?
I'm departing from SF on the 2nd. I want my return ticket for the 9th.
I've found an Alaska Airlines flight, which leaves at 2:55 pm and returns at 12 pm. The ticket price is $126.
Could you find another flight?
Of course. I've also found an American Airlines flight, which leaves at 2:15 pm and returns at 10:25 pm. The ticket price is $120, which is $6 dollars less than your previous flight.
Could you find another flight?
Sure. I've found a Delta Airlines flight, which leaves at 8 am and returns at 6:10 am. The ticket price is $132.
If I regret the purchase, can I refund the ticket?
I'm sorry, but the ticket is not refundable.
Ok, the last flight you offered works for me.
Lovely! Would you like me to book the tickets for you?
Yes, I would like to book the ticket in Economy class.
Just to confirm, your Delta Airlines flight departs from San Francisco tomorrow at 8 am and goes to Seattle. You return on March 9th at 6:10 am. The seating class is Economy and the number of passengers is 1.
Yes, I confirm that. When and where does the onward flight arrive?
Congratulations, your ticket has been confirmed! For the onward flight, you'll arrive at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport at 10:11 am.
Ok, thanks for everything.
You're welcome, have a nice day!
Could you look for flights for this sunday, please?
Could you please tell me the location of your departure and destination and the return date, please?
I will be leaving from New York and I'll fly to Vancouver. I'll come back on the 5th, and I'd like to travel in economy
I found 1 convenient flight: Delta Airlines leaving at 6 am, returning at 12:20 pm. the price is $342
that's perfect
do you want me to book the flight?
yes, please
please confirm the following details: flight with Delta Airlines from New York to Vancouver, in economy, 1 passenger, departing the day after tomorrow at 6 am and returning next tuesday at 12:20 pm
yes, that's it. At what time does the departure flight arrive?
your booking is confirmed. The flight will arrive at 11:11 am
thanks for your help
is there aything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thanks for your help
have a good day
Could you search a flight for me? I'm leaving thursday next week.
When are you coming back?
I would like to come back on the 10th of march.
Where will you be leaving from and where is your destination?
I'm going to phoenix, AZ and i'm leaving from chicago.
There is a flight by Delta airlines. The outbound flight leaves at 8:30 am, the return flight is at 11:55 am. The ticket costs $291
Which airport will it arrive at? Is the ticket refundable?
It will land at Sky Harbor International Airport. The ticket is non-refundable.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should i buy the tickets?
Yes, i would like to book these.
Please confirm: The flightis from Chicago to Phoenix with Delta airlines. It departs next thursday at 8:30 am. The return date is march 10th at 11:55 am. It will be economy class for 1 person.
That sounds good.
Your ticket has been booked.
Thank you.
Is there anything else i can help you with?
No thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you look for American Airlines flights for me please?
Which location are you going to be leaving from and where are you planning on traveling to?
I will leave from LA, and going to Mexico City.
When were you planning your departure and your return?
I would like to leave on the 5th and would like to return on March 8th in Economy.
There is 1 American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:45 pm and returns at 8:05 am with a price of $160 per ticket.
It will be a short trip so that flight sounds good for one person. May I book that flight?
To confirm, your 1 Economy American Airlines flight from Los Angeles next Tuesday leaves at 2:45 pm. You will be headed to Mexico City with a return date of next Friday at 8:05 am.
No, there will be 3 people all together.
So let's confirm that this is a 3 passenger flight from Los Angeles.
Yes, please tell me which airport will be our destination?
Your ticket is confirmed and your destination is Benito Juarez International Airport.
Can you tell me if the tickets are refundable?
No, the tickets are not refundable.
Thank you, that's all the help I need.
Have a super day.
Please search me some flights.
Whats the departure city and when the you want to leave?
Leaving from Los Angeles on 9th of this month and i would prefer American Airlines
When will you be back, and which city are you planning to visit?
Traveling to washington and back on march 11th
American Airlines has a 2:10 pm outbound and its return is 9:55 pm the price is $294
When does the return flight land?
It lands at 1:47 am
That is good
Should i book the tickets?
Yes please make it economy for 1
Please check: American Airlines march 9th at 2:10 pm flight from Los Angeles to Washington and return for 9:55 pm March 11th return. economy for 1
That is good
Your ticket is booked
Thanks for the help
Anything else
No, thank you
Have a good day
Can you find Economy flights for me?
Ok. What are you departure and arrival destinations? When would you like to leave?
Departing San Francisco on the 2nd of March. Returning on March 13th.
Where are you going?
To Phoenix
I have found 4 possible flights. The first is an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:10 am with the return flight leaving at 6:15 am. The cost is $168
That sounds good. Can you help me buy the tickets?
Yes ok. Please confirm the following: The flight is from San Francisco to Phoenix with American Airlines? The dates are departing tomorrow and returning on March 13th? Departure flight leaves at 8:10 am and returns at 6:15 am? 1 passenger flying Economy?
No. I need 4 tickets.
Please confirm the following: The seating class is Economy and the number of passengers is 4?
Yes. That's good
Ok. Your ticket is confirmed
Thank you. That's all I need
Have a wonderful day.
I need to find a flight.
Leaving when and returning when? And where will you be going?
Leaving on the 2nd of March going to Phoenix, AZ and returning on the 12th of March. I'd like something on United Airlines and it's for three people.
Leaving from where please?
That will be from Portland.
I have a United Airlines flight leaving at 9:30 AM and returning at 6:10 PM for $148.
Which airport does it fly into and does it have zero stops?
It flies into Sky Harbor International Airport And it has 0 stops.
That sounds good for my short trip. May I book tickets with you?
Confirming the following, leaving from Portland at 9:30 am, going to Phoenix on United Airlines tomorrow. Returning on March 12th At 6:10 PM. Flying in economy class for 3 passengers.
Where does it fly out of and is the ticket refundable?
The ticket cannot be refunded and the flight leaves from PDX International Airport. The booking is confirmed.
Thank you for helping me today.
You are very welcome.
Can you search flights for me?
Sure. When are you leaving and where from?
I am leaving on the 4th of March from Atlanta, GA. I want to travel Economy and I want to return on the 12th of this month.
Where will you be going?
I am going to LA.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:30 pm. The return flight leaves at 9:05 am. The price is $198.
Are there other flights available?
Yes. There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 5:40 pm. It returns at 8:40 pm. The cost is $180.
Are there any other options? There are two people in my group.
I found 2 convenient flights for you. Southwest Airlines leaves at 1:30 pm and returns at 1:40 pm. The cost is $238.
Where does it depart from and how many stops are there?
It goes from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and has 1 stop.
OK that sounds good. Can you buy the tickets for me?
To confirm: you fly on Southwest Airlines from Atlanta to Los Angeles next Monday at 1:30 pm. You return March 12th at 1:40 pm. You fly Economy with 2 passengers.
Yes, correct.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find some flights for me that leave from London, England. I would prefer American Airlines
When do you think you will be coming back?
I would like to get back on March 12th.
When would you like to leave and where do you plan to go?
I am going to SF with 4 other people. I would like to leave on the 4th.
An American Airlines flight is available that has an outbound flight at 3:05 pm. The return flight will leave at 7:05 am. The price of the flight is $414
This sounds good. It'll be a short trip so I'd like it to be Economy class. Can you help with purchasing tickets for the flight?
So just to be sure, this flight originating in London will go to San Francisco. It is an American Airlines flight that departs next Monday and returns on March 12th. The onward flight leaves at 3:05 pm and return flight leaves at 7:05 am. It is for 4 passengers in the Economy class.
Yeah, that sounds great
You ticket is purchased and confirmed
Thank you very much. That will be all.
Have a great day!
Can you find a flight for me? I am leaving from Chi-town.
Where are you planning to visit? When do you plan to leave and when do you plan on returning?
I am traveling to SF on the 5th of this month. I want to return on the 8th.
I found 4 flights matching your criteria. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 12:30 pm. The return flight leaves at 4:25 pm. The price of the ticket is $295.
When does my return flight arrive and how many stops does it have?
The return flight arrives at 1:47 am and has 1 stop.
That flight sounds good to me. I am planning for a short trip. Can you help me buy tickets?
Of course. Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Chicago to San Francisco. The airline is American Airlines. The departure date is next Tuesday and the return date is next Friday. The onward flight leaves at 12:30 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:25 pm. The seating class is economy and there is 1 passenger.
Yes that sounds good. Which airport does the flight depart from? Will the ticket be refundable?
Your ticket has been confirmed. Your flight departs from O'Hare International Airport. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
Thank you for the help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to find a flight for one person please.
What city and day would you like to leave and where will you be traveling to?
I want to fly from Las Vegas to LA on March 3rd. I would like a fight on American Airlines if possible.
What date will you return?
I want to retun on March 9th and would like a flight on United Airlines.
Ok, there is 1 flight on United Airlines that leaves at 12:05 pm. The return flight departs at 8:05 am and it is $94 for a ticket.
Yes, that flight works for me.
Would you like to purchase a ticket for this flight?
Yes, please reserve the ticket.
Ok, you want 1 Economy ticket for the United Airlines flight from Las Vegas to Los Angeles, leaving the day after tomorrow at 12:05 pm, and returning on March 9th at 8:05 am. Is that correct?
Yes, I that is correct. Is this a refundable ticket? Also, what is the arrival time of the onward flight?
I have confirmed your reservation. Sorry, this ticket is not eligible for a refund. The onward flight has an arrival time of 1:15 pm.
Thanks, I appreciate it.
Is there anything further I can help you with?
That's all, thanks.
Hope you have a great day!
I'd like to book a flight for 4 people.
Where would you like to go? When do you plan to leave? Where would you like to leave from?
I want to leave from Ciudad de Mexico and go to New York City. I'd like to leave on the 2nd and get back on the 14th of March.
I found 1 convenient flight for your trip. The outbound flight leaves at 8:25 am and the return flight leaves at 7:25 pm. Both flights are with United Airlines and the price of the ticket is $222.
That flight sounds good to me.
Can I help you with anything else?
I'd like to buy tickets for this flight.
Please confirm the following details: The flight is from Mexico City to New York. The airlines is United Airlines. The departure date is tomorrow at 8:25 am and the return date is March 14th at 7:25 pm. The seating class is Economy and the number of tickets you want to buy is 4.
That sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Alright, have a great day.
Can you search for a flight for four people?
Where would you like to visit, and what are your departure and return dates?
I would like to go to San Fran. I want to depart from Portland on the 1st and return on the 10th.
I found 5 flights that match your search. One is a flight by Alaska Airlines. The time for the departing flight is 7:55 am and the time for the return flight is 12:20 pm. The ticket costs $136.
Which airport does the flight arrive at?
The flight will land at SFO International Airport.
What are the arrival times for the departing and return flights?
The departing flight arrives at 9:48 am, and the return flight arrives at 2:13 pm.
Sounds good to me. I am planning for a short trip. Can you help me book the tickets?
Please confirm these details: you are booking a flight from Portland to San Francisco via Alaska Airlines. The departing flight is today at 7:55 am, and the return flight is on March 10th at 12:20 pm. You are booking 4 Economy class seats.
Yes, that sounds correct.
I have confirmed your ticket.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you search for flights leaving on the 2nd.
When are you coming back?
I will be coming back on March 11th.
Where are you going and where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from LAX and going to Philadelphia.
There is 1 flight. It is a Southwest Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 1:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 8:35 pm. The ticket price is $307.
Sounds good to me.
Should I buy tickets for it.
Yes, please buy the tickets.
Please confirm: the flight is from Los Angeles and goes to Philadelphia. The departure is tomorrow at 1:40 pm on Southwest Airlines returning on March 11th at 8:35 pm on Southwest Airlines, These are economy seats and the number of passengers is 1.
That is good.
Your ticket is confirmed
Thanks for your help.
Anything else I can help you with?
No.Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you please search flights for me? I am leaving from Chicago.
What are your travel dates to leave and return?
I want to return on the 10th and leave on the 4th of March.
Where do you want to go?
I am traveling to Seattle, WA and prefer to use Southwest Airlines. There will be three people in my group.
I found 1 convenient flight for your trip. There is a Southwest Airlines flight outbound at 6:15 pm with the return flight leaving at 6:50 pm. The price of the ticket is $228.
What airport does the it fly into, and is the ticket refundable?
The flight arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. And, unfortunately, the ticket is non-refundable.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like me to buy the ticket?
Yes, please book that flight.
The flight is leaving from Chicago and arriving in Seattle on Southwest Airlines. The departure date is next Monday at 6:15 pm, and the return date is March 10th. The flight leaves at 6:50 pm. The seating class is Economy, and the number of passengers is 3. Is that correct?
Yes, that sounds great. What airport does the flight depart from?
Your ticket is confirmed. The flight departs from the O'Hare International Airport.
Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day!
I would like to book a flight for my vacation.
What is the departure date and when is your return?
I would like to leave tomorrow and come back on March 9th.
What is your destination and where are your departing from?
I am departing from Seattle, WA and going to New York.
There is a American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 4 pm and the return flight is at 3:40 pm. The cost is $302.
Are they any other flights available?
There is a flight with Delta Airlines leaving at 12:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 7:30 am. The cost is $327.
That flight sounds good. Can you buy the tickets?
Confirm you would like to book 1 Economy flight leaving tomorrow at 12:15 pm from Seattle to New York with Delta Airlines returning on March 9th at 7:30 am.
Yes that is good.
Your ticket is purchased.
Thank you for your help.
Do you need anything further?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
I'd like to search for some flights, please.
What is your departure and arrival location?
I'm going to San Francisco from Phoenix. I need a flight for 2 people on March 12th.
What date are you leaving?
I'm going to leave on the 8th of March.
I have 3 flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:15 am and the he return flight will leave at 8:10 am for $167.
That sounds good to me, especially if I can travel Economy.
I have a flight from Phoenix to San Francisco on American Airlines. The flight will leave next Friday and return on March 12th. The onward flight will leave at 6:15 am and return at 8:10 am. This flight will be for 2 in Economy class.
Perfect. When is the return flight arriving?
Confirmed. The arrival of your return flight will be 12:49 pm.
Can I get this refunded if I need to?
No, unfortunately this ticket is non-refundable.
Okay, thanks.
May I assist you with anything else?
Nope, I'm good.
Have a great rest of your day!
Can you find flights for me leaving Chi-town?
When are you returning?
I want to arrive back on the 14th of March.
Where are you going and when do you intend to leave?
I am the one and only person in my group and I am going to Seattle on the 1st.
I found a $183 Delta Airlines flight departing at 3:35 PM with a return flight arriving at 11:50 PM.
Okay, that works for me, can I purchase it?
To confirm, you would like to purchase 1 Delta Airlines Economy ticket departing today from Chicago for Seattle at 3:35 PM with a return flight departing at 11:50 PM on March 14th?
Yes, that is correct.
Your purchase is confirmed.
Thanks.
Do you need anything else?
No thanks.
Good bye.
I really like American Airlines, could you search for some flights for me leaving from Vegas?
What is your departure date and date of return?
I would like to leave on March 5th and return on March 12th.
Are you planning to visit any places?
I would like to travel in Economy and will be visiting San Fran.
for the ticket price of $109, you can have an American Airlines flight leaving at 5:30 am and returning flight at 5:30 pm.
From which airport does the flight depart and when does the return flight arrive?
The flight departs from McCarran International Airport and arrives at 7:05 pm.
That flight is perfect.
shall I purchase the tickets?
Yes, please book the ticket.
Kindly confirm that the airlines is American Airlines leaving from Las vegas next Tuesday at 5:30 am to San Francisco and returns on March 12th at 5:30 pm. This booking is for 1 pas sager in Economy.
That is perfect.
I confirm the booking of your ticket.
Your assistance is appreciated.
Can I be of further assistance?
That will be all.
Have a good day.
I am interested in going on holiday can you help me with flights?
Where would you like to fly to and when will you be returning home?
i am thinking SF and back on the 12th.
On what date are you looking to travel and from which location?
I would like to leave tomorrow from Atlanta.
I have found 4 options that would suit you. There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 2:30 pm nad returns on 2:15 pm. The total ticket price is $308.
When does the onward flight arrive?
It arrives at 7:15 pm.
That sounds perfect.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets.
Yes please.
To confirm then the flight is from Atlanta to San Francisco with American Airlines. It departs tomorrow at 2:30 pm and returns on March 12th at 2:15 pm. The seating is Economy for 1 passenger.
Yes that is all correct.
You ticket is booked.
Which airport will I arrive at?
SFO International Airport.
That is everything thank you for your help.
Have a great day.
Could you find me round trip flights?
Where do you want to visit?
I will travel to ATL.
Where do you want to leave from? When will you depart and return?
I want to leave on the 4th and return on March 12th on Delta Airlines economy. I will be leaving from Los Angeles.
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8:40 pm and returning at 5:40 pm. It costs $209.
What airport does it leave out depart from and arrive at?
It departs from LAX International Airport and arrives at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That sounds perfect.
Do I need to buy tickets for it?
No, that is all right.
Could I help with something else?
No, thanks for your help though.
Have a wonderful rest of the day.
I need a flight for 1 people in my group.
For which dates and from where?
From Seattle, WA. On March 4th
When is your trip and return dates
To chi-town on 9th of this month in economy
There are 4 : American Airlines flights leaving at 8:15 am and returns at 2:50 pm at $316
When do the two flights arrive?
Most onward flights arrive at 7:32 pm and return at 10:03 pm
Wow. I like it.
Do i purchase the tickets?
Thats it. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I want you to scan for round trip flights.
What is your place of departure and when will you be back? What is your destination?
I want to leave on the 4th of this month and return on the 13th of this month. I would be departing from Atlanta and going to Los Angeles.
There are 4 convenient flights available. You have an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:30 pm and return flight leaves at 5:25 pm. It will cost you $200.
Is there any other flight available?
Yes, there is a Delta Airlines one. It is outbound at 5:40 pm. The return flight leaves at 9:20 am and the ticket will cost you $185.
I think I like this flight. That will be all.
Have a great day!
Can you search for flights for me?
Where are you leaving from, going, and when are you going to come back?
I'm going from NY to ATL and want to be back on March 14th.
When are you going to leave?
I'm leaving on Thursday next week.
There's a $135 American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:20 am, and the return flight leaves at 6:25 am.
That flight sounds good, and that's all I need.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a round trip flight from Delta Airlines, please help me out.
What's your departure location?
I will be departing from Paris, France.
And where will you be going? Also, when will you be leaving and coming back?
I'll be going to Philly. I want to leave on March 5th with a return on the 13th of March.
There's 1 flight I found that is convenient. It's from Delta Airlines, the outbound flight is at 5:35 pm and the return flight is at 12:20 pm. It costs $388.
What's the airport that it will be arriving in? And does it have 1 stop?
It does have 1 stop. It will be arriving in PHL International Airport.
I like the sound of that.
Do you need any additional help?
No, thanks for helping me.
Have a terrific rest of your day.
I need to find a round trip flight.
What airport will you be flying out of?
I will be leaving from Los Angeles.
What dates would you like to look for? Where would you like to fly to?
I need to leave on the 9th and come back on the 11th of this month. Flying from San Fran to Atlanta, GA.
American Airlines has a flight that departs a 2:15 pm and the return flight departs at 11:40 am for $255.
Does it have more than 0 layovers? What time does my flight arrive?
It has 1 layover and it arrives at 2:06 pm.
What other options are there?
Delta Airlines has a flight that departs at 10:05 am and the return flight departs at 12:50 pm for $198.
Is there anything else.
Southwest airlines has a flight that departs at 6:45 am and the return flight departs at 6:30 am for $236.
Thanks that will be all.
Have a great day!
I'd like you to search a flight for me. I am looking for United Airlines Economy.
Where will you be leaving from and when do you plan to leave?
I'm leaving from Chicago on the 9th of this month.
Where are you going and when will you come back?
There are two people in my group, and we want to go to San Francisco and come back on the 14th of March.
I found a United Airlines flight. Outbound is at 4 am and the return flight is 10:10 pm for $178.
When does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 6:47 am.
Which airport will I be departing and returning from?
Destination is SFO International Airport, and you will be departing from O'Hare International Airport.
That sounds great for me.
Should I purchase the tickets?
No, that's okay.
Have a wonderful day.
Hello! Could you help me to find some round-trip flights?
Sure, when do you plan to depart?
I plan to depart on March 7th.
Where would be your preferred departure and arrival locations?
I will be departing from Chicago and I plan to visit NY.
Noted! Then when will you be coming back?
I intend to return on 11th of this month.
I have found an American Airlines flight departing at 12:30 pm and returning at 5:25 am. This will cost you $136.
Are there alternative flights available?
Yes! I have also found a Delta Airlines flight departing at 9:15 am and returning at 6 am. This will cost you $125.
No thanks, are there any other available Economy flights?
Yes. There is also a Southwest Airlines flight departing at 9:50 pm and returning at 4:20 am. This will cost you $141.
Is the ticket refundable?
Yes, the this is a refundable ticket.
That sounds great!
Do you need me to make a reservation?
No, I am fine.
Do you require any further assistance?
No, thank you for your help though.
No worries, have a pleasant day ahead!
I need a round trip flight soon. Find me something from United Airlines
When and where do you plan to leave from?
I want to leave on the 2nd of March from Seattle, WA
Where are you planning to go?
I am gonna be travelling to Ciudad de Mexico!
When do you think you'll be back?
I want to be back Wednesday next week, not too long
I found 1 flight from United Airlines that might fit your schedule. It leaves at 10:10 am and the return flight is at 8:45 pm and will cost $281
Which airport does that flight leave from?
It leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport
What time does it arrive at the destination?
It'll get there at 8:05 pm
That's fine then
Should I book it?
No not right now?
Can I help with anything else then?
No, for now we're good, thanks again
Sure thing, have a wonderful day
I'm going on a trip, can you find some flights for me?
When will you be going and when will you be coming back?
I'm going with two people and we want to get back on March 8th. I am leaving next Wednesday and will be going to Washington.
Where will you be flying from?
I'm going to be leaving from Atlanta.
There is a American Airlines flight which leaves at 11:40 am and returns at 4:10 pm. It costs $132.
Sounds good, thanks.
Have a nice flight!
I'd like to get a round trip flight, returning on the 11th of this month. Can you help?
Sure. From where do you want to fly and when do you want to fly?
I will be flying out of Seattle, WA on the 4th of March. I will be needing 3 tickets and I do not have specific preferences regarding airlines.
Can you please tell me your desired destination?
Sure, I plan to visit Los Angeles.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight taking of at 3:45 pm, with the returning flight taking of at 7:10 pm. Total price of one ticket is $138.
Any other flights available? I forgot to mention that I prefer Premium Economy tickets.
I found 4 flights matching your criteria, out of which I'd recommend the American Airlines flight taking off at 8:15 am, with the return flight taking off at 11:45 pm. Ticket price is $237.
Anything else available? Also, change the return date to the 10th.
I found a Southwest Airlines flight for you, taking off at 5:25 am with the return flight taking off at 12 pm. Ticket price is $238.
Do you know if the flight has one ore more stops and also the departure airport.
The flight has 0 stops and is taking off from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
This sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to buy your tickets?
No, not at the moment.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that will be all.
Have a nice day!
Sir, I would like to book a flight and would prefer to have a round trip. Please can you help me in booking?
Sure, I can help you with that. What date would you like me to book the return ticket for you?
Probably on the 13th.
Where are you travelling to? What date will you be travelling? Which airport you want to choose for your departure?
I would like to fly on 5th of this month from SFO airport and have to reach Los Angeles.
Sure, I can help you make your reservation. The Alaska Airlines flight having its outbound leaving time at 8:20 pm flies to Los Angeles and return flight timing would be at 5:50 pm. Including tax, the cost of your travel would add to $111. Can I book with this flight?
That's fine. Sounds good.
Economy, Business class or first class ticket you want to purchase?
Nope, not now.
That's Okay! Anything to help with?
Nope, that's all. Am done with. Thank you.
Have a fantastic day.
I need help with flights.
What is your departure date?
I will be departing on the 2nd of March headed to NYC and prefer to fly Southwest Airlines.
When is your return date?
I will be returning next Wednesday.
Where will you be departing from?
I will be departing from Washington.
There is 1 flight on Southwest Airlines departing at 4:50 pm on the outbound date and at 5:15 pm on the return date for $86.
From what airport does the flight depart and is the ticket refundable?
It is a non refundable ticket departing from Dulles International Airport.
That sounds good. That's all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you look up flight times for me?
Where is your flight destination?
My travel location is London, England.
What is your return date? What is your starting location? What is your departure date?
My departure location is LA and return date is March 12th. I want to leave on the 1st.
American Airlines has a flight leaving at 9:05 am and returns at 3:05 pm. The cost is $361.
What is the departing flights airport.
The departing airport is LAX International Airport.
This sounds good. This is good.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a round trip flight. Can you find one for me?
Sure. Where are you going and what's your itinerary?
I'm leaving for Atlanta, GA on March 2nd and I want to come back on the 8th.
Okay. Where are you departing from?
I'll be heading out of San Francisco.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:50 pm and the return flight comes back at 2:30 pm. It costs $269.
Okay. What are the airports that the flight departs from and arrives to?
It leaves from SFO International Airport and lands at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Cool. That sounds great.
Do you want me to order the tickets?
No, I just needed the information. Thank you.
Okay. Have a good one!
I wish to go for a vacation to spend my holiday. will you find me round trip flights?
When are planning to leave?
i am planning to leave on today.
Which place are you willing to visit?
I Like to travel to Chi-town.
From where you will depart?
From mexico city
When you will be returning?
It is on March 12th.
Ok check the following details: FLight name is American Airlines , it leaves at 8:05 am and return flight leaves at 12:30 pm. The price of the ticket is $309.
Ok that great and good to me, thank a lot for your help
Take care have a great day
Hey, can you find some flights for me?
Sure, where are you going? Where are you coming from? And when will you depart?
I'm departing LAX and I'd like to fly to New York later today.
Sure, when will you return?
I'd like to come home Thursday next week.
Okay then. There's an American Airlines flight to New York from 6:20 pm. There's a return flight at 3:40 pm for $268.
Is there anything else?
We have a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 10:55 pm. There's a return flight leaving New York at 7:30 am. It costs $193.
That's perfect. I don't need anything else.
Okay, thank you!
I need a round trip flights
What is the return date? What is the destination?
Date of return on 11th of March; my destination si LA
What is the city of departure?
I'll leave from Washington
What is the departure date?
8th of March
I found a American Airlines flight at 10 pm; the return flight at 5:20 am. The ticket costs $310
What is the airport of departure? Is there 1 stop?
Dulles International Airport. Yes, there is 1 stops.
Ok, it sounds good! It's all, thank you
Have a nice day
Can you help me find some flights?
Sure. When will you be arriving back and where are you visiting? Also, where are you departing from?
I'll be travelling to Phoenix with four people and I am departing from Seattle. I'd like to get back on the 13th.
When are you planning to leave?
I will be departing on March 2nd.
I managed to find 3 flights for your trip with American Airlines. The flight leaves at 8:15 am and the returning flight is 6:15 am. It will cost $243.
That's perfect for me.
Shall I purchase that tickets now?
That's okay, that's all I needed.
Have a great day!
I have some unused vacation time coming up and would like to go on a trip. Can you search round trip flights for me?
Sure, lets gather some details first. Where would you like to travel to and when? Also will you be returning from the same location of your initial travel?
I would like to travel to Vancouver, from New York City on March 11th.
Okay, great, when would you like to leave?
I would prefer to leave the first day of my vacation which is the 6th of March.
I was able to locate 2 convenient flights matching your criteria. The first flight is a Delta Airlines outbound flight that leaves at 6 am and the return flight leaves at 3:20 am for a total of $297.
That flight fits my budget and schedule. That is all I need, thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you search airline flights for me?
Where would you like to visit?
I'm traveling to London on March 3rd and I prefer American Airlines.
When are you returning?
I want to return next Tuesday.
Where will you be leaving from
I'm leaving from Chicago.
I found 1 convenient American Airlines flight for your trip, departing at 12:30 pm. The return flight leaves at 0:10 am and the ticket price is $400
Which airport does the flight arrive in and which airport does the flight depart from?
The destination is Heathrow International Airport and departs from O'Hare International Airport.
That flight sounds good. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I am planning to go for a trip. Can you find me round trip flights?
Which place you are leaving from?
from Seattle, can you find?
To which place you have planned to visit?
Yes, I like to visit LA.
May I know the exact date when you are leaving from?
on the 8th
May I know the returning date?
Yes, I will be back on March 10th.
Found 5 flights: An outbound flight through Alaska Airlines leaves at 3:45 pm and return flight leaves at 7:10 pm for which the ticket cost will be $148.
Can you check whether the ticket is refundable?
Yes, ticket is refundable.
That seems great. Thank you for your help.
Have a great day.
Hey, I'm going somewhere next Wednesday and I need to book a flight. Can you see what's available?
How many people are you booking for and when do you plan on returning?
There are four of us, and we want to get back on March 10th.
Where would you look the flight to depart from?
I'm leaving from Chicago so whichever airport is closest.
Where would you like the destination to be?
To Phoenix please.
I've found 1 flight that meets the criteria. It's a Delta Airlines flight. The flight outbound flight will depart at 8:30 am. The return flight will depart at 11:55 am. The price of each ticket will be $300.
Awesome that sounds perfect. Thank you.
No problem. Have a nice day.
I need to search for a round trip flight.
Do you have plans for when you are leaving and coming back? Where are you going?
Monday next week is when I want to leave, and I need to get back on March 9th. I'm going to LA.
And where are you leaving from?
From ATL.
I found an outbound American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:30 pm. The return flight will be at 5:25 pm. The ticket will cost $203.
Anything else available? I need to get back on the 10th of March. Seating doesn't matter to me.
I see a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 5:40 pm. Return flight departs at 9:20 am. The price for that is $186.
Anything else available for me and 2 other people?
There's also an outbound Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 1:30 pm. You're return flight would leave at 1:40 pm and the price is $239.
How many stops For the onward flight and when does it arrive?
It will stop 1 time and arrive at 3:29 pm.
Sounds great. That will do it.
Have a good one!
I'm going out of town for a few days, can you find me some round trip flights?
Where were you planning to go? What return date would you like?
There are 3 people in my group going to ATL. I'd like to get back on the 13th of March.
What date did you want to leave? What city will you be flying out of?
I'm leaving on the 3rd from Vancouver.
I found 2 flights for you. There is a Delta Airlines flight for $297 which leaves at 2:50 am and flies back at 7:50 am.
Sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Have a good day.
Can you find round trip flights for me?
When will you be leaving? When are you arriving back again? Where will you visit?
I will be going on the 5th and coming back the 13th. I'm traveling to Ciudad de Mexico from San Fran.
The American Airlines flight is leaving at 1:20 pm and returning at 2:55 pm. The tickets cost $177.
Will there be other available flights?
The United Airlines flight is leaving at 9:15 am and returning 8:45 pm. The pricing of tickets is $250.
The flight sounds good.
Do you think I should buy the tickets for it?
No, that is good and all I need.
Have a great day.
I need to find some round trip flights.
What is your departure date and where will you be leaving from? Also where are you planning on going?
I'll be leaving later today from Vancouver, BC. I'm heading to Chi-town.
What is your return date?
I'll be returning on the 6th of March. I have 3 people in my group and I'd like to travel in economy class.
I have a Delta airlines flight leaving at 3:20 AM and coming back at 11:55 AM for $319.
Is that a refundable ticket? And which airport does it fly into?
I'm sorry to say that the ticket cannot be refunded. It's flying into O'Hare International Airport.
Do you have anything available on United Airlines?
I have a United Airlines flight leaving at 3:15 AM and coming back at 12:45 PM for $295.
What else is available?
I'm sorry, I don't have anything else available. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Not right now.
Thank you for calling us.
This question is for you, my friend. Would you please find me some options for round-trip flights?
Sure, I can help you with that. What is your flight destination?
I'm on my way to SFO, and I want to return on next Monday.
Okay. from what city would you like to depart?
I'll be going out of Chi-town.
Got it, and what day are you leaving?
I'm out of here on the 2nd of this month, please.
All right. I show an outbound American Airlines flight, departing at 12:30 pm and returning at 3:20 pm. Your ticket cost is $269.
Do you show any other flight options?
Delta Airlines has an outbound flight, departing at 10:40 am and returning at 10:05 pm. That ticket is $212.
Okay, you have found the flight I want. Really appreciate that. You're done for now.
Done for now. Enjoy your day.
Can you find me an economy flight leaving from Delhi, India?
Where are you going, when do you plan to leave and come back?
I am going to Vegas on the 3rd of this month and hope to get back on the 14th. I prefer American Airlines
I found 1 American Airlines flight that leaves at 7 pm and comes back at 10:55 am. It'll be $376
That sounds good
Shall I book it?
No it's ok
Shall I help with anything else?
No thank you
Have a wonderful day
To meet my cousin I am flying to London. Can you find a flight for me?
Great. Please give details of embarkation and return.
Departure must be on this sunday from Atlanta and get back on 7th of March
There are 3 flights meeting your demands. One is American Airlines leaving at 3:30 pm and returns at 8:35 pm. The ticket charge is $365.
Good, it will do.
Would you like to reserve ticket now?
No, not needed now.
Any other help you need
Thank you very much for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I need flights for 3 people. Can you search flights, please?
Where would you like flights to, and what dates are you leaving and returning?
We are traveling to Chicago, leaving on the 7th of this month and returning on the 14th of this month.
From which airport would you like to depart?
We will leave from Las Vegas.
There is a flight on American Airlines, departing flight leaves at 10:55 am and return flight is at 4:30 am. Each ticket is $266.
That flight suits my needs. Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a great day!
Can you look through some flights for me? I would most like to have American Airlines. I'm going to Seattle, WA.
What is your departure city?
I will be flying out of LA.
What is the day you want to leave?
I have four total in my group. I am departing on the 2nd.
What is your return date.
I will be returning on the 11th.
I have 1 very good flight for you. This is an American Airlines flight. It will leave at 5:20 am. The return leg will be departing at 8:15 am. The ticket will cost $143.
That flight sounds very good. I don't need anything else.
Have a great day.
Can you help me search for flights, please. I will be returning on 9th of this month.
Sure. Can you tell me your departure location and time as well as your destination?
I'm flying out of Atlanta towards LAX later today.
I found an American Airlines flight taking off at 2:30 pm. The returning flight is at 5:25 pm. Total ticket price is $180.
Any other flights available?
I found a Delta Airlines flight taking off at 5:40 pm. The returning flight is at 8:40 pm. Total ticket price is $190.
Can you tell me if this flight has any stops and also where does it land?
Landing at LAX International Airport. 0 stops.
This sounds perfect! That will be all.
Have a good one!
I want to book a flight to Sydney, NSW in Australia.
Sure, where are you departing from and what date?
I'm leaving from SD, can you check flights on the 2nd of this month?
Sure, and when do you want to return?
I want to leave on the 12th of this month. Can you book economy?
Okay I have a united Airlines flight departing at 7:20 am, returning at 10:05 pm. Total cost for the return flight is $305.
What airport is that flying out of?
You'll be departing from SAN International Airport.
What airport am I flying into? Is this a refundable ticket?
The flight arrives at Kingsford Smith International Airport. The ticket is non refundable.
Okay sounds good. That's all for now.
Happy to help.
Can you help me look up some flights?
What day are you looking for and from where will you be leaving?
I'm leaving from Portland this Sunday.
What's your destination and when would you like to return?
I want to be back on the 11th of March. Also I want to go with United Airlines if possible on my trip to Seattle, WA.
I've found 1 possible flight with United Airlines. It departs at 10:45 pm while the return flight will leave at 4:15 am. The price is $73.
Which airport will I be landing in? Also, does it have zero layovers?
You'll be landing in Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and the number of stops is 0.
That works for me.
Would you like to buy a ticket now?
No, I'm good. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you look up a flight for me?
Sure, when do you plan to leave?
I am looking to leave on March 4th
Where are you departing from? What is your destination and when is your return date?
I will be leaving from Paris, France and traveling to Atlanta, GA with 3 people in my group. My return date is on the 14th.
I found 2 American airlines flight for you. The departure time is 4:05 am and return time at 3:25 pm. The price is $382 per ticket.
This is the flight i want.
Do you want me to book the flight for you?
No, not yet.
Is there anything else i can help you?
No that's it.
Have a nice day.
Can you find me a flight leaving today?
Sure. Where from? And where to?
I'd like an economy flight from Seattle to San Francisco. I plan to return on the 8th of this month.
We can fly you with Alaska Airlines. The flight departs at 12 pm. There's a return flight on the 8th at 2:55 pm. We have 5 different flights available for $133.
How many stops are there? Is it refundable?
Unfortunately it's not refundable. There are 0 stops.
Okay, that sounds fine.
Can I book it for you?
Actually, no I don't need it.
Is there anything else I can do?
Nothing, thanks for everything.
Okay, have a good day.
Can you search for Economy flights for me?
When do you want to leave and return?
I want to leave on the 5th and return on March 12th.
Where do you want to visit and when?
I prefer to fly on Delta Airlines, leaving from Portland and traveling to Ciudad de Mexico.
There is a flight on Delta Airlines leaving at 8:45 am and returning at 1:45 pm. There is one flight for $271 dollars.
That's great, thanks.
hAVE A GOOD DAY.
Can you find a return flight for me this Sunday?
When are you coming back?
I want to return on March 9th.
Where are you leaving from and planning to visit?
I am leaving from Mexico City and traveling to NYC. I want to book a Economy flight for 1 person.
I have found 2 flights for your trip. There is a Delta Airlines flight available that leaves at 3 pm and has a return flight at 7:20 am. The ticket costs $236. I can discuss the other flight's details if the first flight does not work for you.
The first flight sounds good to me and is all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I am looking for a flight. Look for flights from Seattle that return on the 13th.
Where are you planning to go? What date would you like to travel?
I am flying to SF on the 9th of this month.
Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines? The flight takes off at 12 pm. It returns at 2:55 pm. The ticket costs $127.
Is there anything else? I want one Economy class ticket.
I found 3 flights for you. Would you like to fly with Delta Airlines? The flight takes off at 6:10 am and returns 8 am. The ticket costs $131.
Ok.
Can I help you with something else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
Hi! I need help looking to book a round trip flight. It doesn't matter which class.
Let's start with some details. Where would you be departing from and where are you headed? When would you like to return?
I'm looking for flights from LAX to Vancouver, BC. I'll be returning on the 13th of this month.
When will you be departing?
I'll be leaving on the 8th of March.
I have found an American Airlines flight that departs at 3:05 pm. It is scheduled to return at 11 pm. Tickets are $206 each.
I need to change the details. I'd like four tickets to New York instead.
I've found a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 10:55 pm and returns at 7:30 am. Tickets are $325.
Can you tell me where the flight lands and at what time?
Of course. It arrives at JFK International Airport at 8:05 am.
Great, that's everything I need to know. Thank you.
You are welcome. Have a wonderful day!
I'm looking for a flight
Which day is your return?
On the 12th. Find me an economy ticket
Where do you want to go, and where are you traveling from? Also what are your travel dates?
I am flying to London, UK from San Francisco. I want to leave on the 9th of March
I found 3 flights. There is an American Airlines flight ath leaves at 7:05 am and the return flight back leaves at 3:05 pm. It'll cost $391
Ok that's good
Can I help you with something else?
No that's all thanks
Have a good day
I need to find a round trip flight to NYC.
What is the departure city and date? And when would you like to return?
I would like to begin travelling day after tomorrow, leaving from Atlanta and returning on the 5th
There are 4 flights that fit your criteria. Does American Airlines work? There is a flight leaving at 3:25 pm and returning at 11:45 am with a ticket price of $144
Are there additional options?
There is a Delta Airlines outbound flight that departs at 3:40 pm and the returning flight leaves at 11:25 am, with a ticket price of $125
Are there any more? I would like Economy tickets from London, UK
There is 1 United Airlines flight that matches your needs. The departure flight leaves at 0:25 am and the return flight leaves at 2:40 pm, with a ticket price of $311
great, that's everything for me.
Have a nice day.
I am looking out for booking a flight
Which place are you planning to go?
I would like to fly to Vegas. And I want to have my travel start date as the 7th.
Which day do you want to book the return flight? Also from which would you depart?
I would like to have my return flight from Chi-town and return date as the 11th.
Would you prefer to take American Airlines. The flight take off time is 7:05 am and return flight takes off at around 10:55 am. It will cost you $277.
Great. Thanks for help. That is all that I needed at this point in time.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a returning flight on the 14th of this month.
What location do you plan on leaving from, and where are planning to go? Is there a specific date you're interested in?
Check out flights from Los Angeles, starting today. I'm headed to NY and prefer flying with Delta Airlines.
There's 1 Delta Airlines flight taking off at 10:55 pm with a return flight at 7:30 am. Tickets cost $213 each.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I'm all set, thanks.
Enjoy your day!
I'm searching for round trip flight.
Which city do you like to depart from? WHich day would you like to take return flight and which date do you want to fly?
I like to start my travel on later today from Ciudad de Mexico and the returning on the 13th
Where you like to go?
I like to fly to Phoenix, AZ
How about flying with American Airlines which takes off at 8:05 am and return at 7:35 am which costs $253
Okay thats cool
Can I assist on anything else?
No thanks for the help thats all for now.
Have a wonderful day
I am looking for a round trip flight from Toronto, Ontario.
When would you like to return and where are you planning to go?
I want to return on the 11th of March and I'm flying to SFO.
When would you like to take off?
On the 2nd of March with American Airlines.
I found 1 flight for you. How about an American Airlines flight that takes off at 5:55 am, returns at 7:05 am and costs $309?
How many stops does the flight have and which airport does the flight leave?
It has 1 stop and takes off from Toronto Pearson International Airport.
OK. Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
I'm searching for round trip flights.
Departure and arrival city? Date of return flight?
Flying from Phoenix to Los Angeles and returning the 13th of this month.
Date of departure?
The 9th of this month.
How about American Airlines, there's a flight leaving 7:35 am and returning 7:50 am for $95.
Anything else?
There's a Delta Airlines flight leaving 12:15 pm and returning 3:05 pm for $176.
From which airport?
Departing Sky Harbor International Airport.
Ok, that's all for now.
Have a nice day.
I would like a round trip flight on any airline.
When would you like to leave?
Next Monday.
Is there any particular day for your return?
I would like to return on March 12th. Is there anything from Chicago?
Where would you like to fly to?
I want to go to Seattle.
There is a 2:50 pm flight on American Airlines. The returning flight is 4 pm and the price of the ticket is $268.
Are there any stops.
Just 1.
Fine
Is there anything else I could assist you with?
No. I appreciate your assistance.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Will you help me find a round trip flight?
Which days are you leaving and returning? What city are you departing from?
I plan to travel on the 5th from Seattle, WA, and return on 14th of this month.
Where are you visiting?
Mexico City on Economy please.
I found 3 flights. One of them costs $295 on American Airlines with take off at 8:15 am and returning flight take off at 8:05 am.
Great.
Anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a round trip flight.
Where are you looking to fly?
I'm flying to Phoenix, AZ.
Alright, where are you departing from and what are your travel dates?
I'm leaving from SF. I want to leave on the 3rd and come back on the 9th of March.
I found 3 possible flights. There is a $131 Delta Airlines flight leaving 5:50 am with the return flight leaving at 11:55 am.
What else is there?
I also found a $131 Southwest Airlines fight that leaves at 11:10 pm with the return flight leaving at 6 am.
What else is there? I want an Economy class ticket. What if I leave on the 6th?
I found 1 possible fight: a $130 United Airlines flight leaving at 2:15 pm. The return flight leaves at 5:10 pm.
Alright, thanks that's all I was looking for.
Have a good rest of your day.
I need help finding a round trip flight.
All right. I can find that that for you. Please let me know when you'd like to travel, your departure city, and the date of your return flight.
Please find me Economy class tickets from Chicago. I'd like to leave on the 10th of March and return on the 14th of this month.
What's your destination?
I'll be travelling to Seattle, WA.
Do you like flying with Delta Airlines? I've found a $181 ticket for a flight that departs at 9:15 am. The return flight takes off at 4:55 am.
All right. Thank you. That will be all.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a flight.
Where do you want to go?
I want to fly to Phoenix.
What day would you like to return?
I want to return the 12th.
What date would you like to leave and from what airport?
Look at flights from Seattle, WA for Monday next week.
Would you like to fly on American Airlines, leaving at 8:15 am? The returning flight will depart at 8:40 am and the ticket is $244.
Can you find something else? I want 4 tickets, and I want to take United Airlines.
I found 1 flight for you with United Airlines. It takes off at 5:30 am, and the return flight leaves at 6:10 pm. The ticket is $218.
Great thanks, that's all.
Have a good one.
I will be having a round trip flight, one which I will be flying to Chicago for a tourist visit?
Can you tell me the city from where you will be flying from? When will you be having the return flight?
I will be returning on 11th of March, though please keep in mind that I will me flying from Portland, OR.
When will you be taking the flight?
I usually prefer United Airlines so I would like to have the flight with that Airline and I will depart on Saturday this week.
I see that 1 flight corresponds to what you have requested. Would you like to have United Airlines as your flying airline? This specific flight will be departing at 10:45 pm. As for the return flight it will be taking off at 4 am and the ticket will be costing you $295.
Alright. I appreciate your help, that would be all.
Have a wonderful day!
I want flights from Las Vegas and I wanna start the travel on the 5th.
What day would you like to have the return flight?
Coming back 12th of March
where are you gonna go>
I am going to CDMX
I have 2 flights for you and would you like to go with American Airlines? The flight leaves at 9:30 am. The return flight takes off at 8:05 am and the ticket is $234
alright
can I assist with anything else?
No thank you
Have a great day
I am taking a trip soon, can i see what flights are available?
iWhere and when would you like to depart and travel to?
I need a flight for sunday this week from Atlanta to Toronto.
When would you like to return?
I plan to come back on the 9th of March .
There are 3 flights available with American Airlines . It leaves at 3:25 pm. The flight back takes off at 10:05 am for $229.
Of course
Is there anything else you need?
No, thank you for everything .
Enjoy your day.
I am looking for a round trip flight to Chicago on the 10th.
Which city do you want to depart from?
From Seattle, WA.
Which day do you want to return?
On March 12th.
I found 4 flights. How about an American Airlines flight that takes off at 4 pm, returns at 7:50 am and costs $251.
Alright, sounds good.
Can I help with anything else?
No. Thanks for the help.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a round trip flight for a trip to Portland.
On what date please?
That would be on the 8th.
When would you like to return?
On March 13th.
Departing from which city?
From Phoenix, AZ please.
I have 4 possibilities for you. On American Airlines I have a flight at 12:40 PM coming back at 9:05 AM for $162.
Do you have anything on Southwest Airlines?
On Southwest Airlines, I have a flight at 7:15 PM Returning at 7:40 AM for $186.
Where does that fly out of? I have three passengers by the way.
It leaves from Sky Harbor International Airport for 1 traveler.
OK, that's fine.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I don't think so.
Thank you for calling.
I'm looking for a flight.
When would you want the return flight to happen? From which city are you departing? What is your intended destination?
I'm leaving San Fran, and I'm going to Portland, OR. I want to leave on March 5th and return on Thursday next week.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight on March 5th that returns on Thursday next week. It takes off at 12:20 pm and the returning flight takes off at 7:55 am. The ticket costs $121.
Is the ticket Premium Economy?
Its an Economy seat.
Ok. I'll take that.
Would you like some help with another flight?
No, but thanks.
Have a good day.
I need to find a flight.
What are your departure and return dates?
I want to fly Delta Airlines leaving on the 10th of this month and returning on the 13th.
Where will you be going?
I want to fly to Atlanta, GA.
And where do you want to leave from?
I want a flight out of Los Angeles.
I found you 1 flight with Delta Airlines. It leaves at 9:20 am and the return flight is at 7:50 am it will cost $233.
That sounds okay.
Is there anything else you need help with?
No, that will be all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
You can find me please a flight with Delta Airlines?
Where you want to go ?In witch day you want to be the return and which city you want to depart from?
I want from Seattle, WA to Toronto, Ontario ,returning on the 11th.
You would like to travel is what date?
My travel will start on 7th of this month.
I have for you 1 flight .What is your opinion about flaying with Delta Airlines at 8:45 am and return at 2:10 am .That cost $308
Thank you that is all i need.
Have a great day!
I'm going on a trip. Can you book 2 flight tickets for me?
Sure, what day are you flying out and when are you returning?
I'll be flying out on the 9th, and returning on March 14th.
Which city are you leaving from?
I'll be flying out from Vancouver. Can you book me a ticket in the Economy section?
Got it. And where will you be flying to?
I'm going to Seattle, WA.
How about this flight with Delta Airlines for $306? The departure flight is at 2:50 am and the return flight is at 7:40 am.
Which airports does it fly out from and land in?
The flight would be from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport to YVR International Airport.
Ok, that sounds good. That's all for now.
Have a good day.
I'm going on a trip. Can you book me a flight from Portland leaving on the 1st?
Sure, what day would your return flight be?
I'd be flying back the 4th of this month.
Where are you going?
I'll be flying to LAX.
Ok, I found 5 flight options. There's one with Alaska Airlines for $165. It would be at 5:40 pm on the way there, and 5:15 am on the way back.
What else is there? I prefer Delta Airlines.
Yes, there is a flight with Delta Airlines for $214. It would be at 9:35 am on the way there and 6:50 am on the way back.
What else is there?
Sorry, they don't have anything else. What else can I help you with?
Could you try seeing what United Airlines has?
Sure. I found a flight with United Airlines for $171. It would be at 12:05 pm on the way there, and 8:55 am on the way back.
Ok, that's fine. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I'm searching for a flight.
Which metropolis do you wish to leave from?
Search for flights from Washington.
What place are you planning on visiting?
I am taking a plane to Atlanta, GA.
What date would you like to take the return flight? What day do you want to travel?
I'd like to fly with United Airlines, starting by travel on the 7th of March and returning on 12th of this month.
I got 1 flight for you. Do you want to fly with united Airlines, which takes off at 5:15 pm and returns on 6:30 pm? The ticket price is $118.
How many passengers can take this?
This is for 1 passenger.
Alright.
Could I assist you with anything else?
Nah. Thanks so much for helping me.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Hello, I am looking for a flight.
From where and when would you like to depart? Also, where is your intended destination?
I am looking for an economy flight from Chicago to Portland on Monday next week.
When would you like to return from Portland?
I will be returning on the 11th. I would also like to purchase four tickets.
There is a flight by Southwest Airlines which departs at 4:35 am and returns at 3:15 pm. The tickets cost $301, are you interested?
Yes! Thank you very much.
Have a great day ahead.
I'm looking for a flight for the 8th of March.
What date would you like to start your travel?
Sunday this week, please.
Where are you going and which city are you departing from?
I'm departing from Atlanta, GA and going to SF.
I found a flight with American Airlines. Take off is at 11:40 am and return time is 3:50 pm. The ticket costs $241.
Okay.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you for your help.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for a flight, which ones do you recommend?
On which day do you intend to travel back?
Look for me for the flights returning from Paris on March 10th.
Where are you traveling to, and on what date would you like to travel?
I plan to travel to Los Angeles on the 2nd.
Would you you be willing to travel with American Airlines. The flight is expected to take off at 4:05 am. The return flight takes off at 9:40 am. The cost of the ticket is $368.
Ok. Thanks, that is all I need.
Enjoy your day.
Returining o 13th of this month. I am looking for a flight.
which city do you want to depart from? Where are you planning to go? wheat date would you like to travel?
I am flying to Los Angeles. Look for flight from SFO. I want to start my travel on next Tuesday.
Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines.The flight take off at 8:20 pm. The returning flight takes at 5:50 pm. the tickets coasts $111
Is there anything else?
Would you like to fly with American Airlines. the flight takes if at 3:50 pm. The returning flight takes off a 6:30 am. The tickets coasts $95
Ok. Thanks, that is all I need.
Have a good day.
I'm looking to book a flight to ATL.
Sure. Can I get the dates you'd like to depart and return? What city are you traveling from?
I'll be departing from Portland, OR. Departing on the 1st of March and returning on the 10th of March please.
I found 2 flights. How about this flight on Southwest Airlines. It departs at 4:55 pm and the return departs at 1:30 pm. Seats cost $310.
Thanks, that's good for now.
Take care.
I am currently looking for flights to where I am traveling on the 1st of this month.
Which day do you want to take the return flight?
I will be returning on the 10th of this month.
From which city will you be departing from and traveling to?
I will be departing from NYC traveling to ATL.
I see here an American Airlines flight from NYC to ATL for $131. Departure time is at 11:20 am and returning at 6:25 am on the return date. If this flight does not meet your needs, I have found 4 other flights as well.
Outstanding.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
Nothing else. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Returning on the 11th. I am looking for a flight.
where are you planing to go? Which city do you want to depart from?
I am flying to ATL. Look for flights from LA. find me Economy. class tickets.
what date would you like to travel?
I want to start my travel on March 9th.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines. The flight takes off at 5:25 pm. The returning flight takes of at 2:30 pm. The tickets costs $180 I found 4 flights for you.
Which airport does the flight leave from? where does the flight land?
The flight is for Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. It takes off from LAX International Airport.
Is there anything else?
Would you like to fly with Delta Airlines. The flight takes of at 8:40 pm. the returning flight takes off at 5:40 pm. The ticket coasts $199
I want three tickets. I am not particular about the airline. Is there anything else?
Would you like to fly with Southwest Airlines. The flight takes off at 1:40 pm. The returning flight takes at 1:30 pm. The ticket coasts $222
Ok. Thanks, that is all i need.
Have a good day.
Hi, I'm looking for a flight.
What city would you like to depart from?
I'm flying to Washington and looking to find flights there from LA. I want to fly with American Airlines please.
What day would you like to take the return flight?
I need Economy class tickets that return on the 12th of March.
What date would you like to travel there?
I want to go on Sunday this week, and I need three tickets.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight departs at 2:10 pm and the return flight takes off at 2:50 pm. The ticket price is $305.
Alright.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, and thanks for the help.
Have a great day.
i want to fly into sfo. so i am looking for a flight.
after few days i want to take the return flight.
i think that returning on next thursday. then i want to start my travel on 5th of march.
i want to depart from city.
i am looking for flights from sd. i have one tickets.
i would like to fly with Alaska airlines. i think that the flight takes off at 11:10 am and the returning flight takes off at 6:10 am. the expense of ticket $108, i found 4 flights for you.
the flights have stops.
but i think that the flight has 0 stops.
i want to know about the flight arrive at my destination.
i think that the flight arrives at 12:50 pm.
ok. fine, thanks for all i need.
have a good journey.
Can you help me buy flights for a trip?
When do you want to depart and when would you like to return?
I am planning to leave on the 3rd at around 8 o"clock in the morning.
When are you returning and where do you depart from?
I'm leaving from Chicago and want to return on the 9th of march.
What time do you want to leave?
For my departing flight I can leave around afternoon 3.
Where are you going?
I am headed to Mexico City.
Do you have a preferred airline?
I like United Airlines.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Chicago to Mexico City on United Airlines. The departure date is the day after tomorrow with a return on March 9th. The onward flight leaves at 3 pm and the return flight leaves at 8 am. The seating class is Economy with 1 total passenger.
Yes that sounds good. When does my return flight arrive?
Sorry I couldn't book your ticket. Shall I help with something else?
I wan to continue to make the reservation. I plan to leave around five pm for the return flight.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Chicago to Mexico City on United Airlines. The departure date is the day after tomorrow with a return on March 9th. The onward flight leaves at 3 pm and the return flight leaves at 5 pm. The seating class is Economy with 1 total passenger.
Yes that sounds good. Is the ticket refundable?
Sorry I couldn't book your ticket. Shall I help with anything else?
I want to continue to make the reservation. I am leaving from Atlanta.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Atlanta to Mexico City on United Airlines. The departure date is the day after tomorrow with a return on March 9th. The onward flight leaves at 3 pm and the return flight leaves at 5 pm. The seating class is Economy with 1 total passenger.
Yes that sounds good.
Sorry I couldn't book your ticket. Can I help with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a great day!
I will be leaving for a brief trip. Help me purchase flight tickets?
Is there any airlines you particularly prefer? How about Alaska Airlines, United Airlines or any other? Also, when would you like to board the return flight?
I am looking for United Airlines. I am planning to leave at half past 8 in the night on the returning flight.
What place are you leaving from and when do you plan to come back?
I am going from SF and coming back on the 7th.
What time are you leaving?
My onward flight can leave at 2:45 in the afternoon.
What is your destination?
I am going to Seattle.
What date are you leaving?
I am going on the 1st of this month.
Let me confirm: Your flight is from San Francisco going to Seattle. It is a United Airlines flight and is departing today. The return date will be next Thursday and the flight onward leaves at 2:45 pm and return flight leaves at 8:30 pm. The seating class for the flight will be Economy and the number of passengers is 1.
Not at all. I am coming back on 6th of March.
Can you confirm the following: the plane is from San Francisco and it will be returning on next Wednesday.
Sounds fine. What is the cost?
Your ticket is booked. The cost would be $132.
Thank you. That will be all.
Have a nice day!
I need tickets for a short flight i need to get.
Okay where are you off too? And what time and date should I search for?
I'm going to Paris, leaving on Sunday this week. i'm after a flight around 4:30 in the evening.
Sure, what's your departure city?
I'm flying out of Philadelphia.
Okay, what about your return flight date and time? I can try Alaska Airlines, American Airlines, what's your preference?
I prefer to fly Delta Airlines. I want to return on March 11th, looking at about quarter to 6 in the evening.
Okay, confirming the following: 1 economy flight from Philadelphia to Paris on Delta Airlines. Departing the day after tomorrow at 4:30 pm and returning on March 11th at 5:45 pm.
Yes that's all correct. How many stops are there and what's the total cost?
I wasn't able to book your ticket just yet. So, this flight from Philadelphia to Paris on Delta Airlines has 1 stop and comes to a total of $333. It departs the day after tomorrow and returns on March 11th.
Okay that sounds good.
I've now confirmed your ticket.
Thanks so much.
Do you need anything else, car hire, accommodation?
No that's it for now.
Glad to help.
I'd like to go on vacation and order some tickets.
What airlines would you like?
I want to fly Delta Airlines.
Okay, what time?
I'd like to leave at 9 am.
And when would you like to visit and leave from?
I would like to return around the 14th of March from Seattle and I would like to go to Sydney, NSW.
What time would you like the return flight to be?
For the first part I want to leave in the morning 5:45 and March 2nd at five pm for the return.
To confirm your flight from Seattle to Sydney on Delta Airlines tomorrow and you will be returning March 14th. The flight leaves at 5:45 am and returns at 5 pm in Economy class with 1 person.
Fine, that works great.
I was unable to process your request. Do you need anything else?
No that is all.
Enjoy your time.
I wish to travel to LAX. Please book flight tickets for this short trip.
Where and when do you want to start from? When will you back?
I am starting from Phoenix, AZ around 7 o"clock in the morning and return back on 8th of March.
When will you leave in the return flight?
I wish to leave at 1 in the afternoon.
Is there any preferred airlines. You have American Airlines, Delta Airlines and the like. When will you leave?
I wish to leave on the 1st on Southwest Airlines.
Kindly ensure that, today Southwest Airlines flight from Phoenix to Los Angeles at 7 am. The return flight is next Friday at 1 pm. Only 1 seat in Economy class.
Nope. I wish to have Alaska Airlines. I am returning on 3rd of this month.
Kindly ensure that, it is Alaska Airlines which is day after tomorrow.
Yes. It is good for me. What is the cost and from which airport the flight starts from?
Very that, I am unable to book the ticket. In what way shall I help you further?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a great day.
I want to go on a little trip. Can you find me some tickets?
Sure. Where are you going and when are you leaving?
I'm heading to NYC and I want to leave around 7:15 in the morning.
Okay. When do you want to come back?
I want to head back around 16:45.
Alright. So, when are you leaving and where from? Do you want a specific airline like United Airlines, Southwest Airlines, or something else?
I want to leave later today sometime from SFO. I really like American Airlines if they're available.
What day are you coming back?
I'll be coming home on the 9th of March.
Okay. Let me see if I have this right. You want a flight from San Francisco to New York on American Airlines. You want to leave today at 7:15 am and come back on March 9th at 4:45 pm. This would be 1 ticket for Economy class.
Yeah, that sounds about right.
I've got your ticket ordered and ready.
Thank you for all of the help!
Do you need anything else today?
Nope. That should do it. Bye.
Have a great day!
I need to buy tickets for a short trip I'm planning period I want a premium economy ticket.
Where will you be departing from?
From New York, and I want to leave around 07:30.
When are you planning to return and do you have an airline you would prefer?
I'd like to come back on the 10th of this month and I'd like to fly on Delta airlines.
What time would you like to come back on the 10th and when do you want to leave? Also where are you planning to go?
I'd like to come back at approximately 17:15 on my return and I'd like to leave on the 8th of this month period The trip is to Vancouver, BC.
Please confirm for me, traveling from New York to Vancouver on Delta airlines next Friday returning on March 10th at 5:15 pm. The onward flight will be leaving at 7:30 AM. You'll be sitting in premium economy and it's 1 passenger.
That's all correct, thank you.
The reservation has been confirmed.
Thanks for your help today, that's everything I need.
Thanks for calling, enjoy your day.
I am planning for a trip to London, England. Can you help me to buy flight tickets and the return time will be around 8:15 am.
In which Airlines do I search for the tickets, any suggestion?
Please search it in Delta Airlines.
Give me the dates of your trip, so that I can search.
I am leaving on later today at 10:15 am and will be back on the 13th.
What is your present location?
its Philadelphia, from where I am going to leave?
Please confirm : A Delta Airlines Flight from Philadelphia to London which leaves on today at 10:15 am and the return flight will leaves on March 13th at 8:15 am. An Economy class ticket for 1 person.
Can you change the return time to morning 8?
Okay, please confirm for the return flight time at 8 am for the Economy class.
Yes, that is okay. Please check with the origin Airport.
Sorry, I could not make it as you required. Do you want me to do anyother help?
Yes, can you check the flight on the 4th?
Please confirm: A Delta Airlines Flight from Philadelphia to London which leaves on next Monday at 10:15 am and the return flight will leaves on March 13th at 8 am. An Economy class ticket for 1 person.
Can you check with Southwest Airlines for the departure time quarter to 7 in the morning?
Please confirm to book on southwest Airlines for departure time 6:45 am.
Yes, that is perfect. Let me know the destination Airport name.
Sorry, I could not make the booking and tell me you need any more help from me?
No, that's okay.
Have a great day.
I'm going on a short trip. Can you buy a ticket leaving around morning 9:15?
Sure. Where are you leaving from? What date will you leave? And when do you want to book a returning flight?
I'm leaving from Seattle, WA on March 8th. I'd like my return flight to leave at 3 o"clock in the morning.
Okay, what airline would you prefer?
Delta Airlines, please.
Great. Where are you going? And what day will you come back?
I'm going to Vancouver, and I'd like to return on the 14th of this month.
Fantastic. Please confirm that you'd like to book 1 flight from Seattle to Vancouver with Delta Airlines in the Economy class. You'd like to depart next Friday at 9:15 am and return on March 14th at 3 am.
Yes, that's perfect thanks.
Sorry, I couldn't reserve the ticket. I have another ticket departing Seattle for Vancouver next Friday, and returning on March 14th with Delta Airlines.
Okay, that sounds alright.
Good, your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks, that'll be all.
Okay, have a good weekend.
I want to go on a short trip, so can you help me buy flight tickets?
Where are you visiting?
I'm going to London.
What's the date and time you want to leave, and what time do you want the return flight to be?
I'm leaving this Sunday and want to leave at 0:45 in the morning, but I can leave at around seven am.
Where are you leaving from, and when are you coming back?
I'm leaving from SFO and want to be back on the 13th.
Do you have a preferred airlines?
I want American Airlines.
Confirm the following details: You're flying from San Francisco to London at 7 am on American Airlines the day after tomorrow. You're returning on March 13th, and the return flight leaves at 0:45 am. The ticket is for 1 person in Economy class.
Yeah, that's good.
Sorry, I couldn't book the ticket, but do you need anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
Have a good day.
I need flight tickets for a short trip. The return flight needs to leave at 3:15 in the afternoon.
Where are you departing from, where are you going, and when are returning?
I am leaving from San Francisco, going to Portland and returning on the 7th of March.
What airline do you prefer?
I would like Southwest Airlines.
What date and time do you want to depart?
I want to depart at 08:15 on March 3rd.
I have 1 ticket in Economy class departing from San Francisco to Portland on Southwest Airlines. The onward flight leaves the day after tomorrow at 8:15 am and the return flight leaves at 3:15 pm next Thursday. Does that work for you?
Yes, that works for me.
Your flight has been booked.
Thanks for everything. That is all.
Have a great day.
I'm going on a short trip to SFO. Can you help me book flight tickets?
What time do you plan to leave?
I plan to return on the 14th of this month. For the day of the trip, I want to leave around quarter to 2 in the afternoon.
Which airline were you thinking of? Also, what time do you want for the return flight?
I tend to travel in Economy with a preference for Southwest Airlines. I would probably leave around afternoon 1:30 when heading back for the return flight.
From where would you be leaving?
I'm leaving from Atlanta. On the 3rd, I'll be leaving.
Can you confirm the accuracy, please? You said the flight is from Atlanta, the flight heads straight to San Francisco, the airlines is Southwest Airlines, the date of departure is the day after tomorrow, the date of return is March 14th, the flight leaves at 1:45 pm, the return flights departs at 1:30 pm, your seating class is Economy, and the number of passengers who are going is 1.
Yep, that is correct.
I had confirmed your flight.
Thank you so much.
Do you need anything else that I can gladly help you with?
No, thank you. I'm fine for now.
Thank you, enjoy the rest of your day!
Can you help me find plane tickets for an upcoming trip?
Yes I can. Where are you departing from?
I will be leaving from Los Angeles.
What will be your return date?
I would be needing to be back by the 11th.
Do you have a preference on which airline you would like to fly with?
Yes, please see if you are able to find two tickets with Southwest Airlines.
What day will you need the flight tickets and what city are you traveling from?
I will be coming from Atlanta and I will need the tickets for the 8th of March.
Do you have a preferred on what you would like for your return flight leave time to be.
Yes, can you see if there is something available for two pm?
What time would you like your onward flight leave time to be?
If they have something for 14:15 that would be wonderful.
Okay, so I have you 2 economy class seats with Southwest Airlines for next Friday. You will be leaving from Los Angeles and going to Atlanta. Your date for return is scheduled for March 11th with the onward flight time of 2:15 pm and the return flight will leave at 2 pm. Does that sound right to you?
Yes, that is perfect.
I apologize for the inconvenience however, I was not able to reserve this ticket. Would you like something else?
Can you see if United Airlines have something available for what I need?
Okay, I have 2 economy class tickets for United Airlines for next Friday, in which you are coming from Los Angeles and going to Atlanta. The return day home is scheduled for March 11th, your onward flight departs at 2:15 pm and your return time is 2 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that sounds perfect. Can you tell me what airport I will be departing from and does this flight have 0 stops?
Wow, I am so sorry to but I was not able to book that flight either, Is there something else I can do for you?
No, that is not necessary thank you.
Sorry again and enjoy your day.
I'll be going on a trip soon. Can you book flight tickets for me? I'm hoping to leave around 14:30.
No problem. Where to and from, and what day do you want to leave?
I'm going from NY to San Francisco and leaving on Saturday this week. Any ticket in Economy class is fine.
What are your preferred airlines?
I usually fly Delta Airlines.
Ok. When do you plan to fly back and what time?
I'll be flying back on March 13th, preferably around eleven in the morning.
Ok, just to confirm, you'd like to book 1 round-trip ticket in Economy with Delta Airlines from New York to San Francisco, flying out tomorrow at 2:30 pm and returning on March 13th at 11 am.
No, actually, can you change the time to 14:00 for the return flight?
Sure, just to confirm, your return flight will be at 2 pm in Economy.
Oh also, can you change the return date to the 12th?
Sure, just to confirm, your return flight will be on March 12th at 2 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect. Which airport am I flying to and is the ticket refundable?
Sorry, it looks like there's some kind of error and I'm not able to book that ticket. Can I reserve something else for you?
I need to make that reservation. My plans might change, though, so the tickets need to be refundable.
Ok, I'll try again. Just to confirm, I'm booking 1 round-trip ticket in Economy with Delta Airlines from New York to San Francisco, leaving tomorrow at 2:30 pm and returning on March 12th at 2 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Sorry, I'm getting an error again and can't make the reservation. Is there something else you'd want?
No, forget about it. Thanks for your help anyways.
Sure, have a good day.
I am planning a short trip, can you help me get the tickets? I want to fly with American Airlines. I want to leave at 12:45.
When do you want to fly back? What date are you returning?
I want to come back at 7:45 in the morning. I want to get back home on 13th of March.
When are you planning on leaving? Where are you travelling to? Where do you want to leave from?
I am going to CDMX. I plan to leave on 10th of March. I am leaving from Chicago.
Let's confirm the following: The flight from Chicago to Mexico City flying with American Airlines. Departing March 10th at 12:45 pm and returning March 13th at 7:45 am. The seating will be Economy and it's for 1 passenger.
Yeah that all sounds good. Is there only 0 stops? And, Is the ticket refundable?
Sorry I couldn't book your ticket. The number of stops is one. and the ticket is non-refundable. The flight from Chicago to Mexico City flying with American Airlines. Departing March 10th at 12:45 pm and returning March 13th at 7:45 am. The seating will be Economy and it's for 1 passenger.
No.
Sorry about that. Can I help you with anything else?
No, sorry.
Have a nice day.
Could you help me find tickets from San Francisco for a short trip?
Where do you want to go and what time would you like to leave? Do you have a favorite airline?
I will go to LAX and like to travel on Southwest Airlines at 12:45 pm.
When do you want the return flight to depart?
I would like to leave around quarter past 10 in the night for the return.
When do you want to come back?
I want to return on the 12th of this month.
When do you want to leave?
I will depart next Monday and prefer Premium Economy. Please make the return on the 13th of March.
Please confirm that you want to leave from San Francisco and will go to Los Angeles on Southwest Airlines. The flight will be next Monday and the return is on March 13th. The outbound flight leaves at 12:45 pm and the return flight leaves at 10:15 pm. You want 1 ticket on premium economy class.
No, actually I'm leaving from Paris and there are three people in my group.
Please confirm that you want to leave from Paris and need 3 tickets.
Yep, that is right. Does the flight have one stop? When will my return flight arrive?
Sorry, I was not able to make that booking. Do you need something else?
No but thank you for your help.
Have a super day.
I'm planning a trip, can you help choose a flight?
Do you have a preferred airline? Perhaps Air France, United Airlines or any other carrier? Where are you planning to go?
I'm going to Seattle, WA and I like United Airlines.
Where will you be leaving from and when would you like to return?
Return around 05:30. I'll be leaving from Portland.
What date and time do you want to leave? What date do you want to return?
I'm leaving on the 5th of this month. I'd like to go around morning 7. I want to return the 13th of March.
To verify: You are flying from Portland to Seattle on United Airlines leaving at 7 am. You wish to depart next Tuesday and return March 13th. Your return flight is at 5:30 am I have an economy seat for 1 passenger.
Yes, that works.
I'm sorry, I was unable to book your flight. There is a United Airlines flight from Portland to Seattle next Tuesday with a return on March 13th.
That's all I needed.
Have a good day.
I'm planning a short trip, can you help me buy plane tickets?
What is the date and time you'd like to depart and return? Do you have any preference of airline?
Yeah I prefer Delta Airlines and I plan to leave around a quarter to 1 in the afternoon. I'd like my return flight to be around 12:30.
What date are you planning on departing and returning on, and from where?
Oh, I'm leaving on the 1st of this month from Vegas. I'd like to come back on sunday this week.
Where are you planning to go?
I'd like to go to Vancouver, BC.
Ok, so you are leaving from Las Vegas going to vancouver. The departing flight will be today at 12:45 pm. The return date is the day after tomorrow at 12:30 pm. The flight will be with Delta Airlines, Economy class for 1 passenger.
Thats correct.
I'm sorry but I could not book your ticket from Las Vegas to Vancouver for the Delta Airlines flight Leaving today, and the return flight a day after tomorrow.
Oh, Thats fine.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Which airport will the flight be arriving at?
The flight will arrive at YVR International Airport.
Thank you, thats all I needed help with.
You're very welcome.
Hi,i need a help, I am interested to a short trip,For my onward trip, i can leave around 7 in the morning from Phoenix, AZ
Sure, Please tell me more details, When do you want the return flight to leave? and when you coming back?
I plan to leave around morning 3:30 morning for the return flight and i need to get back on next Wednesday
Do you have any preferred airlines?
Yes, I prefer American Airlines
When do you plan to leave and where are you going to visit?
I am goint to Chicago On Sunday this week, i can leave around quarter to 1 in the afternoon
Please confirm the following details: The flight is from Phoenix and goes to Chicago, The airlines Name is American Airlines, The departure date is day after tomorrow and the return date is next Wednesday, The onward flight leaves at 12:45 pm and return flight leaves at 3:30 am, Number of passengers is 1 and Seating class is Economy
Yes, that seems good for me.
Sorry, I couldn't book your ticket, Shall i help you with anything more?
Yes, i need to continue to book the ticket, I am traveling from San Fran
Please confirm the following details: The flight is from Phoenix and goes to San Francisco, The airlines Name is American Airlines and the departure date is day after tomorrow and the return date is next Wednesday, The onward flight leaves at 12:45 pm and return flight leaves at 3:30 am, Number of passengers is 1 and Seating class is Economy
Yes, That seems good for me
Sorry again, I couldn't book your ticket, Shall i help you with anything more?
No, Thank you very much for your help
You are welcome, have a great day
I would like to book flight tickets.
What airline would you like to fly with? British Airways, United Airlines or another airline maybe? What is your destination and your retunr date?
I want to travel to Los Angeles from Las Vegas with Delta Airlines. I would like to return around 2:30 in the afternoon.
What will the date of return be?
I would like to come back on Tuesday next week.
What date and time do you want to leave?
I want to leave on Saturday this week at around 12:30.
Can you confirm the following information: You are flying from Las Vegas to Los Angeles with Delta Airlines tomorrow at 12:30 pm and returning next Tuesday at 2:30 pm. You will be seated in Economy class and the ticket is for 1 passenger.
Yes it is correct.
I am sorry, it is not possible to book your ticket. Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you
Have a great day.
I am planning a short trip. Can you help me with locating a flight?
Certainly. When would you like to depart? Do you have any preferred airline?
I am leaving on the 10th. I prefer United Airlines if any flights are available.
What time would you like to leave, and from what city? When do you plan to return?
I am leaving from Seattle, WA and flying to Los Angeles. I would prefer a flight in the afternoon 12:45. I want to return on the 12th of March.
What time would you like your return flight to leave?
I want to return around 11:30 pm. Also, I prefer Economy tickets.
OK, please confirm: You are departing Seattle on March 10th at 12:45 pm, flying on United Airlines. There will be 1 passenger in Economy class. You are flying to Los Angeles, with return flight leaving at 11:30 pm on March 12th.
Yes, that sounds great.
Sorry, I was not able to book that ticket. Shall we try again? We're seeking a flight from Seattle to Los Angeles on United Airlines, to depart on March 10th, returning on March 12th at 2:32 am.
Yes, that sounds good.
Sorry, I still could not book that ticket. Do you want to retry? We could search again for United Airlines flights from Seattle to Los Angeles, departing March 10th and returning March 12th.
No, that's all.
Can I help you with anything more?
No, that's all. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I am planning a short trip for 1 person. Would you help me find flights?
Of course. Do you have a preferred airline, such as Alaska Airlines or Southwest Airlines?
I prefer Southwest Airlines, please. I will be leaving from ATL, to return around 6:15 pm.
What time do you want to leave, and when are you returning?
I am interested in Economy. I would like to leave around half past 6 in the morning, and to return on the 10th.
On what date do you plan to leave?
On March 3rd.
Where are you planning to travel?
I am visiting SF.
Please confirm: I am reserving an Economy seat for 1 passenger on Southwest Airlines. You are departing Atlanta on the day after tomorrow at 6:30 am, arriving in San Francisco, and returning on March 10th at 6:15 pm.
No, sorry, change of plans. I will have 2 people in my group, and we will be leaving from Seattle, WA.
Alright, please confirm: you are looking for 2 seats on a flight departing from Seattle.
Yes, that's it.
Sorry, I was not able to book that reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a great day!
Can you help me buy some flight tickets for my short trip? My return flight will be around 7:30 in the morning.
Where do you plan on visiting? What time do you want to leave?
I am traveling to New York City. I can leave around quarter to 6 in the evening.
Where do you want to leave from and and when do you want to come back?
I'm leaving from Philly and want to get back Friday next week.
When do you plan to leave? Do you have a preferred airlines?
I plan to leave 6th of March and I prefer American Airlines.
Just to confirm, you'll be flying American Airlines seating economy for 1 and the flight will be from Philadelphia to New York. The departure date is next Wednesday and return date is next Friday. The onward flight leaves at 5:45 pm and return leaves at 7:30 am.
Yes, that sounds good. When does the onward flight arrive? How many stops does the flight have?
Your ticket is confirm. The onward flight arrives at 6:26 pm with 0 stops.
Thanks for your help. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you get me flight tickets for a short trip?
Where will you depart from? When will you return?
I am leaving Washington on this Sunday and want to return on the 13th of this month.
Which airline do you prefer? What time do want to schedule the departure and return flights?
American Airlines is my preference. I will depart about 2:45 pm and the return flight leaves in the morning 3:45.
Where will you be visiting?
I enjoy traveling in Economy to Paris, France.
Please verify the following: the flight from Washington to Paris is on American Airlines which departs the day after tomorrow. The flight is for 1 passenger in Economy seating and leaves at 2:45 pm and the return flight departs at 3:45 am on March 13th.
That works for me. How many stops will there be and is the flight ticket refundable?
I apologize, I was unable to book your ticket for a 1 stop flight, and unfortunately the ticket is not refundable. The flight departs from Washington and lands in Paris on American Airlines on the day after tomorrow and returns on March 13th.
That works for me.
I apologize, I was unable to book your flight from Washington to Paris on American Airlines on the day after tomorrow with the return flight being on March 13th.
No thank you.
Is there anything further I can assist you with?
Thanks for your help, that will be all.
Enjoy your day.
Hello, I would like to go on a short trip! Could you help to purchase some flight tickets?
Do you have any preferred airlines you would like to travel with?
I would love to take an Economy flight on American Airlines!
What would be your preferred departure and return flight times?
I would like to leave at 8 in the morning for my return flight. Also, I would like to leave at around 11:45 for my onward trip.
When and where are you planning to depart? Also, when would you like to come back from your trip?
I would prefer departing this Saturday to Seattle, Wa, and subsequently return next Thursday.
Sure, where would you like to depart from?
I would like to depart from Los Angeles if that is possible.
Please confirm your reservation for 1 passenger on the Economy American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Seattle. The departure will be tomorrow at 11:45 am, while the return flight would be on next Thursday at 8 am.
Yes, that would be great!
Your reservation has been confirmed, please have a safe flight!
Does the flight have 1 intermediate stop?
Yes, there is 1 intermediate stop on this journey.
Sure, that's all the help I need. Thank you very much!
No problem, have a great day ahead!
I would like a flight ticket.
Do you have a preferred airline such as Air Canada, Air France, or other airline? When are you returning?
I want to fly on Delta Airlines and return on Tuesday next week.
Where are you leaving from? What time do you want the return flight?
There are 4 of us leaving from LA. We want a return flight around 17:00.
When are you leaving?
I want to fly on American Airlines on the 1st of this month.
Where are you flying to?
I want to leave for Philadelphia around evening 6:30.
Please confirm you want 4 tickets to fly from Los Angeles to Philadelphia on American Airlines in economy, departing today at 6:30 pm and returning next Tuesday at 5 pm.
That is perfect.
The reservation was unsuccessful. Do you need anything else?
Please reserve me a plane ticket from Portland.
Please confirm you want 4 tickets to fly from Portland to Philadelphia on American Airlines in economy, departing today at 6:30 pm and returning next Tuesday at 5 pm.
That is perfect.
I could not buy the ticket. Do you need anything else?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I need to buy flight tickets for a short trip.
Where are you going? When are you leaving?
I am leaving for Los Angeles on the 1st.
When are you returning? Where are you leaving from?
I am returning Wednesday next week from Vegas. I want to leave from CDMX at 6:45 am.
Any preferred airlines, American Airlines or Air France?
I prefer American Airlines.
What time are you leaving?
I am leaving my home morning 8:30.
Please confirm, 1 ticket in Economy leaving from Mexico City to Las Vegas on American Airlines. The departure date is today at 8:30 am , returning next Wednesday at 6:45 am.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I want to go on a vacation soon. Can you help me find a good price on tickets?
Where is your planned destination and is there a certain airline you prefer?
I'd like to travel to Chicago on American Airlines if possible.
When would you like the departure time to be?
Please set the time to around 7:30 in the evening.
And what date do you plan to leave on?
I want to leave tomorrow.
Please tell me where you will be departing from.
I'll be heading to Chicago from NY.
What date and time will you be making your return trip?
I need to head back to Chicago on the 9th so I plan to leave around 8 in the night.
Tell me if these details are correct. You wish to leave New York and head to Chicago tomorrow on American Airlines at 8 pm. The return date is March 9th at 7:30 pm. Both trips will be made for 1 person with Economy class seating.
That sounds correct to me.
Thank you. Your ticket has been booked and confirmed.
I appreciate the help. That will be all for now.
You are welcome. Have a great rest of your day.
I need plane tickets for 1 please.
From where will you depart?
From Seattle, WA.
When will you be departing? Do you have an airline preference?
American Airlines please on the 1st of March.
When will you return? Do you have a time preference?
At a quarter to 12 in the morning on the 11th of this month.
What time do you want to depart, and where are you going?
To San Diego at 7:45 in the morning.
I have a departure from Seattle to San Diego on American Airlines today at 7:45 am. You are returning on March 11th at 11:45 am, Economy class for 1.
No I want to leave at 6:45 am for my departing trip.
I have a departure today at 6:45 am.
No I want to leave from Vegas next Friday.
Next Friday from Las Vegas, is that correct?
Yes, when does the flight arrive?
Sorry, I couldn't book the tickets. Can I help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I have a short trip I want to go on, and I need some help buying plane tickets.
What's your origin and what time do you want to leave? Also do you have an airline you prefer such as Delta Airlines, Air Canada, or anything else?
I'm going to be travelling from Philadelphia and I want to leave in the evening 5:15. And I like flying on American Airlines.
When would you like your return flight to leave.
For the return flight I'd prefer to leave at 13:45.
And what's the date of your return?
For my return, it'll be the 11th of March.
And what's your destination.
I'll be going to London, UK.
And what's your departure date?
I'll be departing on the 6th of this month.
Okay, please make sure this is all correct, You will be departing from Philadelphia next Wednesday at 5:15 pm for London and you will be returning on a March 11th flight that leaves at 1:45 pm. The airline is American Airlines, 1 seat in Economy class?
Yes, that's all correct.
I'm sorry, but I couldn't book a ticket with that itinerary. Do you need any more help?
Let's look for another time, I need to book this flight. For the onward trip can I leave at 07:00?
Okay, please make sure this is all correct, You will be departing from Philadelphia next Wednesday at 7 am for London and you will be returning on a March 11th flight that leaves at 1:45 pm. The airline is American Airlines, 1 seat in Economy class?
Yeah, that's correct.
I'm sorry, but I couldn't book that ticket either. Do you need any more help>
I still need to book a ticket. Can you change the destination to Phoenix, AZ with a return flight that leaves at 23:00?
Okay, please make sure this is all correct, You will be departing from Philadelphia next Wednesday at 7 am for Phoenix and you will be returning on a March 11th flight that leaves at 11 pm. The airline is American Airlines, 1 seat in Economy class?
Actually, please change the departure city to Los Angeles.
Okay, so a departing flight from Los Angeles and it leaves at 7 am?
Yeah, that's right.
I'm sorry, but I couldn't book that ticket. Do you need any more help?
No, thanks for the assistance.
You're welcome, have a great day.
I'm looking to go on a short vacation on the 11th of this month. Please hep me find a good price on flight tickets.
Where will you be leaving from and at what time?
On the 7th of March, I would like to leave from Toronto, Ontario around a quarter to 8 in the morning.
Where are you flying to and when do you want the return flight to leave? If you prefer a certain airline, such as Southwest Airlines or Delta Airlines, please let me know.
If possible, I would like to fly to Los Angeles on Delta Airlines around 3:30 in the morning.
You wish to fly from Toronto to Los Angeles on Delta Airlines. The departure date is next Thursday at 7:45 am with a return flight date of March 11th at 3:30 am. The seating class is Economy for 1 passenger.
No, I wish to leave the day after tomorrow.
You wish for the departure date to be at 3:30 am the day after tomorrow?
Yes that sounds fine.
I was not able to book your ticket. I apologize. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all the help I need.
Have a wonderful rest of your day.
Can you get me plane tickets for a short trip out of Atlanta, GA?
When are you coming back and where are you going?
I am going to London, UK and returning on the 14th.
When are you departing?
I want to depart on March 10th.
Do you have a preference for airlines such as Delta Airlines, British Airways, or any other and what time do you want to depart?
I like Delta Airlines and want to depart around 4:15 pm.
When do you prefer the return flight to depart?
I would like the return flight to depart at 3 o"clock in the afternoon.
You want 1 ticket in Economy class from Atlanta to London on Delta Airlines. The flight leaves March 10th at 4:15 pm and the return flight departs at 3 pm on March 14th. Is that right?
No, i want to leave today.
You want to leave today at 3 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct. When will my return flight be over?
Your flight can't be booked. Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can I have a plane ticket for my short trip?
Where are you leaving from and what time? When do you want to come back?
I want to leave from Atlanta, GA at around six pm. I want to return on March 9th.
Where are you traveling to? What time do you want the return flight?
I am traveling to LAX and want to return around night 9:15.
When are you leaving?
I want to leave on the 5th.
Do you have a preferred airline, such as Air France, United Airlines, or other airline?
I need two tickets and want to fly on American Airlines. We want to leave around evening 4:30 for the return.
Please confirm you want 2 tickets to fly from Atlanta to Los Angeles on American Airlines in Economy. The departure is next Tuesday at 6 pm and the return is March 9th at 4:30 pm.
Yes, that is perfect. When does it arrive?
I was unable to make the reservation. May I further assist you?
Please make a reservation on Delta Airlines.
Please confirm you want 2 tickets to fly from Atlanta to Los Angeles on Delta Airlines in Economy. The departure is next Tuesday at 6 pm and the return is March 9th at 4:30 pm.
Yes that is perfect.
I could not make the reservation. Do you need anything else?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I need flight tickets for a short trip.
When do you plan to leave?
I'll be flying in the 3rd of March.
What time do you prefer for the return flight?
I'd prefer the return flight in the morning 8:15.
When are you planning to return and do you have any preference for airlines?
I'd like to be back on the 13th and I prefer United Airlines.
Where are you planning to depart from and at what time?
I'm hoping to leave around 5:30 pm from New York for my onward trip.
Where will you be flying to?
I'm going to CDMX.
Please confirm that you need 1 Economy class ticket on United Airlines from New York to Mexico City with the onward flight departing at 5:30 pm the day after tomorrow and the return flight leaving at 8:15 am on March 13th.
Just one change please. I prefer Premium Economy.
Okay. So you need 1 ticket in Premium Economy class. Right?
Sounds good. When does my return flight arrive and is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is confirmed and it is not refundable. The return flight arrives at 12:56 pm.
Thank you for the assistance.
Is the anything else I can help you with?
No. Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a great day!
I was thinking about going on a short trip, I really could use some time off. I need assistance in the procedure of buying tickets, I want to leave on the 8th.
That's a good idea. When would you like to be back? At what time do you want to leave on the 8th?
My idea is to leave around 12:45 pm to Chi-town. Then, I would like to leave around 12 o"clock in the afternoon.
Where is your destination?
Delhi is my final destination, I want to reach it by flying Economy.
Have you thought about a favorite airline company? When are you planning to leave from Delhi?
My favorite airline company is United Airlines. Schedule my return trip for March 12th.
Read and confirm please. You asked me to book a flight from Delhi to Chicago with United Airlines. Departure day is next Friday at 12 pm and the return is scheduled to be on March 12th at 12:45 pm. The seats will be Economy for 1 passenger.
I've changed my mind look for Delta Airlines flights.
Fine, confirm me the details. You want to book a flight with Delta Airlines for next Friday.
Exactly what I said.
I'm afraid I cannot assist you for the procedure. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No but thank you just the same.
Have a great day.
I plan to take a short flight, can you help me buy tickets?
Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving San Fran on March 1st. I plan to travel on an Economy flight.
Are you travelling with a preferred airline such as Air Canada or Air France? When do you plan to return?
I prefer to fly with United Airlines and I plan to be back on the 4th of this month.
How early would you like to fly out? Is there anywhere particular you are planning to visit?
I would like to leave early possibly around 08:00. I am traveling to NY so I would prefer to take Delta Airlines.
When would you like to return?
I would like to be on my next flight by half past 6 in the evening.
Can you please confirm your flight itinerary? We have the following details: your first flight departs from San Francisco at 8 am onward to New York. The flight departs today and you are flying with Delta Airlines. You will return next Monday on an Economy flight which departs at 6:30 pm and is booked for 1 passenger.
Yes, those details are correct.
I was unable to book your ticket at this time. Is there anything else I can help you with?
I would like to continue making a reservation and change the return date to the 11th.
Can you please confirm your flight itinerary? We have the following details: your first flight is with Delta Airlines and departs from San Francisco at 8 am onward to New York. The flight departs today and you will return next March 11th on an Economy flight which departs at 6:30 pm and is booked for 1 passenger.
Yes, how much will it cost?
I was unable to book your ticket at this time. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No but, thank you for your help.
Have a great day.
I'm going on a short trip, can you please help me buy airline tickets?
What is the destination and when do you want to go? Do you have a preferred airline?
I am traveling to Atlanta and I am leaving on March 8th. I prefer United Airlines.
What time do you want to leave? Also, what date are you returning and where will you be returning from?
I would like to leave around 14:15 for my Atlanta flight. For my return, I am leaving from Las Vegas and plan to leave around 3:15 pm.
When are you coming back?
I would like to return on the 11th.
Please confirm the following details: Next Friday, you have a flight to Atlanta on United Airlines for 1 passenger in economy at 2:15 pm. The return flight is from Las Vegas on March 11th leaving at 3:15 pm.
That is incorrect, I am leaving on the 2nd of this month.
Please confirm the following details: Your departure date is tomorrow and the return flight leaves at 3:15 pm.
No, I want to get back next Monday.
Please confirm the following details: The return flight is from Las Vegas, returning next Monday.
Yes, that sounds good. Does it have any connections and how much does it cost?
I'm sorry, I couldn't book your flight, can I help you with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you book flight tickets for my short trip?
What is your destination
I will be leaving for Chicago on 10th of March.
What time will you be leaving and when will you be coming back?
I will be leaving around night 9:45 and will get back on 13th of March.
Which airlines do you prefer for return flight and when? May be Alaska Airlines, British Airways or any other airline.
My destination is Seattle and my preferred United Airlines. I want to buy three tickets for return flight which must be around quarter to 6 in the evening.
Which city will you be leaving from?
I will be taking my flight from New York.
Please confirm the details: You want me to buy 3 Economy class flights tickets for 3 passengers in United Airlines from Seattle to New York on March 10th at 9:45 pm. The return flight must be on March 13th at 5:45 pm.
No. I will be traveling on this Saturday.
Please confirm the details again: You want me to book flight tickets for United Airlines with the departure date as tomorrow.
Yes, that sounds great.
Sorry, your tickets could not be booked. Do you want help with anything else?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
I need to fly out of New York City. Do you think you can help?
Sure, when will you return? Do you have a set date to leave? Where will you travel?
I want to fly Economy from Paris around early morning 4:30 am. I want to come back on the 3rd of March.
Do you have a favorite airline?
I have miles I'm collecting from American Airlines. I can leave LAX in the morning 11 am.
What date do you plan to go?
Friday next week is the best possible date.
Just to be sure I've got it: You'll Leave Los Angeles at 11 am. You'll travel American Airlines next friday going to Paris. You'll head back home at 4:30 am. day after tomorrow on Economy. You just want 1 ticket.
That's about it. Do you only get one stop on this flight?
I am so sorry but I couldn't book your ticket.
Can you please try the same flight, but just leave around 06:30 just for the return flight?
Ok Just to be sure I've got it: You'll Leave Los Angeles at 11 am. You'll travel American Airlines next friday going to Paris. You'll head back home at 6:30 am. day after tomorrow on Economy. You just want 1 ticket.
That's exactly right.
I am so sorry but that's not working either. The times don't match anything that's available.
No, I don't really think you can help me.
Have a good day.
I'm planning a short trip, can you help me buy flight tickets?
When are you coming back?
I'll get back on the 13th.
What time of day?
I'll fly around night 9:30.
And how about when you'll depart? Where are you flying from?
I'm departing from Ny at around quarter past 2 in the afternoon on 9th of March.
Any airline preferences? United Airlines, Southwest Airlines, anything else? Where are you visiting?
I'm traveling to Atlanta, GA, and I prefer United Airlines.
So I'll book an Economy ticket for 1 passenger to fly from New York to Atlanta with United Airlines, departing at 2:15 pm on March 9th, and returning at 9:30 pm on March 13th. Is that okay?
Yes, that sounds good, but which airports will I be going to?
The reservation was successful. You'll depart from JFK International Airport and arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks a lot for your help!
Anything else you want help with?
No thanks, that's all for now.
Have a wonderful day!
I'm looking to go on a short trip. could you help me find something? I want to return on March 8th.
When will you be leaving? Where do you want to go?
I'm going to Seattle, WA. I want the return to be for around six am. I' coming from ATL.
What time do you want to depart?
Around morning 8:15.
Any preferred airlines?
Yes, American Airlines. I'm leaving from LA.
What date are you leaving?
On the 3rd.
No problem, please confirm: You are travelling to Seattle from Los Angeles via American Airlines the day after tomorrow. You'll return next Friday. Your first flight leaves at 8:15 am and the return flight leaves at 6 am. There is 1 person travelling in economy.
Yes, confirm. When does my return flight arrive? Is this refundable?
Sorry, I couldn't book that ticket. Is there anything else I can do?
Can we amend this reservation? I want to return on the 5th.
No problem, please confirm: flight from Los Angeles to Seattle via American Airlines leaving the day after tomorrow.You'll return next Tuesday. Your outbound flight leaves at 8:15 am. Your return flight leaves at 6 am. There is 1 passenger travelling in economy.
No, that's not right. I'm going to Vancouver, BC.
Please confirm: flight to Vancouver for 1 person.
Yes, that's right.
Sorry, I couldn't book that ticket. Is there anything else?
No, that's it.
Have a great day.
I need to buy some plane tickets for a short trip.
When do you want to leave and return?
I want to leave 9:30 in the morning and come home on March 5th.
When exactly do you want to leave?
1st of this month. I'm interested in booking with Southwest Airlines.
Where do you want to go and when? Do you know what time you want to come back?
I'm going to LAX and would like to get back home from Chicago for around 12 o"clock in the afternoon.
Just to make sure, you want a Southwest Airlines flight today at 9:30 am from Chicago to Los Angeles, returning next Tuesday at 12 pm. There's 1 passenger ticket in the Economy section.
Sounds perfect, thanks.
I'm sorry, but I can't book your Southwest Airlines flight from Chicago to Los Angeles departing today and returning next Tuesday.
That's perfect, thanks.
I'm sorry, but I can't book your Southwest Airlines flight from Chicago to Los Angeles departing today and returning next Tuesday.
No, I'm all set, thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'm going on a short trip for the long weekend and need to buy some flight tickets. Can you get me Economy tickets out of LA?
What is your return date?
I'd like to come back on the 5th of March.
What departure time and destination would you like? Do you have an airline in mind, like United Airlines, or British Airways?
I'd like to go to NYC on Southwest Airlines. Are there any flights around half past 1 in the afternoon?
What about your return flight?
I'd like to return on the 1st around 5:45 pm.
Please confirm: departure from Los Angeles to New York today on Southwest Airlines at 1:30 pm, Economy seating for 1 passenger. Return is next Tuesday, leaving at 5:45 pm.
No, I changed my mind. Let's try United Airlines.
Please confirm: 1 passenger for United Airlines.
Sounds good, when does my flight back get here?
Sorry, I couldn't get your ticket. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a great day.
I am planning a brief trip. Would you help me find flights?
Yes, of course. When do you plan to leave, and when are you returning?
I want to leave on the 7th of this month, and return on the 12th.
Do you have any preferred time for your arrival and departure? Also, do you prefer any specific airline?
I would prefer Southwest Airlines if available. I plan to leave around 9:45 in the morning. I would like my return flight around half past 1 in the afternoon.
What city will you be leaving from?
I am flying out of Chicago.
What is your destination?
Seattle is my destination.
Please confirm: you are seeking tickets to Seattle for 1 passenger in Economy class on Southwest Airlines. You are departing Chicago next Thursday at 9:45 am. You'll return on March 12th at 1:30 pm.
Yes, that's good. What time do I arrive in Seattle?
Sorry, I was not able to book that ticket. The Southwest Airlines flight from Chicago to Seattle arrives at 12:15 pm next Thursday, with a return flight on March 12th.
No, thank you, that's all I needed.
Have a great day.
Can you help me in buying flight tickets for my short trip?
What will be your destination, date of departure and return flight dates?
I will be traveling to Chi-town on the 1st and will return back on the 14th of this month.
what will be your preferred flight, time and place of departure?
My preferred flight is Southwest Airlines and I will be leaving from Los Angeles at 7:30 am.
When will you be returning back?
I will be leaving at 5:15 pm and will return around 7:15 in the morning.
Please confirm the details: You want me to book an Economy class flight ticket Southwest Airlines for 1 passenger from Los Angeles to Chicago for today at 5:15 pm. The date and time for return flight is March 14th and 7:15 am.
Yes, that sounds good. Tell me the cost and check if it has zero stop?
Sorry Your ticket could not be booked. DO you need me to help you with something else?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
I need flight tickets for a short trip.
What airlines do you prefer?
I would like United Airlines.
Where are you departing? What time and date are you returning and when do you want to depart for your return flight?
I am leaving New Delhi, returning on the 9th, and want that return flight to leave at 2:15 in the afternoon.
What date and time are you leaving and where are you going?
I want to travel in Economy for my trip on the 5th to SFO. I want to leave half past 1 in the morning.
You want 1 ticket in Economy class from Delhi to San Francisco on United Airlines that leaves at 1:30 am next Tuesday. The return flight departs at 2:15 pm on March 9th. Is that right?
Yes, that works. What airport does it depart from and does it have 1 stop?
The flight has 1 stop and departs from Indira Gandhi International Airport. Your flight has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need any more help?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I am planning to go on a trip and I need flight tickets around 3:15 in the morning for a return flight.
When will you be returning?
I will be returning on the 7th of March. For the 1st flight it can be around 11 in the morning.
What is the destination?
I will be travelling to Vancouver, BC.
What is the departure city and date of departure? Do you have a preferred airline such as Air France, United Airlines or any other airline?
Please book for Delta Airlines. I am leaving from NYC on the 1st of this month and there is two people in my travel group.
Please confirm the following details: 2 Economy Seats on Delta Airlines. Departure flight from New York to Vancouver today at 11 am. Return flight next Thursday at 3:15 am.
That is correct, may I have the price?
Your ticket is confirmed and the price is $308
Thank you!
Can I assist you with anything else?
No thank you!
Have a nice day!
Can you help me buy flight tickets to San Fran on economy.
When do you want the return to leave?
Around 14:45 please
When will you be leaving?
On the 1st of this month
Do you have any preffered airlines?
I want to fly American Airlines.
When do you want to leave and when are you coming back?
I want to leave around half past 1 in the afternoon and get back on March 14th
Where are you going?
I want to go to ATL.
Please confirm: Flight to San Francisco to Atlanta on American Airlines, Leaving today at 1:30 pm. The return flight will be leaving at 2:45 pm on March 14th. This flight is economy for 1 passenger.
Which airport am I going from?
Confirmed tickets, from SFO International Airport.
Thanks thats all I need.
Have a great Day!
I need some plane tickets for a little trip I'm taking. Can you help? I will return on the 4th.
Do you want tickets for American Airlines, United Airlines or a different line? When will you leave and when do you want the return flight departure time to be?
I want to fly on United Airlines around 9:30 am for the return flight. Starting off I can depart from my home airport around a quarter to 4 in the afternoon.
When do you want departure to be? Where are you going?
I am going to visit my aunt in Atlanta, GA. I am leaving this saturday. I requre 3 tickets.
From what city will you depart?
My house is in Seattle, WA.
I think I have it: You'll depart Seattle at 3:45 pm. tomorrow on United Airlines with 3 people on Economy class going to Atlanta. You'll return next Monday, boarding at 9:30 am.
That sounds good as long as there are zero stops.
I have your ticket but the number of stops is 1.
I guess that will have to do, thanks.
Do you need any rental reservations or anything else?
No, my aunt is picking me up and I'm staying with her.
Have a good visit with your aunt.
I need some airline tickets for a quick trip
Of course. What day are you coming back?
I'll return on the 12th.
Ok, and I need the city you're leaving from and the times for your flights.
I'll be leaving from SFO at around 06:45, with the return flight around 4:30 pm.
Any preferred airline? Perhaps Air France, Delta Airlines, or anything else? What day will you be leaving?
I prefer Delta Airlines, leaving later today.
And going where?
I need to go to ATL
Please confirm: a flight from San Francisco to Atlanta on Delta Airlines, departing today and returning March 12th. Departing at 6:45 am and returning at 4:30 pm. Economy class for 1 passenger.
Yes that's right. What is the departure airport and how many stops?
Your flight has been booked. It has 1 stop and departs from SFO International Airport
Thanks so much
Have a great day
I'm going on a trip. Can you help me with the tickets? I want to leave from Vegas at around 8:45 in the night.
Do you have any preferred airlines?
Yeah, Delta Airlines.
What day are you leaving and when do you plan to return?
I'm going to SF. I'm leaving next Friday and I want to return on the 14th of March. There's 2 people.
And what time do you want to leave?
For the outbound trip I can leave around 22:30.
No, problem, please confirm: Trip for 2 people leaving from Las Vegas to San Francisco via Delta Airlines. You are leaving next Friday and returning on March 14th. The outbound flight leaves at 10:30 pm and your return flight leaves at 8:45 pm. You are flying economy.
Yes, I confirm. How much is that gonna cost?
The price is $96. It's leaving from Las Vegas and going to San Francisco. It's with Delta Airlines and departs next Friday. It returns on March 14th.
Yes, that's good.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's it, thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you help me book flights for a short trip? I am traveling in Economy.
When do you plan to leave and return? What time would you like to leave?
I am leaving on the 6th and plan to return on the 12th. I can leave at around 16:00.
And in what time would you like to return from your destination?
At around morning 0:15.
Do you have a preferred airlines, like British Airways or United Airlines? Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving on 3rd of March, from New York City to Atlanta, GA. I prefer Delta Airlines.
Please confirm! You want to leave from New York to Atlanta in a Delta Airlines plane. You plan to leave the day after tomorrow at 4 pm and return on March 12th at 0:15 am. You will travel in Economy and it's just 1 passenger.
No, make it 2 passengers.
So it is 2 passengers for the Delta Airlines trip?
Yes, that's it. Is the ticket refundable? How much will it cost?
Sorry, I couldn't book it. Can I assist you in anything else?
No, that was all.
Have a great day.
I want to go on a short trip. WOuld you help to find tickets? I'd like to return on the 12th.
What date and time do you want to leave?
I'd like to leave on the 6th of this month at about morning 8.
When would you like your return flight to leve?
I'd like to travel to Portland from SFO and can leave morning 9:15.
Do you have a favorite airline? What about Southwest Airlines, Delta Airlines or something else?
I like Delta Airlines. I will need 2 tickets.
Please confirm that you will leave from San Francisco to Portland on Delta Airlines. You will depart next Wednesday at 8 am. You will return on March 12th at 9:15 am. You need 2 economy tickets.
Yes, that sounds right.
Sorry, I was unable to book the flight. How about a Delta Airlines flight that leaves San Francisco and goes to Portland next Wednesday and returns March 12th?
That should work.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Gret. Thank you, that is all I wanted.
Have a good one.
can you buy flight tickets for a short trip on 11th of this month?
What time do you want to leave? Do you have preferred airlines? When you want the return flight?
I prefer United Airlines. My onward trip in morning 6:45 and return flight around quarter to 8 in the evening.
where will you be leaving from? Where is your visit? When you plan to leave?
I am leaving to Chi-town on 6th of this month and leaving from Atlanta.
Please confirm. United Airlines from Atlanta to Chicago on next wednesday at 6:45 am and the return on March 11th at 7:45 pm for 1 passenger in Economy class.
Yes. Is the ticket refundable? How much does it cost?
Sorry i couldn't book your ticket. Shall i help you with anything else?
I want to make the reservation leaving from Seattle, WA
Please confirm. United Airlines from Seattle to Chicago on next wednesday at 6:45 am and the return on March 11th at 7:45 pm for 1 passenger in Economy class.
No i am travelling to Phoenix
Please confirm. The onward flight leaves to Phoenix at 6:45 am.
Yes. That works for me.
Sorry i couldn't book your ticket. Shall i help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help
Have a wonderful day.
I'm going to be traveling and I need some flight tickets. I expect to return the 14th of this month.
What is your departure date and at what time do you wish to leave?
If possible I want to leave at 9:45 am the 11th of this month.
Were will you be leaving from?
I will be leaving from Atlanta, GA.
What is your destination and at what time do you wish to return?
I will be going to New York City and if possible I want to return at night 8:45.
Do you wish to fly with a specific airline?
I would like Delta Airlines if possible.
Please confirm: 1 Economy class ticket from Delta Airlines. Destination New York and departing from Atlanta. The dates of the flights are from March 11th to March 14th. Leaving at 9:45 am and returning at 8:45 pm.
I would like my departing trip to leave at night 8:45 and if possible leave from San Francisco.
Please confirm: leaving from San Francisco at 8:45 pm.
That sound great. To what airport is the flight going to arrive and return?
Sorry, there was an error trying to book your flight. Is there anything else you need?
I want to book the flight. I plan to return the same day at evening 5.
Please confirm: 1 Economy class ticket from Delta Airlines. Destination New York and departing from San Francisco. The dates of the flights are from March 11th to March 14th. Leaving at 8:45 pm and returning at 5 pm.
That is correct.
Sorry, there was an error trying to book your flight. Is there anything else you need?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I'm planning to go on a short trip, can you help me buy tickets for a flight?
When are you planning on returning?
I want to get back on the 10th, and want to leave around 2:45 in the morning.
Do you have any airline preferences?
I would prefer to go on a American Airlines flight.
Where are you planning on visiting, and from which airport will you be leaving from?
I am planning on visiting the Ciudad de Mexico, and will leave from LAX.
What date are you planning on leaving, and at what time?
I am leaving next Wednesday, in the morning 7:30. Actually, I think for this trip I would prefer Southwest Airlines.
Understood, you want to travel to Mexico City from Los Angeles on a Southwest Airlines economy flight for 1, your planning on leaving next Wednesday and returning on March 10th. The onward flight will leave at 7:30 am, while the return flight leaves at 2:45 am, is that all correct?
Yes that all sounds good.
Unfortunately, I could not book you ticket. Sorry for the inconvenience, can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you for your help anyways.
Once again sorry for inconvenience, have a wonderful day.
I'd like to get some plane tickets - can you give me a hand?
What are the details of your travel?
I'd like to fly through United Airlines, traveling to Chi-town - I'd prefer it if the return flight left around the afternoon 3:30.
I'd like to get some more information from you: how many tickets would you like, what city are you leaving from, what time would you like to leave, and what date are you returning?
I'd like to get 3 tickets - I'd be departing at 1 in the afternoon from San Fran, and the return date would be March 12th.
What date would you like to catch your departing flight?
I'd like to depart on the 10th.
To review: You would like to buy 3 tickets through United Airlines, leaving from San Francisco to Chicago at 1 pm on March 10th, returning March 12th at 3:30 pm. The tickets are economy class - does that sound right?
Can you check for tickets through Delta Airlines?
To review: You would like to buy 3 tickets through Delta Airlines, leaving from San Francisco to Chicago at 1 pm on March 10th, returning March 12th at 3:30 pm. Is that what you're looking for?
That sounds great, yeah.
I wasn't able to get tickets that match your search - is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all for now.
Have a great day.
I'm planning to go on a short trip. Can you help me buy flight tickets? I would like to come back on March 9th.
Alright. Where are you planning to visit?
I would like to travel to Atlanta.
Great. What day and time would you like to leave? Also, if you have any preferred airlines such as Air France, or United Airlines, feel free to let me know.
Awesome. I would like to fly with United Airlines. Also, I will be leaving on the 2nd of this month, around 09:15.
Alright, and when would you like the return flight to leave?
I was planning on leaving around morning 7 to return.
Sounds great. Also, where are you leaving from?
I will be leaving from Philly.
Perfect! Just to confirm, you will be taking a flight from Philadelphia, to Atlanta, on United Airlines, for 1 passenger in Economy class. The departure date is tomorrow, and you would like to return on March 9th. The departure time is 9:15 am and the return flight is scheduled for 7 am.
Yes, that sounds great!
Unfortunately, I was unable to book your ticket. However, we do have a flight departing Philadelphia going to Atlanta, on United Airlines, for tomorrow and returning on March 9th.
Alright, that sounds good!
Perfect. Your ticket is confirmed.
Great, thanks for your help!
You're welcome. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks again!
Have a great day and enjoy your trip!
I need a one-way flight leaving from Philly. Preferablly Delta Airlines.
When are you wanting to leave?
The 10th of March.
Where would you like to go?
Going to Atlanta, GA.
I found 1 possible flight. A $267 ticket leaving at 2:20 pm. The company is Delta Airlines.
What's the arrival airport?
The destination is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Okay, that works. Can you look for round trip flights?
When are you planning to return?
Coming back on the 12th.
I found 1 possible flight via Delta Airlines. It's $234, leaves at 2:20 pm with the departing flight leaving at 3:40 pm.
What's the departing airport? When will I arrive?
Arrival time for the onward flight is 8:21 pm. The departing flight leaves from PHL International Airport.
Alright, that works.
Should I go ahead and purchase tickets?
Nope, that's all I was looking for.
Enjoy your day!
Hi, i need a help, I am going to lAX , Can you find one-way flight for me
When do you plan to leave?
going on 6th of March.
Where will you be leaving from?
From Portland, OR
I found 5 flights for you, There is a Alaska Airlines flight, leaves at 10:10 am and it has 0 stops, Ticket price is $120
Ok, When does the onward flight arrive? Is the ticket is refundable?
The onward flight arrives at 12:40 pm, Sorry, the ticket is not refundable
That flight seems good for me, Could you search round trip flight for me? I want to get back on 8th of this month.
I found 1 convenient flight for you, There is a Alaska Airlines, the outbound flight leave at 10:10 am and return flight leaves at 5:15 am, Ticket price is $125
Ok, When does the onward flight and return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 7:45 am and onward flight arrives at 12:40 pm
Ok, That flight seems good for me
Shall i book a ticket for you?
No, Not now.
Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thank you very much for your help.
you are welcome, have a great day
cOULD YOU PLEASE FIND A ONE WAY FLIGHT FOR MY UPCOMING TRIP
when is the trip ?
on 1st of March
from where are you planning to start?
I will be starting from San Francisco. we are a group of 3 members
what is your destination
we are going to portland
One 0 stop outbound flight Alaska airlines is available at 12:20 pm. the ticket price is $108.
Is there any other flights on the 8th
total of 4 flights are available. There is a 0 stop American Airlines flight at 8:05 am which costs $109.
where does the onward flight arrive and what time does it reach?
it reaches at 9:58 am to PDX International Airport
great, could you check the return flights for me?
when are you planning to return?
I am returning on the 10th. Could you please check an availability in economy class.
Sure. One outbound American Airlines flight leaves at 8:05 am. The return Flight is at 7:20 am. The ticket cost is $116.
That flight sounds good
thank you
Can you find me one-way flights?
Where will you be leaving from and when would you like to leave?
I am travelling to Seattle from Paris, France. I am leaving on the 9th of this month.
There is an Air France flight leaving at 3:55 am with 1 stop. The price is $374.
Which airport does the flight depart from and when does the flight arrive?
The onward flight is at 12:15 pm and departs from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Are there any more flights?
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:05 am with 1 stop. The price is $345.
Are there any more flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 11:20 am with 1 stop. The price is $355.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
No I do not.
Can I help you with anything else?
Can you search for Economy class round trip tickets for me?
When will you be returning?
I want to return on the 11th of this month.
I found 1 flight. There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 11:20 am. The return flight is at 6:10 am. The price is $416.
Is the ticket refundable?
Unfortunately, it is non-refundable.
That sounds good to me. That was all I needed.
Have a nice day.
Would you search for one way flights?
Where will you visit?
I am going to ATL.
When will you leave?
I will leave on March 11th.
When do you want to leave?
I will leave from NY.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 11:20 am with 0 stops. The cost is $129.
At which airport does the flight arrive and which airport does the flight depart from?
It goes to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. It leaves from JFK International Airport.
That sounds like a good flight.
Would you like tickets?
No, I do not need a ticket.
Is there anything else I could assist you with?
Could you look for round trip flights? I want tickets that are refundable in case anything changes.
When will you come back?
I want to get back on the 13th.
I have 1 flight that seems like it would be convenient for you. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:20 am and the return flight leaves at 6:25 am. It costs $122.
That flight sounds wonderful.
Should I buy tickets for it?
No, that is all.
Could I help with something else?
No, that is.
Have a great day.
I need information about oneway flights for my next trip.
From where you will start? and to which location?
I will start from Ciudad de Mexico and will go to Phoenix.
When are you planning?
I am going with 3 peoples by 10th of this month. look for business or economy class.
There are 3 American Airlines flights suitable for you leaves at 8:05 am that will have 1 stop. Ticket price is $235.
This is ok for me.
Shall I buy the tickets?
No, dont buy.
Is there anything else?
Look for returning flights on 12th of March.
1 American Airlines outbound flight is leaving by 8:05 am and it returns by 7:35 am. Its price is around $247.
This is ok for me.
Shall I buy the tickets?
No, its okay for now.
Is there anything else?
No, thanks a lot for your help.
Have a great day.
Could you find me one.way flights in economy from ATL, please?
Could you please tell me when would you like to leave and which is your destination, please?
I'll be travelling to Seattle, WA on march 11th
There's an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:35 pm with 0 stops. The price is $195
Is the ticket refundable?
Unfortunately it's not
No problem, the flights is good. Could you please search a return flight too, please?
When would you like to come back?
I'd like to come back in the 13th of march
With american Airlines there a flight leaving at 9:35 pm and returning at 9:45 pm. The price is $205
When does the flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 0:07 am
Are there any other available flights?
Sorry I wasn't able to find other flights: is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks, that's all
Have a good day
Please help me find one-way flights.
Please let me know your departure and destination cities, as well as the date you plan to travel.
I'd like to leave for NYC from Washington on 7th of March.
I found 2 flights you may like. There's a $88 American Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 6:05 am.
Please let me know the origin and destination ariports.
The flight originates from Dulles International Airport and lands at JFK International Airport.
No, that won't work for me. Please search for other available flights.
Okay. How about a Southwest Airlines flight with 0 stops, leaving at 9:15 am, at $77 per ticket?
That flight works for me.
Will there be anything else?
Yes, please. I've just been informed that I might have to travel back this month. Please help me find found trip flights.
When would you be coming back?
I'd like to return on 9th of this month.
Okay. Do you like Southwest Airlines? There's a flight leaving at 9:15 am, with a return flight at 5:15 pm. The ticket will cost $83.
That flight will work for me.
Would you like me to by tickets for it?
Not at the moment, thanks.
Will there be anything else?
No, Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Have a great day.
I'm going out of town for a bachelor party. Can you find me a one-way flight in Economy seating?
What dates were you interested in. Which cities will be leaving and going to?
I want to go to Vegas from Vancouver on the 7th of March.
There is an Air Canada flight for $238 that leaves at 4:45 pm that has only 1 stop.
Are there any other flights? Doesn't matter which airline.
There is a Delta Airlines fight for $240 that leaves at 12:20 pm that has only 1 stop.
How about any other flights? I forgot - there's 2 of us traveling.
There is a United Airlines flight for $213 that leaves at 6:05 pm that has only 1 stop.
What time does it arrive in Vegas?
Arrival time is 10:40 pm.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to book the flight?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
What about round trip flights?
What return date did you want?
I want to get back on the 9th of this month.
I found 1 United Airlines flight for $228 that leaves at 6:05 pm from Vancouver and leaves at 12:05 pm from Vegas.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to book the flight?
No, I'm good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight.
What is your departure location and time, and what is your destination?
I am leaving on the 8th to travel from Washington to Chicago.
We have seats available on American Airlines on that date. The outbound flight leaves at 10 pm for Chicago with 0 stops. That ticket will cost $118.
That flight sounds good to me. I changed my mind - can you search round trip flights for me instead?
Sure, when would you like to return?
I want to return from Chicago on the 10th.
Flying on American Airlines, your outbound flight will leave at 10 pm. The return flight leaves at 2:50 pm, for a total price of $132.
That flight sounds great.
Should I book it for you?
No, I can do that myself. Thanks.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that's it.
Have a great day!
Can you find me a flight for two people?
Where are you leaving from?
San Francisco.
Where you are visiting?
LA. Also, can you make those seats Premium Economy.
When do you plan to leave?
March 6th. Also, I prefer Alaska Airlines if a flight is available that day.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight on March 6th that departs at 7:10 pm. There are 0 stops and the price of the ticket is $155.
Is that refundable? Also, when does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 8:35 pm. The ticket is not refundable.
That flight sounds good but can you search round trip flights?
When are you coming back?
The 8th of March.
I found 1 option for Alaska Airlines, there is a flight that departs at 7:10 pm on March 6th and the return flight is at 5:50 pm on March 8th. The price of the ticket is $174.
Is that ticket refundable?
Sorry, it is not.
That flight sounds great.
Do you want to buy the tickets?
No, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day!
I need to find one-way flights for tomorrow.
Where are you planning to go?
I'm going to San Francisco.
Where will you be flying from?
I'll be departing from Phoenix.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:15 am and has 0 stops. Ticket is priced at $132.
That sounds like a good flight to me.
Shall I buy tickets for you?
No. Not yet. Can you find round trip flights for me?
When will you be returning?
I want to be back on 5th of March.
American Airlines have an outbound flight leaving at 6:15 am and a return flight leaving at 8:10 am. The ticket costs $172.
Is the ticket refundable? Which airport does the flight arrive at?
The ticket is not refundable and the flight is scheduled to arrive at SFO International Airport.
That sounds good to me.
Okay. Should I get tickets for you?
No, I'm good.
Anything else that you would like me to help with?
No. Thank you very much.
Have a great day!
I'm planning on going on a trip soon. Can you help me find a good flight?
Sure. Where will you be leaving from and what's your destination?
I'll leave from CDMX and go to Chi-town.
What day are you looking to leave on?
The 6th if possible.
I've found 3 suitable flights. I suggest an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:05 am and has only 1 stop. The ticket will cost $320.
Which airport does it depart from and where does it land?
Your destination will be O'Hare International Airport and you'll be leaving from Benito Juarez International Airport.
That sounds good to me. Can you look up the flights for me?
When would you like to return?
I want to be home next Friday.
I've found 1 convenient flight with American Airlines. It leaves at 8:05 am while the return flight leaves at 1:20 pm. It'll cost $324.
That sounds good to me, thanks. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me fin a one-way flight to ATL? I need three tickets.
Where are you departing from, and when do you want to depart?
I am departing from Phoenix, AZ on the 8th of this month.
I've found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:25 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $159.
Sounds good.
Would you like to book the tickets?
No, not at the moment.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you find me a round trip flight, returning on the 11th?
Sure, I've found 1 flight. This is an American Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 11:25 pm, and the return flight is at 11:40 am. The ticket costs $244.
When do the departing and returning flights arrive?
The departing flight arrives at 6:37 am, and the return flight arrives at 4:22 pm.
Sound good. That's all for now.
Have a nice day.
I have a trip coming up. Can you find a one way flight for Thursday next week.
Where are you planning to visit?
I am going to Atlanta, GA.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from LA. I would like to fly Economy on United Airlines.
There is 1 flight suiting your criteria. It is an United Airlines outbound flight leaving at 8:40 pm and has 0 stops. The price of a ticket is $163.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to book a ticket.
No, I don't want to buy a ticket right now. Can you search for a flight back on the 9th of March.
There is 1 flight matching your criteria. It is a United Airlines outbound flight leaving at 8:40 pm. The return flight leaves at 12:15 pm. The price of ticket is $251.
That flight sounds good. That's all the help I need.
Have a good day.
Hey, can you find me some flights?
Sure. Where are you going and when?
I want to go to SD on Delta Airlines. I want to head out on March 9th.
Okay. Where do you want to leave from?
I'll be leaving Seattle, WA.
I could only find just 1 flight for you on Delta Airlines. It leaves at 8:45 am and only has 1 stop. It costs $186.
That sounds about right to me.
Okay. Do you want to book the tickets?
Actually, no. Could you find some round trip flights instead. I want to travel Premium Economy and it's going to be a group of four.
Okay. When are you coming back?
We'll be heading back on the 12th of March.
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 8:45 am that has a return flight that leaves at 11:05 am on those dates. It costs $346 for a ticket.
That sounds perfect. Thanks. That's all.
Have a good day!
Hey I want a premium economy one way flight, help me out!
Where are you coming from?
I'm gonna be leaving from Vancouver, BC
Where are you going?
I'm going to ATL, and I wanna leave on the 9th of this month so I can leave quickly
I found 2 flights, here's a 1:35 pm 0 stop flight from Air Canada that costs $260
Is that one refundable? Also what airport does it arrive at?
It's non-refundable and it arrives at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport
How about cheaper economy emotions, are there any left?
I found 2 flights, here's a Delta Airlines 1 stop flight for $263 that leaves early morning at 2:50 am
Hmmm.. Any other flights I should consider? I'm heading to LAX instead
There's a 11 pm 0 stop flight to LAX via American Airlines, this one is $143
That sounds good then
Do you want me to book already?
Nah, it's ok for now
Can I do anything else?
Help me find round trip tickets
When are you coming back?
I wanna be back on the 11th of this month
There's 1 American Airlines trip that costs $193 and leaves at 11 pm with a return flight at 4:50 pm on those dates
That's great! That's it for now
Have a good rest of your day
Can you help me find a one-way flight?
Where are you leaving from, and at what time? Where is your destination?
I'm leaving New York on the 7th of this month and traveling to Philly.
I've found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:55 am and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $61.
Which airport will the flight arrive at?
The flight will arrive at PHL International Airport.
Which airport will the flight depart from?
The flight will depart from JFK International Airport.
Sound good. Can you help me find a round trip flight?
When would you like to return?
I'd like to return on the 9th of March.
I've found an American Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 7:55 am, and the return flight is at 5:35 pm. The ticket costs $65.
Sound good to me. That's all for now.
Have a nice day.
I would like a one-way flight via Economy class.
Where would you be departing from and what is your destination? When would you like to leave?
I will be traveling from SD to Vegas on the 6th.
There are 4 flights available. You can fly on American Airlines. There are 0 stops to your destination. The flight leaves at 7:15 pm and cost $92.
Is there anything else? I want to leave Seattle on the 7th of this month.
There is a flight on Delta Airlines that leaves at 6:10 am. There would only be 1 stop to your destination and the cost of the ticket is $221
That would be great.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
No, I don't want any. I want you to search for round trip flights for four people.
When would you be returning?
On the 9th
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 6:10 am. It returns at 11:05 am and costs $228.
That would be great. That's all for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find me some one-way flights please, I prefer Premium Economy cause I like the leg room
When are you thinking of going?
I want to head out on the 4th of this month
Going anywhere special? Also where are you coming from?
I'm going to Los Angeles, just a chill trip. I'll be leaving from San Fran so staying within Cali
I found a 0 stop Alaska Airlines flight. Actually I found 4 others, but I think this one is good, it leaves at 7:10 pm and it'll run you $140.
That's alright, but is there anything else? Maybe via Southwest Airlines
There's a Southwest Airlines flight, also with 0 stops that leaves at 6:45 am and it a dollar more at $141
Anything else? I don't really care about the airline
There are 2 other flights, one is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 12:15 pm with 0 stops and costs $176
Is that refundable though?
No, I'm sorry it's not
Which airport does it arrive at and where does it depart from?
It's flying from SFO International Airport to LAX International Airport
Alright that sounds good. Can you look for round trip flights then?
When do you want to come back?
I got work so I wanna be back by next Wednesday
I found 1 flight at 12:15 pm on American airlines. The return flight would leave at 4:50 pm and the total for everything is $167
Is it refundable or not? Also where does the flight arrive?
It arrives at LAX International Airport, but it is also non-refundable
That sounds great, that's all for now
Got it, have a good one
I am searching for one-way flights.
What are your traveling details- date and place?
I am leaving from Los Angeles to CDMX on 3rd of this month
I have an american airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 2:45 pm and costs $151
Is it a refundable ticket?
no, that is non refundable sadly
Are there any other flights available to Chicago?
There is also alaska airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 4:20 pm and costs $163
Any other flight? I am booking for a group of four people.
Okay, How about one with Delta airlines? It has 0 stops as well, leaves at 1:40 pm and costs $162
This one sounds good.
Should I buy the tickets?
No, I don't want to buy tickets right now. Can you search for round trip flights instead?
What is the date of return journey?
I get back on 5th of this month.
I hav 1 delta airlines flights that leaves at 1:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:25 pm. It costs $182
Okay, that sounds good.
Should I purchase its tickets?
No. That would be all. Thanks!
Have a great day!
Hi, I'd like to book a one-way flight for an upcoming trip.
Sure thing! When are you leaving?
I'll be leaving on the 7th of this month. I need tickets for three people, and I can do business or economy.
Got it. Where will you be traveling to and from?
I'll be going to Mexico City from Phoenix.
Okay, I've found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:35 am with only 1 stop. Three tickets will cost $376. How does that sound?
Yep, that sounds great! Could you search for a return flight too?
Sure, when would you like to come back?
I'd like to return on the 9th of this month.
I found another American Airlines flight. The outbound flight will take off at 7:35 am, and the return flight will take off at 8:05 am. Three tickets will cost $407.
Is anything else available?
I couldn't find any other flights, sorry. Can I help you with something else?
No, that's okay. Thanks anyways!
Sure thing, have a nice day!
Can you help me find some flights?
I can do that. Where are you going to and from where?
I'm going to London. I'll be leaving from SF.
What date would you like to leave?
On March 11th.
I have found 5 possible flights for you. This one leaves at 4:30 am and has 1 stop. It costs $424 with Alaska Airlines.
Can I look at some more? There are three people travelling.
I've got an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:05 am and has 1 stop. It costs $382.
That sounds better.
Do you want me to buy these tickets?
No, not yet. Can you look for return flights for me? I want to come back on the 13th of this month.
There's an American Airlines flight. You'll return at 3:05 pm. The outbound flight is 7:05 am. It costs $391.
When does the outbound flight land?
It lands at 6:37 am.
Okay, thanks a lot.
Shall I buy these tickets?
No, that's okay.
Is there anything I can help you with?
No, that's it thanks.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a one-way flight to Chicago. Can you find one for me?
What is the day you want to leave?
I want to leave on the 11th of this month.
What is your point of departure?
I am leaving out of Seattle.
I have located 5 suitable flights. One of these is on Alaska Airlines. The flight leaves at 8:25 am and it has 0 stops. The ticket will cost $168.
What is the airport it leaves from and which airport will it arrive at?
The destination airport is O'Hare International Airport and it leaves out of Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Are there other flights that can be found?
Yes, there is also an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight departs at 4 pm, and there are 0 stops on it. The cost of the ticket is $169.
Can you find any other flights?
There is also a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight departs at 11:50 pm and there are 0 stops on the flight. The ticket will cost $150.
That flight sounds fine to me.
Would you like to buy tickets for this flight?
No I don't wish to purchase a ticket.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Will you search for round trip flights for me?
What date do you want to come back?
I would like to return on 13th of this month.
Okay, I have found a Delta Airlines flight. It will leave at 11:50 pm, and the return flight will depart at 11:55 am at a price of $231.
What is the airport the flight is leaving from? What time will the onward flight get there?
The onward flight will get there at 6:20 am, leaving from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That flight sounds fine to me.
Do you want me to buy tickets for it?
No, that's okay.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. I appreciate the help.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a one-way flight on American Airlines, and I want it to be Economy.
Okay. Where will you be taking off from?
I'm flying out of Los Angeles.
And when you wanting to leave?
I'm going next Friday, to Mexico City. There's 2 of us going to be flying.
Looking that up, I see there's 1 flight that will work for you, an American Airlines flight taking off outbound at 2:45 pm. It has 0 stops, and it's going to cost $145.
Great! Can you tell me where it's departing from and arriving?
It flies out of LAX International Airport, and lands in Benito Juarez International Airport.
That sounds like the flight for me!
Would you like to go ahead and purchase tickets for it?
No, I don't want to buy tickets. But can you look for round trip flights for me, ones that get back on the 10th?
Yes, here you go. I found an American Airlines flight, outbound at 2:45 pm, and returning at 8:05 am. That one costs $155.
It sounds like it would work!
Do you want me to buy the tickets for it?
No, I'm all set for now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Nope, that's all, thanks.
You have a great day.
I'm going away, can you help me search for one-way flights for 2 people?
From where to where?
I'm flying from Seattle to Las Vegas.
When will you leave?
I'll go on the 8th of this month.
I've found 3 options- how about a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8:45 am, with 1 stop, at a cost of $229?
What other options are there?
How about a Southwest Airlines flight with 1 stop, leaving at 6:50 pm, at a cost of $226?
I want something else, any class is fine.
How about a United Airlines flight, with 1 stop, leaving at 10:10 am, at a cost of $233?
I like the sound of that one.
Shall I buy tickets for it now?
No, not yet.
Anything else I can help you with?
Can you search for round trip flights, getting back on March 10th?
How about a United Airlines flight, departing at 10:10 am, returning at 1:40 pm, at a cost of $239?
Where will it land?
It'll land at McCarran International Airport.
That sounds good.
Do you want me to buy tickets now?
No thanks, that's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day!
I'm planning a vacation soon. Can you find a one-way flight for me?
What locations will you be leaving and visiting? At what time do you intend on leaving?
My trip, which begins on March 10th, goes from Portland to Los Angeles.
My search brought up 5 flights that might appeal to you. How about the Alaska Airlines flight? It leaves at 10:10 am, has 0 stops, and a ticket for which costs $150.
That's not bad, but what other flights are available?
The American Airlines flight might be good for you. It leaves at 6 am, has 1 stop, and a ticket for it costs $207.
What airport does the flight depart from?
It'll depart from PDX International Airport.
That flight sounds great.
Would you like to purchase a ticket for it?
Not at the moment. I'd like to see if there are any round trip flights available before I decide on a ticket to buy. Traveling in Economy would be ideal.
On what date will you return?
I'd like to return on the 12th of March.
How about this American Airlines flight? The outbound flight leaves at 6 am, and the return flight leaves at 11:15 pm. A ticket will cost you $171.
At what airport will this flight arrive at?
It's going to travel to LAX International Airport.
When will the return flight arrive?
It will arrive at 1:45 am.
That sounds fine with me.
Should I purchase you a ticket right now?
No, I'm fine. I don't need anything else from you.
Glad I was able to help you out. Enjoy your day.
I need a one way flight.
What city would you like to leave from and on what date?
Phoenix, Az on the 5th of March.
Where will you be flaying too?
to SFO.
How about an American Airlines flight departing at 7:35 am with 1 layover for $184?
DO you have another option with Premium Economy?
How about a Delta Airlines flight departing at 11:55 am with 0 layovers for $171?
Where does it arrive? Is the ticket refundable?
It arrives into SFO International Airport. It is a nonrefundable ticket.
What are some other options?
what do you think of a Southwest Airlines flight departing at 9:55 pm with 0 layovers for $190?
That is nice? Can you show me round trip flights?
When would you like to return.
I need to be back on the 7th of March. The ticket is for 1 person.
There is 1 flight it is a Southwest Airlines flight departing at 9:55 pm with the returning flight departing at 6:15 pm for $204?
What time would my return flight arrive?
It would arrive at 8:22 pm.
That sounds good.
Would you like for me to buy the tickets?
No thank you.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No that will be all.
Have a great day!
I need to fly soon, can you search for me one way flights?
When are you going away?
I am leaving on the 3rd of March.
Where do you wish to depart?
I am traveling to Atlanta, GA from Sydney, NSW.
I found 2 suitable flights based on your criteria, the best one is with Delta Airlines and leaving at 5:50 pm, it has 1 stop and the ticket price is $356.
Sounds amazing, I prefer traveling Economy and there are four people leaving with me.
Which dates are you coming back?
Make it next Tuesday.
I found 1 good booking for you with Delta Airlines leaving at 5:50 pm and returning flight leaves at 12:50 pm and the full price is $407.
Sounds great to me! Thanks!
Have a fantastic day.
I'm taking a vacation to Paris soon. Can you see if there are any one-way flights available?
At what time and from what location will you be leaving?
I got my destination wrong. I'm actually visiting Washington. I'll be leaving from Chicago on Tuesday next week. What airline is used doesn't matter.
How about American Airlines for your flight? It leaves at 8:10 am, has 0 stops, and a ticket for it costs $128.
What other flights are available?
Another one you could go on is Southwest Airlines. That flight leaves at 7:25 am, has 0 stops, and a ticket for it costs $119.
What airport will the flight depart from? Can I get a refund on the ticket?
The flight will depart from O'Hare International Airport. Sadly, you cannot get a refund for your ticket.
That flight sounds great.
Would you like to purchase a ticket right now?
No, I don't want to purchase a ticket just yet. Let's see what other flights there are. Can you find me a round trip flight?
At what time will you return?
I aim to return on the 7th of this month.
I found 1 flight that could suit your needs, from Southwest Airlines. It leaves at 7:25 am and returns at 3:50 pm. A ticket for it costs $166.
When will the onward flight arrive? Can I get a refund on the ticket?
The onward flight arrives at 10:23 am, but alas, you can't get a refund on your ticket.
That flight is fine with me.
Should I purchase tickets right now?
No, I'm fine.
Are there any other matters in which I can help you?
That's all for now. Glad you were able to lend a hand.
It's my pleasure to be of help. Have a wonderful day.
Can you search for one-way flights?
Where are you leaving from and where do you want to go and which date?
I need to go to Phoenix from vegas and i will be moving on the 8th
There is a American Airlines flight leaving at 4:40 pm with 0 stops with ticket costing at $82
I am interested in Economy class and are there any other flights available?
I have short listed 2 perfect flights for you and one among them is Delta Airlines which leaves at 4:45 pm having 0 stops and ticket cost will be $96
Have you looked into any other flight availability?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 2:25 pm with 0 stops and the ticket cost is $85
This is ok for me
Are you interested in buying tickets?
No, i am not interested in buying ticket
Is there any other help from me?
Do you need me to look in for round trip flights?
When are you planning to return back?
I need to go back on 11th of March
There is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 2:25 pm and the return flight is at 9:50 pm .The ticket cost is $95
That flight is perfect for me
Do i need to buy tickets for that flight?
No, i am ok
Is there any other help you need from me?
No, thank you very much
Have a nice day
Find me a one way flight, departing Monday next Week
Sure. Where are you going? Departure airport?
I'll leave from SFO and go to Toronto, Canada
I found an Alaska Airlines flight, 1 stop, departing at 4:30 am for $275
Anything else. Try United Airlines leaving on Sunday this week instead
I found 1 flight: United Airlines leaving at 5:35 am with 1 stop. It costs $280
Where does it leave from?
The departure is from SFO International Airport
And it arrives where?
You'll get into Toronto Pearson International Airport
Great.
Would you like to book a reservation?
No nevermind that. Instead make it a round-trip flight, returning March 5th.
I found 1 option: United Airlines departing at 5:35 am, with the return departing at 5:35 pm. It costs $289.
And it arrives where again?
Toronto Pearson International Airport
That's perfect, but I'm good for now thanks
Take care and let me know what else I can do to help
Hi I'm looking to travel. Can you find some one-way flights for me?
Sure, where are you travelling to, where are you leaving from, and when is the date of your stay?
I will be going to Mexico City later today, and I am departing from Phoenix.
I found 3 flights that I think will work for you. I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:35 am with 1 stop. The cost of the ticket will be $226.
Great, will the ticket be refundable?
Unfortunately, there are no refunds on the ticket.
Which airport will the flight be arriving in?
The flight will arrive at Benito Juarez International Airport.
That works great for me.
Would you like me to book the tickets now?
No, I don't wish to purchase tickets at this time. Can you look for round trips too? I'd like to return on Sunday this week.
I managed to find 1 flight that I think will work for you. It's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:35 am and the return flight departs at 8:05 am. The cost will be $254.
That's perfect. That's everything I needed.
Enjoy your flight!
I need to find one-way flights.
Where are you going, when are you leaving, and where are you leaving from?
I'll be going to Seattle, WA from ATL on March 12th.
I found 4 options. There is an American Airlines flight at 3:30 pm with 1 stop. The ticket price is $278.
Are there any other flights? I'd prefer Economy, and I need to leave later today.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 4:20 pm with 0 stops. The ticket price is $172.
Are there any other flights?
Yes, there is a Southwest Airlines flight at 7:20 pm with 0 stops. The ticket price is $199.
What airport is it leaving from?
It leaves from the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That sounds good. Can you find round trip flights?
When will your return be?
I want to return on March 3rd.
I found a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves outbound at 7:20 pm. The return flight will leave at 5:40 am. The ticket price is $216.
What airport will that flight arrive in?
It will arrive at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That one sounds good to me.
Should I get you tickets?
No thanks.
Do you need anything else?
No thank you.
Have a great day!
Please find one-way flights.
Where are you going?
I want to go to Vegas.
Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Portland, OR.
When do you want to leave?
I want to leave on the 12th of March. I want to travel Southwest Airlines.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 4:55 pm with 1 stop. The price is $202.
Any other flights available?
Sorry, I couldn't find any other flights. Anything else I can help you with?
Please look again through American Airlines.
I found 1 flight that matches your request. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5 am with 1 stop. The price is $223.
What airport does the flight arrive at and is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is non-refundable. The flight arrives at McCarran International Airport.
Sounds good, thanks.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
No, can you find round trip flights?
When are you returning?
I'm returning on March 14th.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5 am and the return flight leaves at 4:40 pm. the ticket is $226.
Sounds great. Thanks.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No, thank you. That's all.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight to Phoenix, AZ for three people.
Where are you heading out from?
I'm coming from Vancouver and want to leave on March 11th.
How does a $221 Air Canada flight leaving at 4:45 pm with 1 stop sound?
Any other flights available?
There's a 1 stop $239 Delta Airlines flight leaving at 3:20 am.
Any other flights?
There's a 1 stop $335 United Airlines flight leaving at 3:15 am.
When's the layover flight time, and is it refundable?
The layover arrives at 1:17 pm. No refunds.
Sounds perfect, thanks.
Want to purchase the tickets?
Not right now.
Need help with anything else?
I need an Economy round trip flight.
When do you plan on heading back?
The 13th of this month.
There's a $312 United Airlines flight leaving at 3:15 am and returning 7:15 am.
Sounds good. That'll about do it.
Have a fantastic rest of the day!
i want oneway flights for two people
where will you be leaving from?1
i want leaving from chicago. i like seeating class is economy.
where are you planning to visit? when do you plan to leave?
i want travelling to paris, france on march 1st
i found american airlines it has 0 stops and ticket price is $226. the flight leave at 5:10 am.
the flight sounds good to ome
do you want to buy tickets for it
no i don't want to buy a ticket. can you search flights for me
when are you coming back?
i am returning on 3rd of this month
i found 1 suitable flight for you there is american airlines and ticket price is $362. the flight leaves at 5:10 am and return at 4:05 am
the flight sounds good to me
should i buy the tickets for it
no. i am good. that's all need
have a great day
I want to plan a trip and need help with the flight. I'm looking for oneway flights that leave from Chi-town.
What day are you leaving on and where are you going?
I'm going to leave on the 2nd and I'll be heading to LAX.
There are 4 flights that I found. There's an outbound flight from American Airlines that leaves at 4:30 am and has 0 stops that cost $154, do you like this one?
That sounds like it'll work, can you also search for another flight for me?
On what date will you be returning?
I'll be returning on March 4th, and it'll be for 2 people, not just me.
There's an American Airlines flight that is outbound at 4:30 am and it returns at 8:30 am. It costs $183. Does this suit you?
Yeah, that's good. That'll be all the help I'll need.
Okay, have a great day.
Can you help me find a oneway ticket from Phoenix, AZ? I am indifferent to business or economy.
Where are you going?
I am going to Los Angeles and i would prefer to go on Delta Airlines.
When do you want to leave?
I am leaving on the 2nd.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines that has 1 stop and leaves at 12:15 pm. THe ticket costs $175.
Which airport is the flight leaving from?
Sky Harbor International Airport.
Which airport does the flight get in to? What time does it arrive?
It lands at LAX International Airport at 3:45 pm.
That sounds good. Can you search more flights for me? I want to get back on MArch 4th.
I found 1 Delta Airlines round trip flight. THe outbound leaves at 12:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 3:05 pm for $180.
That sounds good.
Should i buy the tickets?
No thank you
DO you need help with anything else?
No, thank you!
Have a good day!
I have an upcoming trip. Can you find me a one way flight leaving LAX on March 10th?
Where are you headed?
I'm going to ATL
I found 5 flights. There's an Alaska Airlines one that leaves at 8:15 pm and has 0 stops. It's gonna cost $195
Anything else available?
There's a 9:05 am American Airlines Flight that's $171, also 0 stops
That sounds good
Anything else you need?
Can you search other flights
When are you coming back?
I'll be back March 12th, economy preferred
I found 1 flight via American Airlines leaving at 9:05 am. The return is at 2:30 pm and is $171
That's good, thats all thanks
Have a good day
I need a one way flight on any airline.
Which date do you need, and where are you departing from and arriving to?
I need 1 ticket for March 3rd to Seattle, WA on Delta Airlines from San Francisco.
I found 1 with Delta Airlines at 8 am with 0 stops. It costs $130.
From which airport?
SFO International Airport.
Is this a redeye?
It is not overnight.
Okay I need a round trip.
Which day would you return?
On the 5th of March.
I have a departure flight at 8 am and a return flight at 6:10 am for $126 on Delta Airlines.
Okay thank you, that's all.
Have a great day.
I need flight tickets. 4 people, flying one way to Portland, OR.
Sure. Where are you departing from? What date?
I need to leave on March 10th from Delhi, India.
I found 2 flights. How about American Airlines, departing at 7 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $392.
No that doesn't work.
What about United Airlines. It departs at 1:10 am and has 1 stop, costing $362.
Where does it depart from and where does it land?
Departing from Indira Gandhi International Airport, arriving at PDX International Airport.
Ok, make it a round trip though, and find me Premium Economy seats.
What day will you return?
On the 12th of this month
I found 1 flight, United Airlines. Departing at 1:10 am and the return leaves at 10:35 am. It costs $675.
Ok that's all for now.
Take care.
Im looking for one way flight
Which city do you like to depart from ? What date and where are you planning to go?
I would like to fly to Atlanta from Washington on 12th of this month.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines which takes off at 11:20 pm and has 0 stops costs $109
Okay. I wanted to serach round trip flight. Find me Economy class tickets.
Which day do you like to take the return flight?
Returning on 14th of March.
How about American Airlines which takes off at 4:10 pm and return flight takes off at 11:40 am costs $118.
Where will the flight lands? Is it a redeye flight?
The flight is for Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport which is not an overnight flight.
Okay. Thanks a lot. Thats all I need.
Have a great day
Can you help me book a one way flight?
Where would you like to go? And on what date would you like to depart?
I want to leave on March 12th from Phoenix, AZ to SF. I'd like Economy class tickets.
I found 4 flights for you. This one is with American Airlines. It leaves at 7:35 am and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $168.
Ok. I'm also looking for a return flight.
Which day do you want to return?
I want to return on the 14th of this month. I need 4 tickets.
I found 1 flight for you. This one is with American Airlines. It leaves at 7:35 am. The return fligth takes off at 8:10 am. The ticket costs $180.
Ok. Thanks for your help, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
I would like to fly one way to Phoenix, AZ with Delta Airlines.
In which city are you departing from and when are you traveling?
The 5th of March from LA.
There is 1 flight with Delta Airlines that leaves at 10:50 pm and has 0 stop. The cost is $90.
Is this for 4 passengers? At which airport?
No, 1 passenger from LAX International Airport.
I would like a round trip, 4 tickets for Economy class.
When would you like the return flight?
On March 7th please.
Would you like to return with Delta Airlines at 3:05 pm and the return is 12:15 pm the ticket is $169
Which airport does the flight leave from?
It leaves from LAX International Airport
Ok thank you for the information.
Can I help you with something else?
No, that is all!
Have a good day.
Can you help me find a flight ticket? I do not have a seat preference.
Yes I can help you with that. What day are you needing to travel?
I will need something for the 9th.
Where will you be leaving from and where will you be going?
I would like a flight leaving from the LAX and going to Portland, OR.
I have a flight available with Alaska Airlines that will depart at 7:25 am with 0 stops. The price of this ticket is $142, would that work for you?
Do you have anything else available by chance?
I also have a flight available the American Airlines that will depart at 11:15 pm with 0 stops. The cost of this flight is $126, will that work for you?
Can you tell me the airports I will be departing from and arriving to?
Yes, you will be leaving from the LAX International Airport and arriving to the PDX International Airport.
That is not going to work for me, do you have anything else?
How about a Delta Airlines? The have a ticket available for $151 with 0 stops that will depart at 9:50 pm.
Okay, are the tickets round trip and I will be needing three please.
Okay, what will be your return date?
I will need to be back on the 11th.
Did you want me to reserve your tickets with Delta Airlines for $180? Your departure time will be 9:50 pm and your return time take off will be 3:20 pm.
Can you tell me what time I will arrive to Portland and what time will my returning flight arrive?
Yes I have your arrival time for 0:20 am and returning time will be 8:24 pm.
Okay, thank you so much that will be all for me today.
I hope you enjoy your trip. Safe travels.
I would like a one way flight on the 1st to ATL.
Which city would you like to leave from?
Chi-town.
There is an American Airlines flight that takes off at 7:50 am with 0 stops. The ticket is $125.
Which airport does it leave from?
O'Hare International Airport.
How about something else?
Delta Airlines has a flight at 11:55 am with 0 stops. That ticket costs $121.
It is Economy or Business class?
It's an Economy seat.
I'm looking for a flight.
When would you like the return flight?
It would like to return the 3rd of this month.
I've found 1 Delta Airlines flight at 11:55 am and returning at 5:45 pm. That ticket is $174.
ok.
Can I help you with anything else?
No and thank you for your help.
Have a good day.
I got to fly away from New York City.
When are you planning to do that.
On Tuesday next week.
Where you heading?
I'm Portland, OR bound.
I see a 4:05 am American Airlines 1 stopper for $312.
I'll pass on that.
How about a 5:55 pm 1 stop flight for $304? Southwest Airlines?
You know what? What do have for Chi-town.
I have 2 flights. There's a 6 am Delta Airlines with 0 stops for $131.
That sounds like a redeye. When does it land?
At 7:19 am. So its not a redeye.
Make it a round-tripper.
When do you want to be back?
7th of March should work.
I see a Delta Airlines that departs at 9:55 pm and takes of at 9:15 am one the way back. That'll set you back $116.
JFK or Laguardia?
JFK International Airport.
Got it. I think I'm good for now.
Speak to you later then.
Help me find a one way flight?
When will you be traveling?
I need to leave on Wednesday next week.
Where are you departing from and where are you going?
Find a flight from SF to New Delhi.
Would you like to fly on Alaska Airlines? There is a flight out at 4:30 am with just 1 stop. The tickets is $417 and I have found 4 flights.
Is that for a First Class ticket?
No it's an Economy seat.
Is there something else?
What about American Airlines? It departs at 1:15 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket is $275.
Ok please get me four tickets for the flight.
Which day would you like to return?
How about the 8th of March?
What about American Airlines? It departs at 1:15 pm and the return flight departs at 9:20 am. The ticket is $383.
That sounds like a redeye flight.
It does fly overnight.
When will it arrive? Where does it depart from?
It arrives at 4:07 pm and departs from SFO International Airport.
Ok, that's perfect.
Is there anything else?
No, that is all.
Okay, have a great flight.
My name is Jack. I'd like to book a one way flight from Portland, OR for a business trip.
Which is your destination city of travel?
I would be flying to Chicago.
What date and what time please? Which airline would you like to choose?
On March 7th, I've to start my journey. Any airlines would be fine. I would like to book in business class.
Please hold on... I'll check the timetable for you.... Here, you go! There are 5 flights matching your criteria. The one, Alaska Airlines that has only 1 stop takes off at 10:10 am and the travel cost is only $283. Would you prefer to fly in this airlines?
Please may I know if any other planes available? I need four tickets totally.
Yup! American Airlines that has only 1 stop is readily available on that day. It takes off at 6 am and the travel cost would amounts to $233. Will that be okay for you.
Oh! I've made up my mind. Please find some other flights in Premium Economy class tickets to Atlanta, GA.
Will Delta Airlines meet your requirement? The flight stops only at 1 place and it would takes off at 9:35 am. Cost of the ticket is $376 only.
How much would it cost if I am looking for a round trip?
Please can I know when you wish to have the return flight?
I'll be back on the 10th.
Do you prefer the same Delta Airlines flight that has a round trip and the return flight takes off at 5:50 am and the onward journey would be at 9:35 am. Cost is just $445 for the travel.
At what time will I reach the destination?
Destination arrival of the flight will be at 8:47 pm.
Okay! Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I'd like to find one way flights from Chicago.
When do you want to travel and to where?
I would like to travel today to ATL.
I have 3 flights for you. How about an American Airlines flight that takes off at 7:50 am and has 0 stops? It costs $125.
Is that for 3 passengers? What airport does it leave from?
It is for 1 person and takes off from O'Hare International Airport.
Okay. I need a round trip flight on the 3rd of March on Premium Economy.
I have 1 American Airlines flight for you that departs at 8:40 pm. It returns at 9:15 pm. It costs $198.
When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 10:16 pm.
Thanks, that is all I need.
Have a great day.
I need premium economy tickets for a one way flight.
What is your departure city?
Departing from Mexico City.
What is your destination?
Please search United Airlines departing on March 12th and arriving in LA.
Is your preference United Airlines? There is a flight leaving at 8:45 pm with 0 stops at a cost of $258.
What is the departure airport?
Departing from Benito Juarez International Airport.
Great. I need a round trip flight.
What is your return date?
I get back the 14th.
There is 1 option on United Airlines departing at 8:45 pm and returning at 4:25 am for $260.
What is the arrival time of the return flight.
The flight arrives at 9:45 am.
Ok. Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. Thanks that's it.
OK. Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight to depart next Thursday. Please search for economy class tickets.
I can help you with that. Where are you leaving from, and what's your destination?
I am looking for flights from Washington to San Francisco.
I have a flight on American Airlines for $294, leaving at 9:45 am. That flight has 1 stop.
Which airport does it leave from, and where does it land?
That flight leaves from Dulles International Airport, and arrives at SFO International Airport.
That's not really what I want. Please find something else.
I have a flight on Southwest Airlines for $280. It takes off at 3:50 pm and also has 1 stop.
No, I want something else please.
There are seats available on a United Airlines flight that takes off at 8 am. That one is $292 and also has 1 stop.
I would like a round trip for that.
Okay, on what day would you return?
I will return on the 9th of this month.
I have 1 flight available on United Airlines for $298, taking off at 8 am. The return flight will depart at 5:50 am.
OK, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, that's all. Thank you.
Have a good day.
I would like a one way flight from SD.
When would you like to travel.
I would like to leave on March 8th.
What is your destination.
I am going to NYC.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight with 1 stop leaving at 3:20 pm. The ticket cost is $245.
Is this a redeye flight.
It is an overnight flight.
I want something else flying to SFO with two tickets.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:20 pm with 0 stops at a cost of $107.
I would like a round trip flight.
Which day do you want to return?
I would prefer the 10th of March.
I found 1 flight on American Airlines the departs at 9:20 pm and returns at 12:15 pm with a cost of $132.
OK, thanks, I am all set.
Have a great day.
I need a flight to visit an out-of-state relative.
Where would you be departing from?
I need 1 ticket from San Diego to Atlanta.
When would you like to leave?
I want to leave on the 12th of this month and fly Southwest Airlines.
Okay I was able to find 1 flight that matches this criteria. It is a Southwest Airlines flight that takes of at 1:20 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $262.
Which airport does the flight go to?
It is for Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport in Atlanta.
Okay, I would like a return flight as well.
When would you like to fly back to San Diego?
On the 14th of this month.
I found a Southwest Airlines flight that departs for Atlanta at 1:20 pm and leaves to return to San Diego at 12:05 pm. The ticket will cost $275.
Is this Business class? And when does the flight arrive at the destination?
It is Economy and arrives at 11:07 pm.
Okay thank you.
Have a good day!
I want a one way flight ticket.
Where do you want to go? What date and city would you like to depart from?
I am going to Chicago. I plan on departing from Philly on March 11th.
I found 4 available flights. Are you interested in flying with American Airlines? Their flight departs at 10:10 am and has 0 stops. A ticket costs $122.
I want a round trip flight. I want four tickets and to return on the 13th of March.
I found 1 flight and it's with American Airlines. The departure is scheduled for 10:10 am and the returning flight takes of at 6:40 pm. This ticket is $121.
Is it a red-eye?
No it isn't.
Is it Business class?
It is Economy class?
Alright.
Is there anything else I may help you with?
No, thanks.
Enjoy your day!
I'm planning a trip, can you find me a one way economy flight?
Sure, where and when are you planning to leave from?
I want to fly out from Toronto on the 7th of this month
Okay, and where do you want to fly to?
Chicago
Okay, I've found 3 flights. Do you like Air Canada? Because I've found a flight for $103, it leaves at 4:40 pm and has 0 stops
Is it a redeye flight do you know?
No, it's not
Can you see if there's anything else?
Sure, what about American Airlines? There's a flight for $113, it leaves at 10:05 am and has 0 stops
Is that for four passengers? And where does it land?
No, that's for 1 passenger. It lands at O'Hare International Airport
Okay, I'm going to need return tickets
I can do that for you, when are you coming back?
On the 9th of March
Okay, I've found 1 with American Airlines for $115. It leaves at 10:05 am and returns at 4:20 pm.
Ok, thanks. I don't need anything else.
Glad I could help, have a wonderful day
I need to find a one way flight.
Which city will you be leaving from
I will be leaving from Atlanta.
Where will you be traveling to?
I will be flying to San Diego. I would like to leave on the 12th of March and I would like Premium Economy.
Delta Airlines has 1 stop and the flight will take off at 6:50 am and the ticket will cost you $431.
No, something else please.
Southwest Airlines has 1 stop and takes off at 5:55 pm and will cost you $452.
Ok. I want a flight and four tickets returning on March 14th.
How about Southwest Airlines, I found 1 with them taking off at 6:30 am and the return flight leaves at 7 am and will cost you $475.
ok.
Anything else?
Nope, thanks!
Have a great day!
I would like to book a one way flight on the 11th March. Do you have any deals next week?
Sorry, for time being there is no deal. I am happy to assist you. Where are you flying to?
I will be travelling to Vancouver, BC.
To reach that destination, you can leave from Las Vegas. Do you wish to book your ticket from that city for your departure?
Yup! Please book the flights from Las Vegas.
Sure. Would you prefer to travel with American Airlines and you can leave by morning at 9:30 am. It has 1 stops and this is the good one among the 4 flights I found for you. It would cost $199 for your travel. Do you want me to continue with booking?
Sorry. Please can you look with Delta Airlines for I want to travel a little bit late. I need only one ticket.
Sure. Can I book with Delta Airlines that takes off at 12:20 pm which has only 1 stops. I think this is the best 1 flight I can find for you. Your travel cost will be around $211.
Fine. Is round trip available with that flight?
I think there is a return flight available. On which day you prefer? Either a morning or evening return?
I would prefer to return in the early morning on 13th of this month and if there is a ticket available in Economy class, it would be good.
I can find 1 flight for you with Delta Airlines that takes off at 12:20 pm and the return take off will be at 3:20 am. $225 would be the total cost including tax. Do you want me to continue with booking?
Yup.
Is there anything to help with?
Nope, thanks much for your help.
Have a nice journey and a great day.
I'll be flying to Vegas soon, and I want to find a one way flight.
What date will you travel?
I want to depart on 2nd of March, from Seattle to LA.
How about flying with Alaska Airlines? There is a flight available which takes off at 3:45 pm, with 0 stops, at a cost of $147.
Where does it land, and at what time?
It'll arrive at 6:32 pm at LAX International Airport.
That sounds okay, can you search for further options?
When will you want to return?
I'll return next Monday.
I've found a suitable flight with Alaska Airlines, with a departure flight at 3:45 pm, and a return flight at 7:10 pm, at a cost of $155.
That sounds good.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all for now, thanks.
Have a good day!
I want to look for a one way flight for the 1st of this month.
What airport would you like to depart from and where would you like to go?
Departing from LA going to London.
I have 5 options for you. There is an Alaska Airlines departing at 9:30 am with 1 layover for $423.
How many passagers are you looking for?
1 passenger.
Is it a Premium Economy ticket? What airport does it depart from?
It departs for LAX International Airport. It is a Economy ticket.
I want something elese.
How about an American Airlines flight that departs at 9:05 am and has 1 layover for $394.
ok. How about a round trip flight.
What date would you like to return.
I need two tickets returning on the 3rd.
How about an American Airlines flight departing at 9:05 am and the return flight departs at 3:05 pm for $357
IS it a Premium Economy ticket?
No It is an Economy seat.
ok.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No that will be all
Have a great day>
I need a one way flight.
From which city are you departing?
I will be leaving from SFO and I need a Premium Economy ticket to Seattle, WA.
Which date will you be leaving?
Friday next week please
Would you like to use Alaska Airlines? It departs at 6:20 AM and has 0 stops. The ticket is $208.
I need a round trip flight.
Which day will you be returning?
On the 10th of March.
I found 1 flight on ALaska Airlines that departs at 6:20 am and returns at 12 pm. The ticket is $207.
Thank you that is all.
Have a great day.
I'm going on a trip. I need three Premium Economy tickets for a one-way trip.
Sure. Where are you going? And what city are you leaving from?
I'm going to Los Angeles from Ciudad de Mexico.
When is your trip?
The 11th of this month. Ah, but, make that just two pickets.
There is 1 American Airlines flight which leaves at 8:05 am. It has 0 stops and costs $215.
What airport does this take me to? Is it an overnight flight?
You arrive at LAX International Airport on the same day you depart.
Sounds good, but can you change that to a round-trip? I want to be back on the 13th of March.
There is 1 American Airlines flight which leaves at 8:05 am and costs $235. The flight which brings you back leaves at 2:45 pm.
Perfect.
Do you want anything else?
That's all, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking to book a one-way flight.
What are the flight details? Where are you leaving from, and where are you traveling to?
I'd like to go to Portland, OR and I'm leaving from SD.
What date would you like to fly out?
I'm leaving on March 11th.
I've found 4 possible options for you: Alaska Airlines has a flight for $148 that leaves at 1:20 pm, with 0 stops.
Can you search for round trips as well?
What day would you like to return?
I think I would be returning on the 13th of March.
Alaska Airlines has 1 flight for $154 that departs at 1:20 pm and the returning flight is at 5:40 pm.
What class is the ticket in and what airport does it land at?
The arrival airport is PDX International Airport, the seat is in Economy.
Alright, that's everything I need for now.
Have a great day.
Hey, I need to book a one-way flight.
Sure thing. Where are you going? Where are you departing from? When would you like to travel?
I'd like to depart on the 12th of March from LAX to Portland.
Are you happy to fly with Alaska Airlines? We have a flight from 7:25 am with 0 stops. The total price will be $129.
Okay, that sounds good thanks.
So, when would you like to book a returning flight?
I'm returning on the 14th of this month.
Sure. If you'll fly with Alaska Airlines, we have a return flight, with the initial flight departing at 5:15 am and the return leg departing at 10:10 am. It's $141 total. There's only 1 flight available.
Okay that'll be fine. That's all.
Thanks, see you.
Im looking for one way flight
From which city you want to depart and To where are you planning to go? Your prefered dates to travel?
I want to travel to Sydney, NSW from Atlanta on March 6th
Do you like American Airlines ? The flight takes off at 11:40 am and has 1 stops which costs $376
Can you get me something else like Premium Economy class tickets and i would like fly with Delta Airlines
I found 1 flights which suits for you. Do you like to fly with Delta Airlines? It costs $611 and takes off at 12:50 pm
How many passengers will be there?
Its only for 1 person
Cool. I would like take a round flight trip for three tickets and return will be on next Friday
I found 1 flight for this. DO you like Delta Airlines and it takes off at 12:50 pm and return takes off at 5:50 pm which costs $627
From which airport does the flight leave? When does the return flight arrives?
It takes off from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport where return flight arrives at 5:04 pm
Okay great
Can I assist you on anything else?
No.Thanks for the help
Have a great day
I am travelling on the 6th and need a one way flight.
Which city are you travelling from?
From LA please.
Where are you travelling to?
I am going to Delhi.
There are 4 possible fligts. There is one with Alaska Airlines wih 0 stops taking off at 5:35 pm costing $266.
Which airport does the flight depart from?
It departs from LAX International Airport.
Is there anything else? I am flying to Ciudad de Mexico and need 4 tickets.
There are 3 possible flight. There is one with American Airlines with 0 stops taking off at 2:45 pm costing $131 per person.
When will the flight arrive?
It arrives at 8:05 pm.
Ok, I need a return flights too.
Which day are you returning?
The 8th of March.
There is 1 flight with American Airlines flying out at 2:45 pm and returning at 8:05 am. Total cost is $159.
Which airports does the fight depart and land at?
It leaves LAX International Airport and lands at Benito Juarez International Airport.
Ok that is everything thanks.
Have a lovely day.
I am looking for a one way flight
Where would you like to go
I want to go to vegas
When would you like depart and from what city
I am departing from Los Angeles on 1st of March
American Airlines provide 0 stops flight at 8:25 pm for $76
sure
anything else i can help you with
i need a round trip flight
When would you like to return
return on March 3rd
How about American Airlines depart at 8:25 pm and return at 9:30 am for $88
where does the flight land
the flight will land at Mccarran international airport
when does the return flight land
the flight will arrive at 9:35 pm in Vegas and be back to LA at 10:40 am
thank you, thats all i need
have a nice day
I'd like a one way flight.
What is the date and city you wish to departure from?
I'm looking for a flight from Chi-town on the 6th of March.
Where is your intended destination?
I'll be going to Los Angeles.
I have 4 options for you. The first is with American Airlines leaving at 4:30 am with 0 stops. The cost of the flight will be $157.
Can you find me a flight for economy class tickets?
What day would you like to return?
I'd like one ticket to return next Friday.
How about American Airlines leaving at 4:30 am. The returning flight leaves at 8:30 am and costs $167.
Will this be a late night flight?
No, it is not a redeye flight.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, but thank you.
Enjoy your day.
I need a one way flight: 3 tickets through Delta Airlines.
Alright, what city are you planning to leave from and where do you want to go? What are the dates of your trip?
Please look for flights from New York to Vancouver starting the 4th of March.
I found 1 flight with 1 stop, it's $299 through Delta Airlines and takes off at 6 am. Is this what you are looking for?
Where does it land?
The flight arrives into YVR International Airport.
Alright, I need a round trip flight.
When do you want to return?
Return on the 6th.
Alright, I found 1 $318 flight with Delta Airlines. It takes off at 6 am and the return flights leaves at 2:50 am.
Alright.
Anything else I can help with?
Nope, thanks!
Have a good rest of your day!
I am searching for one way flight to Seattle.
Which is your travelling date?
I wish to start my travel on 5th of March
From which city do you wish to move from?
I am looking for flights from Atlanta.
What do you think about flight at American Airlines? It will takes off at 3:30 pm and has 1 stop. The price of the ticket is $288.
From which airport the flight takes off? Whether it is a redeye flight?
It starts from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. No, it is not an overnight flight.
Ok. I wish to have a round trip flight. I need two tickets.
When will you want to book the return flight?
I am returning back on 7th of this month.
What do you think about flight at American Airlines? It will takes off at 11:40 am and the return flight will be at 9:45 pm. The price of the ticket is $251.
Which is the landing place? When will be the returning flight come?
It will come at 6:17 am. The flight is for Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Ok. Thank you.
Anything else do you need?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
Hey there. I need a one way flight out of NYC.
Sure. When are you departing? Where are you going?
I'll leave on the 10th of March to Paris, France.
Okay. We have a flight with American Airlines departing at 7:35 am with 0 stops. The ticket price is $223.
That's not so good for me. Can you get me an economy flight with United Airlines?
Sure. We have a United Airlines flight departing at 2:40 pm with 1 stop. The total price is $363.
When does that flight land? Is it for 1 traveller?
It arrives at 2:46 pm for 1 traveller.
Okay. I'd like to return on the 12th. Do you have a flight?
Sure. We have 1 United Airlines flight leaving at 2:40 pm and returning at 11:10 pm. It costs $325.
Okay great, that's all thanks.
No worries, see you.
I want to look for flights from SF, one way only.
What destinations and dates are you planning to travel?
I want to go on March 6th, to go to San Diego.
Do you have a preference for Alaska Airlines? There is a flight at 6:10 am, with 0 stops, at the price of $116.
Yes i am looking for a flight like that. Are there any Economy class tickets remaining?
Is there a return flight you are looking for?
I would like to book four tickets that return on March 8th.
There are two flights from Alaska Airlines. The first one takes off at 6:10 am and the second one is at 11:10 am. The tickets cost a total of $123.
What time is the returning flight scheduled to arrive? Is there a red eye option?
The returning flight is scheduled for 12:50 pm, it is not a red eye.
I see thanks, that is all.
Thank you, come again.
I am looking for a flight.
When and where do you want to go?
I plan on leaving from Paris, France this Sunday. I want to go to Atlanta with an economy seat.
There is a flight with Air France that is $338. It leaves at 2:25 am and has 1 stop.
I prefer a different flight.
There is a flight with American Airlines that costs $348. It takes off at 4:05 am and has 1 stop.
This is for 3 passengers, correct?
No, it is for 1 passenger.
I am looking for a flight.
What date would you like to come back?
I will return on the 5th.
There is an American Airlines flight that costs $367. It leaves at 4:05 am, and the returning flight leaves at 3:25 pm.
Would this be a redeye flight?
It will be an overnight flight.
Thank you, that is all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Hi, I'm looking for a one way flight to Washington.
Sure. For which date?
I need it for the 11th of this month. I'll be flying from SD to SF.
OK. There are 5 flights available. There's one on Alaska Airlines for $118. It leaves at 11:10 am and has 0 stops.
I'd like something else, please.
If you do American Airlines, you can leave at 9:20 pm. This flight costs $103 and also has 0 stops.
Are there any other flights?
There's a flight with Delta Airlines that leaves at 7:55 pm. This flight costs $106 and also has 0 stops.
Is that economy or business class? Where does it fly to?
You would be flying Economy to SFO International Airport.
That sounds good. Please book me 2 tickets.
OK. When will you be flying back?
I'll return on the 13th of this month. I'd like Economy, please.
You can fly with Delta Airlines for $110. You would leave at 7:55 pm. The return flight would be at 9:45 pm.
That sounds good.
OK. Anything else?
No, but thank you.
You're welcome. Enjoy!
I would like to find a one way flight.
Where are you departing from and traveling to? On what date would you like to travel?
I am looking to fly from Vancouver, BC to San Diego on Thursday next week.
I found 2 flights. Air Canada has a flight for $204 with 1 stop that departs at 4:45 pm.
I am looking for two tickets. What else did you find?
Delta Airlines has a flight with 1 stop for $207 leaving at 3:20 am.
Is this a redeye flight? When does it arrive at my destination?
It is not an overnight flight. It arrives at 8:34 am.
Let's talk about the return flight.
Which day would you like to take the return flight?
I would like to return March 9th.
I found 1 flight. Delta Airlines has a flight that takes off at 3:20 am and returns at 11:05 am for $221.
Is it a redeye flight?
It is not an overnight flight.
Which airport does the flight leave from? Is the ticket economy or business class?
The flight takes off from YVR International Airport. It is an Economy seat.
OK.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you for your help.
Have a good day!
Please find a one way flight with United Airlines.
For which city?
Make it SF
Whats the date of travel?
Make it 7th of this month
And the city of departure?
It would be from Phoenix
Please confirm booking 1 United Airlines 0 stop flight at 11:50 pm, costing $114
Is this a late flight?
yes its an overnight flight
What time will it land?
It would land at 1:57 Am
Can you find me an Economy flight?
When is the return
it will be March 9th
Please confirm booking 1 United Airlines flight at 11:50 pm, costing $125, and takes off at 2:15 pm
yes thats correct
Anything else i can help with?
No, that would be it thanks
Have a great day!
I need a one way flight from Atlanta.
On what date are you planning to fly and where do you want to go?
I'm going to Philly on the 9th of this month.
American Airlines has a flight leaving at 3:25 pm, with 1 stop and a ticket costs $169.
Do I have any other options?
Delta Airlines has one leaving at 3:40 pm with 1 stop. Ticket costs $183.
Something else please.
United Airlines has a flight at 12:50 pm, with 1 stop and tickets cost $200.
Did you find tickets for 3 people?
No. This is for 1 person.
Ok. Find me Economy class flight tickets for my return on the 11th.
The United Airlines departing flight takes off at 12:50 pm and the retuning flight takes off at 4:45 am. The ticket costs $193.
Ok. Thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. Thank you. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
Could you check for flights leaving on the 2nd of this month and returning on the 9th of March?
Sure. Where to? And where from?
From SFO to Chicago please.
I got 4. We have a 7:05 am American Airlines flight for $323. It leaves Chicago at 1:20 pm on the return.
I'm down with that.
Should I book it?
No thanks. Look for a one-way Economy instead.
I got 1 for you. A 7:05 am American Airlines flight for $313.
When does it arrive?
7:34 pm in Chicago.
From what airport does it leave?
SFO International Airport.
I like the sound of that. I'm good for now.
Take it easy.
I'm going out of town for a few days for a funeral and need some round trip flights.
What is your destination? What flight dates were you looking for?
I'm traveling to Phoenix, AZ, leaving on March 9th and getting back on the 11th.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Atlanta.
There's an American Airlines flight for $251, which leaves at 11:40 am and returns at 3:55 pm.
What airport does it leave from?
Departure is from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No, I'm good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
How about one-way flights?
I found 1 American Airlines flight for $301. It leaves at 11:40 am and as 1 stop.
Sounds good to me.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a great day.
Can you find some flight tickets for me? I prefer American Airlines.
When do you plan on departing and where are you visiting?
I am leaving on this Sunday to Washington.
Where will you be departing from?
I am leaving from New Delhi.
What date are you returning?
I want to return on March 7th.
I found 1 flight on American Airlines that departs at 9:20 am and returns at 6:05 am for $370.
That flight sounds good.
Do you want me to purchase the ticket?
No, thank you. Can you find me one-way flights instead?
I found 1 flight on American Airlines that departs at 9:20 am with 1 stop for $375.
Perfect, that flight works for me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Hello there, I am looking for some round trip flights to Seattle.
When are your preferred dates to depart and return?
I would like to leave on the 5th of March and return on the 10th.
May I know where will you be departing from?
I am intending to depart from LAX.
That's great, I have found 5 convenient flights for your trip, one of which is an Alaska Airlines flight which will cost you $211. The departure flight leaves at 5:15 am, while you will return at 12 pm.
Are there alternative flights available?
Sure, there is also an American Airlines flight which costs $160, departing at 5:20 am and returning at 8:15 am.
May I know which airport does the flight depart from?
The flight departs from LAX International Airport.
That sounds great to me!
Do you require a reservation for this flight?
No, I do not need a reservation. Could you help me find for a one-way flight instead?
Sure, I have found 1 flight, which is an American Airlines flight departing at 5:20 am with 0 intermediate stops and will set you back $151.
What time does the departure flight arrive then?
The departure flight will arrive at 8:07 am.
May I know at which airport does the departure flight depart and arrive at?
You will be travelling from LAX International Airport to Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
This flight is perfect for me.
Do you require further assistance?
No, that's all the help I need.
Sure, have a great day ahead then!
I'm looking for a flight, can you help me with this?
Please tell me where you'll be departing from and when you will be coming back?
I want to leave from Portland, OR and I will be getting back on the 13th.
And what date do you plan to leave on and where will you be travelling to?
I'll be leaving on 3rd of March, and I'll be going to LAX.
I've found 4 flights. There's an American Airlines outbound flight that leave at 6 am with a return flight that leaves at 5:20 am. It costs $198, how does that sounds?
That'll work for me. I also have another trip I'd like you to help me with, I'm looking for a oneway flight.
There's a flight from American Airlines outbound flight that leaves at 6 am and costs $192, it has 1 stop. Is this something you'd be interested in?
Yeah, that seems good. That'll be it for now.
Okay, have a great day.
Can you search flights for me?
When are you coming back? Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from LAX. I want to get back on next Thursday.
Where are you planning to visit? When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving on Sunday this week. I am traveling to New York. There are four people in my group.
I found 4 convenient flights for your trip. There is a American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 6:20 pm. The return flight leaves at 3:40 pm. The price of the ticket is $260.
Are there any other available flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 10:55 pm. The return flight leaves at 7:30 am. The price of the ticket is $205.
Are there any other available flight? I am leaving from Vancouver. I prefer United Airlines.
I found 1 convenient flight for you trip. There is an United Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 3:15 am. The return flight leaves at 8:20 am. The price of the ticket is $320.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should I buy the tickets for it?
No, I am good. I have a trip coming up. Can you find me oneway flights?
There is an United Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 3:15 am and it has 1 stop. The price of the ticket, is $299.
That flight sounds good to me. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me find a round-trip flight? I'll be leaving from Los Angeles.
When would you like to leave?
I'd like to leave by the 4th of this month.
When do you plan on returning, and where would you like to visit?
I'd like to be back by the 14th of March and my destination is Chi-town.
There is an American Airlines flight that departs at 8:30 am, and has a returning flight that departs at 4:30 am. The price per ticket is $202.
Could you check to see if there are any other flights available?
There is a flight with Delta Airlines that departs at 1:40 pm, and has a returning flight that departs at 11:15 pm. The price per ticket is $176.
Any other flights available?
There is a flight with Southwest Airlines that departs at 7:20 am, and has a returning flight that departs at 8:35 am. The price per ticket is $243.
When would the returning flight arrive?
The return flight is set to arrive at 3:24 pm.
Which airport would I arrive at? And which airport does the initial flight depart from?
You will be leaving LAX International Airport and arriving at O'Hare International Airport.
Great.
Can I help you with anything else?
Are you able to find a one-way flight?
There is a flight with Southwest Airlines with 0 stops that leaves at 7:20 am. The price per ticket is $159.
Excellent. That'll be all for now.
Enjoy your day.
Can you find some flights for me?
Where are you going and when?
I am going to New York on March 1st.
When will you be returning?
I will be returning this Sunday.
Where will you fly out of?
I would like to fly Delta Airlines out of Atlanta, GA.
I round a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 11:25 am and the cost is $137.
When does the return flight arrive and how many layovers are there?
The flight has 0 layovers and the return arrives at 6:02 pm.
That is great.
Do you want me to get you tickets?
No, not now. Can you find me any oneway flights in Economy?
I found a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 3:40 pm and the cost is $129.
That is great and all I need.
Have a great day.
I need a flight, expected return on the 13th
What is the departure date? What is the destination? What will be the city of the departure flight?
March 8th to CDMX, from Chicago
With American Airlines the outbound flight leaves at 1:20 pm, the return flight leaves at 8:05 am. The ticket costs $326
This is OK. I'd like a one-way flight, for three people
I found 1 flight with American Airlines: departure at 1:20 pm with 1 stops. Ticket costs $285
Ok, perfect!
Can I help you again?
No, thank you
Have a great day
Look up available flights.
Where is your starting location and destination? When do you want to return?
I would like to leave from Los Angeles and fly to London, UK. I want to return March 9th.
What day would you like to depart?
Set my departure date for the 7th. Please get me an Economy seat on American Airlines.
There is a flight on American Airlines leaving at 8:30 am. The returning flight would leave at 3:05 pm. This ticket would cost $353.
That is the flight I want.
Shall I purchase the ticket for you?
Not now. Could you find me a oneway flight for two people?
I found 1 flight in my search on American Airlines. The outbound flight would leave at 8:30 am with 1 stop. It would cost $380.
Which airport does the flight depart from?
It will depart from the LAX International Airport.
That sounds good. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
I need to book a flight for Economy and I need to return on the 10th.
Where are you leaving from, when would you like to leave and where would you like to go?
I need to leave New York on the 7th of March to make it to Vancouver.
For $297, Delta Airlines currently has an outbound flight that leaves at 6 am and returns at 2:50 am.
When will my flight return?
Your flight will arrive at 6:34 pm.
That sounds good enough.
Should I buy the tickets?
Can you find me any one way flights for my other trip coming up?
I found 1 flight through Delta Airlines for $284 that has 1 stop and leaves at 6 am.
That sounds good.
Need help with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you help me search for flights?
Where are you departing from?
I am departing from Los Angeles.
When do you want to return?
I am leaving on the 11th of March, and I'd like to return on the 14th of this month.
What is your destination?
I would like to go to Ciudad de Mexico in an Economy class seat.
There is an available American Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 10:30 am, and the return flight is at 8:05 am. The ticket costs $208.
Are there any other options? I plan to leave on Saturday this week.
I've found 2 flights that match your search. One is a Delta Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 9:15 am, and the return flight is at 1:45 pm. The ticket costs $243.
Yes, that flight sounds good.
Should I book the tickets?
No, thank you. I have an upcoming trip. Can you help me find some oneway flights?
I've found 1 such flight. It is a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 9:15 am. The flight has 1 stop, and the ticket costs $221.
That sounds good. Thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
I need to catch a plane.
To where? And where from? When do you want to leave?
From Chicago to NYC next Tuesday.
When are you returning?
I'd like to be back on March 9th.
I see a $126 American Airlines flight leaving at 12:30 pm and a return flight leaving at 5:25 am.
That works for me.
Should I book it?
No, not now.
Is there anything else you want?
Can you find some oneway flights?
I see one for $111. American Airlines, leaving at 12:30 pm with 0 stops.
I like the sound of that. That'll be it for now.
Great. Enjoy your day.
Can you find me a flight?
Sure thing. Please provide me your departure and return dates and final destination.
I'm departing to San Fran on the 5th of this month and returning on Thursday next week.
Where will you be flying out of?
I am flying out of Delhi.
I found a American Airlines departing at 9:20 am and the return flight departs at 1:15 pm for $354.
Good. Can you find me a oneway trip?
I found a American Airlines departing at 9:20 am for $411. This flight have 1 stop.
Where will I be arriving and when will I get there?
You will landing in SFO International Airport at 2:22 pm.
Great. Book it!
Ok. Would you like assistance with anything else?
Nah. I'm good. Thanks for the help!
Great. Have a good one.
I'm traveling to Los Angeles. Can you help me find flights?
What is your departure city and your dates of travel?
I'm leaving from Washington and plan to be gone from the 7th of this month to the 9th.
I found 3 flights that would work for your timeframe. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:50 pm and returning at 2:10 pm. The ticket price is $306.
What other flights are available?
There is another flight that leaves at 10 am and returns at 4 am. It costs $215 and is on Delta Airlines.
There are two of us traveling and we'd like an economy ticket. Are there any other flights?
Yes, I found 1 more flight that leaves at 3:55 pm and returns at 7:20 am. This is on Southwest Airlines and costs $259 per ticket.
I'd like the Southwest flight.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
No, not right now.
Do you need help with anything else?
Yes, I would like help finding a one way flight for another trip I have planned.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 3:55 pm. It costs $208 and has 0 stops.
If I change my mind, is the ticket refundable.
No, it cannot be refunded.
OK, that flight sounds good. That's all I need for now.
Have a good day.
Can you search flights for me? I'm leaving from NY.
When do you plan to leave?
The 5th of March.
When are you planning to visit?
I'm traveling to Chicago.
When are you coming back?
I want to get back on March 9th. I prefer American Airlines.
I found 1 convenient flight for your trip. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 am. The return flight is at 1:20 pm. The price of the ticket is $131 dollars.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should i buy the ticket?
No, I'm good. I have a trip coming up. Can you find me one way flights? Both business and economy are fine.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 am. It has 0 stops and the price of the ticket is $129 dollars.
That flight sounds good to me.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me search flights?
Sure, where would you like to visit?
I am going to Ciudad de Mexico. I would like to leave from LAX and economy or business class seats are fine.
Okay, I will just need your departure and arrival date.
I will be travelling on the 4th of March and returning home the 13th of this month.
I have locate 3 flights. There is one departing at 2:45 pm and arriving back at 8:05 am. This flight is through American Airlines and the price of the ticket is $156.
I would like to hear about the other flights, and I will be accompanied by 2 others.
I have a flight with Delta Airlines departing 9:15 am and returning 1:45 pm, for $260.
Okay and what airport will this flight be departing? What is the return time back?
This flight is leaving from the LAX International Airport and returning back at 5:15 pm.
Do you have any other flights available?
I have a flight with United Airlines that departs at 4:25 am, returns 8:45 pm for $171.
That sounds great, also I have another trip coming up, can you help me find a one way ticket?
I am showing a flight with United Airlines that departs at 4:25 am and has 0 stops. The ticket price is $160.
Can you tell me the arrival time of onward flight and what Airport will I be arriving in?
Sure, the flight will arrive at 9:45 am at the Benito Juarez International Airport.
Great, thank you. That is all I need.
You are welcome and enjoy your day.
Can you find me a flight?
Sure. Leaving from where?
Departing from Chicago.
To what city? Returning when?
I need to go to London. A ticket for 1 person, returning on the 10th of this month. Delta Airlines would be best.
What day do you want to leave.
March 5th.
I found a Delta Airlines flight. It leaves at 9:15 am and the return leaves at 8 am, costing $300.
That sounds good, but let's look for a one way flight.
How about a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 9:15 am, with 1 stop. It costs $344.
Are there any other flights?
Sorry, I couldn't find any other flights. Is there anything else I can help with?
No thanks.
Have a great day.
Could you look at flights for me? There's one person in my group.
What place will you be departing from? What day are you going to return? What place are you going to visit?
I will be departing from Atlanta, and will travel to Phoenix. I'd like to return on 9th of this month.
What time do you plan on departing?
I will depart on 3rd of MArch.
There's an outbound American Airlines flight that will leave at 11:40 am and return at 3:55 pm. The cost of the ticket is $249.
Do you have any other flight options? I'd prefer to travel in Economy.
There's an outbound Delta Airlines flight that will leave at 6:55 pm and return at 11:55 am. The cost of the ticket is $247.
That trip sounds perfect for me.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
Nah, I'm okay. I have a trip coming up. Could you find me oneway flights?
I discovered 1 suitable flight for you. There is an outbound Delta Airlines flight leaving at 6:55 pm with 0 stops. The cost of the ticket is $170.
That trip sounds perfect. That's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
can you find a flight for me
where would you like to leave from? when do you want to leave? When would you like to come back
i am leaving from toronto and im leaving one the 6th. i want to come back on the 13th
where would you like to visit
im am traveling to San Fran
i found 1 conventient flight for your trip. it is with united airlines. the flight will leave at 5:35 pm and will return on 5:35 am the price of the ticket is $286
How many stops does it have
it has 1 stop
that sounds fine. i have a trip that is coming ip can you find me a oneway flight? there is 1 person in the group
i found 1 flight with united airlines. the leaving flight os at 5:35 pm and it has 1 stop. The price is $269
what airport does the flight arrive at. When does the onward flight arrive
the destination is SFO international airport the onward flight arrives at 9:12 pm
the flight sounds good to me
would you like help with anyone else
no thanks for the help
have a great day
Hello. Can you please search for flights for me? I want to get back home on Monday next week and I am traveling to Atlanta.
Where will you be leaving from and when do you plan to leave?
I am leaving tomorrow out of Toronto, Canada, traveling in Economy.
I found 3 flights for you. One is on American Airlines that departs at 5:55 am and returns at 3:25 pm. The cost of the ticket is $227.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should I purchase the tickets for you?
No thank you. I have another trip upcoming where I need a one way flight. Can you find me one please?
I found 1 flight for you. There is an American Airlines flight that departs at 5:55 am and and has 1 stop. The price is $220.
Can you tell me if the ticket is refundable? When does that flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 11:31 am, and the ticket is non-refundable.
Ok, that works, thank you. That is all that I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I have to go visit my mom. Can you look up flight prices?
What is your destination? What dates are you flying?
I'm departing home on the 1st of this month and I need to return on the 13th of this month. I'm headed to Phoenix, AZ and I want to fly in Economy.
What is your departing city?
My departing city is Los Angeles.
Delta Airlines has a flight for $167 with a departure time of 3:05 pm and the return flight time is 12:15 pm.
What city will the plane leave from and when will I get back to my original airport?
You will leave from LAX International Airport and return to your starting airport at 3:45 pm.
I really would prefer to use United Airlines and I have four people flying with me. Can you find another flight for all of us?
I see 1 United Airlines flight that departs at 8:45 am and returns at 7:15 am for $110.
I like that flight.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
No thanks. Can you find one way flights for my upcoming trip?
United Airlines has a flight for $95 that stops 0 times. It departs at 8:45 am.
I like that flight.
Do you need anything else?
No, thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Will you help me find a flight. I prefer to travel in Economy.
Sure. When are you leaving?
Day after tomorrow.
Where are you flying out of? Where are you visiting? When do you plan on coming back?
I plan to travel to Paris. There are two people in my group. I want to leave from Los Angeles and get back on 12th of this month.
Okay. I found 2 flights priced with a ticket price of $319. American Airlines which leaves at 9:40 am with a return flight that leaves at 4:05 am.
Is the ticket refundable? What's the arrival time for the return flight?
Arrival time for the return flight is 10:40 am. The ticket is not refundable.
Sound good. Will you find me oneway flights?
I found an American Airlines flight that departs at 9:40 am with 0 stop. The price for one ticket is $263.
Which airport? What does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 7:58 am and departs from LAX International Airport.
Sounds great.
You need help with anything else?
No, that's it for now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you search for flights from Delta Airlines from me?
Where are you going?
I'm going to London, England next Monday.
When are you going to be back?
I want to be back on the 12th. Oh, and I'm leaving from Chicago.
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight that leaves Chicago at 9:15 am and departs from London at 8 am, and it costs $288.
What airport does the flight leave from, and is it a refundable ticket?
The flight leaves from O'Hare International Airport, but the ticket isn't refundable.
That flight sounds good. I have an upcoming trip, so can you find me one way flights? I have 1 person in my group.
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 9:15 am. It has 1 stop and costs $352.
When's the onward flight going to come?
It comes at 6:37 am.
Ok, that flight sounds good.
Do you need help with anything else?
Nope, thanks for the help.
Have a good day.
Please look for flights.
When would you like to return?
I am returning on the 14th of this month.
Where are you going, when are you leaving, and where are you leaving from?
I am going to ATL from NYC today.
I found 4 flights that match your requirements. American Airlines has a flight that leaves at 11:20 am and returns at 6:25 am. The price is $126.
What other flights are available.
Delta Airlines has a flight that leaves at 11:25 am and returns at 3:40 pm. The price is $140.
What airport does the flight arrive at and are there zero stops?
The flight arrives at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. There are 0 stops.
What other flights are available? There are two people leaving on the 6th.
There are 2 flights matching your requirements. One is Southwest Airlines that leaves at 9:50 pm and returns at 9:20 am for $171.
That one sounds great.
Would you like the purchase tickets?
No, I have another trip coming up. Are there any oneway flights?
Southwest Airlines has a flight that has 1 stop and leaves at 9:50 pm for $189.
That works for me.
Have a great day.
I'd like assistance in locating a flight.
Which location will you be departing from? What days are you planning to depart and return?
I'll be leaving March 2nd from Atlanta and plan on returning the 11th.
Where is your destination?
We are traveling to New York City. I prefer Delta Airlines, and there will be two people traveling.
I've located a flight with Delta Airlines. The departure time is 3:40 pm and the flight return will be at 11:25 am. One ticket costs $135.
Are these tickets refundable? What time will my return flight arrive?
The return flight will arrive at 1:47 pm. Sorry, but the tickets are not refundable.
Okay, please schedule that flight. I'll be taking a trip soon and need to find one way flights traveling economy.
I've found 1 flight on Delta Airlines at a cost of $130. The flight leaves at 3:40 pm and has 0 stops.
Where does this flight leave from?
The departure is from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
What time will the onward arrival be?
Expected time is 6:02 pm for the onward flight arrival.
Okay! Sounds great.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. I appreciate your assistance.
It was my pleasure to assist you. Have a great day.
Can you search flights for me? I'm coming from London, England with 3 people in my group.
When do you want to leave, come back, and where are you planning to visit?
I'm going to NYC on the 5th of March, and I want to get back on 10th of March.
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 3:35 pm with a return flight at 6:20 pm with a price of $264.
Sounds good to me. I have a trip coming up so can you find me a oneway flight? I like traveling Economy.
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 3:35 pm with 0 stops. The price is $240.
When does the onward flight arrive and which airport does it depart from?
It arrives at 7:57 pm and departs from Heathrow International Airport.
That sounds good to me. That's all I need.
Have a good day.
Can you find flights for me? I would like to travel in Premium Economy.
When would you be leaving and what dates would you be coming back?
I would like to leave on March 4th and return on March 6th. I have a preference for Delta Airlines.
What city will you be departing from and where are you planning to travel to?
I would be departing from Seattle, WA and I would like to travel to San Diego.
I've found 1 flight for your trip. It is a Delta Airlines flight, the outbound flight leaves at 8:45 am. The return flight leaves at 11:05 am. The cost of the ticket is $360.
That flight would work for me.
Do you want me to buy the tickets?
No thank you, I already have a trip coming up. Can you help me find a oneway flight?
I've found a Delta Airlines flight, outbound flight departs at 8:45 am. The flight has 1 stop and the cost of the ticket is $305.
That flight would work.
Can I help you with anything else?
That would be all for now, thank you for your help.
Have a great day.
I have upcoming . travel plans, can you help me find a flight?
Yes, where are you planning to visit?
I am traveling to Los Angeles.
Ok, and where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from Seattle.
When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving on the 11th of March.
When are you coming back?
I would like to return on the 14th of March. I also prefer to travel in Economy class.
I found 1 flight for you with Alaska Airlines for $157. The outbound flight leaves at 3:45 pm, and the return flight leaves at 7:10 pm.
That flight sounds good to me. I have an upcoming trip as well, so can you help me find oneway flights?
There is a flight with Alaska Airlines for $160. It leaves at 3:45 pm and has 0 stops.
Ok, in which airport does the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at LAX International Airport.
That flight sounds good to me. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a flight for the 2nd of March.
Where are you going and when are you returning?
I'm leaving on March 12th from San Fran to Los Angeles.
I found 4 great flights. Alaska Airlines leaves at 8:20 pm and the return leaves at 5:50 pm. Tickets are $105.
That is perfect!
Would you like tickets?
No, not now.
Is there something else that you need.
Can you find me a onewy flight for two?
I found 1 from Alaska Airlines that leaves at 8:20 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket is $100.
When does the onward flight get in and which airport?
The onward flight arrives at LAX International Airport at 9:45 pm.
Perfect, that's all!
Ok have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for flights for two people.
Where are you flying to and where will you be leaving from?
I will flying from Vegas to Los Angeles.
When do you want to leave and return?
I'm leaving this Saturday and coming back on the 13th of this month.
There are 4 possible flight options. The first option is an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:30 am. The return flight will leave at 8:25 pm and ticket prices will be $99.
That flight is perfect.
Would you like to purchase these tickets?
No thanks. I have a trip coming up, can you find me one-way flights instead?
I found 1 flight that will work. It is an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:30 am with 0 stops. The ticket price will be $93.
When does the onward flight land and can I refund the ticket?
The onward flight will land at 10:40 am. No, tickets are not refundable.
That flight sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thanks!
Have a great day.
Please search for Economy flights on the 10th of this month.
From where to where? When are you planning to return?
I want to fly from San Diego to Portland. I will return on the 12th of this month.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight to Portland at 3:20 pm. The return flights leaves at 5:40 pm. The ticket is $171.
What other flights are available? I want to travel to SF.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:20 pm. The return flight leaves at 12:15 pm. This flight is $133.
Anything else?
There is a Delta Airlines flight at 7:55 pm. The return flight leaves at 9:45 pm. The ticket is $110.
Which airport does it go to?
The flight is to SFO International Airport.
The last one sounds good. I have another trip coming up. Can you look for one way flights?
I found 1 suitable flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 7:55 pm with 0 stops. The ticket is $107.
Where is the flight to and from?
The flight is from SAN International Airport to SFO International Airport.
Okay, that works. That's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you search available fights for me?
What date are you looking to leave on? What date will you return?
I will be leaving on March 3rd and I wish to return on the 14th of March.
Where are you planning to travel to?
I am going to ATL for a few days.
Can I please get what area or city you are leaving from?
I will be leaving from Toronto, Canada.
I have found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:05 am and the return flight leaves at 3:25 pm. The price of the ticket will be $208.00
Are there any other flights available? I am the only one in my group and I like traveling in Premium Economy.
There is another choice with Delta Airlines. The outbound flight leaves at 7:15 am and the returning flight leaves at 3:40 pm. The cost for the tick is $356.
Which airport does that flight leave from and when would I arrive at my destination?
The flight leaves from Toronto Pearson International Airport and will arrive at 11:31 am.
That flight sounds good to me. I have a trip coming up, can you find me any oneway flights?
There is 1 suitable flight available for you with Delta Airlines. The outbound flight leaves at 7:15 am and has 1 stop. The price for the ticket is $351.
That flight sounds perfect for me and that is all I need. Thanks.
Perfect then. Have a wonderful day.
Search flight for four people to SF.
What is the departure city? when is the departure and the arrival back?
I would like economy tickets to Ciudad De mexico for 3rd of this month and back on March 12th
There is a American Airlines flight which leaves at 2:55 pm and the return flight is at 1:20 pm, costing $156
Is there any other option
There is an United Airlines flight which leaves at 8:45 pm and the return flight is at 9:15 am, costing $235
ok, thats good
should i buy the tickets?
No, please find me oneway tickets
There is an 1 stop United Airlines flight which leaves at 8:45 pm and, costing $215
What time is the outward flight and from which airport?
The onward flight arrives at 11:45 pm and departs from Benito Juarez International airport
Thats good for me
Have a good day
Can you look up departure times from the San Diego airport?
What city do you want to fly to?
I'm going to SFO.
What day do you want to leave?
I want to leave on the 1st of March.
What day would you like to return?
There are two of us and we want to return on the 8th of this month. I would prefer Premium Economy class tickets.
There are 2 possible flights. The first one is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 11:10 am. The return trip leaves at 6:10 am. The ticket costs $175.
Are there any other choices? I want to return on March 13th.
Another possible flight would be on Delta Airlines. The flight leaves at 7:55 pm. The return flight leaves at 9:45 pm. This round trip ticket costs $181.
I think that flight will work for me. I have a one way trip that I need flight information for. Can you help me?
There is 1 flight on Delta Airlines that might work for you. The flight leaves at 7:55 pm and it has 0 layovers. The ticket costs $175.
I think I would like that flight.
Is there anything else that you need help with?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
Can you find me some flights? I'm going to Delhi, hopefully on American Airlines.
Sure thing. When are you returning? Where are you departing from? And when will you depart?
I'm leaving from LA on the 8th of March. I'd like to return on March 12th. I'm in a group of 3 people.
Okay, I found 1 good flight for you. There's an American Airlines flight leaving LA at 6:30 am. The return flight leaves Delhi at 7 pm. The cost is $345 per person.
Which airport is the flight leaving from?
It leaves from LAX International Airport.
When do the flights arrive at each destination?
The initial flight arrives in Delhi at 4:07 pm and the return flight arrives in LA at 8:04 pm.
That sounds great, thanks.
Should I buy your tickets?
No thanks. I have another trip coming up, can you get me a one-way ticket?
Sure. There's an American Airlines flight leaving 6:30 am with 1 stop. It costs $365.
That sounds great. Thanks, that's all.
No worries, see you.
Can you please search some flights available? I will be leaving from Portland, OR and would prefer Economy class.
Where are you going to visit and when do you plan to leave?
I will leave on March 4th, traveling to SD.
When will you want to return?
I want to return on the 11th of this month
There are 3 flights that are available. There is an Alaska Airlines flight with an outbound leaving at 5:40 pm and a return flight leaving at 1:20 pm. This flight ticket costs $156
When will the return flight arrive? And to what airport?
The return flight will arrive at 4:04 pm at SAN International Airport
This flight seems perfect to me
Should I buy tickets to this flight?
No thanks. I have a trip coming up and was wondering if you could find me any oneway flights?
An Alaska Airlines flight is available, with an outbound flight leaving at 5:40 pm. It has 0 stops and cost is $144
That seems pretty good to me
Can I help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a great day!
I need some help searching flights. 2 of us are leaving later today.
Where are you headed?
I'm going to SD.
When will you be returning? Where do you need to leave from?
San Fran is where I'll be leaving from, and I need to get back on the 10th of March.
There's 5 different flights that would work for that trip. Here's one, an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 6:10 am. The flight back leaves at 11:10 am, and the price is $103.
Which airport would I be arriving at?
The flight's destination is SAN International Airport.
I'd actually prefer an Economy ticket. Is there another flight in that class?
Yes, there's an American Airlines flight which would be leaving at 12:15 pm and returning at 9:20 pm, for $130.
That flight sounds like it would work well.
Is there anything else you need help with?
Can you tell me about some oneway flights for a trip I've got soon?
Let's see, here's an American Airlines flight, flying outbound at 12:15 pm with 1 stop. That ticket would be $140.
Is that a refundable ticket?
No, that ticket isn't refundable, unfortunately.
Okay, that fight sounds good. I don't need anything else.
I hope you have a wonderful day!
Can you search flights leaving from Chicago?
What are your departure and return dates? Where are you going?
I would like to leave on the 9th of this month and get back on March 14th. I am traveling with 4 people to Delhi, India.
I found 1 United Airlines flight that meets your criteria. The departure flight leaves at 12:45 pm and the return flight leaves at 1:10 am. The ticket costs $433.
What time does my return flight come in?
It arrives at 1:52 pm.
That sounds like a good option. Can you find me oneway flights for a trip I have coming up?
I found 1 flight with United Airlines. The flight has 1 stop and leaves at 12:45 pm. The ticket costs $409.
Where does the flight leave from?
The flight leaves from O'Hare International Airport.
That sounds good?
Can I help you with anything else?
No, Thank you.
You're welcome, Have a great day.
I'm going on a trip and will be flying. I need flight information please.
What are the details of the trip, for example where are you visiting, when will you come back, and where do you leave from?
I will depart from Washington and return on the 13th. I'm flying to New York.
What is the date you want to leave?
I need to leave on March 10th.
American Airlines has an outbound flight leaving at 6:05 am. Their return flight departs at 10:55 am. The ticket cost is $87.
What about other flights? I plan to leave on the 11th.
I found 1 suitable flight. Its a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 4:50 pm. The return flight comes back at 5:15 pm. The ticket cost is $81.
Can I get my money back on the ticket?
No the ticket unfortunately is not refundable.
Does the flight have stops? What time does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight's arrival time is 6 pm. There are 0 stops.
That flight should be good. There's a trip coming up. I will need a oneway flight please.
Here is 1 suitable flight. Its a Southwest Airlines flight leaving 1t 4:50 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket cost is $78.
That flight should be good.
Can I help you with something else today?
I don't think so thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you please search for a flight to Las Vegas for me?
What is the departure city and dates you are interested in ?
I will be travelling from Mexico City and the dates I would like are from 7th of March to March 11th.
1 flight has been found on American Airlines, departing at 8:05 am and the returning flight is at 6:40 am. The cost will be $247.
The flight is good for me
Can I assist you with anything else?
Yes I need a oneway flight in Economy class.
There is 1 flight on American Airlines at 8:05 am with 1 stop and the price is $226.
The flight time and price are good.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No thanks.
Bye and have a nice day.
Hello, can you help me find a flight for one?
When would you like to leave and return?
I'd like to leave March 3rd and return the 13th of this month.
Where will you be leaving from and where would you like to go?
I'll be going from Atlanta, GA to NY. I prefer to travel economy.
American Airlines has a flight that leaves at 3:25 pm and returns at 11:45 am for $135.
Are there any other options?
Delta Airlines has one that leaves at 3:40 pm and returns 11:25 am for $133.
When and where does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 1:47 pm at JFK International Airport.
Does United Airlines have anything available?
There is a United Airlines flight at 12:50 pm that returns 7:05 pm for $145.
That sounds good to me. Could you find me a one way flight?
There is 1 flight from United Airlines that leaves at 12:50 pm with 0 stops for $129.
Sounds good to me.
Anything else I can do?
Nope, thanks for all your help!
Have a wonderful day!
Can you look up a flight for me?
Where are you flying from? When would you like to return?
It will be 1 Economy flight from Seattle, returning on the 11th of March.
Where are you heading to?
I'll be heading out to Atlanta, GA on the 12th of this month.
When are you planning to leave?
Today.
I found 3 convenient flights on this date. There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 11:50 pm for $189. The return flight leaves at 4:20 pm.
Are there any other options?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 5:40 am for $201. The return flight leaves at 7:20 pm.
That one works for me.
Shall I go ahead and purchase the flight?
No, that's okay. Can you find me a one way flight?
There's 1 Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 5:40 am with 0 stops. It costs $191.
That sounds good to me. That's all I need.
Have a good day.
I am looking for a flight from Phoenix.
When and where do you want to go?
I am going to CDMX the day after tomorrow.
When will you be back?
I prefer to be back on the 11th of this month.
I found 2 flights that you might like. There is a flight that leaves at 7:35 am with the returning flight leaving at 8:05 am. You will be flying with American Airlines with a total cost of $251.
Sounds good.
Should I purchase the ticket now?
That's ok. I have an upcoming trip. Can you find me a flight?
There is 1 American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:35 am and has 1 stop. Ther price is $230.
When will it arrive?
The flight arrives at 8:05 pm.
That's great! Thank you.
Take care, now.
I need to find flights.
When do you plan to fly out, when are your returning and where do you plan to go to?
I plan to fly out to Las Vegas on March 7th and return on 12th of March.
Where will you be departing from?
I'll be flying out of SFO.
Of the 3 convenient flights, American Airlines flight that departs at 5:30 pm, with return flight leaving at 5:30 am for $109 per ticket is a good option.
That sounds like a good option. Please find me one way Economy class tickets for my upcoming trip.
There is 1 suitable option on American Airlines, with departure at 5:30 pm. It has 0 stops and the ticket is priced at $112.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like help with anything else?
No. Thank you.
Have a great day!
Can you search for some flights for me?
When do you plan on leaving?
I'll be leaving next Wednesday.
Where do you plan on visiting? When will you be coming back?
I'll be flying economy to LAX the 8th of this month.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from ATL with one person in my group.
We'll be flying American Airlines and leaving at 9:15 pm and returning at 5:25 pm with the cost of $239.
That flight sounds good. Are there any one way flights for my upcoming trip?
There's 1 flight with American Airlines that leaves at 9:15 pm and the price is $269.
That's all I need and sounds good.
Have a wonderful day.
I need some help searching for flights, it should be round trip.
Where will you be going and on what date?
I'll be going to Los Angeles next Tuesday.
And when will you be returning?
I'll be returning on the 12th of March.
And what city will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Atlanta, GA.
I found a flight from American Airlines. It leaves at 11:40 am with the returning flight taking off at 9:05 am. It costs $226.
What time will it arrive at the destination? Also, is the for two passengers?
It will arrive at 5:15 pm at the destination. And it's just for 1 passenger.
Do you have anything else? I'm also flying to Chicago.
There are 2 flights. There's a flight that leaves at 7:50 am with the return leaving at 8:30 am. It's with Delta Airlines and costs $125.
Do you have anything else. I want to return on the 14th of this month and I need 3 tickets.
There's a flight that leaves at 6:50 am and the return leaves at 9:50 pm. It's with United Airlines and it costs $119.
Alright, can you look for some one way flights.
There's a flight that leaves at 6:50 am and has 0 stops. It's with United Airlines and costs $105.
Where will it be landing? And is it a redeye flight?
It will land at O'Hare International Airport. And it is not a redeye flight.
Alright.
Do you need any more help?
No, thanks for helping me.
Okay, take care.
I am planning for a trip. I need your help to search for a round trip flight, can you find me something?
Yes, I can find you a best and let me know When and Where are you leave from and on which date you need to book the return flight?
I need to book a flight on the 6th from Paris, France and will be return on 13th of March.
Let me know the destination place.
Ya, I am travelling to LAX.
Found 2 results: An American Airlines flight which takes off at 4:05 am and return flight at 9:40 am for which the ticket cost is $388.
Is there any other flight from Portland, OR to SD?
Yes, found 2, A flight from Alaska Airlines takes off at 5:40 pm and return flight at 1:20 pm with ticket cost $153. Is that okay for you?
from which Airport does the flight leave from? and please confirm that you have checked for First Class ticket?
No, it is a Economy class ticket and the flight leaves from PDX International Airport.
Okay, please find for one way flight.
Again I found Alaska Airlines flight takes off at 5:40 pm with 0 stops and ticket cost will be $144. Please confirm.
Yes, that is okay for me, thanks.
Have a great day.
I'm going on a short business trip. Please help me find a round trip ticket with a return date of the 13th.
Please let me know your destination, travel date and the departure city.
I'd like to travel from Paris to Chicago on the 3rd of this month.
I've found an American Airlines flight that you may like. The departure flight takes off at 4:05 am, and the returning flight at 5:10 am. The ticket price is $368.
All right. There's been a change of plans, sorry. Please find me 2 one-way Economy class tickets.
I've found an American Airlines flight that you may like. The departure flight takes off at 4:05 am, and has 1 stop. The ticket price is $450.
Sure.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks. You've been very helpful.
Have a great day.
I need help finding a round trip flight.
Sure. When are you returning?
I'll be coming back the 13th of this month.
When would you like to leave?
I want to head out on the 10th of this month.
Okay. Where are you going and what city are you leaving from?
I'm looking for a flight to Seattle, WA from Portland.
Do you mind American Airlines? There's a flight that leaves at 6 am and returns on the 13th at 8:35 am. It only costs $72.
Where does it land? Does it have 0 layovers?
Yes, it has 0 stops and lands in Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Are there any other flights?
How about Delta Airlines? Their flight takes off at 9:35 am and returns on the 13th at 7:55 am. It costs $73.
What about another flight?
There's a flight with United Airlines. It leaves at 10:45 pm and returns on the 13th at 4:15 am. That one costs $76.
Alright. Instead, I'd like to find a one way flight.
There's 1 flight that I've found. It's with United Airlines and takes off at 10:45 pm. It has 0 stops and costs $69.
Cool. That's all I need. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day!
I am looking to book a flight any class will do.
what date would you like to travel? whitch day do you want to return ?
im traveling from Tuesday next week and will be returning on the 14th.
from what city you want to depart from? where are you planning to go?
look for flights from Seattle, WA and I am flying to phoenix
would you like to fly with American Airlines? The ticket costs $231.The flight takes off at 8:15 am and the returning flight takes off at 8:40 am
where does the flight land? and is this a redeye flight ?
the flight is for Sky Harbor International Airport and it is not an overnight flight.
Ok. I would like to find a one way flight.
would you like to fly with American Airlines? the ticket costs $222 I found 1 flight for you . The flight takes off at 8:15 am.
is the flight redeye?
the flight is not overnight.
ok.
would you like help with something else?
No. Thankyou for your help.
yourwelcome Have a good day.
Hey, I am looking for a flight. Can you help me find any?
When would you like to return? And do you have the place in mind?
I want to return on the 13th of March. I am flying to Atlanta, GA, to meet some friends.
Where will you be departing from?
From Toronto, Ontario. Please find me some Economy class tickets.
For what day would you like that?
March 5th would be great.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight will take off at 10:05 am, and is set to return from your destination on 3:25 pm. The ticket will cost you $238 dollars.
When does the onward flight arrives? Are there any stops on the way there?
The flight will arrive at 2:56 pm. It has 1 stop.
Okay, I will want just the one way flight.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight will leave at 10:05 am. It has only 1 stop, and the ticket will cost you $223.
Okay. That's all I need, thank you for the help.
Have a great day.
Hey, I am looking for 2 tickets for a flight.
Where will you be departing from? And what is the destination? Do you have a return date in mind?
I want to return on the 10th of this month. I will departure from ATL to SFO. Can you find me some Economy class tickets?
What is the departure date?
On Saturday this week. And I want to travel with United Airlines.
I found 1 flight for you with United Airlines. The ticket will cost you $191 and you will be leaving at 9:40 am. The return flight takes off at 10:15 am.
Does the flight has many stops? Is this a redeye flight?
It is not an overnight flight, no worries. It has 0 stops.
Okay. I want to find a one way flight.
I found 1 flight for you. It's from United Airlines and it will take off at 9:40 am. It has 0 stops and will cost you $186.
Okay, good to know.
Can I assist you in anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a flight.
What day would you like to return and where are you going?
Atlanta, GA returning on the 13th.
What day do you want to leave?
Departing Monday next week.
Where are you departing from?
Leaving from Phoenix. I would like one ticket departing Thursday next week.
How does American Airlines sound? The flight leaves at 11:25 pm and the return flight leaves at 11:40 am. The ticket is $231.
I would rather fly United Airlines.
United Airlines has a flight that departs at 8:40 pm and the return flight departs at 3 pm. It costs $262.
Is this a redeye flight?
It is an overnight flight.
I would like a one way flight in Economy class.
I found 1 flight. United Airlines has a flight that takes off at 8:40 pm. The flight has 0 stops. It costs $180.
OK.
Is there anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I would like a flight with United Airlines.
Where do you want to go and what city are you leaving from?
I will be returning on the 12th of March and am flying to San Fran. Find flights from Chicago. I would like to start traveling on 4th of March.
I found 1 flight for you. Do you want to fly with United Airlines? The flight leaves at 4 am and returns at 5:35 am. It costs $188.
I'd like a one way flight and need 4 tickets.
I have 1 flight for you. Would you like to fly with United Airlines? The flight leaves at 4 am and has 0 stops. It costs $176.
That's fine.
Would I be able to help you with anything else?
No, that is all.
Enjoy your day!
I'm looking for a flight to Atlanta, GA.
On which date?
I want to leave Saturday this week.
Which day would you like to return?
Return Tuesday next week on American Airlines.
Departing from which city?
From New York City.
I found 1 flight with American Airlines departing at 11:20 am and returning at 6:25 am for $140.
Is that in Economy?
It is in Economy.
When do I arrive at my destination?
You arrive in Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport at 1:42 pm.
Ok I want two tickets for a one way flight.
I found 1 flight with American Airlines with 0 stops leaving at 11:20 am for $128.
Ok.
Anything else I can help with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
Please find me a flight on Delta Airlines.
What date are you planning to travel?
I would like to begin travelling on March 9th
What date are you planning to return? What's your destination? What's your departure city?
I would like to return from Chi-town to NYC on the 13th of this month.
I found you 1 flight, costing $130, on Delta Airlines. Is that okay? The flight will depart at 11:05 am. The return flight will be at 6 am.
All right. Please find me two Economy class tickets on a one-way flight.
I found you 1 flight, with 0 stops, on Delta Airlines. Is that okay? The departure time is 11:05 am. The ticket will cost $104.
All right.
Will there be anything else?
No, thanks. You've been very helpful.
Have a nice day.
I would like to purchase 1 flight ticket.
What date would you like to leave and when do you plan to return. Where will you be departing from?
I'm looking for flights from SFO. I want to leave on the 1st, and returning March 11th.
Where will you be traveling to?
I am flying to SD and would like to fly Economy with Alaska Airlines.
I found 1 flight with Alaska Airlines leaving at 6:10 am and return flight leaves at 11:10 am. It will cost you $111.
Okay, I would like to find a one way flight.
I found 1 flight with 0 stops with Alaska Airlines taking off at 6:10 am and the ticket will cost you $91.
Where does the flight land?
The flight will land at SAN International Airport.
What airport will the flight leave form?
It will depart from SFO International Airport.
ok.
Anything else?
Nope, thanks!
HAve a good day!
I would like to find a flight.
When would you like to depart, and when would you like to return?
I'd like to depart on the 10th and return on the 12th.
Where are you departing from, and what is your destination?
I am traveling from New Delhi to Chicago. I would like 1 ticket.
I've found 1 flight for you. It is a United Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 1:10 am, and the return flight is at 12:45 pm. The price of the ticket is $433.
Alright. I want a one way flight.
I've found 1 flight for you. It is a United Airlines flight which departs at 1:10 am. The price of the ticket is $406.
Which airport does the flight leave from, and which airport does it land at?
The flight takes off from Indira Gandhi International Airport and will arrive at O'Hare International Airport.
Okay, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I need a flight to London.
When do you want to return, and from which city?
I want to return on the 13th of this month. Flying out of ATL.
What date do you want to depart?
Departing on the 9th.
There's an American Airlines flight departing 8:40 pm. Returning at 2:05 pm. Total cost is $324.
That sounds good.
Do you need anything else?
Yes, I need a one way flight, any class.
Okay I have 1 flight, American Airlines departing 8:40 pm, with 0 stops. Total cost is $270.
When does it arrive?
The flight gets in at 10:44 am.
Is this a redeye?
It's an overnight flight.
That's fine thanks.
Do you need help with anything else?
No that's all.
Happy to help.
I am traveling to visit my mother soon. Can you find me a flight?
What is your expecting departure date?
I want to fly out on the 2nd of March.
What city are you planning on landing in? And where and when would you like your return flight to be?
I am flying into Philly and then returning from New York City on March 9th.
Ok, I found 4 possible flights for you. Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The departing flight takes off at 7:55 am and the return flight takes off at 5:35 pm. The ticket costs $64.
Is this ticket only for one passenger? Also, is it economy or business class?
It is an economy ticket for 1 passenger.
Ok, thank you. I actually want to find 3 tickets for a one way flight.
I found 1 possible flight for you. Would you like to fly with American Airlines? It is a nonstop flight with 0 stops that takes off at 7:55 am. It costs $58.
Ok. Thanks, that is all I need.
Of course, have a good day.
I need to book an airline reservation.
Where will yoube traveling from, and where are you going? When do you need to return?
I will be flying from Chi-town to Los Angeles. I'll need to come back on the 9th.
And when do you wish to fly?
This Saturday. Any airline is fine.
The are 3 flights available. American Airlines has a flight at 8:30 AM and the return flight leaves at 4:30 AM. The round-trip fair is $164.
What are the other options. Is there an economy class fare?
There are 2 flights available. Delta Airlines has a flight that leaves at 7:15 pm, with a return flight at 5:25 pm for $167.
Let's change it to Portland, OR. I just need 1 ticket.
There are 3 flights available. Alaska Airlines has a flight that leaves at 7:25 am, with a return flight at 1:55 pm for $178.
That sounds like a redeye. When does the reutrn flight arrive.
There is no overnight flight. The return flight arrives at 5:54 pm.
Ok. How about just 1 way.
There is 1 flights available. Alaska Airlines has a flight that leaves at 7:25 am, with 0 stops for $133.
I'll think about that.
Will you need anything further?
Not just now.
Let me know when I can be of assistance.
I am looking for a flight. Look for flights from Delhi.
Where are you headed? What day do you want to come back?
I am returning on 11th of March. I am flying to LAX and want to start my travel on the 8th.
I found 1 flight for you. Would you like to fly with American Airlines on a flight that takes off at 7 pm, costs $368 and with a return flight that takes off at 6:30 am?
How many stops are on that flight?
The flight only has 1.
Okay. I want to find a one way flight instead. Any ticket class is fine.
I found 1 flight for you. Would you like to fly with American Airlines on a flight that leaves at 7 pm with 0 stops and a price of $297?
Okay.
Can I help you with something else?
No, that is all. Thank you.
Have a good day!
I'm looking for a flight to Atlanta, GA on the 3rd of March.
What day do you want to take the return flight?
I want to return on March 5th. Find me Economy tickets from any airline.
What city are you departing from?
I'm departing from New York and want to return on the 6th of this month.
I found 4 flights. Would you like to fly with American Airlines. The flight takes off at 11:20 am and the return flight takes off at 6:25 am. The ticket costs $129.
Ok. I want to find a one way flight and 2 tickets.
I found 1 flight. Would you like to fly with American Airlines. The flight takes off at 11:20 am and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $130.
Ok.
Anything else you need?
No, that's all.
Have a good day.
hello I am looking to book a flight.
Great I can help you where is the destination going to be?
I would like three Economy tickets to New York.
What day and where will you be departing from? what day would you like to return?
I am wanting to leave next Tuesday returning the 7th of this month from San Fran
I found 3 flights the first is with American Airlines that departs at 8:30 pm with the return flight departing at 4:45 pm for $213 dollar
Is there anything else to Seattle, WA With Southwest Airlines?
I found 1 flight with Southwest Airlines that departs at 8:45 pm and the return flight departs at 9:50 pm for $125 is that OK
I would like to find a one way flight
I found a Southwest Airlines flight departing 8:45 pm that has 0 stops and the price is $111
This flight looks to be a redeye is it?
no it is not a redeye?
when does the flight arrive where I am going.
10:56 pm is when the flight arrives
OK great.
is there anything else I can help you with?
that that is everything thank you for your help
your welcome have a great day.
I'm looking for a certain flight.
What city are you departing from and where are you planning to go?
I wish to flay with United Airlines and I need a flight from Phoenix, AZ. I would like 4 tickets to seattle.
What day are you returning and what is the date of travel?
I am returning on the 13th of this month and I would like to start my travel on the 7th of March.
I found 1 flight for you with United Airlines. It takes off at 6:10 pm and the returning flight takes off at 5:30 am and costs $193.
Ok, I would like to find a one way flight.
Would you like a United Airlines flight that takes off at 6:10 pm and has 1 stop? The cost of the ticket is $158.
Sure!
Anything else I can help you with?
No thank you! Thanks for all your help!
Have a great day!
I would like to find a flight that returns on the 10th of March.
Where would you like to leave from?
I want to leave from New York.
Where would you like to go?
I want 4 tickets going to Philadelphia, and I would like to fly with United Airlines.
Okay, what date would you like to leave?
I want to leave on the 8th of March and fly in Economy class.
Okay, so I've found a flight with United Airlines that leaves at 10:05 am and costs $68. The return flight would leave at 4:45 am.
Okay, I would like to find a one way flight.
Would you like to fly with United Airlines on a 0 stop flight that leave at 10:05 am and costs $71?
Okay, that's everything I needed.
Okay, have a nice day.
Can you find me an Economy class ticket for a flight?
Sure. What date would you like to leave and come back and from which city would you like to depart.
I want to travel from Los Angeles tomorrow on Alaska Airlines. I will be returning on the 11th of this month.
Where would you like to go?
I would like to fly to Seattle.
I found 1 flight for you on Alaska Airlines. The flight leaves at 7:10 pm and the return flight leaves at 3:45 pm. The ticket costs $168.
Please find me a one way flight and I will need 3 tickets total.
There is 1 flight for you on Alaska Airlines. This flight has 0 stops and leaves at 7:10 pm. The cost will be $155.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
That is all. Thank you so much.
You are welcome. Have a great day.
I'm looking for a round trip flight for visiting family. I want to leave on March 6th and come back on the 10th of March.
Where would you like to go? What city do you want to fly out of?
I'd like to fly out of Seattle to NY on United Airlines.
I found 1 flight with United Airlines for $308. Take off is at 10:10 am and return flight leaves at 5:10 am.
Which airport will I land in and at what time?
You will arrive at 11:20 pm at JFK International Airport.
Ok, I'd like a one way flight.
I found 1 flight for you with United Airlines for $326. Take off is at 10:10 am with 1 stop.
Ok.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
Hey there, I'm looking to book a flight.
What date would you like?
I will be returning on 11th of this month. I am flying to New York. I want to leave on Sunday this week.
Which city are you departing from?
We are looking for flights from Seattle, WA.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines. The flight will depart at 4 pm. The return flight is at 3:40 pm. The ticket will cost $304.
Is that an Economy ticket? When does the return flight arrive?
It is economy. It will arrive at 8:45 pm.
Can I have something else? I want to fly with Delta Airlines. Look for flights from Paris.
I have 1 for you. Would you like to fly with Delta Airlines? The flight takes off at 10 am. The returning flight takes off at 10:50 pm. The ticket costs $242.
Okay. I want to find a one way flight, actually. I want three economy class tickets.
What about; Delta Airlines. The flight leaves at 10 am, it has 0 stops and it costs $224.
Okay. that sounds like the best one.
Have a nice day.
I am looking for a flight to San Francisco returning on 14th of March.
What city would you like to depart from?
I would like to depart from Chicago on United Airlines. Can you find me an Economy ticket?
What date are you traveling?
I'd like to travel on the 6th of March.
I found 1 flight on United Airlines that takes off at 6:25 pm and returns at 10:10 pm. That ticket will cost $181.
What time does the return flight arrive at my destination?
The flight will arrive at 9:12 pm and return at 4:57 am.
Sounds good!
Will there be anything else?
I want three tickets for a oneway flight.
I found 1 flight with United Airlines that departs at 6:25 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $177.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a wonderful day!
I am planning for a trip. I want to return on March 14th.
Sounds good. When do you want to go ? and from which city do you want to travel?
I want to from LA. I am planning to travel on 7th of March. I don't care about the airline.
What is your travel destination ?
I want to return in March 12th and I want to go to Seattle, WA.
I found a flight by Alaska Airlines on 7:10 pm, and returning flight will be on 3:45 pm. The ticket prices are $153.
Is it economy class ticket ? And is there any stops during the flight ?
It is Economy class ticket with 0 stops.
Nice, I am looking for a one way flight.
Ok, Here is 1 flight by Alaska Airlines on 7:10 pm with 0 stop and the price is $164 .
Can you tell me origin airport ?
The flight leaves from LAX International Airport.
Is it economy or business seat ? and what is the arrival time in destination ?
The flight will arrive on 9:57 pm. And it is Economy seat.
Sound's great. That's what I need.
Do you need something else ?
No, Thank you.
Have a nice trip.
I am looking for American Airlines Flight for Atlanta.
Which are the dates of onward and return travel?
I wnat to travel on 12th of March and return on 14th of this month.
From which city you want to depart?
I need 4 tickets of United Airlines Flight from Philly.
Would you like travel by United Airlines Flight which takes off at 4:45 am? The return Flight takes off at 7:10 am and the cost is $185.
Can I look for a one way Flight?
There is 1 flight of United Airlines which takes of at 4:45 am with 1 stop. The cost of the ticket is $171.
Thats all I need. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Could you find me a flight?
Where do you want to go and which day will you return?
I will fly to Phoenix and want to return this Sunday.
What city do you want to leave from?
I'd like to use Delta Airlines from Chicago. Find me Premium Economy class tickets.
On what date do you want to travel?
I'd like to start my travel later today.
I found 1 flights with Delta Airlines. The flight leaves at 8:30 am. The returning flight leaves at 11:55 am. The ticket costs $470.
When does the flight arrive at my destination? Which airport does the flight leave from?
The flight leaves from O'Hare International Airport at 1:17 pm.
Okay find me three one way tickets.
I found 1 flight for you. Do you want to fly with Delta Airlines? The flight leaves at 8:30 am and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $434.
Okay.
Could I help you with something else?
No, that's it. I appreciate the help.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a flight to Atlanta, GA.
When are you planning on returning
March 11th.
Which city will you be departing and on what date?
Find me a flight from Washington on Thursday next week.
I found 3 flights. American Airlines takes of a 4:10 pm and the return flights takes off at 11:40 am, would you like American Airlines? the ticket cost $115
Look for flights from Phoenix any ticket class will be fine
I found 2 flights out of Phoenix. Southwest Airlines takes off at 10:55 pm and returns at 12:05 pm, ticket cost is $181
Where does it land?
It lands st Hartsfield-Jackson international Airport
Is this a redeye flight for three passengers
No, it's an overnight flight for 1 traveler
I want to find a one way flight
I found 1 flight with Southwest Airlines for $177, it takes of at 10:55 pm 0 stops
OK
Is there anything I can help you with
No thanks
Have a good day
I need a flight for the 11th of march for 3 people.
Where would you like to go? What day would you like to return? What city would you like to depart from?
I want to fly on American Airlines From Mexico City to SFO. Returning on the 13th
I have 1 flight for youon American Airlines departing at 2:55 PM and the returning flight departs at 1:20 pm. The total tick cost is $171.
What airport does it leave from?
It departs from Benito Juarez International Airport.
Ok I need a one way flight.
I have 1 direct flight on American Airlines taking off at 2:55 pm with 0 Stops. The total cost is $143.
What airport does it depart from?
It departs from Benito Juarez International Airport.
ok that sounds good.
IS there anything else I can help you with?
No that will be all.
Have a great day!
I'm planning a trip, please help me find a flight.
Where are you going, and when will you return?
I'll fly out to San Fran, returning on the 12th of this month.
When and where will you travel from?
I'll fly from Washington, on the 10th of this month.
How about flying with United Airlines, taking off at 8 am and returning at 5:50 am, at a cost of $292?
That sounds good.
Anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I want to find a one way flight, for three people, in Economy class.
Okay, I found 1 suitable flight with United Airlines, taking off at 8 am, at a cost of $274. The flight has 1 scheduled stop.
That sounds good.
Anything else you want help with?
No, that's all for now, thanks.
Have a good day!
I'd like to find a flight.
What dates did you want to find and where were you planning to go?
I'd like to fly to ATL starting on March 2nd.
On what day did you want to take the return flight?
I'd like to return on Wednesday next week.
Which city did you want to leave from?
I'd like to leave from Seattle, WA. Any ticket class is fine with me.
I found 4 flights. One of them is an American Airlines flight for $203 taking off at 9:45 pm, with a return flight at 9:35 pm.
Are there any flights for United Airlines? I want one ticket.
I found 1 flight for you. There is a United Airlines flight for $191 taking off at 4:55 pm and with the return flight taking off at 10:55 am.
Which airport does this flight depart from and would this be a redeye flight?
It takes off from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and it is an overnight flight.
I'd like to find a one way flight.
Did you want to fly with United Airlines? There is a flight taking off at 4:55 pm with 0 stops for $177.
Can you find me something else?
Sorry, I couldn't find a flight. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
I am looking for a flight with American Airlines.
When do you plan to depart and when will you be back?
I'll be flying out to NYC on next Wednesday and want to be back by March 11th.
Where will you be flying out of?
I'll be departing from Los Angeles and I need only 1 ticket.
The American Airlines flight to NYC departs at 6:20 pm and returns at 7:45 pm. The ticket costs $293. Would you prefer this flight?
Ok. I want to find one way flights please.
There is 1 American Airlines flight that departs at 6:20 pm, has 0 stops and costs $246. Is that okay?
Which airport does this flight leave from? Is this the rate for a Business class ticket?
Flight is from LAX International Airport and the ticket rate is for an Economy class seat.
Ok, thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Will you help me find a flight?
Where are you going?
Portland, OR.
When are you traveling there? When will you return?
I want to travel on 1st of this month and return on March 12th. Any ticket class is fine.
Which city are you traveling from?
Do you have anything from San Francisco to Seattle.
I found a ticket for $132 on Alaska Airlines that departs at 6:20 am. The return flight departs at 12 pm.
Which airport does the flight take off from?
SFO International Airport.
Where does the flight land? Are there any stops?
Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. It has 0 stops.
Fine. I want to search for a one way flight.
I found a flight on Alaska Airlines that takes off at 2:55 pm with 0 stops. Ticket costs $173.
That's fine.
Anything else?
No, that's all for now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a round trip flight to Ciudad de Mexico returning on the 7th.
From which city would you like to depart?
I would like 4 tickets departing from Chi-town.
What day would you like to leave?
I would like to leave this Sunday.
For $312 you can fly with American Airlines departing at 12:30 pm with the return flight departing at 8:05 am.
What else do you need to know? I would like to fly with United Airlines.
I found 1 United Airlines flight for you. It departs at 12:45 pm and the return flight is at 8:25 am. The total cost is $308.
Is this classified as an economy or business class ticket? Would it be a redeye flight?
It's an overnight flight in an Economy seat.
Ok, I'd like a one way flight.
I found 1 flight for you with United Airlines that departs at 12:45 pm. It has 1 layover stop and costs $287.
Is this a redeye flight? When does it arrive?
It's an overnight flights arriving at 2:05 am.
Alright.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I would like to find a flight that returns on March 11th.
Where are you leaving from, and where would you like to go?
I would like to fly from Chi-town to SF.
When would you like to travel?
I would like to depart on the 7th.
I've found 4 such flights. There is a flight with American Airlines. The departing flight is at 7:05 am, and the returning flight is at 3:20 pm. The price of the ticket is $166.
Okay. I want 2 tickets for a one way flight.
I've found 1 such flight. The flight is with American Airlines, and the flight departs at 7:05 am. The flight has 0 stops, and the price of the ticket is $153.
Thank you, that will be all.
Have a great day.
I'm planning on going on a short trip to Los Angeles. Can you help me find a flight? I need 4 tickets.
Where do you want to leave from?
Find any flights that leave today from Washington.
When do you plan on returning?
I will be flying back on Wednesday next week.
There's a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 2:50 pm with a returning flight that departs at 2:10 pm. The price of the ticket is $284.
Can you tell me if the flight has one stop? When does the plane land?
The flight does have 1 stop and it arrives at 7:57 pm.
Are there any other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10 am with a returning flight that departs at 6:10 pm. The ticket is $203.
What about anything else?
How about flying with Southwest Airlines? There is a departing flight that leaves at 2:50 pm with the returning flight leaving at 7:20 am. The ticket is $255.
Okay, can you find any one way flights?
I found 1 oneway flight with Southwest Airlines. The flight leaves at 2:50 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket is $193.
Where does the flight take off from?
It leaves from the Dulles International Airport.
Great, thanks for all your help. I don't need anything else.
Have a nice day!
I am looking for a flight, on the 6th.
Great, when do you want the return flight and what is your destination?
I want to return on March 12th and want to fly to Vegas.
Super, which city from which do you want to depart?
I want two tickets from Portland, OR.
I found 2 possible flights matching your criteria, do you want to fly with Delta Airlines departing at 4:40 pm and returning at 7:50 pm. The total cost would be $230.
Actually could I please have a one way flight?
Would you like to fly with Delta Airlines, taking off at 4:40 pm with 1 stop and will cost $206.
Where would the flight land and what class would the seat be?
The flight is for McCarran International Airport and the seating class is Economy.
Great that's all thanks.
Super thanks, have a great day.
I need a flight from Seattle, WA.
When do you want to leave and when do you want to return?
I will be flying to Washington on the 3rd of March and coming back on the 12th of this month.
I found 4 flights that fit your requirements. One is with American Airlines. It costs $319 and leaves at 4:55 am.The return flight leaves at 4:10 pm.
Do I have any other options?
There is a flight with Delta Airlines that is priced at $195. It leaves at 7:45 pm. and the retutn flight leaves at 6:25 pm.
What airport would I be leaving from.
You would depart from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
How many people did you get this for and what is the arrival time of the return flight?
I got it for 1 and 10:33 pm is the scheduleda
Actually , I want 2 tickets.
Would you be interested in a flight with Southwest Airlines for $303? It leaves at 4:25 am and the return flight is at 2:35 pm.
Find me a one way ticket any class.
Southwest Airlines has 1 flight with 0 stops that leaves at 5:45 am for $323.
That's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a flight. I need a flight that returns on March 13th.
I can do that. Please provide the date and location of you travel.
I need a flight to San Francisco. I would like a flight for Thursday next week.
Okay, which airport would you like to fly out of?
I want to fly out of Seattle.
I found 4 flights departing Seattle on the date requested. Are you okay with flying Alaska Airlines? They have a flight at 12 pm. Your returning flight would be at 2:55 pm. The price is $137.
Are there any other flights? I would like 1 tickets on United Airlines.
I found 1 flight for you on United Airlines. It takes off at 8:30 pm. Your return flight would be at 3:05 pm. The cost is $136.
What airport does the flight land at?
Your flight will land at SFO International Airport.
Okay. I want a one way flight.
Do you still want to fly United Airlines? There is a flight at 8:30 pm. This flight cost $123 and has 0 stops, as you requested.
Which airport does it leave from?
The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Okay.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, than you.
You're welcome, have a good day.
Search a flight for me.
On which date are you starting and returning?
Starting on 7th of this month and returning on the 13th.
From where do you depart?
From SF I'm departing. Search me Economy class tickets.
Where is your destination?
I'm going to Seattle, WA.
There are 5 flights available. Is Alaska Airlines okay for you? It takes off at 2:55 pm and while returning it takes off at 12 pm. The ticket rate is $132.
okay. I need four tickets for one way flight.
There is 1 flight which is Alaska Airlines departs at 2:55 pm and it has 0 stops. $117 is the ticket cost.
From which airport does the flight depart? At what time the flight arrive at destination?
It departs from SFO International Airport. The flight arrives at 5:06 pm.
okay, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
please find me a flight
which date are you planning to travel? and which city are you going to?
returning on wednesday next week. i want to travel from NYC on the march 1st.
where are you planning to go?
i will be flying to paris, france
i have 2 fights, first flight is with american airlines. the flight will depart at 3:40 pm. the returning flight will depart at 4:05 am. it costs $297
is there anything else? any ticket class works for me.
i found 1 flight, delta airlines departs at 3:30 pm. the returning flight will depart at 5:35 pm. ticket costs $322
does the flight have 1 layover? is this a redeye flight?
the flight has 1 layover. it is an overnight flight
i want to find a one way flight
i found 1 flight, delta airlines, which takes off at 10:50 pm. the flight has 0 stops, cost is $360
is this a redeye flight?
it is an overnight flight
ok, thanks
have a good day
I would like to buy a plane ticket.
Where are you leaving from? What days would you like to start and end your trip?
I am looking for flights from New York. I would like to leave on the 1st and come back on the 14th. I would also like it to be an Economy ticket.
Where would you like to go?
I am going to Seattle, WA. I would like a United Airlines flight, if possible.
There is 1 United Airlines flight. The flight leaves at 5:10 am and the returning flight comes back at 10:10 am. The ticket costs $338
What airport is the flight leaving from? and when does the returning flight land?
The flight takes off from JFK International Airport. The returning flight lands at 11:20 pm
That sounds okay
Is there anything else you need?
I think I want a one way flight instead.
There is a United Airlines flight that takes off at 5:10 am, but it has 1 stop. It costs $295.
How many tickets are available and is this a redeye?
The trip is for 1 passenger. This is not an overnight flight.
Okay
Is there anything else you need today?
No, that's everything
Have a nice day
I'm looking for a flight to Seattle, WA.
Where would you like to depart from and on what date? What date would you like a return flight?
I would like to start my travels on the 6th of March. Search for flights from NYC with a return date of the 14th of March.
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 2 pm, with the return flight taking off at 10:35 am. This ticket costs $301, would you like to book this flight?
I need 1 ticket on a premium economy class flight, One way preferred.
Delta Airlines has 1 flight taking off at 6 am with 1 stop. This ticket costs $482. Would you like to book this ticket?
Alright, that was all I needed.
Have a great day.
I want to book four tickets for a flight.
Where are you planning to go? Which day do you want the return flight to be?
I want to return on the 11th of this month. I am flying to Chicago and want to fly with Southwest Airlines.
What date would you like to travel? Which city do you want to depart from?
I want to start my travel on the 7th of March. I am departing from NYC.
Do you want to fly with Southwest Airlines? The flight departs at 4:20 am and has a returning flight at 9:50 pm. Tickets will cost $125.
Ok, that is fine. I want a one way Economy class flight please.
I found 1 flight for you. Would you like to fly with Southwest Airlines? The flight takes off at 4:20 am, has 0 stops, and will cost $111.
Ok.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
I am hoping to book a flight with Delta Airlines for Sunday this week.
What city will you be making the departure from and what day would you be taking the return flight?
I will be coming back on next Tuesday. Also, get me flights from Atlanta.
What is your planned destination?
I am visiting Toronto, Ontario and I would be needing two tickets.
So you want to fly with Delta Airlines. The flight will be taking off at 3:40 pm. The return flight will be taking off at 7:15 am. The ticket is priced at $221.
Alright, I want a one way flight.
There is 1 flight available with Delta Airlines. It takes off at 3:40 pm and has 1 stop. It will cost you $213.
That is fine. Thank you.
Hope you have a great day!
Hello, I am looking to book a flight.
What dates are you planning to travel and what is your destination?
I am interested in flying to Vegas preferably starting on the 2nd of this month.
What city are you planning to depart from?
I am looking for flights that depart from Mexico City.
When would you like to book the return flight?
I plan on returning on the 13th.
I was able to find 1 flight with American Airlines on your desired dates for $238. The flight takes off at 8:05 am and returns at 6:40 am.
Is this a direct Economy class flight?
This is an Economy class flight with 1 stopover.
I would like to find a one way flight.
I was able to find 1 flight with only 1 stop with American Airlines. This flight takes off at 8:05 am and costs $204.
When will the flight arrive at my destination and how many passengers are you able to book at this price?
This ticket is for 1 traveler and will arrive at the destination by 2:35 pm.
Okay.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
Can you help me find a flight?
From what city will you be departing? What is your date of travel? Which day will be your return flight?
I would like to start my trip today. Looking for flights from Phoenix, returning on March 14th.
What city are you planning to travel to?
I would like to fly to SF.
I have found 4 flights for you. There is a flight with American Airlines. It takes off at 7:35 am. The return flight takes off at 8:10 am. The price for the ticket is $182.
Are there any others? I would like two tickets.
There is also Delta Airlines. The flight takes off at 11:55 am, returning flight is at 5:50 am. Price for the ticket is $130.
I would like to find a one way ticket in Economy class.
I have found 1 flight with Delta Airlines. The flight has 0 stops and takes off at 11:55 am. The price of the ticket is $124.
Can you tell me what airport this flight departs from? Do you know if this is a redeye flight?
It departs from Sky Harbor International Airport and it is not an overnight flight.
Alright.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a flight.
Where are you planning to go?
Returning on the 13th, I am flying to Ciudad de Mexico.
Which city do you want to depart from, what date would you like to travel?
Locate flights from Philly. I want to start my travel on the 11th of this month.
I found 2 flights for you, Would you like to fly with Delta Airlines? The flight takes off at 4:40 pm and the returning flight takes off at 3 pm. The ticket price is $228.
Is there anything else?
Would you like to fly with United Airlines? The flight takes off at 12:55 pm, and the returning flight takes off at 8:25 am. The ticket price is $219.
When does the flight arrive at my destination?
The flight arrives at 7:31 pm.
Okay, I want to find a one way flight and I want four tickets.
I found 1 flight for you, would you like to fly with United Airlines? The flight leaves at 12:55 pm, and the flight has 1 stop and costs $211.
Where does the flight land?
The flight is for Benito Juarez International Airport.
Which airport does the flight leave from and when does the flight arrive at my destination?
It takes off from PHL International Airport. The flight arrives at 7:31 pm.
Thank you, that is all I need.
HAve a good day.
I would like to book a flight.
On what day, and what city would you like to depart from?
I would be leaving later today from NYC.
When are you planning to leave and when do you plan on returning?
I will be flying to Vancouver, BC and returning on the 13th.
I found 2 flights with Delta Airlines leaving at 7:30 am and the returning flight takes off at 3:20 am. It will run you $338.
Anything else?
What about United Airlines, the flight takes off at 8:20 am and the returning flight takes off at 3:15 am. The ticket costs $325.
How many stops does the flight have and which airport will we be flying out from?
The flight has 1 stop and you will be taking off from JFK International Airport.
I want 1 ticket for a one way flight.
United Airlines takes off at 12:10 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket will be $344.
Cool
Anything else I can help with.
Nope. Thanks for your help.
Have a great day!
I want to book a flight for the 11th of this month.
On with day would you like to return from which city?
I'll be returning from London, England on the 13th of March.
Do you have an itinerary?
I'd like to fly to Philly.
I found 2 flights for you costing $361. Flying with American Airlines at 2:05 pm for take off and returning at 10:10 am.
Is there anything else? I want two Economy class tickets.
I found 1 flight with United Airlines. Take off is at 0:25 am and the return flight is at 12:55 pm. The cost is $290.
Is this a redeye flight? What time does the return flight get in?
The return flight arrives at 6:37 am so it is an overnight flight.
Ok. I want to find a one way flight.
I found a flight costing $279 with United Airlines. Take off is at 0:25 am with 1 stop.
Ok. Thanks, that is all I need.
Have a good day.
I'm planning a trip, can you help me look for a flight?
Which day are you planning to return and from which city?
I want to go from NYC the day after tomorrow and return on the 13th of this month.
Where would you like to go?
I want to go to Vancouver, BC. Can you look for a Premium Economy class ticket.
I found 1 flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines flight that takes off at 6 am and returns at 2:50 am. The price is $505.
What is the departure airport, and how many stops does the flight have?
The flight departs from JFK International Airport and has 1 stop.
Ok. Can you find me 1 ticket for a one-way flight?
I found 1 flight with Delta Airlines. It takes off at 6 am, has 1 stop and costs $461.
What are the departure and arrival airports?
The flight departs from JFK International Airport and arrives at YVR International Airport.
Ok. Sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you for your help.
Have a good day.
Search for one way flights. I like Southwest Airlines the bes.
Is there a place you have in mind? When and where do you leave from?
I am traveling from NYC to SF. I will be leaving on the 8th of this month.
I found one flight for you. It is a Southwest Airlines flight with 0 stops leaves at 1:30 pm. It costs $218.
Could I get a refund if I needed one?
Yes it is refundable.
When will the outbound flight arrive?
It arrives at 4:56 pm.
That flight works for me. Pleae search for round trip flights.
When will you get back?
I would prefer to get back on the 10th of this month
I have 1 convenient flight for your trip on Southwest Airlines. The outbound flight departs at 1:30 pm and the return leaves at 8:10 pm. It costs $214 in total.
When does the return flight leave?
The return flight arrives at 5:36 am.
Could I get a refund if I needed one?elwhat if i was dying
Yes it is refundable.
That flight sounds good. I would like to go on a short trip. Would you help me to buy flight tickets?
Please confirm that you will leave from New York to San Francisco on Southwest Airlines next Friday at 1:30 pm. You will return on March 10th at 8:10 pm. You will take Economy class for 1 passenger.
Yes that is right.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for helping.
Is there anything else I could be of assistance with?
No, that is it. Thanks though.
Enjoy your day.
I would like a one-way flight.
What date are you departing?
I am departing on the 4th of March.
What city are you departing from?
I am departing out of Atlanta.
Where are you going to?
I am with three people and we are going to SF.
I found an American Airlines flight leaving tomorrow at 11:40 am with 0 stops. The cost is $176.
Can you find something else, preferably with United Airlines?
I found a United Airlines flight that leaves at 9:40 am with 0 stops. It costs $175.
That works for me.
Shall I buy tickets for you?
No, not right now. Can you find round trip tickets for when I get back Wednesday next week?
Search revealed 1 flight for you. It is a United Airlines flight that departs at 9:40 am. The return departure is at 6:10 pm and it costs $228.
That works for me. Can you buy tickets for my short trip?
You want 3 tickets in Economy class for a fight from Atlanta to San Francisco on United Airlines. The flight leaves next Monday at 9:40 am and the return flight leaves at 6:10 pm next Wednesday. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
Your flight has been booked.
Thanks for everything. That is all.
Have a good day.
I will be traveling soon. I need a one way flight.
Do you know your departure date and where are you leaving from? Where would you like to go?
I would like to leave on Friday next week to Las Vegas, departing from SF.
There are 4 flights that match your criteria. There is an American Airlines flight with a cost of $98. It departs at 5:30 am and it has 0 stops.
It sounds great.
Do you want to book a ticket?
No, not yet. Are there return flights?
When will you be returning?
I will return the 10th.
There is 1 flight that matches your criteria. There is a flight from American Airlines with a cost of $105, it departs at 5:30 am and returns at 5:30 pm.
That sounds great.
Do you want to buy a ticket for the flight?
No, I don't want to.
Is there anything I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I would like a one-way flight please?
What city are you flying out of? When are you leaving?
I am leaving from SF on the 11th of March.
Where are you going?
I am going to NYC.
I found 5 flights including an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 8:35 am. The ticket cost is $215.
Are there other flights?
There is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 8:30 pm. The ticket cost is $213.
What airport does it leave from?
The flight leaves from SFO International Airport.
Do you have other flights? There are 4 of us traveling.
There is a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 10:55 am and the ticket cost is $185.
When does it arrive?
The flight arrives at 8:21 pm.
That flight is perfect.
Do you want to make the reservation?
Not at this time.
May I further assist you?
I am looking for a round trip flight in economy.
When are you returning?
I want to come back on the 13th.
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight which costs $245. The departure flight leaves at 10:55 am and the return flight leaves at 7:30 am.
That is perfect. Can you buy the tickets?
Please confirm you want 4 tickets to fly from San Francisco to New York on Delta Airlines in economy. The departure is March 11th at 10:55 am and the return is March 13th at 7:30 am.
That is perfect. When does the returning flight arrive?
The reservation is successful. The return flight arrives at 12:50 pm.
Which airports are the flight departing from and arriving to?
The flight leaves SFO International Airport and arrives at JFK International Airport.
Thank you very much.
See you soon!
I need a oneway flight departing on March 5th.
When and where are you departing from?
I want to travel on United Airlines departing from Mexico City and traveling to LAX.
There is a flight on United Airlines departing at 8:45 pm with 0 stops for $152.
What airport will you be departing from?
The flight will depart from Benito Juarez International Airport.
That sounds good. I need a return flight for the 7th of this month on economy.
There is 1 flight on United Airlines departing at 8:45 pm on the outbound date and at 4:25 am on returning date for $148.
Is the ticket refundable and from what airport does it arrive?
It is a non refundable ticket arriving at LAX International Airport.
That is perfect.
Should I book it?
No thanks. That's all.
Enjoy your day.
I need to get away quick. Get me a ticket will you?
Sure, I'll try. When will you leave? Where are you wanting to fly?
I'm headed out of New Delhi and going to Chi-town. I am leaving 10th of March.
American Airlines has a flight at 1:45 pm with 0 layovers. The price on that is only $258.
What other options are there?
There is a United Airlines leaving at 1:10 am. with 1 stop. It's more. It cost's $406.
Ok, That's good, how about if I get a return ticket at the same time and get back on 12th of March?
There is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 1:10 am. The return on that leaves at 12:45 pm. Your cost in US is $433.
When do I arrive after leaving New Delhi? When does the return get back to New Delhi?
Return flight is landing around 8:39 pm. Your trip out will arrive at 1:37 pm.
Lets put that in ink. I'll do it.
I'll get the tickets if you want.
Please do it. Make sure I get the best Economy rate.
Here we go: Leaving Delhi on United Airlines on March 10th at 1:10 am on economy 1 passenger. You'll return from Chicago March 12th at 12:45 pm.
Correct, except the most important part. I have four people in my group.
Ok, just to re clarify. number of tickets is 4 and your return date is March 12th?
Yes, you finally see the light. Thanks.
I have the tickets (4) for you.
Which airport will I touch down in?
You'll be in the busy O'Hare International Airport.
That's a good one. Thanks.
What is left for you to get?
Nothing, I'm great.
Have a good time, fly safe.
I am looking for one-way flights leaving from NY.
When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving on the 2nd of March.
What is your destination?
I am traveling to Portland.
There is an American Airlines flight that matches your criteria. The outbound flight leaves at 4:05 am and it has 1 stop. The price of the ticket is $315.
Which airport does the flight arrive in and which one does it depart from?
The destination is PDX International Airport and the flight departs from JFK International Airport.
Are there any other available flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 2:35 pm and it has 1 stop. The price of the ticket is $310.
Are there any other available flights? I would prefer to travel in economy.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that matches your preferences. The outbound flight leaves at 5:55 pm and it has 1 stop. The price of the ticket is $294.
That flight sounds good to me.
Would you like me to buy tickets for it?
No I don't want to buy a ticket. Could you instead search round trip flights for me? I only need a ticket for 1 person.
When do you plan to return?
I want to get back on the 4th.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that is convenient for your needs. The outbound flight leaves at 5:55 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:55 pm. The price of the ticket is $315.
Which airport does the flight arrive in?
The destination is PDX International Airport.
When does the onward flight arrive and would the ticket be refundable?
The onward flight arrives at 11:53 pm. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
That flight sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you help me buy tickets for this flight? I only plan to go on a short trip.
Of course. Please confirm the following details: A ticket for 1 in economy class seating on a Southwest Airlines flight from New York to Portland. The departure date is tomorrow and the return date is next Monday. The onward flight leaves at 5:55 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:55 pm.
Yes that sounds good, I would like to purchase a ticket. When does my return flight arrive and which airport does it depart from?
Your ticket has been confirmed. The flight departs from JFK International Airport and the return flight arrives at 5:25 am.
Thank you for your help, that is all I need.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I'm going to be traveling soon, I need a one way flight.
Where are you planing to go to?
I am going to Paris.
Do you know your departure date and from where will you leave?
I would like to leave next Friday from Philly.
There are 4 flights that match your criteria. There is a flight from American Airlines with a price of $260 leaving at 4:45 pm. It has 1 stop.
That sounds good. Can you look for a return flight also?
When do you want to return?
The 10th if possible.
There is 1 flight that matches your criteria. The flight is from American Airlines with a price of $286, it leaves at 4:45 pm and returns at 4:05 am.
From which airport does it depart and to which does it arrive?
It departs from PHL International Airport and arrives to Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
That sounds great. I will be going with some people, can you buy three tickets?
Please confirm: 3 Economy class tickets for a flight from American Airlines leaving from Philadelphia and a destination of Paris. Leaving next Friday at 4:45 pm and returning on March 10th at 4:05 am.
That is correct, is the ticket refundable?
The ticket has been booked. It is not a refundable ticket.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
Can you please find me one-way flights?
When and where are you leaving from and where are you planning to visit?
I am leaving from SD and traveling to Phoenix. I prefer American Airlines and want to leave on March 3rd.
I found 1 flight on American Airlines. The flight leaves at 3:15 pm and has 0 stops. The cost per ticket is $92.
What airport does it depart from?
The flight departs from SAN International Airport.
That sounds good. Can you please search for round trip flights?
When are you coming back?
I want to return on the 7th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 3:15 pm and returns at 6:25 am. The cost per ticket is $143.
That sounds good.
Should I purchase the tickets?
Yes, please. I want to fly in economy.
Please confirm the following: Booking a flight from San Diego to Phoenix on American Airlines. You will fly out the day after tomorrow and return next Thursday. The flight leaves at 3:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 6:25 am. You are flying in economy and the number of passengers is 1.
Yes, that sounds good. When does the flight arrive and what airport do I fly into?
Your ticket is confirms. The destination is Sky Harbor International Airport and the flight arrives a 4:35 pm.
Thank you, that is all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to get some plant tickets.
Sure, when will you leave?
Next monday is my departure date.
Where do you want to go? Where will you depart?
I'm leaving Las Vegas and visiting Chicago, the windy city.
You have 2 possible choices. American Airlines might be best for you. You'll depart at 10:55 am. It has 1 stop. Your total there will be $237
What else is there?
Try United Airlines. It leaves at 1:40 pm. It has a stop but costs more: $267.
When does the flight leave? Which airport?
O'Hare International Airport. It arrives at 10:07 pm.
I will take it. It's economy right?
When will you come back?
I will return 6th of March.
I found 1 option. United Airlines leaves at 1:40 pm, returns (departs) at 10:35 am. Total cost is $273.
That is just the way I want to go.
How about I get your tickets?
Yes, do that. I have three people who need them.
Great, let's confirm: Board United Airlines next Monday at 1:40 pm.You'll originally depart from Las Vegas, going to Chicago. You'll return next wednesday at 10:35 am. Your 3 tickets are on economy.
Wrong, I only need two tickets.
Ok, to be clear, your flight next Monday needs 2 tickets.
That's it - 2.
Your plans are set in concrete now.
When does my onward flight get there? What airport will I need to board from?
Airport there is McCarran International Airport. It arrives back at 10:07 pm.
Thanks, perfect. I really appreciate your diligence.
Have a safe flight.
I need help finding one-way flights.
I can help with that. When do you plan to leave? Where are you flying to? Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from London, traveling to Philadelphia. I want to leave on March 11th.
Great! I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:05 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $326. Does that interest you at all?
I don't like that airline. I should tell you that I'm leaving from CDMX and there are 2 of us.
Thank you for the additional information! I found 2 flights for you. I recommend Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $207. Does that interest you at all?
What airport does the flight arrive at? Is the ticket refundable?
The flight arrives at PHL International Airport. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
Shoot. What's the other flight?
It's with United Airlines. It leaves at 8:25 am, has 1 stop and costs $223. Does that interest you at all?
That sounds great.
Would you like me to purchase tickets for you?
No, thank you. Can you search for roundtrip flights for me?
Yes, I can! When are you returning?
I want to get back on the 13th.
I found a United Airlines flight that leaves at 8:25 am. The return flight leaves at 12:55 pm and costs $242. Does that interest you at all?
When does the return flight arrive?
It arrives at 7:31 pm.
That sounds great. Can you purchase tickets for that?
Absolutely! Can you confirm the following details, please? You are purchasing 2 tickets for a flight leaving Mexico City and flying into Philadelphia. The flight is with United Airlines on March 11th at 8:25 am. It returns on March 13th at 12:55 pm. All seats are in economy.
Perfect! Which airport does the flight arrive at?
Your tickets are confirmed. Your flight arrives at PHL International Airport.
Which airport does the flight depart from?
It departs from Benito Juarez International Airport.
Thanks for everything!
You're welcome. Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a wonderful day!
I'm looking for one way flights to London.
Departure date?
The 11th of March.
Departure city?
Leaving from Los Angeles on the 2nd, I don't care about the airline.
There is an American Airlines flight with 1 stop leaving 8:30 am for $377.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like tickets?
No, not now.
Can I help you with anything else?
Look up round trip flights returning on March 4th.
There's an American Airlines flight leaving 8:30 am and returning 3:05 pm for $343.
Flying into which airport?
Into Heathrow International Airport.
That sounds good.
Would you like to buy tickets?
Yes, I would.
Please confirm: 1 ticket on American Airlines in Economy departing from Los Angeles and landing in London. Departing tomorrow at 8:30 am and returning next Monday at 3:05 pm.
No, there's just 1 person.
Please confirm: 1 ticket for American Airlines.
Sounds good.
Your ticket is booked.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Would you look for one way flights?
When do you want to depart?
I will leave on the 11th.
Where will you visit? Where will you leave from?
I will leave from NY and go to Toronto, Canada.
How about this American Airlines flight? The outbound flight leaves at 6:55 am and has 0 stops. It costs $102.
That sounds like a winner.
Do you want tickets for it?
No, actually I don't want tickets yet. Find me round trip flight tickets in Premium Economy. I have four people in my group.
When will you come back?
I will come back on the 13th.
I have 1 nice flight. It's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:55 am. The return flight departs at 12:50 pm. This ticket costs $168.
Okay that sounds good. I want to go on a short trip. Could you help me buy flght tickets/
So you would lik eto leave from New York and go to Toronto on American Airlines on March 11th at 6:55 am. You will return on March 13th at 12:50 pm. You are taking premium economy for 4 passengers. Is this right?
Yes, that is great.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
At which airport does the flight arrive? What airport does the flight depart from?
So you are going to Toronto Pearson International Airport and leaving from JFK International Airport.
Thank you for helping.
Could I help with something else?
No, thank you for helping.
Have a great day.
I need a oneway flight for a trip.
When are you leaving and which location?
I will be leaving Vegas on the 10th with 1 person.
Where do you want to go?
I need to travel to Vancouver, BC.
There is a 9:30 am flight with 1 stop on American Airlines. The cost is $205.
Do you have any other options? I like United Airlines.
OK, there is a United Airlines flight leaving at 8:15 am with 1 stop. The ticket is $207.
OK, good. Can you search flights for me?
When do you want to return?
On Economy on the 12th of March.
There is another United Airlines flight leaving at 8:15 am and returning at 6:05 pm. The ticket price is $225.
Great, Can you help me with the purchase?
Yes, please confirm the information: Flight leaving Las Vegas in March 10th to Vancouver on United Airlines at 8:15 am and returning at 6:05 pm on March 12th. The class is Economy and 1 person for the ticket.
Yes, that's great/
The ticket is purchased.
Thanks so much.
Have a good day.
Can you find one-way flight tickets?
Where are you going? Where do you plan to leave from?
I am leaving from Los Angeles and going to London.
When do you want to leave?
I am going on March 14th.
I found 4 flights for you. One is an Alaska Airlines flight. It leaves at 9:30 am and has 1 stop. A ticket costs $444.
What else is available? I only want 1 ticket. I am going on the 11th of this month.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:30 am and has 1 stop. A ticket costs $372.
Are there other flights? I am departing from Chicago.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 11:05 am and has 1 stop. A ticket is $339.
Where does the flight arrive?
The destination airport is Heathrow International Airport.
Where does it depart from?
O'hare International Airport.
Sounds great.
Do you want tickets?
No thanks. Can you find round trip flights?
When are you returning?
The 13th.
I found 1 flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines flight and leaves at 11:05 am. The return flight leaves at 8 am. It costs $294
Where does it depart from?
O'Hare International Airport.
Where does it arrive?
Heathrow International Airport
Sounds great.
Should I buy tickets?
Yes, book 1 Economy ticket please.
Please confirm the following: 1 economy ticket for a Delta Airlines flight from Chicago to London. It departs March 11th at 11:05 am and returns March 13th at 8 am.
Yes sounds good. When will the return flight arrive?
12:29 pm.
Is the ticket refundable.
No, it arrives at 6:37 am.
Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find one-way flights? I would prefer to travel in economy.
Certainly. Where are you planning on visiting?
I am traveling to Phoenix.
Where are you leaving from and when do you plan to leave?
I am leaving from LA and I wish to leave on Sunday this week.
I have found an American Airlines flight that matches your needs. The outbound flight leaves at 7:50 am and it has 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $105.
Which airport does the flight arrive in?
The destination is Sky Harbor International Airport.
What time does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 9:18 am.
Are there any other available flights? I would prefer to fly with United Airlines.
There is a United Airlines flight available. The outbound flight leaves at 8:45 am and it has 0 stops. The price of a ticket for this flight is $89.
That sounds good to me. Could you search round trip flights for me? I only need a ticket for 1 person.
When do you plan to come back?
I would like to return on the 5th of March.
I have found 1 United Airlines flight that is convenient for your trip. The outbound flight leaves at 8:45 am. The return flight leaves at 7:15 am. The price of the ticket is $96.
When does the onward flight arrive and when would the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 8:43 am and the onward flight arrives at 10:13 am.
That flight sounds good to me. I am planning for a short trip. Could you help me buy my tickets?
Of course. Please confirm the following details: the United Airlines flight you are interested in travels from Los Angeles to Phoenix. The departure date is the day after tomorrow and the return date is next Tuesday. The onward flight leaves at 8:45 am and the return flight leaves at 7:15 am. There is 1 passenger and the seating is economy class. Is that correct?
Yes that sounds good.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for the help. That is all I need.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for one-way flights, can you give me a hand?
I'll need some more details: where are you traveling to and from, and when do you plan to leave?
I'm leaving Philadelphia on the 12th of this month and going to Atlanta, GA.
I've found 4 possible options for you; one of them is an American Airlines flight departing at 10:10 am, with 1 layover, for $242.
There will be three people traveling together - are there any other flights available?
I've found 3 other flights: Delta Airlines has an outbound flight at 2:20 pm with 1 layover for $211.
I think that would work, yeah.
Would you like to get the tickets?
Not at the moment - can you search for round trip flights as well? I'd like to return on the 14th of this month.
I've found 1 flight through Delta Airlines for $213, it departs at 2:20 pm and arrives back in Philadelphia at 3:40 pm.
When do the departing and arriving flights get to the airports?
The departing flight arrives at 8:21 pm and the return flight arrives at 7:46 pm.
That sounds doable.
Would you like to buy the tickets?
Not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a great day.
I need a one-way ticket on an airplane.
Where are you going? When and what time are you leaving?
I'm heading to Seattle, WA from LAX. Will be cutting out tomorrow.
Well, I see 5 flights up your alley. There's a 7:10 pm Alaska Airlines with 0 stops for $155.
What else is out there?
A 5:20 am American Airlines with 0 stops too. That'll run you $147.
Keep looking.
A 6:50 am Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops. $124 is the damage.
From which airport does it leave? And when does it land?
LAX International Airport. You'll hit the ground at 9:37 am.
I like it but make it a round tripper instead. Check the Economy section.
When do you want to return.
Monday next week.
Ok. I got 1. It takes of at 6:50 am and 8:45 am on the return. Delta Airlines. That'll set you back $138.
I'm down with that.
You want to pony up for the tickets.
Yeah, buy me the tickets.
Will do. Let me make sure I got this straight. 1 Economy seat to Seattle from Los Angeles tomorrow at 6:50 am, returning next Monday on an 8:45 am flight. Delta Airlines. Correct?
Yes, correct. What airport does it arrive in?
Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. Your flight is booked.
When does it arrive back? And which airport do I go to tomorrow?
Go to LAX International Airport. You'll be back on the ground there at 11:32 am.
Excellent. Good job.
Thanks. Any more jobs?
No. I'm just going to chill.
Have a chill time then.
I have to get a 1 way ticket.
Do you know where you'll depart and do you have a planned date of departure?
I will leave CDMX on March 9th.
Where will you travel to?
My family of 3 wants to go to New York City.
One option for you is an American airlines flight, it's departure time is 12:05 pm. It has 0 stops and its price per ticket is $168.
I like the pricing on that ticket. What about getting round trip tickets. We like traveling economy.
When will your return trip be?
I'm not returning until the 11th I think.
I have a 12:05 pm departure on board American Airlines. The return trip takes off at 11:20 am. It's cost is $227.
That's a good price.
What can I get for you?
I need those tickets please?
Ok.. I have: Depart Mexico City at 12:05 pm on American Airlines on March 9th going to New York. You'll return March 11th, boarding that flight at 11:20 am. Your seating class is Economy. You'll have 3 seats.
I agree, that's great.
I have the tickets for you.
Will I have a refundable ticket? When will I arrive back in mexico?
Yes, it's refundable. The return arrives in Mexico at 4:14 pm.
You are the cat's pajamas, thanks.
Have a safe flight.
Hey, can you help me find some one-way flights, please?
What airport would you like to leave from?
Ideally I'd be leaving from LAX, so Los Angeles.
Where are you traveling to and what day would you like to leave?
I'd be leaving March 3rd, heading to New York.
That sounds fun! I've found 5 possible options: Alaska Airlines has an outbound flight at 9:30 am with 0 stops for $236.
I think I'd prefer Delta Airlines - what flights do they have?
I've found 1 matching flight for you via Delta Airlines, outbound at 10:55 pm with 0 stops for $208.
When does the departing flight arrive?
That flight will arrive at 8:05 am.
Yeah, I think that works.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
Can you also look for some round trip flights, the same locations?
When would you like to return to LA?
I'd like to get back on the 5th of this month.
I've found 1 round trip Delta Airlines flight leaving at 10:55 pm and returning at 7:30 am for $227.
What airport would the flight leave from, and where does it arrive?
It leaves from LAX International Airport and will arrive at JFK international airport.
That sounds good, yeah.
Would you like to buy tickets today?
Yeah, let's book that.
To review: You are booking 1 Economy flight through Delta Airlines from Los Angeles to New York, departing the day after tomorrow at 10:55 pm, with the returning flight next Tuesday leaving at 7:30 am.
Yeah, that sounds right - when do both flights arrive at their destination?
Your departing flight will arrive at 8:05 am and the returning flight will arrive at 10:40 am.
That all sounds good, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
That's all, thank you.
Have a great day.
I need to find a one way flight for an upcoming trip I have.
Sure, when do you need to depart and where is the destination?
I intend on leaving Seattle on the 1st of March, traveling to Portland, and prefer to travel Premium Economy.
There are 4 flights that match that criteria. The first is American Airlines departing at 8:05 am with 0 stops for $107.
What airport would I be flying out of and arriving at?
That flights departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and arrives at PDX International Airport.
Great, that sounds like what I am looking for.
Would you like me to reserve the tickets for you?
No thank you, not for that flight. Can you search for flights for 2 people?
Sure, when will you be returning?
I would like to return the day after tomorrow.
I was able to find 1 convenient flight with American Airlines that leaves at 8:05 am and has a return flight at 6 am for $122.
That flight works for me.
Would you like me to book those tickets for you?
No thank you, I can do it.
Is there anything else I can look up for you?
No, that was all of the information I needed.
Have a great day!
Please find me one-way flights.
What day do you plan to leave? Where are you departing from and where would you like to visit?
I plan on leaving next Wednesday. I am going to SF from Chicago.
I found 4 flights for you. One is an American Airlines flight that departs at 12:30 pm and has 1 stop. A ticket costs $324.
What airport does the flight end in? Is the flight refundable?
The flight ends in SFO International Airport. The ticket is not refundable.
It sounds great. Please search round trip flights.
When are you returning?
March 8th.
There is an American Airlines flight that costs $307. The departing flight leaves at 12:30 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:25 pm.
Sounds great.
May I help you with something else?
I plan on going on a short trip. Please help me buy flight tickets.
Please confirm the flight details: The flight is from Chicago and goes to San Francisco. The departure date is next Wednesday and the return date is next Friday. The departing flight leaves at 12:30 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:25 pm. The airlines is American Airlines, your seating class is Economy, and you are buying 1 ticket.
Great! When does my return flight arrive and what airport does it depart from?
The reservation is confirmed. The flight leaves from O'Hare International Airport and arrives at 1:47 am.
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No thanks.
Have a fine day.
Could you find me one way flights leaving from San Fran?
When will you leave and where are you going?
I will go to San Diego on the 1st.
I have 5 flights that should work. There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 6:10 am and has 0 stops. It costs $91.
When does the outbound flight arrive?
It arrives at 7:50 am.
Could I get a refund if necessry? Which airport does the flight depart from?
Sorry, but the ticket is non refundable. The flight leaves from SFO International Airport.
That flight works. Could you search round trip flights for me?
When are you returning?
I want to get back on Sunday this week.
I have 1 flight that will work, and it's on Alaska Airlines. The outbound flight leaves at 6:10 am and the return flight leaves at 5:10 pm. This ticket costs $102.
That flight sounds good.
Should I purchase the ticket?
Yes, I want that ticket, in economy class.
Please confirm that your flight leaves from San Francisco and goes to San Diego on Alaska Airlines today at 6:10 am. You will return the day after tomorrow at 5:10 pm. You need 1 economy ticket. Is this right?
Yes, that sounds good. Which airport does the flight leave from and when does the onward flight arrive?
Your ticket has been confirmed. The flight leaves from SFO International Airport and arrives at 7:50 am.
Thank you for helping.
Would I be able to assist with anything else?
No, that should do it.
Have a great day.
I'm trying to find a one way flight for four people on the 5th of March.
What is your destination and your departure place?
Leaving from Toronto, Canada and going to Philly.
I have 3 possibilities for you, and Air Canada flight leaving at 1:25 PM with one stop for $149.
Departing from where?
It leaves from Toronto Pearson International Airport.
What else do you have?
I have an American Airlines flight leaving at 12:50 PM for $146 with 1 stop.
What else is available?
There is a United Airlines flight with 1 stop leaving at 5:35 PM for $221.
That sounds like a possibility. I like economy seats.
What is your return date?
The return is March 7th.
I have a United Airlines flight leaving at 5:35 PM and coming back at 11:30 AM for $240.
What's the arrival time of the return?
It comes back at 5:08 PM.
That sounds like it will work.
Would you like to reserve that?
Yes, I would.
Please confirm, leaving from Toronto and going to Philadelphia on United Airlines next Tuesday and returning next Thursday. The onword flight departs at 5:35 PM and returns at 11:30 AM, seating in economy for 4 passengers.
Sounds OK, where does it fly into?
It flies into PHL International Airport. The booking is complete.
What is the arrival time of the onward flight and can the ticket be refunded?
The arrival time is 0:16 AM and it is a non refundable ticket.
Sounds perfect, thank you.
You're very welcome.
I want a one way flight. I like Economy tickets.
Where will you be leaving from and where are you visiting?
I am leaving from Philly and going to Delhi, India.
When are you planning to leave?
7th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight available. It departs at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop. A ticket costs $316.
That flight sounds great!
Would you like to purchase tickets?
No, thanks. Can you search round trip flights?
When are you returning?
I will be back on on the 9th of this month.
I found 1 flight for you; it is an American Airlines flight that departs at 4:45 pm. The return flight leaves at 1:45 pm. A ticket costs $349.
Sounds good. It will be a short trip. Can you buy one ticket for me?
Please confirm the following details: 1 Economy ticket for an American Airlines flight from Philadelphia to Delhi. It departs next Thursday at 4:45 pm. The return flight is scheduled for March 9th and leaves at 1:45 pm.
No, I want four tickets please.
Please confirm the following: the return date is March 9th and you want 4 tickets.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Thank you!
Shall I help you with something else?
No thanks.
Have a great day!
I need a one-way flight to Paris, France.
When would you like to leave?
On the 7th.
Which location would you leave from?
NYC.
I've found an American Airlines flight that has 0 stops and leaves at 7:35 am for $235.
Can you tell me if the tickets refundable and which airport does the flight arrive at?
The arrival is at Charles de Gaulle International Airport and the ticket is not refundable.
Perfect, can you search round trip flights for me?
When would you like to come back?
There are four people traveling economy and we'll be back on March 9th.
How about an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:35 am and returns at 4:05 am for $264.
Which airport?
The Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Perfect, I need a short trip, please purchase the tickets.
Please confirm the flight details: 4 passengers on booked on American Airlines for a flight from New York to Paris next Thursday in economy at 7:35 am and returning March 9th at 4:05 am.
Perfect, that is correct. Are the tickets refundable?
Confirmation confirmed, and tickets are not refundable.
Thank you.
Have a great day.
Could you look up one-way flights for me?
What location do you anticipate traveling to?
I am visiting San Francisco.
What place will you depart from?
I will depart from LA.
What time do you anticipate departing?
I am departing on March 6th.
I found 4 suitable flights for you. There is an outbound Alaska Airlines Flight departing at 5:50 pm with 0 stops. The cost of the ticket is $100.
Can I get my money back on the ticket?
Sadly, you cannot get your money back on the ticket.
The flight sounds perfect for me. Could you look for round trip flights for me? I have one person in my group.
What time are you coming back?
I'd like to return on next Friday.
I found 1 convenient flight or your trip. There is a ticket for an outbound Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 5:50 pm with a return flight departing at 7:10 pm. The cost is $99.
What airport does the flight leave from?
The flight leaves from LAX international Airport.
That sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to purchase tickets for the flight?
Nah, that's fine. That's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I'm looking for one-way flights. Can you help me?
What date did you want to fly out on?
I'll be leaving on the day after tomorrow.
What destination did you have in mind? Also, did you want to fly out of anywhere in particular?
Yes, I'll be headed to Portland, OR from Seattle.
Okay, there's an American Airlines flight at $75. It takes off at 8:05 am and has 0 layovers.
I'd actually prefer Delta Airlines. Are there any options there?
There's a Delta Airlines flight at $82 that might work. It's also got 0 layovers and leaves at 7:55 am.
That option is a good fit.
Do you want me to purchase a ticket for it now?
No, that's okay. Let's wait on that.
Do you need help with anything else then?
Yes, let's look at round trip flights now. I've got two people in my group and want to come back on March 5th.
Okay, I've found 1 flight that'll work for you. It's Delta Airlines as preferred and costs $83. The flight out is at 7:55 am, and the trip back takes off at 9:35 am.
When does the trip out there land? Also, are the tickets refundable?
They are non-refundable unfortunately. However, the flight will arrive at 8:53 am.
Okay, that sounds like a good choice.
Do you want me to purchase tickets for this flight?
Yes, let's go ahead and book the seats.
Let's confirm the details first. You're flying out of Seattle and to Portland on the day after tomorrow. The flight is with Delta Airlines and will take off at 7:55 am. The return trip is next Tuesday at 9:35 am. You want 2 tickets in Economy seating.
Right. That works for me.
Okay, your ticket purchase is confirmed.
Thanks for the help.
Do you need anything else right now?
No, I'm alright. Thanks again.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Help me look for some one-way flights please.
What destination did you have in mind?
I will be traveling to ATL.
Where did you want to fly out of?
I'd like to fly out of San Fran if possible.
Sure. What date did you want to fly out on?
Let's shoot for the 9th.
I've found 5 flights that'll fit your needs. There's an Alaska Airlines flight at $196. It takes off at 3:55 pm and has 0 stops.
Let's keep looking. What else is there?
There's an American Airlines flight with 1 layover at $287. It departs at 2:15 pm.
Which airport is it flying out of?
The airport is SFO International Airport.
That seems like a good fit.
Do you want to purchase tickets for the flight?
No, let's hold off on that. I'd like to search round trip flights first.
When did you want to fly back then?
I'll be heading back on March 11th. Oh, there's one person in my group.
Okay. The American Airlines flight which leaves at 2:15 pm has a return flight at 11:40 am. The ticket price is $255.
Okay, let's go with that then. Can you buy the ticket for me?
Of course, but let's confirm the details first. You're flying from San Francisco to Atlanta on American Airlines. You want 1 ticket in Economy seating. The flight out is on March 9th at 2:15 pm, and you're returning on March 11th with a flight taking off at 11:40 am.
Yes, that's perfect.
The ticket has been purchased.
Thank you for your assistance.
Do you need anything else at the moment?
No, I'm fine. Thank you again.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'm looking to get some one-way flights for my vacation. Can you find me some flying out of SFO?
What city are you flying to?
I'm going to Philadelphia, and I'd like to fly in Economy seating.
What date would you like to leave?
I want to leave on March 2nd, and can we make the seating Premium Economy?
There is an Alaska Airlines flight for $436 that leaves at 1:35 pm and has 1 stop.
Are there any other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight for $428 that leaves at 10:55 am and has 1 stop.
What is the arrival time?
Arrival time is 10:26 pm.
What airport would I be flying out of?
Departure is from SFO International Airport.
Are there any other flights?
There is a United Airlines flight for $448 that leaves at 12:30 pm and has 1 stop.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to book this flight?
No, not right now.
Can I help with anything else?
How about round trip flights? Return date is March 14th.
I found 1 United Airlines flight for $457 that leaves at 12:30 pm and returns at 9 pm.
What time would I arrive back at SFO?
Return arrival time is 3:01 am.
What airport would I fly out of?
Departure is from SFO International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to book this flight?
Yes, let's book it.
Please confirm: United Airlines flight for 1 passenger in Premium Economy seating. Departure is from San Francisco tomorrow at 12:30 pm, returning from Philadelphia on March 14th at 9 pm.
That sounds good.
Your ticket has been purchased.
Thanks for your help, that's all.
Have a great day.
I want to fly from Philadelphia, in Economy class, can you help me find flights?
Where are you flying to?
I'm going to Chicago.
When will you leave?
On 6th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops, leaving at 10:10 am, at a cost of $112.
Which airports will it fly between?
It will travel from PHL International Airport to O'Hare International Airport.
That sounds good, can you search for round trip flights four one person, getting back on the 8th.
I found 1 convenient option, an American Airlines flight departing at 10:10 am, returning at 6:40 pm, at a cost of $128.
Where and when will it arrive?
It will arrive at O'Hare International Airport at 11:21 am.
That's good, can you help me buy tickets?
So I'll book an Economy ticket for 1 passenger from Philadelphia to Chicago with American Airlines, leaving next Wednesday at 10:10 am, returning next Friday at 6:40 pm. Is that okay?
Yes, that sounds good.
The reservation was successful.
Thanks a lot.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all for now, thanks.
Have a wonderful day!
I am looking for one-way flights. Can you help me?
Certainly. When do you plan on leaving and where will you be leaving from? Also, where do you plan to visit?
I will be leaving from SD and I am traveling to SFO. I am leaving on the 11th of March.
I have found 5 suitable flights for you. There is an Alaska Airlines flight that appears to be convenient for your needs. The outbound flight leaves at 11:10 am and has 0 stops. The price of a ticket is $118.
Are there any other available flights?
There is also an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 9:20 pm and it has 0 stops. The price for this ticket is $103.
Are there any other available flights? I would prefer to fly with Delta Airlines and I am actually going to leave on the 5th of March.
I have found 1 Delta Airlines flight that is suitable for you. The outbound flight leaves at 7:55 pm and it has 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $115.
That flight sounds good to me. Can you also search round trip flights for me? I want to get back on the 7th.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that matches your criteria. The outbound flight leaves at 7:55 pm. The return flight leaves at 5:50 am. The price of the ticket is $168.
Which airport does this flight depart from?
The flight departs from SAN International Airport.
Which airport does the flight arrive in and when does my return flight arrive?
The destination is SFO International Airport and the return flight arrives at 9:45 am.
That flight sounds good to me. I am only planning to go on a short trip. Can you help me buy tickets?
Of course. Please confirm the following details: A ticket for the Delta Airlines flight traveling from San Diego to San Francisco that leaves next Tuesday and returns next Thursday. The onward flight leaves at 7:55 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:50 am. There is 1 passenger and the seating is economy class.
No. I need tickets for 3 passengers.
Please confirm the revised details: the return date is next Thursday and the number of passengers is 3.
Yes that sounds correct.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for the help. That is all I need.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Please find me one way flights.
When is departure?
Departure is tomorrow.
What is departure city and arrival city?
Departure city is Portland and LA is arrival city and I want Economy.
I found 5. At 10:10 am on Alaska Airlines with 0 stops for $155.
Is there something for 2 people?
There is an American Airlines that departs from 7:20 am and 1 stop for $196.
When does it arrive?
It arrives at 11:40 am.
What airport and is it refundable?
Not refundable and arrival is LAX International Airport.
Is there any other flights available?
Yes, a Delta Airlines departs at 9:35 am with 1 stop for $169.
That is good for me.
Would you like tickets now?
No, hold off on the tickets.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, a round trip ticket to arrive back next Monday.
I found 1. A Delta Airlines departure at 9:35 am that returns at 6:50 am and the ticket is $197.
What is the departing airport and arrival time?
Departs from PDX International Airport arriving at 3:17 pm.
That is what I need.
Would you like to buy tickets?
Yes.
Please confirm. Departure city is tomorrow for Portland at 9:35 am next Monday and Los Angeles is arrival city and I want Economy on Delta Airlines with a return departure of 6:50 am for 2.
Yes I confirm all. What time do I arrive back?
The return time is 12:08 pm.
Thank for all of your help.
Is there anything else you need?
No that is all.
Thank you and have a nice day.
Can you find me a one-way flight? Preferably on Delta Airlines?
When did you want to leave and from where? Where are you going?
I'm leaving on the 1st of March from London to NY.
I found 1 flight. Delta Airlines leaving at 3:35 pm with 0 stops for $194.
That sounds good.
Shall I buy a ticket?
No. I don't want that one.
Do you need anything else?
Can you check round ticket flights for two?
When are you returning?
I'd like to return this Sunday.
I found 1 flight. It is on Delta Airlines leaving at 3:35 pm. The return flight leaves at 6:20 pm. It is $218 for the ticket.
That sounds good.
Shall I book the tickets?
Yes, please do.
To verify: The flight is for 2 economy tickets from London to New York on Delta Airlines. It departs today at 3:35 pm and returns the day after tomorrow leaving at 6:20 pm.
Yes that's correct.
I have confirmed your tickets.
What time does the onward flight arrive?
It arrives at 7:57 pm.
Perfect. That's all I need, thanks!
Have a great day.
I need you to find me one-way flights out of ATL.
When are you leaving and where are you going?
I am leaving on March 8th to Nairobi, Kenya.
Search revealed 2 flights. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 6:45 am with 1 stop. It costs $400.
That works for me. Can you find round trip flights?
What date is your return flight?
I am returning on the 10th of this month.
I found an American Airlines flight with the first flight departing at 6:45 am and the second flight departing at 5:35 am. It costs $453.
That works. Can you book an Economy class for my short trip?
You want 1 ticket in Economy class from Atlanta to Nairobi on American Airlines. The departure trip leaves at 6:45 am next Friday and the return trip departs at 5:35 am on March 10th. Is that right?
No, I need 3 tickets.
You need 3 tickets for your flight to Nairobi. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct. Does the airline give refunds and when does the first flight arrive?
There are no refunds and the first flight arrives at 10:07 am. Your tickets have been purchased.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I have a trip coming. Can you find me flights that are one way?
Where are you planning to visit? When do you plan on leaving for your trip?
I am traveling to Vancouver from Las Vegas. I plan on leaving on the 1st.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:30 am from Las Vegas. The flight has 1 stop and the price of the ticket is $232.
Are there any other flights that are available? I prefer to fly with Delta Airlines and I am leaving from Washington.
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving from Washington at 10 am. The flight has 1 stop and the price of the ticket is $281.
That flight sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets for it?
No, I do not want to buy a ticket. Can you search for flights coming back for me?
When are you coming back?
I plan on getting back on the 3rd of this month.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10 am and returns at 2:50 am. The price of the ticket is $297.
Are there any other available flights?
Sorry, I wasn't able to find any other available flights. Shall I help you with anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight from NY, can you help me?
Where would you like to visit, and when do you plan on leaving?
I'd like to visit Portland and leave on the 1st of March.
I've found a flight with American Airlines that departs at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop. The price of a ticket is $284.
Are refunds allowed for the ticket?
The ticket is not refundable, unfortunately.
Okay. This flight will do.
Would you like me to buy a ticket for you?
No, thank you. I don't want to buy a ticket. Do a search for round-trip flights.
When would you like to return?
I like to come back by this Sunday.
There is a flight with American Airlines that departs at 4:45 pm, and the returning flight departs at 7:20 am. One ticket is $310.
That sounds great.
Should I buy a ticket for you?
Yes, I'd like you to secure a ticker. Thank you.
To confirm: You'd like 1 ticket in Economy seating for the American Airlines flight that departs today from New York to Portland at 4:45 pm and a returning flight for the day after tomorrow that departs at 7:20 am?
Yes, that is correct. When will I arrive?
Your ticket has been purchased. Your returning flight arrives at 8:21 pm.
Thank you so much for your help. That'll be all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you help me find a one-way flight?
Where are you leaving from, and when? What is your destination?
I'm leaving from Phoenix to Sydney on the 2nd of March.
There's an American Airlines Flight that leaves at 7:35 am and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $279.
Are there other options?
There's a Delta Airlines Flight that leaves at 11:55 am and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $280.
What is the destination airport?
The flight will arrive at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
When will it arrive?
It will arrive at 4:01 pm.
Sounds good. Can you help me find a round trip flight?
When would you like to return?
I'd like to return on the 4th.
There's a Delta Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 11:55 am, and the return flight is at 5:50 pm. The ticket costs $318.
What is the destination airport?
The flight will arrive at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
Can you help me buy a ticket? I just want a short trip.
So you'd like 1 Economy class seat on a roundtrip flight from Phoenix to Sydney? You'll be flying with Delta Airlines. The departure is tomorrow at 11:55 am, and the return flight is at 5:50 pm next Monday.
Sounds good. When will the departing flight arrive, and which airport will it depart from?
Your ticket has been confirmed. The flight will arrive at 4:01 pm, and will depart from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Thanks.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
locate one-way flights please.
Sure, where would you like to fly to?
Los Angeles would be a fun place to go.
Ok, great. When would you like to leave?
We would like to leave on March 10th. There will be three people traveling in my party.
ok, where would you like to depart from?
Leave from Paris please.
one moment, I found 3 flights that may work for you.I have Air France outbound flight leaving at 9:15 pm with 0 layovers. This ticket will cost $286.
Give me more options please.
Sure, How about, American Airlines outbound flight leaving at 4:05 am with 1 layover stop. The ticket price is $393.
Ok, when would the onward flight be arriving? Find out if the tickets are refundable?
OK, Unfortunately tickets are non refundable. Your onward flight would arrive at 10:40 am.
That sound good. Go ahead and start a search for round trip flights now.
Sure. When would you be coming back?
how about for the 12th of this month.
one moment, located 1 flight that is American Airlines outbound, leaving at 4:05 am. The return flight would leave at 9:40 am. This ticket costs $356.
ok, When would my return flight arrive?
Flight would arrive at 7:58 am.
ok. it's a short trip for me. Can you please assist me purchasing the tickets?
one moment. Please confirm: Departing Paris to Los Angeles on American Airlines on March 10th. Return date is March 12th with onward flight leaving at 4:05 am and return flight leaving at 9:40 am. Seating would be Economy class for 3 passengers. Does this sound right?
Yes. sounds perfect.
Great. Your tickets are confirmed.
ok, great. find out when the onward flight would arrive.
sure, onward flight will arrive at 10:40 am.
Thanks for that information.
your welcome. Shall I help with anything else?
Nope. thats it.
ok. have a wonderful day.
Could you retrieve one way flights?
When would you like to leave?
I will leave on the 6th of this month.
Where do you want to leave from and where do you want to go?
I will leave from Portland and am going to Paris.
How about this Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 10:10 am? It has 1 stop and costs $399.
Could you find something else? I have two people in my group.
I have 1 flight that is suitable. It is an American Airlines flight. It leaves at 7:20 am and has 1 stop. It costs $337.
Could I get a refund if necessary?
No, that ticket cannot be refunded.
Well, the flight sounds good anyway.
So you want tickets?
No, actually, do not buy tickets. Could you look for round trip flights for me?
When do you want to come back?
I want to get back next Friday.
I found 1 good flight for your trip. How about an American Airlines flight? The outbound leaves 7:20 am and the return leaves at 4:05 am. The ticket costs $371.
Which airport does the flight leve from and when does the outbound flight arrives?
The flight leaves from PDX International Airport and the outbound flight arrives at 8:53 am.
That flight sounds nice.
Could I buy tickets for it?
No that is all I needed.
Have a good one.
I'm looking for one-way flights can you help?
Where are you leaving from and where is your destination?
I am travelling with 4 friends from Atlanta, GA to London, UK.
When are you planning to leave?
I'm leaving on the 11th.
There are 4 flights that meet your criteria. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket price is $205.
Are there any other flights?
I have found a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 5:30 pm and has 0 stops. The cost of a ticket for this flight is $260.
Are there any options to travel with United Airlines in any class?
There is 1 suitable flight with United Airlines which leaves at 10:30 am and has 0 stops. The cost of a ticket is $386.
Which Airport does the flight leave from?
The flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Sounds great.
Would you like to purchase tickets for this flight?
No thanks.
Do you need help with anything else?
I'd like to look at round trip flights.
When are you looking to return?
I want to come back on the 13th of this month.
have found 1 flight with United Airlines that meets your criteria. It leaves at 10:30 am and returns at 10:25 pm. The cost per ticket is $408.
Which airport does the flight leave from?
The flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That sounds great. Can you help me purchase tickets for a short trip?
Okay so to confirm: You would like Economy tickets for 4 people with United Airlines departing from Atlanta at 10:30 am to london on March 11th and returning on March 13th at 10:25 pm.
That sounds great.
Your booking has been made.
What airport doe the flight fly to and when does my return flight arrive?
The destination is Heathrow International Airport and it returns at 4:29 am
great
anything else
no
great
I'd like to find some one-way flights. Can you find me one for a group of one?
Of course. What destination did you have in mind, and where were you wanting to leave from? Was there a date that worked best for you?
Yes, I want to fly out of Portland this Sunday. I'll be headed to Seattle.
Okay, I've found 3 flights that'll work for you. There's an American Airlines flight at $89. It leaves at 6 am and has 0 layovers.
List out another option for me.
There's a Delta Airlines flight at $70. It leaves at 9:35 am and also has 0 stops.
Let's keep looking. I prefer United Airlines and would like to go Premium Economy.
Sure. There's a United Airlines flight at $106. It takes off at 7:15 am and has 0 layovers.
Which airport is it flying in to?
The flight will land at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That sounds like a good fit.
Do you need help with anything else then?
Yes, let's look at round trip flights now. I want to fly back on March 5th.
I've found 1 flight that'll work for you. It's a United Airlines flight listed at $115. It flies out at 7:15 am, and it will return at 4:15 am.
Where does this flight land at?
This one is still arriving in Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Are the tickets for this flight refundable?
Sadly they are non-refundable.
Well, let's go with this flight anyway. This is going to be a short trip. Can you purchase tickets for me?
Yes, let's confirm the details first though. You're flight from Portland to Seattle on United Airlines. You want 1 ticket with Premium Economy seating. The first flight is the day after tomorrow at 7:15 am, and the flight back is next Tuesday at 4:15 am.
That sounds great. Which airport is my flight departing from?
It's taking off from PDX International Airport. Your ticket purchase has been confirmed.
Thank you for the help.
Do you need anything else at the moment?
No, I'm fine. Thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'm going away, can you find some one-way flights for me?
What is your itinerary?
I'll go from Phoenix, AZ, to Seattle, leaving the day after tomorrow.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:40 am for a cost of $224. It has 1 scheduled stop.
When does it arrive? Is the ticket refundable?
No, the ticket is not refundable. The flight arrives at 2:47 pm.
I like the sound of it.
Shall I buy tickets now?
No, not yet.
Anything else I can help you with?
Search for some round trip flights, please.
When are you coming back?
On March 5th.
I found 1 convenient option- an American Airlines flight departing at 8:40 am, returning at 8:15 am, for a price of $238.
Which airports are on the route?
It goes from Sky Harbor International Airport to Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
It sounds good.
Shall I buy the tickets now?
Yes, please do that.
So I'll buy 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Phoenix to Seattle, departing at 8:40 am the day after tomorrow, and returning at 8:15 am next Tuesday. Is that okay?
Yes, that's good.
The reservation was successful.
Thanks a lot.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all for now, thanks.
Have a wonderful day!
I need to find an affordable one-way flight for my birthday coming up.
I can certainly help you with that. I just need some information first. I need to know where you are departing from, where you are going, and when you plan to leave.
I would like to leave from Washington on the 10th of this month and will be arriving at CDMX.
The first flight that comes up is an outbound flight by American Airlines that departs at 10:15 am. It appears to have 1 stop along the way and costs a total of $243.
Is there anything else? I really don't mind travelling economy and there will be a total of 4 people in my group.
Delta Airlines has a flight that will be leaving at 10 am but it too has 1 stop and the cost of the ticket is $355.
I think I would prefer that flight over the first one you mentioned.
Would you like me to proceed with reserving those tickets for you and your group?
No, I don't want to purchase tickets just yet. What can you find with round trip flights?
Well that depends, on what day would you be returning?
I would be flying back no later than the 13th of this month.
I see that Delta Airlines has an outbound flight that leaves at 10 am and has a return flight at 3 pm which costs $303.
Okay, can you tell me what time that flight would arrive at my destination and the time the return flight would arrive home?
You would reach your destination at 0:50 am and arrive home at 8:05 pm, provided there are no unexpected delays.
That sounds great!
Would you like me to reserve these tickets for you?
No thank you. I can do that myself a little later.
Is there anything else I can find for you today?
No, you've helped with the only item on my agenda today. Thank you.
Have a good day.
I need a one-way flight on March 9th.
Where are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing Phoenix, AZ and going to SD.
I found a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops that departs at 10:45 pm. It costs $74.
What airport does it land at?
It lands at SAN International Airport.
That works for me.
Do you want me to buy you tickets now?
No, not right now.
Do you need something more?
Can you find me round trip flights?
What is your return date?
I am returning on the 11th of March.
Search revealed 1 flight for you. Delta Airlines departs at 10:45 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:05 pm. The cost is $86.
What time does the first flight land?
The first flight lands at 0:05 am.
When does my second flight land at what airport?
The second flight lands at 6:25 pm at SAN International Airport.
That works for me. Can you get me tickets for my short trip?
You want 1 seat in Economy class on Delta Airlines from Phoenix to San Diego. The first flight leaves at 10:45 pm on March 9th and the second flight leaves at 5:05 pm on March 11th. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct.
Your flight is booked.
Thanks a lot. That is all.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one way flight?
Where are you going and when will you be leaving?
I'll be going to Phoenix and I want to leave on March 6th.
And where will you be leaving from?
I'm going to leave from NY.
There are 3 flights that match. There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 7:30 am with 1 stop. It costs $316.
What else is there?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 am with 1 stop. It costs $292.
Is there anything else?
There's a United Airlines flight that leaves at 8:20 am with 1 stop. It costs $298.
And what time does it arrive? Also, is the ticket refundable?
It arrives at 1:17 pm, and I'm sorry but the ticket is no refundable.
Okay, that's still good. Now, can you search for round trip flights?
When will you be returning?
I'll be returning on March 8th.
There's 1 flight that can. It's United Airlines and the outbound flight leaves at 8:20 am with the return flight leaving at 7:15 am. it costs $311.
When does the outward flight arrive? And is the ticket refundable?
The onward flight arrives at 1:17 pm, and the ticket is not refundable, sorry.
Well, that still work for me.
Do you need help with anything else?
For my short trip, can you help me buy the tickets?
Okay, please make sure this is all correct, the flight is leaving from New York next Wednesday at 8:20 am to Phoenix. It returns next Friday leaving at 7:15 am. It will be on United Airlines. And it is 1 seat in Economy.
Yes, that's correct. And what time does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 6:40 pm. I've booked the ticket.
Thanks for the help, that's it for now.
Okay, have a great day.
Can you find me a one way flight please?
When will you leave and what is your destintation?
I am leaving from Portland and going to Ciudad de Mexico.
When will you depart?
I want to leave March 3rd.
I found 5 flight.s The first is on Alaska Airlines and leaves at 10:10 am. This flight stops 1 time and costs $270.
Which airport does it arrive to?
Benito Juarez International Airport.
Which airport does it depart from?
PDX International Airport is the departure site.
What else is available.
I have an American Airlines outbound flight at 7:20 am with 1 stop that costs $268.
What else do you have. I need four seats.
Delta Airlines has an outbound flight that has 1 stop and leaves at 8:45 am. It costs $276.
That sounds great.
Can I do anything else for you?
Will you search round trip flights please.
When will you return?
I want to return next Tuesday.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines at 8:45 am and returning at 1:45 pm for $293.
When do both flights arrive?
The return flight arrives at 9:33 pm and outbound flight arrives at 6:53 pm.
That sounds good. Can you purchase the tickets please.
I have a flight from Portland to Mexico City on Delta Airlines the day after tomorrow and returning next Tuesday. The departure flight arrives at 8:45 am and the return flight arrives at 1:45 pm. The seating class is Economy and it is for 4 people.
That's perfect thank you.
Your tickets are reserved.
Thank you for everything.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, that will be all.
Have a great day.
Can you find me some one-way flights?
Yes, I can help you with that. I need your departure and arrival cities, as well as the dates.
I am going from Seattle, WA to SF on the 10th.
I found you a flight on Alaska Airlines. It has 0 stops and departs at 12 pm. The ticket price is $106.
I prefer United Airlines. Do you have any other flights?
I found you 1 flight on United Airlines that leaves at 8:30 pm. There are 0 stops and the ticket costs $97.
That flight sounds good to me. Are there any round trip flights available?
When is your departure date?
I want to get back on the 12th, preferably.
There's a flight on United Airlines that leaves outbound 8:30 pm and returns at 1:10 pm. The price is $117.
That sounds good. My trip is short. Can you buy tickets for me?
I am booking 1 Economy class ticket on United Airlines leaving Seattle on March 10th at 8:30 pm. Returning from San Francisco at 1:10 pm on March 12th. Is that correct?
Yes. Is the ticket refundable?
I have confirmed your ticket which, unfortunately, is non-refundable.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a great day!
Can you find a one-way ticket for me
When are you leaving
I will leave on the 7th
Where are you leaving from
I am traveling from New York
Where are you visiting
I am visiting Paris
American Airlines depart at 7:35 am for $235. this is 0 stop flight
Where does it depart from and what time does it arrive
This will depart from JFK International Airport arrive at 10:22 pm
That sounds good
Do you want to purchase a ticket
No not yet
Anything else i can help you with
I want a round trip
When are you traveling back
I want to return on 9th of this month
American Airlines depart at 7:35 am and return at 4:05 am for $264
That sounds good. Can you buy ticket for 4 people for me
Please confirm your booking for 4 tickets flying on American Airlines Economy from New York to Paris departing next Thursday at 7:35 am and arrive on March 9th at 4:05 am
Yes please, are the tickets refundable?
your booking is confirmed. tickets are not refundable
Thank you
anything else i can do for you
no thats it
have a nice day
I need a flight for two people.
What dates will you traveling? What airport would you like to fly out of? What city will you be flying too?
I will be flying out of Vegas on the 5th of March going to New Delhi.
I have 4 options for you. American Airlines departing at 10:55 am with 1 stop for $341.
That flight sounds good. Can you find a flight back?
When would you like to return?
March 7th
American Airlines departing flight leaves at 10:55 am and the return flight leaves at 7 pm. The total is $379 for the ticket
That sounds great.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
Yes please do.
American Airlines flight with Economy seating departing from Las Vegas next Tuesday at 10:55 am flying to Delhi and returning next Thursday at 7 pm for 2 passengers. Is that correct.
Yes that sounds good. What time do I arrive in Delhi?
Your ticket is confirmed. Your arrival time into Delhi is 8:39 pm
Which airport does the flight arrive and is the tick refundable?
Indira Gandhi International Airport and the tick is non refundable.
Thanks that will be all.
Have a great day.
I'm going to Atlanta, can you help me find some one-way flights?
When are you going?
On Monday next week.
Where from?
From NY.
How about travelling with American Airlines at 11:45 am, for a cost of $135. There will be 0 stops.
What else is available?
How about a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 7:20 am, with 0 stops, for a cost of $137.
Which airport does it depart from?
From JFK International Airport.
That sounds good.
Shall I buy tickets for it now?
No, not yet.
Anything else you want help with?
I want to search for round trip flights.
When are you returning?
On March 6th.
How about a Delta Airlines flight departing at 7:20 am, returning at 3:40 pm, for a cost of $138.
I like the sound of that, please buy flight tickets.
So I'll book 1 Economy ticket for the Delta Airlines flight from New York to Atlanta, leaving next Monday at 7:20 am, and returning next Wednesday at 3:40 pm. Is that okay?
Yes it is. Where will the flight depart from, and how long will it take?
The reservation was successful. You'll be flying out of JFK International Airport, and landing at 9:42 am.
Thanks, that's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day!
I need one ticket for a one-way flight to SF.
Sure, what day and where will you leave from?
Next Friday and from CDMX.
There are 3 flights that I've found. How about an American Airlines flight that has 0 stops and leaves at 2:55 pm for $162?
What airport will the plain arrive from?
The SFO International Airport.
Where does it depart and what's the flight arrival time?
It departs from Benito Juarez International Airport and arrives at 4:38 pm.
Perfect.
Shall I book tickets?
No, please search for a round trip flight.
What date will be you coming back?
March 10th.
There 1 flight from American Airlines that leaves at 2:55 pm and returns at 1:20 pm for $166
Perfect, thanks.
Shall I purchase the tickets?
Yes please.
Please confirm your flight: 1 economy seat for an American Airlines flight leaving from Mexico City at 2:55 pm and arriving at San Francisco next Friday. The flight returns March 10th at 1:20 pm.
Awesome, which airport?
Confirmation to SFO International Airport is complete.
Thanks for everything.
Would you like anything else?
Nope! Thanks.
Have a great day.
I may have to fly out for a family emergency. Can you help me find refundable tickets for one-way flights?
Where are you flying to?
I'm going to Washington.
What date would you like?
I'm leaving on Wednesday next week.
What city will you be flying out of?
I'm leaving from Seattle and would like to go in Economy seating.
There is an American Airlines flight for $321 that leaves at 4:55 am and has 1 stop.
Are there any other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight for $179 that leaves at 6:25 pm and has 0 stops.
Which airports will I be flying in and out of?
Departure is from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, arriving at Dulles International Airport.
Are there any other flights?
There is a United Airlines flight for $203 that leaves at 9:05 pm and has 0 stops.
That one sounds good.
Would you like to book the flight?
No, not right now.
Can I help you with anything else?
How about round trip flights for 1 person?
What return date did you want?
I want to get back on the 10th of this month.
I found 1 United Airlines flight for $265 that leaves at 9:05 pm and returns at 5:15 pm.
Which airports would I be going in and out of?
Departure is from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and arrival is at Dulles International Airport.
Sounds good to me.
Did you want to book the flight?
Yes, let's book this flight.
Please confirm: United Airlines flight for 1 passenger in Economy seating, leaving from Seattle next Wednesday at 9:05 pm, and returning from Washington on March 10th at 5:15 pm.
That's good. What arrival times am I looking at for both flights?
Your ticket has been purchased. Washington arrival time is 5:53 am, and Seattle arrival time is 9:52 pm.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you tell me one way flights with United Airlines?
What is your departure city?
I depart form ATL.
When do you leave?
I want to leave on the 10th from Delta Airlines to London, England.
I have 1 Delta Airlines departure for 5:30 pm with 0 stops for $222.
What is arrival Airport and what is departure airport?
Destination is Heathrow International Airport and departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
I like that flight.
Do you want reservations?
No I do not want them.
Is there anything else you need?
Search for round trip now.
When do you arrive back?
I want to arrive back March 12th.
I have a Delta Airlines departure at 5:30 pm and returns at 8 am for $267.
When does return arrive back and what is departing airport?
The return is 8:21 pm and departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
I like that flight.
Do you want me to buy tickets?
Yes any class is fine.
Please confirm a March 10th 5:30 pm departure from Atlanta to London on Delta Airlines with a March 12th return leaving at 8 am with a economy seats for 1.
Yes I confirm. What is arrival airport and is it refundable?
Your ticket is confirmed with destination to Heathrow International Airport and ticket is not refundable.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can do?
That is all for today.
Have a great day and thanks.
Would you look for one way flights for me?
When do you want to go and where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from London, UK on the 9th of this month.
Where do you want to go?
I will go to NYC.
I recommend this American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:05 pm and has 1 stop. It costs $324.
Which irport does it leave from and to which airport does it go?
It leaves Heathrow International Airport and goes to JFK International Airport.
Do you have any other flights?
I recommend this British Airways flight that leaves at 9:15 am and has 0 stops. It costs $211.
Do you have anything else at all?
What about this Delta Airlines Flight that leaves at 3:35 pm and has 0 stops? That costs $239.
That flight sounds gret. Would you look for round trip flights in economy now?
When will you come back?
I want to get back on March 11th.
How about this Delta Airlines flight? The outbound flight leaves at 3:35 pm and return flight leaves at 6:20 pm. This costs $251.
When will the outbound flight arrive and could I get a refund if needed?
No, this ticket cannot be refunded. The outbound flight arrives at 7:57 pm.
That flight sounds gret.
Could I buy tickets for it?
Yes, and I would like to book for three people.
Please confirm that you are leaving from London to New York on Delta Airlines. The flight departs on March 9th at 3:35 pm and returns on March 11th at 6:20 pm. You are flying Economy. Is this right?
No, actually make it 4 people.
Please confirm that you have 4 people in your group and that the return flight leaves at 6:20 pm.
Yes, that is cool.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for helping. That is all I need for now.
Have a good one.
I need 2 seats on a plane.
Where are you going? And from where are you leaving?
I'm heading to Atlanta from LA.
When do you want to leave?
I'll be cutting out on the 4th.
I see 5 flights you might like. For $179 you got an 8:15 pm Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops.
Look for something else in Economy.
How about a 5:25 pm American Airlines flight with 0 stops for $169?
What's the arrival airport?
Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
What about the departure?
That's from LAX International Airport.
I think I'm down with that.
Excellent. You want me to grab you some tickets.
No, not yet. Look for a round tripper returning on March 6th.
I see 1. A 5:25 pm American Airlines that takes off for the return at 9:15 pm. It'll run you $234.
What time does it return? And which airport so I need to go to?
Go to LAX International Airport. You'll be back at 1:47 am.
Sounds like a plan. Book it.
Ok. Please confirm. 2 Economy seats next Monday on a 5:25 pm American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Atlanta. Returning next Wednesday on a 9:15 pm flight.
Confirmed. Can I get a refund if need be?
No refunds. But you have a ticket.
Ok. Good job.
You got anything else for me.
No. Thats it for now.
Take it easy.
I need to find one-way flights leaving Chicago.
No problem! Where are you planning to visit?
I'm traveling to Seattle.
When do you want to leave?
I need to leave the 9th of this month.
I've found 4 flights for you. I recommend the American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:50 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $307. Does that interest you at all?
Which airport does the flight depart from? Is the ticket refundable?
The flight leaves from the O'Hare International Airport. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
What about one of the other flights?
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3:35 pm. It has 0 stops and costs $187. Does that interest you at all?
That sounds perfect.
Would you like me to purchase tickets for you?
No, I'm good.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can we search for roundtrip flight? I want to travel in economy.
When would you like to return?
I plan to return on the 11th of March.
I found 1 flight that should work for you. It's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3:35 pm. The return flight leaves at 11:50 pm. The whole trip costs $180. Does that interest you at all?
That sounds good, actually. Can you purchase tickets for me? There are 4 of us flying.
Sure! Can you confirm the following details, please? You're purchasing 4 tickets for a Delta Airlines flight leaving Chicago on March 9th at 3:35 pm. The return flight leaves Seattle on March 11th at 11:50 pm. All seats are in economy.
Yes, that's all great.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Great, thanks!
You're welcome! Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a wonderful day!
I would like to find a one way flight for my upcoming trip.
What is the destination of your trip?
I would like to travel Premium Economy to Delhi.
And what is your departure location?
I am departing from ATL
And what is your date of departure?
My departure date is the 7th.
There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 9:35 am, making 1 stop. The cost of the ticket is $635
Can you tell me if the ticket is refundable?
Yes, the ticket is refundable.
That works perfectly. Can you search flights with a return date of 13th of March.
There is 1 American Airlines flight that departs at 9:35 am, with a return flight leaving at 3 pm. The cost of the ticket is $710.
That flight sounds great. My trip will be a short one. Can you please go ahead and buy the plane tickets?
To confirm, the Premium Economy flight on American Airlines for 1 passenger, leaving from Atlanta and going to Delhi leaves next Thursday, and the departure time is 9:35 am. The return flight on March 13th leaves at 3 pm.
Excellent. That sounds great.
Your ticket has been successfully confirmed.
Great, thank you. that was everything I needed
Have a great day.
I need a one-way flight.
When are you leaving, and where are you going?
I am traveling to San Francisco on Monday next week.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving Los Angeles.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 5:50 pm which costs $96.
Which airport and what time does it arrive?
The flight arrives at SFO International Airport at 7:15 pm.
That is perfect.
Do you need anything else?
Can you find a round trip flight?
When are you returning?
I want to come home on Wednesday next week.
I found 1 Alaska Airlines flight costing $102. The outbound flight leaves at 5:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 8:20 pm.
That sounds good. Can you purchase one ticket in Economy?
Please confirm you need 1 ticket on Alaska Airlines flying from Los Angeles to San Francisco in Economy. The departure is next Monday at 5:50 pm and the return is next Wednesday at 8:20 pm.
Yes, that is perfect. Can I get a refund? When does the flight arrive?
The ticket is non-refundable and arrives at 7:15 pm.
Thank you, that will be all.
See you soon!
Can you please find one-way flights for me?
Where and when would you like to visit? And what city are you leaving from?
I'm flying out of Philadelphia and going to ATL on March 9th.
I found 4 possible flights. One is on American Airlines, and it leaves at 10:10 am and has 1 stop. The ticket price is $205.
Will the ticket be refundable if I need to change?
No, the ticket cannot be refunded unfortunately.
Okay, well that flight works for me.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No thanks, can you find round trip flights for me? I want to travel in Economy class.
When do you plan on returning?
I want to get home on the 11th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am. The return flight departs at 3:25 pm and the ticket costs $206.
That sounds good, I just want a short trip. Can you help me get tickets?
Please confirm: 1 ticket from Philadelphia to Atlanta on American Airlines, leaving March 9th at 10:10 am and returning March 11th at 3:25 pm. The ticket is for Economy class.
No, I need four tickets for my group.
Okay, please confirm: 4 tickets to leave on March 9th.
Yep, that's good. What airport does the flight arrive into? And is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket has been confirmed. It will fly into Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, and unfortunately you can't refund the ticket.
Thanks so much for helping.
Can I assist with anything else?
Nope, thank you so much.
Have a great day.
Can you list one way flights?
What is your departure city and when?
Departure is San Fran and on 10th of this month.
Where is your visit?
I want to visit Vegas.
I found 4. Alaska Airlines leaves at 8:15 pm and has 0 stops for $109.
Can it be refunded?
Yes it is refundable.
I would prefer Delta Airlines for three people.
I have 1 Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:50 am with 0 stop for $103.
What is the departure airport?
The departure airport is SFO International Airport.
I like that flight.
Would you like reservations?
No I do not want reservations yet.
Is there anything else you need?
I would like info on round trips flights.
When would you like to come back?
I want to come back on March 12th.
I found 1 Delta Airlines that leaves at 10:50 am and returns at 10:50 pm for $110.
What is the arrival time of return?
Arrival time is 0:25 am.
I like that flight.
Do you want reservations?
No that is all today.
Thank you and have a great day.
Can you assist me with finding one-way flights
Where will you be departing from.
I will be leaving from Philadelphia.
Where would you like to go and when would you like to leave
My destination is Chi-town and I would like to leave on March 10th.
I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 10:10 am. The ticket price is $120.
What time does the flight arrive at the destination and is the ticket refundable.
The ticket is not refundable. The flight arrives at 11:21 am.
It sounds good. Can you find a round trip flight that comes back on March 12th.
I found 1 flight on American Airlines for $127. The outbound flight departs at 10:10 am and the return flight leaves at 6:40 pm.
What airport does the flight arrive at and when does the onward flight arrive?
The flight arrives at O'Hare International Airport. The arrival time for the onward flight is 11:21 am.
That sounds like a good flight
Should I purchase the tickets
Yest please book an Economy class ticket for one.
Can you please confirm the flight details: The American Airlines flight departing from Philadelphia to Chicago on March 10th at 10:10 am. The return date is March 12th at 6:40 pm. The reservation is for 1 Economy class seat.
Actually there are four people in my party.
Please confirm the following information. The number of passengers departing on March 10th is 4.
That is correct. Can you tell me when the return flight arrives and at which airport?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The return flight departs from PHL International Airport and arrives at 9:51 pm.
Thanks for your assistance.
Can I assist you with anything else.
No thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day
WOuld you find me one way flights?
When do you want to leave and where are you going? What city are you departing from?
I will depart from San Francisco and need to go to Las Vegas. This should be Wednesday next week.
How about an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 8:15 pm and has 0 stops? It costs $103.
Do you have anything else? I like economy class.
I have 4 flights that could work. What do you think of this American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:30 pm and has 0 stops? It costs $101.
Do you have anything else suitable? I have 3 people in my group.
This Delta Airlines flight is good and it leaves at 9:05 pm with 0 stops. It costs $102.
Could I get a refund on the ticket? When does the outbound flight arrive?
Sorry but you cannot get a refund. The outbound flight arrives at 10:40 pm.
That sounds good to me.
So you want to buy tickets?
No, not at the moment.
Could I assist with anything else?
Would you look for round trip flights?
When will you come back?
I will get back on March 8th.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 9:05 pm and the return departs at 10:50 pm. It costs $107. What do you think?
When will my return arrive? Which airport does the flight leave from?
The flight leaves from SFO International Airport and returns at 0:25 am.
That sounds good.
Do you want me to buy the tickets?
Yes, please buy the tickets.
Would you confirm these details? The flight leaves from San Francisco to Las Vegas on Delta Airlines. It departs next Wednesday at 9:05 pm and returns next Friday at 10:50 pm. Your group contains 3 people and you want economy tickets. Does this all sound correct?
That sounds right.
I have confirmed your tickets.
Would I be able to get a refund? When does the outbound flight arrive?
Unfortunately the ticket cannot be refunded. The outbound flight arrives at 10:40 pm.
Thank you for helping.
Should I help with anything else?
No, but thank you for your help.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight.
Where are you planning to go?
I wanna go to Sydney, NSW.
When are you planning on leaving?
On the 8th of March.
Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Sydney, NSW, and I'm going to San Diego.
I found 2 flights. One is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight is at 5:50 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket would cost you $257.
What other available flights are there? I want to travel in Economy.
I found 1 flight. It is a United Airlines flight. The outbound flight is at 10:05 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket would cost you $248.
I like that flight the most. Can you look for round trip flights for me?
What time will you be you coming back?
I wanna come back March 10th.
I found 1 round trip flight. It is a United Airlines flight. The outbound flight is at 10:05 pm and the return flight is at 7:20 am. The ticket would cost you $295.
When would you return flight be there? Would I be able to get a refund on the ticket?
The airlines does not allow tickets to be refundable. The return flight will be there at 1:06 pm.
Sounds like a perfect flight to me.
Would you like me to buy tickets for you/
Yes. Please book the tickets for me.
You want 1 ticket for a United Airlines Economy class flight from Sydney to San Diego next Friday. You'll be returning March 10th and the onward flight is at 10:05 pm. The return flight will go at 7:20 am. Is this all correct?
No. I'm going to need 3 tickets.
The return flight will go at 7:20 am. It will have 3 passengers. Is this correct?
Yes, that's correct.
Your tickets have been booked.
Thank you. That is all.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for a one-way flights, can you help?
Yes, where are you visiting and when would you like to leave?
I'm going to CDMX on the 12th of March.
Where are you leaving from?
Vegas.
There are 3 flights. How about a 9:30 am American Airlines flight that makes 1 stop at $221.
Sure.
Would you like me to purchase tickets?
No, but can you search for round trip flights?
What day will you be coming back?
On the 14th of this month.
How about an 9:30 am American Airlines flight that returns at 8:05 am for $241
Perfect, I'm planning a short trip. Can you buy flight tickets?
Please confirm your flight details: 1 economy American Airlines ticket from Las Vegas going to Mexico City on March 12th and returning March 14th at 9:30 am and returning at 8:05 am.
Wonderful, thanks.
Confirmation complete.
Thanks, that's it.
Have a great day.
Could you search one-way flights for me?
What place will you depart from, and what location do you anticipate traveling to?
I am departing from Chicago and will visit SFO.
What time do you intend to depart?
I am departing on the 10th of March.
There is a ticket costing $173 for an outbound American Airlines flight departing at 7:05 am with 0 stops.
Can I get my money back for the ticket? What airport does the flight go to?
The target is SFO International Airport. Sadly, the you cannot get money back for the ticket.
The flight is perfect for me.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the flight?
Nope, I do not wish to purchase a ticket.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Could you look up round trip flights for me, preferably in Economy?
What time will your return at?
There's 2 people in my cohort, and I'd like to return on 12th of March.
I discovered 1 convenient flight for your trip. There is a ticket costing $181 for an outbound American Airlines flight that departs at 7:05 am. The returning flight departs at 3:20 pm.
What time does my return flight come at?
The return arrive will come at 10:07 pm.
Can I get my money back for the ticket? What airport does the flight come to?
The target is SFO International Airport. Sadly, there you cannot get your money back for the ticket.
That flight is perfect for me. I intend to go on a short trip; could you assist me in purchasing flight tickets?
Please verify the following information: 2 passengers in Economy seats for an American Airlines flight departing from Chicago to San Francisco. The flight will depart on 7:05 am of March 10th and will return on 3:20 pm of March 12th.
Yup, that's perfect.
Your ticket is verified.
Thank you for your assistance. That's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Can you find me a one way flight from Washington?
When are you departing, and what is your destination?
I'm leaving on the 7th of this month for Paris, France.
I've found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:50 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $355.
Sounds good. Can you find a round trip flight?
When would you like to return?
I'd like to return on the 9th of this month. Please help me find an Economy ticket.
I've found 1 flight for you, an American Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 2:50 pm, and the return flight is at 4:05 am. The ticket costs $366.
When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight should arrive at 12:05 pm.
When does the departing flight arrive? Will I be able to refund the ticket?
The departing flight should arrive at 11:36 am. Unfortunately, no, the ticket is not refundable.
Sounds good to me, I just want a short trip. Please help me reserve tickets.
So you'd like 1 Economy class ticket for a roundtrip flight from Washington to Paris? You will be flying with American Airlines. The departing flight is at 2:50 pm next Thursday, the returning flight is at 4:05 am on March 9th.
Sounds good. Which airport will the flight arrive at?
Your ticket has been reserved. The flight will arrive at Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Which airport will the flight depart from?
The flight will depart from Dulles International Airport.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
Hi. Can you help me book a flight traveling in premium economy?
Absolutely! Where will you be departing from?
Seattle, WA.
Great. Where are you traveling to and when do you plan to leave?
I want to leave Friday next week. I'm flying to Vancouver, BC.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 3:45 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $428. Does that interest you at all?
Are there any other flights? I have three people in my group.
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 8:45 am. It has 1 stop and costs $415. Does that interest you at all?
That sounds great.
Would you like me to purchase tickets for you?
No, not right now.
All right. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can we search for roundtrip flights?
Absolutely! When are you returning?
I want to return on the 10th of this month.
Okay. I found 1 flight. It's with Delta Airlines and leaves at 8:45 am. It returns at 3:20 am. The cost is $457. Does that interest you at all?
Which airport does the flight depart from? And which airport does the flight arrive at?
The flight leaves YVR International Airport and arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That sounds perfect. Can you purchase tickets for me?
Sure thing! Can you confirm the following details, please? Your flight leaves Seattle at 8:45 am and arrives at Vancouver at 3:20 am. It's with Delta Airlines. The flight leaves next Friday and returns on March 10th. The number of seats is 3 in premium economy.
That's all correct. When does my return flight arrive, and when does the onward flight arrive?
Your tickets are confirmed. The return flight arrives at 2:47 pm. The onward flight arrives at 7:49 pm.
Thanks so much for all your help! That's all.
You're welcome! Have a wonderful day!
I am looking for a one-way flight.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving Toronto, Ontario.
Where are you going?
I am going to SFO.
When are you leaving?
I am going on the 4th.
There is an Air Canada flight with 1 stop that leaves at 4:40 pm and the cost is $283.
What other flights are available? There are 4 of us going to New York.
I found 2 flights including an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 12:50 pm and the ticket costs $112.
What other flights are available?
There is a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 10:30 pm and the ticket costs $95.
That is perfect.
Do you want to purchase the ticket?
Not at this time.
Do you need anything else?
I am looking for a round trip flight.
When are you returning?
I want to come back next Wednesday.
There is a Delta Airlines flight costing $100. The outbound flight leaves at 10:30 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:05 am.
What airports are the flight leaving from and going to?
The flight leaves Toronto Pearson International Airport and arrives at JFK International Airport.
That is perfect. Please purchase tickets in economy.
Please confirm you want 4 tickets to fly from Toronto to New York on Delta Airlines in economy. The departure is next Monday at 10:30 pm and the return flight is next Wednesday at 5:05 am.
I actually want premium economy.
Please confirm you want to travel from Toronto in premium economy.
That is perfect.
The ticked has been purchased.
Thank you very much.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I need to fly out for a family emergency, can you find me one-way flights?
When did you want to leave?
I'm leaving the day after tomorrow, and I'd like to go in Economy seating.
What cities are you leaving and going to?
I'm going from Chi-town to New York.
There is an American Airlines flight for $128 with 0 stops, which leaves at 12:30 pm.
What airport does it land in?
JFK International Airport.
Sounds good to me. How about round trip flights? I want to get back on the 5th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight for $137 that leaves at 12:30 pm and returns at 5:25 am.
Sounds good to me, since it's just a short trip. Can you get me four tickets?
Please confirm: American Airlines flight from Chicago to New York for 4 passengers, Economy seating. Departure is day after tomorrow at 12:30 pm, returning next Tuesday at 5:25 am.
Sounds good. When does the return flight arrive?
Your tickets have been purchased. Return flight arrives at 6:44 am.
What about the New York arrival time? Is the ticket refundable?
JFK arrival time is 3:49 pm. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
Thanks for your help, that's all I needed.
Have a great day.
Can you help with plane reservations?
What day will you depart?
The 7th of this month.
From where will you fly and where will you go?
I'm headed to Portland. I and one other person. two. depart from CDMX.
I have 3 choices for you. How about American Airlines? It leaves at 2:35 am. with only 1 stop. The ticket there is $255.
Good. How about returning?
When will you come home?
March 9th.
I have American Airlines 2:35 am departure, returning 7:20 am. It costs $267.
Do you know what airports are involved?
PDX International Airport. You'll depart from Benito Juarez International Airport.
great, Get me Economy tickets please.
Sure- It's for Departing Mexico City Next Thursday on American Airlines going to Portland at 2:35 am. You'll return March 9th at 7:20 am. Your 2 tickets are in Economy.
Perfect, thanks.
I got you.
That's perfect thanks.
Have a fun flight.
Would you search for one way flights?
Where are you going?
I'm going to SFO.
When will you leave and from where?
I want to leave on the 4th of March from Seattle, WA.
How about this Alaska Airlines flight? It leaves at 12 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $119.
When will the onward flight arrive and is it refundable?
Sorry but the ticket is not refundable. It arrives at 2:11 pm.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like these tickets?
No, do ont buy me tickets. Would you search for round trip flights?
When will you come back?
I want to return on the 6th of March.
So I have 1 good flight for you. It's an Alaska Airlines flight and it leaves at 12 pm. The return flight leaves at 2:55 pm. It costs $127.
When will the outbound flight arrive and to which airport?
It goes to SFO International Airport and arrives at 2:11 pm.
That sounds like a winner
Should I get tickets for it?
Yes, and please make them economy tickets.
Please confirm that you are 1 person traveling in Economy. You are leaving from Seattle and going to San Francisco on Alaska Airlines next Monday at 12 pm and will return next Wednesday at 2:55 pm.
Yes, that sounds great. When will my return flight arrive and which airport does the flight depart from?
Your ticket has been confirmed. The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and the return flight arrives at 5:06 pm.
Thank you for helping
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all.
Enjoy your day.
Could you find me any one-way flights?
Where are you planning to visit, and when will you leave and return?
There are 3 people travelling, we're leaving from ATL on the 10th of this month and heading to Seattle, WA.
There is an american airlines flight, the outbound flight leaves at 9:35 pm and has 0 stops. The price is $197.
Where does it depart from? And when does the onward flight arrive?
It departs from the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, and the onward flight leaves at 0:07 am.
Sounds good to me. Could you search for a round trip flight? I'd like to return on the 12th.
Okay, there's an american airlines flight, outbound leaving at 9:35 pm, return flight leaving at 9:45 pm. The price is $210.
Which airport does the flight land in?
The destination is the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That flight works for me.
Would you like me to do anything else?
I plan to go on a short trip, could you help me buy tickets?
Please confirm the following details: You're leaving from Atlanta to Seattle, flying with American Airlines. The departure date is March 10th, and the return is March 12th. The outbound flight leaves at 9:35 pm, and the return flight leaves at 9:45 pm. There are 3 passengers, and you're flying economy.
Yes, correct. When does the return flight land?
The tickets are confirmed. Your return flight lands 6:17 am.
Thank you, i'm all set.
Have a great day.
Could you search for one-way flights for me? I am departing from SF.
What place do you anticipate traveling to?
I am heading to Los Angeles.
What time do you intend to depart?
I am departing on March 3rd.
There is a ticket costing $96 for an outbound Alaska Airlines flight that departs at 7:10 pm with 0 stops.
Do you have alternative flights? I have four people in my cohort.
I discovered 3 suitable flights. There is a ticket costing $88 for an outbound American Airlines flight that departs at 3:50 pm with 0 stops.
What time does the onward flight come at, and which airport does it leave from?
The flight leaves from SFO International Airport and will come at 5:15 pm.
That flight sounds perfect.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the flight?
No, I do not wish to purchase a ticket.
Could I assist you with something else?
Could you look up round trip flights for me? I prefer to travel in Economy and would like to return on March 5th.
There is a ticket costing $96 for an outbound American Airlines flight departing at 3:50 pm. The return flight departs at 6:30 am.
Can I get my money back for the ticket? What time does the onward flight come at?
Sadly, you cannot get your money back for the ticket. The onward flight will come at 5:15 pm.
That flight sounds perfect for me. I intend to go on a brief trip; could you help me purchase plane tickets?
Please verify the following information: 4 passengers with Economy seats for an American Airlines flight departing from San Francisco to Los Angeles. The plane leaves at 3:50 pm on day after tomorrow, and will return at 6:30 am next Tuesday.
Yeah, that's perfect.
Your tickets are verified.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
Nope. Thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I need help finding a one-way flight. I prefer economy flights on United Airlines.
I can help you with that. Where will you be leaving from, and on what date?
I am leaving from Chi-town on March 4th.
What's your destination?
I am going to Seattle, WA.
United Airlines has 1 flight leaving at 3:50 pm with 0 stops for $158.
Is that ticket refundable?
No, unfortunately it is not.
What airport does that leave from?
The flight leaves from O'Hare International Airport.
That one sounds good for me.
Do you want to buy tickets now?
No, thanks, not now.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
Could you check round-trip flights for me instead? I want to return on the 6th of March.
United Airlines has an outbound flight leaving at 3:50 pm, with return flight leaving at 5:55 pm, for $173.
Which airport would I leave from, and where does it arrive?
The flight departs from O'Hare International Airport and arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That one sounds good to me.
Do you want to purchase tickets now?
Yes, I would like to book tickets now. There are 4 people in my group.
Please confirm: You are booking a flight for 4 passengers in economy class on United Airlines. Your flight leaves Chicago for Seattle next Monday at 3:50 pm, and returns next Wednesday at 5:55 pm.
Yes, that's good.
Your tickets are now confirmed.
Thanks for your help. That's all.
Have a great trip.
Could you find me one-way flights?
Sure, where do you want to visit?
I'd like to head to Delhi on the 11th of March.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Philly, and honestly, I'd prefer a flight on United Airlines.
There's 1 united airlines flight. It leaves at 4:45 am, with 1 stop, and the price of the ticket is $304.
Sounds good to me. Could you book me an Economy ticket for a round trip?
When are you returning?
I want to return on the 13th of March.
I found 1 flight that seems pretty conveninent. There's a united airlines flight, the outbound leaves at 4:45 am, and the return flight leaves at 12:35 pm. The price of the ticket is $314.
Where does it arrive?
The destination is the Indira Gandhi International Airport.
Is the ticket refundable? And when does the return flight arrive?
Sadly, it's not refundable. The return flight arrives at 4:36 pm.
That sounds good to me, I'd like to go for a short trip. could you buy flight tickets for two?
Please confirm the following details: You'd like to leave from Philadelphia to Delhi, on United Airlines. The departure date is on March 11th, and the return date is March 13th. The outbound flight leaves at 4:45 am, and the return flight leaves at 12:35 pm. And you'd like 2 economy tickets.
That sounds good to me.
Your ticket has been purchased.
Thanks for your help!`
Would you like any aid?
No thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you find me any one-way flights with American Airlines please?
Where are you going to and where are you departing from?
I want to travel economy and I need 2 tickets. I will be leaving from Chi-town going to CDMX.
When is this for?
I want to leave today.
I have 1 flight for you. American Airlines. The flight leaves at 12:30 pm. It has 1 stop and the price is $262.
Which airport does it arrive at and what time?
The destination is Benito Juarez International Airport. The flight departs at 7:31 pm.
That all sounds okay to me. Can you find a return?
When will you be coming back?
I want to get back the day after tomorrow.
There is 1 flight. American Airlines, leaving at 12:30 pm, coming back at 8:05 am, and the price is $308.
When does the return arrive?
At 7:32 pm.
That sounds great. Can you buy the tickets for me?
Let's confirm the details first. American Airlines flight from Chicago at 12:30 pm to Mexico City today. Returning the day after tomorrow at 8:05 am. 2 Economy seats.
Perfect. Is the ticket refundable? Which airport does it arrive at?
Ticket confirmed. The plane arrives at Benito Juarez International Airport. The ticket isn't refundable I'm afraid.
Thanks for your help that's all I need.
Have a lovely day.
Hello, Michael here! I and my colleagues are flying to attend a business meeting by this week. Can you help me to find me one way flight in some good airlines, please?
Sure. I can help you on that. Please provide me the details of where is your plan of visit?
I would be flying to San Fran.
From where and when is your departure would be?
I would be flying on 3rd of this month from Seattle.
Please wait....I will look for a suitable flight for you... Here you go!!! I can find 5 one way flights to San Fran. The cheapest would be Alaska Airlines flight that costs just $129 for the travel. It has 0 stops and the outbound flight leaves at 12 pm. Would you like to go with this flight?
Please do you have any other one way flights available cheaper than this one?
Yup! American Airlines flight costs $116 for the one-way trip. It has 0 stops and the outbound flight leaves at 10:25 pm.
This flight sounds great. Please can you look for round trip also? I would be travelling in Economy class?
When is your return? How many are planning to travel?
4 of us would be travelling and we will return on 5th of March.
Okay! Please give me a moment... I can find there is an American Airlines flight that cost $134 for the round trip. The outbound flight would leave at 10:25 pm and return flight will take off at 2:15 pm. Can I book for you in this flight?
Yup! Sounds good.
How many tickets should I buy for you?
Nope, sorry. not now. Thanks for the information.
Alright! Have a wonderful day.
Can you get me a ticket to San Francisco, for a flight?
Easy enough, when will you leave and where are you leaving from?
I will depart Phoenix, AZ. I want to leave this sunday.
I have an american Airlines flight with 0 stops. It leaves at 6:15 am. It has a funny price. $123.
Is it a refundable ticket?
Sorry it is not.
What airport does the flight take off from?
The sky Harbor International airport.
That sounds perfect. Search flights please.
When do you want to return?
5th of March. I need economy tickets.
I have 1 possibility. It is an American Airlines ticket leaving at 6:15 am. It will return at 8:10 am. Your cost will be $167.
Perfect, get me a ticket.
Ok, just to be clear you're leaving Phoenix day after tomorrow on American Airlines at 6:15 am. You're going to San Francisco on Economy class. You'll return next Tuesday, leaving at 8:10 am. You will get 1 ticket.
That's the ticket for me. When does my return flight arrive?
I have your ticket. the onward flight gets to San Francisco at 8:22 am. and you'll get back here at 12:49 pm.
Perfect, you're the best.
Have a safe flight.
Can you list one way flights for 1?
What is departure time and city?
Departure is Atlanta, GA and I leavve 7th of March.
Where is the destination?
Desitination is Portland, OR.
I found 4. I have American Airlines departing 3:30 pm with 1 stop for $285.
Is there anything else?
There is Delta Airlines departing at 5:50 am with 1 stop for $288.
What is departure airport and when is arrival?
Departure is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and arrives 10:55 am.
That is good how about round trip?
When is arrival date?
Arrival back on the 10th.
There is a a 5:50 am Delta Airlines returning 9:35 am for $286.
Is is refundable and when does it arrive?
The arrival is 8:47 pm and non refundable.
That sounds good for a short trip, I want it.
Confirm, Delta Airlines from Atlanta leaving 5:50 am going to Portland and departing next Thursday. Return date is March 10th leaving at 9:35 am on an Economy ticket for 1.
That is good, when does departure fight arrive?
You are confirmed and it arrives 10:55 am.
What is the arrival aiport?
The arrival airport is PDX International Airport.
Thank you for everything.
Is there anything else I can help?
No that is all today.
Have a great day.
Can you search one-way flight for me?
Where do you plan to go and when do you plan to leave and from where you leaving?
I am planning to leave from Phoenix to SFO on 11th of March
I have short listed 4 perfect flights for you.One among them is American Airlines flight which leaves at 6:15 am with 0 stops and ticket cost is $123
This is perfect for me
Do you need any other help from me?
Can you look in for round top flights for me?
When are you planning to return back?
I need to go back on 13th of march
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 6:15 am and the return flight is at 8:10 am with ticket price at $168
This is perfect for me
Do you need me to buy tickets for the flight?
Yes i want you to book the ticket
Please give confirmation details: The flight American Airlines is from Phoenix going to San Francisco on March 11th and the return date is on March 13th.The onward flight leaving at 6:15 am and the return flight at 8:10 am.The number of passengers is 1 with Economy seating class
This is perfect
Your ticket is booked
Thank you for the help
Can i help you more?
No, thanking you very much
Have a nice day
Could you search one-way flights for me?
What time do you intend to depart at?
I am departing on the 11th of this month.
What location will you depart from, and where do you intend to travel to?
I will depart from Mexico City, and will go to Seattle.
I discovered 3 appropriate flights for you. There is a ticket costing $269 for an outbound American Airlines flight departing at 8:05 am with 1 stop.
What airport does the flight leave from, and can I get my money back for the ticket?
the flight leaves from the Benito Juarez International Airport. Sadly, you cannot get your money back for the ticket.
Do you have other flight alternatives?
There is a ticket costing $235 for an outbound Delta Airlines flight that departs at 1:45 pm with 1 stop.
Do you have other flight alternatives? I prefer to travel in Economy.
I discovered 1 appropriate flight for you. There is a ticket costing $263 for an outbound United Airlines flight that departs at 8:45 pm with 0 stops.
That flight is perfect for me. Could you look up round trip flights for me? There's one person in my cohort.
What time will you return at?
I'd like to return on the 13th of this month.
I discovered 1 convenient flight for your trip. There is a ticket costing $294 for an outbound United Airlines that departs on 8:45 pm has a return flight departing on 12:30 pm.
What airport will the flight leave from?
The flight will leave from the Benito Juarez International Airport.
That flight is perfect for me.
Do you want me to purchase the tickets for it?
Yeah, I'd like to reserve the ticket.
Please verify the following details: an economy seat for 1 passenger for a United Airlines flight from Mexico City to Seattle. The flight will depart on 8:45 pm at March 11th, and will start the return flight at 12:30 pm at March 13th.
That is perfect for me. What time does my return flight come? Can I get my money back for the ticket?
Your ticket is verified. The return flight will come at 2:05 am. Sadly, you cannot get your money back for the ticket.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
Nah; thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Can you find me one-way flights?
When do you plan to leave? Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from Los Angeles on the 11th.
Where are you planning to visit?
I am travelling to Portland
Sure. I found 5 flights. Alaska Airlines, outbound flight leaves at 7:25 am has 0 stops and the ticket price is $133
Which airport does the flight depart from ?
The flight departs from LAX International Airport
Which airport does the flight arrive?
The destination is PDX International Airport
Good. Can you search round trip flights with refundable tickets? My plans might change.
When are you coming back?
I want to be back on the 13th.
There is Alaska Airlines, outbound flight leaves at 7:25 am. The return flight leaves at 1:55 pm. The price of ticket is $181.
Which airport does the flight arrive? Which airport does the flight depart from?
The destination is PDX International Airport and the departure from LAX International Airport.
Sound Good. Can you help me to buy tickets for 2 people?
Please confirm. Book 2 tickets in onward Alaska Airlines Economy flight from Los Angeles departs from Portland on March 11th at 7:25 am. the return date is March 13th leave at 1:55 pm
Yes that works form me
Your ticket is confirmed
Thanks for the help. That's all i need
Have a wonderful day.
Get me a one way flight stat.
Sure, when would you like to go?
March 8th is my go date.
Where are ya going? Where will you leave from?
Leaving Portland and going to the wonderful Ciudad de Mexico.
I have a choice for you. It's Alaska Airlines 10:10 am flight with 1 stop. It will cost $274.
What other option is there for me?
Well, there's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:20 am. with 1 top. It's just $266.
What other choice will I have? there are four of us.
How about Delta Airlines. It's outbound takes off at 8:45 am, it has 1 stop. It will cost $258.
Where does that fly from?
PDX International Airport.
Can I get my money back if I change my mind?
No, you can not.
I'll risk it. Get me those tickets.
Can I get the ticket now?
No dice. You must now search round trip tickets. I like travelling economy more than any other possible choice.
When would you prefer to return?
I have to be back in my office on the 10th.
Ok, I have 1 for you. Delta Airlines has a departing time of 8:45 am. The flight back home leaves at 1:45 pm. You'll pay $280 for that though.
OK, I think you've sold me.
Can I get those for you now?
Yes, you talked me into it.
Here's what I have for your 4 tickets: Fly from Portland next Friday at 8:45 am. on Delta Airlines on Economy class. You'll get on the 1:45 pm departing plane on March 10th from Mexico City.
Winner winner, chicken Dinner. Great. Thanks. which Airport am I touching down in? When does my plane get home at the end?
I got you. The destination is Benito Juarez International Airport. You'll touch down about 9:33 pm.
You're a peach. Thanks.
Have a safe and fun trip.
Can you please find me one-way flights for 4 people?
Where are you departing from and when do you want to leave? Where is your destination?
I am leaving from Philadelphia and traveling to LA, leaving on the 10th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight with 1 stop that leaves at 10:10 am. The price per ticket is $298.
Are there any other available flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 2:20 pm and has 1 stop for $285.
That flight sounds good. Can you search round trip flights for me?
When are you coming back?
I will return on the 12th of this month.
I found 1 flight for you. There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 2:20 pm and the return flight leaves at 1:40 pm. The price is $318 per ticket.
That sounds good.
Should I purchase them?
Yes, please book the ticket.
Please confirm the following details: A flight is booked from Philadelphia to Los Angeles on Delta Airlines, leaving March 10th and returning March 12th. The first flight leaves at 2:20 pm and the return flight leaves at 1:40 pm. The seats are for 4 passengers and the seating is in economy.
Yes, that is correct.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Which airport does the flight depart from, and when does the return flight arrive?
The flight departs from PHL International Airport and the return flight arrives at 0:16 am.
Thank you, that is all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to a one way flight to Sydney, Australia.
What airport would you like to fly out of and on what date?
Las Vegas on the 3rd of this month.
American Airlines has a flight that departs at 9:30 am with 1 layover for $275,
What other options do you have. Economy class is what I am looking for.
I have 2 other flights. Delta Airlines has a flight that departs at 12:20 pm and has 1 layover for $273.
What is the other flight?
United Airlines has a flight that departs at 12:05 pm and has 1 layover for $279.
That sounds great. I need four tickets.
When would you like to come back?
I need to be back on March 6th.
This is 1 option and it is a United Airlines flight that departs at 12:05 pm and the turning flight departs a 10:05 pm for $291.
That is awesome can you help we buy the tickets.
4 passengers flying United Airlines with economy seating from Las Vegas going to Sydney leaving the day after tomorrow at 12:05 pm and returning next Wednesday at 10:05 pm. Is that correct?
Yes that is good. IS the ticket refundable and what airport does the flight leave from?
Your tickets are comfirmed. The tickect is nonrefundable. The flight departs from McCarran International Airport.
Thanks that will be all.
Have an awesome day!
I'm looking for one way flights.
Where are you leaving from and when do you leave?
I am leaving from Atlanta, GA on the 9th of this month.
Where are you going?
I am going to Paris, France.
I found 4 flights that match your request. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:25 pm with 1 stop. The ticket is $323.
Are there any other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight with 1 stop that leaves at 3:40 pm. The ticket is $337.
When does the onward flight arrive and what airport does it depart from?
The flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and the onward flight arrives at 1:37 pm.
Yes, that sounds good. Can you find round trip flights?
When did you want to come back?
I'm returning on the 11th.
I found 1 flight that matches your request. There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:35 pm. The ticket is $352.
That sounds good. It is a short trip. Can you buy tickets? There is 1 in my group.
Please confirm: Delta Airlines flight for 1 person in economy seating from Atlanta to Paris. The flight leaves March 9th and returns March 11th. The onward flight leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:35 pm.
Yes, sounds great.
Your ticket has been reserved.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I need a plane ticket. One-way.
What city or airport are you departing from?
Departing from SD.
Where are you travelling and when wdo you wish to go?
I'm looking for an Economy class ticket to Phoenix, AZ on Thursday next week.
I found 5 flights you might like. Alaska Airlines has a flight with 0 connections at 5:45 am. The economy class fare is $98.
Hmm. That's pretty early. What else?
American Airlines has a flight with 0 connections at 3:15 pm. The economy class fare is $92.
Ok. That sounds better. How about round trip for two passengers.
When would you be returning?
Returning on the 10th of this month.
American Airlines has a flight with 0 connections at 3:15 pm, returning at 6:25 am on the 10th of this month. The economy class fare is $143.
Excellent. That's just what I need.
Should I book this for you?
Yes. I would like you to book this flight.
You want 2 Economy class seats on the American Airlines Flight from San Diego to Phoenix, departing next Thursday at 3:15 PM, and returning March 10th at 6:25 am. Is this correct?
Yes. That is correct.
Your reservation is confirmed
Great. Thanks for all the help. That's all for now.
Let me know if you require anything else.
I need a one-way flight.
When are you leaving?
I want to fly on Alaska Airlines on Thursday next week.
Where are you going?
I am going to San Francisco.
Where are you leaving from?
I am flying out of San Diego.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 11:10 am and costs $107.
Which airport does the flight leave from, and when does it arrive?
It leaves from San International Airport and arrives at 12:50 pm.
That is a good flight. Can you find me a round trip flight in Economy class?
When are you returning?
There are four of us flying on March 9th.
I found 1 Alaska Airlines flight for $141, leaving at 11:10 am and the return flight leaves at 7:10 pm.
That is perfect.
Do you want to buy the tickets?
Not at this time.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I need you to find me one-way flights.
Where and when are you leaving and where are you going?
I am traveling from Los Angeles to Portland, OR on the 1st of march.
Search revealed 5 results. One is Alaska Airlines that leaves at 5:15 am with 0 stops. The costs is $133.
What airport is the flight leaving from?
It flies out of LAX International Airport.
Is this trip refundable?
No, it is not refundable.
What other flights do you have?
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:15 pm with 0 stops. It costs $133.
What other flights are there for one person?
I found a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 9:50 pm with 0 stops. It costs $155.
That works for me. What round trips flights can you find?
What date are you returning?
I am returning on the 3rd.
Search revealed 1 flight. It is Delta Airlines and the first flight leaves at 9:50 pm. The send flight departs at 3:20 pm and the total price is $183.
Which airport does it fly into and when does the second flight land?
It first flight flies into PDX International Airport and the second flight lands at 8:24 pm.
That works for me. Can you get me a refundable ticket in Economy class for my short trip?
You want 1 ticket in Economy class on Delta Airlines from Los Angeles to Portland. The first flight departs today at 9:50 pm and the second flight departs at 3:20 pm the day after tomorrow. Is that right?
Yes, that works. What airport does the first flight depart from and when does that flight land?
Your booking is successful. The first flight flies out of LAX International Airport and lands at 0:20 am.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Could you search one-way flights for me? I am departing on the 14th of this month.
What location do you intend to travel to?
I am going to Atlanta, GA.
What location will your depart from?
I am departing from Chi-town.
I discovered 3 appropriate flights for you. There is a ticket costing $129 for an outbound American Airlines flight departing at 8:40 pm with 0 stops.
Do you have alternative flights? I prefer to travel in Premium Economy, and am departing this Saturday.
There is a ticket costing $191 for an outbound Delta Airlines flight departing at 8:30 am with 0 stops.
What time does the onward flight come?
The onward flight will come at 11:31 am.
That flight sounds perfect.
Can I assist you with something else?
Could you look up round trip flights for me?
What day will you return at?
I'd like to return at the 6th of March.
I discovered 1 convenient flight for your travel. There is a ticket costing $198 for an outbound Delta Airlines flight that departs at 8:30 am, with the return flight departing at 7:50 am.
That flight sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to purchase the tickets?
Yeah, I'd like to reserve the ticket.
Please verify the following information: A Premium Economy seat for 1 passenger for a Delta Airlines flight from Chicago to Atlanta, with the onward flight departing at 8:30 am tomorrow and the return flight departing at 7:50 am on next Wednesday.
Nope. There's 3 people in my cohort.
Please verify the following information: 3 passengers for a flight departing tomorrow.
Nope. There's four people in my cohort.
Please verify the following information: 4 passengers for a flight headed to Atlanta.
Yeah, that's the one.
Your tickets are verified.
Thank you for your assistance; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I feel like going on a trip. Can you find me a one-way flight ticket?
Sure, where do you want to go?
I'd like to go to Las Vegas.
Ok, and when do you want to leave?
I'd like to leave next Tuesday.
Ok, and where would you be flying out from?
I'd be flying out from Chi-town. Any airline is fine.
Ok, I found an American Airlines flight with 1 stop for $267 that leaves at 4:30 am that day.
Can you see what there is that leaves from SF?
I found 4 options for that. There's a flight with Alaska Airlines with 0 stops for $96 that leaves at 8:15 pm.
Which airport does that leave from?
It would be flying out of SFO International Airport.
What airport does it arrive at, and is it refundable?
It would be landing at McCarran International Airport, and it is refundable.
What else is there?
There's also a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops for $109 that leaves at 10:50 am.
That one sounds perfect.
Do you want me to buy you tickets?
No, not yet. Can you see what's available round trip that would return on March 7th?
There's a Delta Airlines flight for $116 that leaves at 10:50 am with a return flight at 10:50 pm.
What airport does it fly to?
It would land in McCarran International Airport.
Is the ticket refundable, and what time does the return flight land?
Unfortunately the ticket is not refundable. It would land at 0:25 am.
That one sounds fine.
Should I buy tickets?
Yes, go ahead and book tickets for that flight.
Ok, just to confirm, you'd like to buy 1 ticket in Economy on Delta Airlines from San Francisco to Las Vegas, leaving next Tuesday at 10:50 am and returning next Thursday at 10:50 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that sounds fine. When do I land on the way there and which airport would I be flying out from?
You'd be flying out of SFO International Airport and landing at 12:25 pm.
Great, thanks. That's all.
Sure, have a good day.
I'd like you to find me some one-way flights.
I can do that. When did you want to leave and where from?
I'd prefer to go Economy, and I'll be leaving from San Diego on Tuesday next week.
What are you headed then?
I'll be flying to Sydney, NSW.
Okay, I've found 4 flights for you. There's an Alaska Airlines flight at $245. It leaves at 6:45 am and has 1 layover.
Actually, let's switch to Premium Economy. Are there any flights fitting that criteria?
Yes, there's a Delta Airlines flight at $507. It leaves at 11:05 am and also has 1 layover.
Let's keep looking. I've got four people that will be flying.
How about a United Airlines flight at $522? This one leaves at 7:20 am and has 1 layover.
That will work for me.
Did you want to purchase tickets for it now?
No, I'll wait. Could you look at round trip flights for me now?
When did you want to make the return trip?
I'd be returning on Thursday next week.
Alright, I've found 1 flight that'll work well for you. It's a United Airlines flight at $503. The flight out leaves at 7:20 am, and the trip back takes off at 10:05 pm.
That'll work. This will be a short trip. Can you buy the tickets for me?
Before I buy them, let's review. The first flight is from San Diego to Sydney on United Airlines. It takes off at 7:20 am next Tuesday. The trip back is next Thursday at 10:05 pm. Both flights have 4 passengers at Premium Economy seating.
Right, that's perfect. When does the flight out arrive? Also, are these tickets refundable?
I've confirmed the ticket purchase. The flight arrives at 1:06 pm, but unfortunately tickets are non-refundable.
Okay, that's all I need for now. Thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find me a one-way flight? I prefer Premium Economy.
What destination did you have in mind? Did you want to leave from anywhere in particular, and if so when?
I'll be flying to Los Angeles via Atlanta, GA on Monday next week. Try to get Economy seating.
Sure. I've found 4 flights that will fit. There's an American Airlines flight at $184. It leaves at 9:35 am and has 0 layovers.
Are there any other flights that'll do?
Yes, there's a Delta Airlines option at $150. It leaves at 10:20 pm and also has 0 layovers.
Let's keep looking. What else is there?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight at $164. It takes off at 1:30 pm and has 0 layovers.
Which airport does it land in?
It'll arrive at LAX International Airport.
And which airport is is taking off from? Also, is the ticket refundable?
Sadly it is not refundable, but it departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That sounds like a good choice, but can you search for round trip flights now?
When do you intend to fly back?
I'll be coming back on the 6th of this month.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that'll work. It's priced at $239 and takes off at 1:30 pm. The trip back leaves at 1 pm.
That option will work for me.
Do you want me to buy tickets for it now?
Yea, go ahead and book the flight.
Before I do, let's confirm. You're flying from Atlanta to Los Angeles on Southwest Airlines. The flight there is on next Monday at 1:30 pm, and the flight back is next Wednesday at 1 pm. You'll be getting 1 ticket in Economy class.
There are actually four people in my group.
Okay, let's be sure then. The number of people flying is 4, and the return date will be next Wednesday?
I changed my mind. I just want a ticket for one person now.
Sure. So, you want 1 ticket for the flight which will head out of Atlanta at 1:30 pm?
Yes, that's what I need.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Okay, thanks for the assistance.
Do you need anything else?
No, I'm good for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find me a one-way flight for three people?
Where will you be leaving from? when will you leave? and Where are you planning to visit?
I am leaving from Vegas on March 5th and heading to San Francisco.
I found 4 suitable flights. How about an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:55 am, has 0 stops and costs $119 per ticket.
When does the onward flight arrive and which airport does it depart from?
The flight arrives at 12:30 pm and departs from McCarran International Airport.
Are there any other flights available?
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:50 pm, has 0 stops and costs $103 per ticket.
Are there any other flights?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 9:55 am, has 0 stops and costs $114 per ticket.
That sounds good. Can you search for round trip flights for me? I want to get back on the 9th and any class is fine.
I found 1 flight. There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 9:55 am, returns at 12:50 pm and costs $153 per ticket.
That sounds good. I plan to go on a short trip. can you help me buy tickets?
Please confirm 3 Economy class tickets for a Southwest Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco leaving next Tuesday at 9:55 am and returning on March 9th at 12:50 pm.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for the help. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Would you find me one way flights?
Where would you like to visit?
I want to go to Atlanta.
When will you leave?
I will leave on 12th of March.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from SFO.
I have 5 flights that should be good. What about this Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 4:30 am and has 1 stop? It costs $286.
Which airport does the flight leave from? When does the outbound flight arrive?
The flight goes to SFO International Airport at 2:56 pm.
Do you have any other flights available?
I have this American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 2:15 pm and has 1 stop. It costs $305.
Do you have anything else? My favorite airline is United Airlines.
I have a United Airlines flight that leaves at 10:15 am and has 0 stops. It costs $194.
That sounds gret. Could you search for round trip flights for me? I have one person in my group.
When will you return?
I like flying economy and want to get back on March 14th.
There is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 10:15 am and the return leaves at 3 pm. It costs $192.
Which airport does the flight arrive at?
It will go to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That flight sounds good. I want to go on a short trip. Could you help me buy flight tickets?
Please confirm that you want to leave from San Francisco on March 12th and are going to Atlanta on United Airlines at March 14th. The outbound flight leaves at 10:15 am and return leaves at 3 pm. You need 1 ticket and are traveling economy class. Does this sound right?
Yes, that sounds good.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for helping. That is all I needed.
Have a great day.
Can you please find me some one-way flights to LA?
When do you plan to leave?
I am leaving on March 12th.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Phoenix, AZ.
I found 4 flights for you. There us an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:35 am and has 0 layovers. The price per ticket is $96.
Are there any other available flights? I am leaving from Seattle, WA and I need 1 ticket.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 3:45 pm and has 0 stops. The price per ticket is $123.
Which airport does it depart from?
The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That sounds good.
Shall I book the tickets?
No thank you.
Shall I help you with anything else?
Can you search round trip flights, in economy?
When are you coming back?
I would like to return on the 14th of this month. I want the tickets to be refundable.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 3:45 pm and a return flight at 7:10 pm. The price per ticket is $137.
That flight sounds good.
Should I buy the tickets?
Yes please.
Please confirm the following: Booking 1 ticket in economy from Seattle to Los Angeles on Alaska Airlines on March 12th and returning March 14th. The flight leaves 3:45 pm and returns at 7:10 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What airport does it arrive at?
Your ticket is confirmed. The destination is LAX International Airport.
Thank you for your help, that is all.
Have a wonderful day.
I will be taking a flight so I need you to help me find a one-way flight. I will be flying from London, England, and my destination will be SFO.
Do you know the time of your departure?
I usually take the Premium Economy class. I will be flying on 12th of this month.
I see that an American Airlines flight has a flight leaving at 3:05 pm and the flight has 1 stop. The ticket will be costing you $534.
Can you see if there are other options available. I want to travel in Economy class. I will be flying from Portland.
I can see that a Delta Airlines flight departs at 8:45 am, and it has 0 stops. The ticket will be costing you $102.
Can you see if there are other flight which I can take? I will be flying with 3 other people.
I see that a Southwest Airlines flight will be leaving at 3:15 pm with 0 stops. The ticket will be costing you $114.
This flight suits me well. Would you be able to see for a round trip flight?
When will you be returning?
I will be returning from my trip on 14th of March.
I see that 1 flight suits to your request and it is a Southwest Airlines flight which leaves at 3:15 pm and will be returning at 11:30 pm. The total cost of the ticket will be $126.
Which is the arrival time of my return flight?
Your return flight will arrive at destination at 1:23 am.
Will I be able to refund the ticket? From which airport will the flight leave?
Your ticket can not be refunded. The flight leaves from PDX International Airport.
This flight seems good. I will be having a short trip so help me to buy flight tickets.
Can you please confirm that you want to have tickets for 3 people in the economy class for a Southwest Airlines flight from Portland to San Francisco with departure being March 12th at 3:15 pm and the return on March 14th at 11:30 pm.
That seems nice. When the departure flight arrives.
Your ticket has been bought your departure flight arrives at 5:08 pm.
I appreciate it. That would be all.
Have a good time!
Can you find me some one-way flights? Preferably Delta Airlines. I will be leaving on March 1st.
Where would you like to visit and where will you be leaving from?
I will be leaving from Seattle, WA and traveling to Mexico City.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that has an outbound flight at 8:45 am with 1 stop. The price of this ticket is $279.
When will the onward flight arrive and to which airport does the flight arrive?
The flight will arrive at Benito Juarez International Airport. The onward flight will arrive at 8:05 pm
Sounds good to me. Can you find some round trip flights for me as well?
When will you be coming back?
I have 2 people in my group. I want to be back on March 3rd.
There is 1 convenient flight for your trip. It is a Delta Airlines flight that has an outbound flight at 8:45 am and a return flight that leaves at 1:45 pm. The price of the ticket is $301.
This sounds good to me. It will be a short trip. Can you help with purchasing tickets?
Please doublecheck the details: The flight will be from Seattle to Mexico City on Delta Airlines. It will depart today and the return date will be the day after tomorrow. The onward flight leaves at 8:45 am and the return flight will leave at 1:45 pm. The seating is Economy and it will be for 2 people.
Yes, that sounds pretty good.
I have confirmed and purchased your ticket.
Thank you very much.
Can I help with anything else?
No, thank you very much.
Have a great day!
I want to purchase a one-way flight to Las Vegas.
From which airport will you be departing?
I am flying out of LAX on the 6th. I don't care which class you book me a seat in.
The search has returned 4 possible flights. I've found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:25 pm with 0 layovers. The cost of a ticket is $96.
At what time does the flight arrive?
The flight touches down at 9:35 pm.
Am I able to refund the ticket?
I am sorry, but you are not able to refund the ticket.
I would like to book that flight.
Can you please confirm that you would like to book the flight?
I've changed my mind. I would like to purchase a round trip flight, coming home on March 9th.
There is 1 flight that meets your criteria. It is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:25 pm and returns at 10:55 am. A ticket will cost $91.
I would like to book that trip.
Please verify the following is correct. 1 ticket from Los Angeles to Las Vegas on American Airlines. Leaving on next Wednesday and returning on March 9th. The flight departs at 8:25 pm and returns at 10:55 am. Your class is Economy.
Yes, that is correct. Remind me again, from where does the flight depart?
Verification processed. The flight leaves from LAX international Airport.
Thank you for your help.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find one-way flights to New York on the 10th of this month?
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Seattle. I want to travel United Airlines.
I found 1 flight that matches your request. There is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am with 1 stop for $324.
Yes, that sounds good.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
No, not right now.
Anything else I can do for you?
Can you find round trip flights?
When are you returning?
There are 3 people in the group. We are returning on March 12th.
I found 1 flight that matches your request. There is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am and the return flight leaves at 5:10 am. the ticket is $313.
When does the onward flight come in and what airport does the flight depart from?
The flight leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. The onward flight gets in at 11:20 pm.
Sounds good. It is a short trip. Can you help me buy tickets, please?
Please confirm: 3 economy seats via United Airlines from Seattle to New York. The flight departs March 10th and returns March 12th. The onward flight leaves at 10:10 am and the return flight leaves at 5:10 am.
Yes, sounds great.
Your ticket was booked.
Thanks so much.
Anything I can help you with?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you locate one-way flights for me?
Where are you wanting to go?
I am going to Seattle, WA.
What is your point of departure and when do you want to leave?
I want to leave from NYC on March 7th.
I have located 4 suitable flights for you, one of which is an American Airlines flight. This flight will depart at 3:40 pm and it has 1 stop. You can buy the ticket for $289.
What time does the flight get there?
The onward flight will get there at 8:45 pm.
Can the ticket be refunded? What is the airport the flight will arrive at?
The flight lands at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. Sorry, but the ticket is not refundable.
That flight sounds to me.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the flight?
No, I don't want to purchase a ticket.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you look up round trip flights for me? I would like to come back on the 9th of this month.
I have located 1 convenient flight for your trip. It is on American Airlines leaving at 3:40 pm and the return flight will depart at 4 pm. The ticket cost is $301.
What airport does the flight go to? Can the ticket be refunded?
The flight arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. Sorry, but the ticket cannot be refunded.
This flight sounds fine to me. I want to go on a short trip. Will you help me buy flight tickets for Economy class?
Can you confirm the following details for me? The flight leaves New York, goes to Seattle on American Airlines and leaves next Thursday. The flight comes back March 9th and the onward flight departs at 3:40 pm. The return flight departs at 4 pm. It's an economy class ticket and the number of passengers is 1.
Yes, that sounds fine with me.
The ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for all your help, that's all I was needing.
Have a great day.
I need help finding a one way flight out of LA.
When do you plan on leaving?
I'd like to leave on the 2nd of this month.
Where are you headed?
I'm going to be traveling to Chicago.
I've found 4 flights that could work for you. Theres an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 4:20 pm, the ticket price is $165.
Can you tell me about other flights, I'd like to travel economy class.
No problem, there are 3 matching flights. How about American Airlines departing at 8:30 am with 0 stops for $163 per ticket.
Which airport does that flight arrive at, and would it be possible to get the ticket refunded?
The flight will be arriving at O'Hare International Airport, and no the ticket is not refundable.
Okay, sounds good to me. Can you do a search for a round trip flight?
When would you be returning?
I'd like to get a flight back next monday.
There's an American Airlines flight available. The outbound flight will leave at 8:30 am, and the return flight leaves at 4:30 am. the ticket price is $188.
Which airport will that flight arrive at, and when will the return flight arrive?
The destination is O'Hare International Airport, and the return flight will arrive at 7:02 am.
That sounds great.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yeah I'd like to buy a ticket.
Okay booking an economy class ticket for 1 passenger on American Airlines departing from Los Angeles tomorrow at 8:30 am going to Chicago, with a return flight next monday departing at 4:30 am.
Yes that sounds correct to me
The ticket has been purchased
Which airport is the flight leaving from?
The flight is leaving from LAX international airport.
Can the ticket be refunded?
No.
Thank you for the help.
Do you need help with anything else?
Nope.
Youre welcome, have a nice day.
I'm looking to find one way flights.
Leaving from where and what time? And where are you going?
I'll be leaving from ATL and going to Chicago on the 10th of March.
I have a flight on American Airlines leaving at 9:15 PM with 0 stops for $122.
What is the arrival time of the onward flight?
That is 10:16 PM.
What is the arrival destination and is it refundable?
It flies into O'Hare International Airport and it is a refundable ticket.
What else is available? It's for one person and I'm going to Toronto.
I have 3 possibilities for you, one of them is a Delta airlines flight leaving at 3:40 PM with 1 stop for $229.
That sounds like it will work.
Do you want to book that now?
Not yet, thank you.
What else can I do for you?
Could you look for round trip flights please?
Returning when please?
Returning on the 12th.
I have 1 flight on Delta airlines leaving at 3:40 PM and coming back at 7:15 AM for $243.
Flying into which airport and departing from where?
It arrives at Toronto Pearson International Airport and leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
I like the sound of that one.
Do you want to book that flight now?
Not right now, thank you.
You're welcome, goodbye.
I'm looking for one way flights.
Leaving from where and heading to where?
Leaving from Chicago, going to Phoenix.
When is your departure date?
That's on March 10th.
I have an American Airlines flight leaving at 4:30 AM with 1 stop for $271.
What else is available?
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8:30 AM with 1 stop for $270.
I like the Delta flight.
Would you like to book tickets?
Not yet. Could you search round trips for me?
Returning when please?
I'd like to return on the 12th of March.
I have 1 possibility, a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8:30 AM and coming back at 11:55 AM for $288.
Where does it fly into?
It lands at Sky Harbor International Airport.
What is the arrival time of the return flight and the arrival time of the onward flight?
The return flight is at 10:07 PM and the onward flight is at 1:17 PM.
That one will work.
Would you like to reserve that?
Yes I would.
Confirming the following, flying from Chicago to Phoenix on Delta airlines on March 10th, coming back March 12th. Leaving at 8:30 AM and returning at 11:55 AM in economy for 1 passenger.
Sounds perfect, thanks.
Everything is confirmed.
Thank you for helping me today.
It was my pleasure.
can you search a one-way ticket for me
where are you going and when?
I want to go to NY on Tuesday next week
Where are you leaving from
I will leave from San Fran
I found 4 flights for you that is 0 stop with Alaska Airlines leave at 8:35 am for $174
What airport will this arrive at and where is this depart from?
This will depart from SFO International Airport and arrive at JFK International AIrport
Any other flights available? i want to travel on Economy with 4 in my group
American Airlines 0 stop leaves at 8:30 pm for $197
Any other flights available with particular airline?
I got 2 flights for you with Southwest Airlines leaves at 9:20 pm with 0 stop that cost $246
This is good for me
would you like to to book the ticket
No not yet, can you search a round trip for me with return date on 7th of this month
Southwest Airlines depart at 9:20 pm and return at 5:55 pm for $242
Which airport does this arrive and depart from?
This will arrive at JFK International Airport and depart from SFO International AIrport
this sounds good
should i book the ticket for you
No i am not ready yet
Anything else i can help you with
No thats it
have a nice day
Can you search for 2 flight tickets in a one-way flight?
Can you tell me the departure location, destination and the date of departure?
I will be going to Atlanta, GA from Chicago on 8th of this month.
I found an American Airlines flight which leaves at 8:40 pm with 0 stop and the ticket is priced at $124.
What is the destination of the flight?
The flight is to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Okay, That sounds nice to me.
Would you like me to buy tickets for the flight?
No. Don't buy the tickets. Can you find a round trip flight with any class?
When will be you returning date?
I will get back on March 10th.
I found an American Airlines flight whose timing for the onward journey is 8:40 pm and for return journey is 9:15 pm. The thicket is priced at $137.
Can you search for any other available flights?
Sorry, I could not find any flight. Do you want my help with anything else?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
I want to travel to ATL please help me to find one-way flights
You will be leaving from where?
I want to leave from Toronto, Canada
When you leave?
On the 7th I plan
I have for you 3 option.First is with Air Canada.Outbound leave at 4:40 pm with 1 stop.Cost is $217
You can find something else?
I found for you with American Airlines .The outbound flight leaves at 5:55 am with 1 stop.That cost $192
Sounds great .
You want to buy ticket?
No, I do not want.Search for round flight for three people
In what date you plan to come back?
In 9th of March I would like.
With American Airlines that leaves at 5:55 am and return leaves at 3:25 pm.Cost will be $211
Tell me please at what airport will arrive.
Will arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport
Sounds good
Can I help you with anything else?
I would like to go in a short trip and I need flight tickets at Economy class
From Toronto to Atlanta with American Airlines.Departure will be next Thursday and return March 9th,onward leaves at 5:55 am and return at 3:25 pm with class Economy is that correct?
Yes sounds perfect
Your booking is confirmed
Thank you for help
Can I help you with something else?
No is Ok.Thanks
Have a great day!
Can you find me one-way flights? There is one people in my group.
When do you plan to leave? And where do you want to go?
I am travelling to Atlanta, GA, on March 2nd.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Phoenix, AZ.
I found 4 flights which might suit you. There is an American Airlines flight, which leaves at 11:25 pm, and has 0 stops. The prize of the ticket is $153.
When does the flight arrive? Is the ticket refundable?
Unfortunately, it is not refundable. The flight arrives at 6:37 am.
Sounds good to me. Can you search round trip flights for me?
When are you coming back?
I wanna get back next Tuesday.
There is an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 11:25 pm, and the return flight leaves at 11:40 am. The price of the ticket is $243.
Which airport does it depart from?
It departs from Sky Harbor International Airport.
That one sounds good to me. Can you help me buy flight tickets? I plan to go on a short trip.
Please confirm the following details: the flight is from Phoenix, and goes to Atlanta. The airline is American Airlines. The departure date is tomorrow, and the return date is next Tuesday. The onward flight leaves at 11:25 pm, and the return flight leaves at 11:40 am. The seating class is economy, and the number of tickets is 1.
Sounds good to me.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks a lot for your help.
Shall I assist you any further?
Nope, thanks for your help.
Have a good one!
Can you find me a one-way flight?
For what date?
For March 10th.
Where do you want to leave from?
I'm going from Los Angeles.
And where are you going?
I'm going to Vancouver.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 8:40 pm. It has 0 stops and the cost is $156.
Are there any others?
American Airlines has one with 1 stop that leaves at 3:05 pm. It costs $202.
Are there any more?
Delta Airlines has one with 0 stops leaving at 10:55 am for $135.
Which airport does the onward flight leave from and when does it arrive?
It's at LAX International Airport and arrives at 1:59 pm.
That sounds good, but could you also check round trip flights?
When do you want to return?
I want to get back March 12th.
I found 1 flight for you. It's Delta Airlines flight leaving at 10:55 am and the return flight leaves at 3:20 am. The cost is $148.
What airport does the onward flight leave from and when does it arrive?
It leaves from LAX International Airport and arrives at 1:59 pm.
That sounds good. I'd like to get economy class tickets, can you find that for me?
To verify: You want 1 economy class ticket to fly from Los Angeles to Vancouver on Delta Airlines, March 10th at 10:55 am. Then return March 12th on a flight leaving at 3:20 am.
No I need tickets for four people.
Okay, that's 4 tickets to leave March 10th.
That's right. What time will my return flight arrive and to which airport?
At YVR International Airport you'll arrive at 6:24 am. Your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a great day.
I need to go out of town for a work conference. Can you find some one-way flights?
What dates and cities were you looking for?
I want to travel to CDMX on the 7th of this month. Can you check United Airlines?
Which city are you departing from?
I'm leaving from NY. Can you look for Economy seating?
I found 1 United Airlines flight for $152 that leaves at 5 pm and has 0 stops.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to book the flight?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
How about round trip flights?
What return date would you like?
I want to get back on March 9th.
I found 1 United Airlines flight for $163 that leaves New York at 5 pm, returning from CDMX at 8:25 am.
Sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Sure, can you help me get the ticket? It's just for one person.
Please confirm: United Airlines flight for 1 passenger from New York to Mexico City next Thursday, leaving at 5 pm, in Economy seating. Return is at 8:25 am on March 9th.
That's good. Which airport will I be taking off from? Is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket has been purchased. Departure is from JFK International Airport. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
I am looking for one-way flights, can you help me?
What is your point of departure and when will you be leaving?
I will leave from SD on the 12th of this month.
Where are you going to visit?
I am going to go to Los Angeles.
I have located 2 good flights for you. One is on Alaska Airlines leaving at 3:20 pm and there are 0 stops. It costs $64.
Are any additional flights available?
There is also a flight on American Airlines. It leaves at 9:50 am, has 0 stops and costs $64.
What times does the onward flight get there?
The onward flight will get there at 10:44 am.
This flight sounds fine with me.
Do you wish to purchase any tickets for it?
No I don't wish to buy any tickets.
Can I help you with anything else?
Would you do a search for round trip flights for me? I want to return on 14th of March.
I have located 1 convenient flight for you. This flight is on American Airlines leaving at 9:50 am, coming back at 7:20 am and it is priced at $70.
What time does the return flight get there and what airport does it fly out of?
The flight will arrive at 8:14 am and leaves from SAN International Airport.
That flight sounds fine to me.
Do you want me to buy tickets for it?
Yes, please book the ticket for me. I have four people included in my group.
Confirm these details for me: the flight leaves from San Diego and goes to Los Angeles on American Airlines. The flight leaves on March 12th and gets back on March 14th. The onward flight departs at 9:50 am and the return flight will leave at 7:20 am. The tickets are for 4 passengers in Economy class.
No. I actually only have three people in my group.
Okay, can you confirm these details for me? The flight will be on American Airlines and you have 3 passengers.
Yes, that's fine. Can the ticket be refunded? And what airport does the flight land at?
The ticket has been confirmed, heading to LAX International Airport. It is refundable.
Thanks very much. That's all I was needing.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a oneway flight for a trip I have coming up? I leave on Saturday this week.
From where will you be leaving?
I am leaving from San Fran and would prefer United Airlines.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Atlanta.
I have found 1 flight for you. It's a United Airlines flight that leaves at 10:15 am and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $191.
Is it refundable?
No, it is not refundable.
Where does it leave from?
The flight leaves from SFO International Airport.
That sounds great. Could you search other flights for me? I would like to get back on the 4th of this month. I like to travel in Economy.
I have found 1 flight for your trip. There is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 10:15 am and the return flight leaves at 9:40 am. The ticket costs $196.
That sounds great to me. I plan to go on a short trip. Could you help me buy the tickets? There are four people coming with me.
Please confirm the following: the flight is from San Francisco and is going to Atlanta. The preferred airline is United Airlines. It leaves tomorrow and returns next Monday. The onward flight leaves at 10:15 am and the return flight leaves at 9:40 am. It's in economy and the number of people is 4.
Yes, that sounds great. Where does the flight arrive at?
Your ticket has been purchased. The destination is at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Awesome, thanks for all your help. That'll be all.
Have a great day!
I'd like to find a one-way flight.
Where are you departing from, and what is your destination? When would you like to depart?
I'm leaving Portland, OR on the 9th of this month and traveling to New York.
Sure, I have 3 flights for you. One is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 7:55 am. The flight has 1 stop and costs $304.
Are there any other options? Any seating class is fine.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:20 am. The flight has 1 stop and costs $290.
Are there any other options? I need 2 tickets.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 4:55 pm. The flight has 1 stop and costs $320.
Are the tickets refundable?
No, they are unfortunately not refundable.
When does the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 5:25 am.
Sounds good. Can you help me find a round trip flight?
When would you like to return?
The 12th of March, please.
I have 1 flight for you, a Southwest Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 4:55 pm and the returning flight is at 5:55 pm. The ticket costs $335.
Which airport does the flight depart at, and where does the flight arrive?
The flight goes from PDX International Airport to JFK International Airport.
Sounds good, I just want a short trip. Please help me reserve tickets.
So you want 2 Economy class tickets for a round trip flight from Portland to New York? The flight is with Southwest Airlines. The departure is on March 9th at 4:55 pm, and the return is on March 12th at 5:55 pm.
Sounds good. Are these tickets refundable?
Your reservation is successful. Unfortunately, the tickets are not refundable.
Thank you, that's all.
Have a nice day.
I need a one-way flight.
Where are you going?
I am going to Chicago.
When are you leaving?
I want to fly on March 8th.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving LA.
I found 4 flights including an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 4:20 pm with a ticket price of $161.
What airport does it arrive at?
It is going to O'Hare International Airport.
Are there other flights?
There is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that costs $155 which will leave at 8:30 am.
That is a good flight. Can you find a round trip flight?
When are you returning?
I want to come back on March 10th.
There is 1 American Airlines flight costing $180. The departure leaves at 8:30 am and the return leaves at 4:30 am.
When does the flight arrive?
The outbound flight arrives at 3:02 pm.
When does the return flight arrive?
The return arrives at 7:02 am.
That is perfect. Can you buy the tickets please?
Please confirm you want 1 ticket to fly from Los Angeles to Chicago on American Airlines in economy. The departure is next Friday at 8:30 am and the return is March 10th at 4:30 am.
That is perfect. Which airport does the flight leave from?
The reservation is successful. The flight leaves LAX International Airport.
Thank you, that will be all.
See you soon!
Can you book me a one-way economy flight?
Sure, where are you leaving from?
London, England
What would you like to go?
Chicago.
What day would you like to leave on?
Next Monday, please.
There are 3 flights that I've found. How about an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:05 pm with 1 stop that costs $427?
Perfect, I'll take it.
Shall I buy tickets and book it?
No, but please search for a round trip flight.
When would you like to come back?
On the 6th of March and there are 2 people.
There's 1 American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:05 pm and returns at 12:30 pm for $413.
Great, can you please book the flight?
Sure, please confirm the flight details: 2 economy tickets for an American Airlines flight from London to Chicago next Monday at 3:05 pm and returning next Wednesday at 12:30 pm.
Correct, which airport and what time will my return flight arrive?
Confirmation is complete and you will leave from O'Hare International Airport at 6:37 am.
Awesome, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Nope, thanks.
Have a great day.
I need a one way flight from Chicago leaving on the 7th.
What is your destination?
Heading to SFO.
I have 4 flights for you, an American Airlines flight leaves at 7:05 AM with 0 stops for $153.
I think that one sounds good.
Would you like to make reservations?
No comment not yet. Could you look for round trip flights please?
Returning when please?
That would be on the 9th.
I have 1 flight for you on American Airlines leaving at 7:05 AM and returning at 4:25 PM for $212.
Where does it fly into?
It flies into SFO International Airport.
Is that a refundable ticket?
No, I'm sorry.
No problem, I'll take that one.
Would you like to book that now?
Yes, I would.
Please confirm the following, flying from Chicago to San Francisco on American Airlines next Thursday March 9th at 7:05 AM and returning at 4:25 PM in economy for 1 passenger.
That's all correct.
The reservation is complete.
Thank you for your help today.
Is there anything else you need?
Not right now.
Thank you for calling, have a nice day.
I want to search for some one-way flights.
Where to?
I'm going to London, UK.
When and from where will you be departing?
From Atlanta, GA, on this Saturday.
I've found 4 options- there is an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:40 pm, with 0 stops, for a cost of $228.
I like the sound of that.
Shall I buy tickets now?
No, not yet.
Anything else I can help you with?
Please search for round trip flights.
When are you coming back?
On the 4th of this month.
I found 1 convenient flight- an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm, with a return flight at 0:10 am, at a cost of $341.
Which airport does it fly to?
It flies to Heathrow International Airport.
That sounds good, can you help me buy tickets?
So I'll buy 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines round trip flight from Atlanta to London, departing tomorrow at 8:40 pm, and returning next Monday at 0:10 am. Is this okay?
Yes it is. But is the ticket refundable? Where does it depart from?
The reservation was successful, but it is not refundable. The flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks a lot for your help.
Do you want any further help with anything?
No, that's all thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me a one-way flight.
When are you leaving?
On the 3rd of March please.
Where are you going to and from?
I am going from Los Angeles to Ciudad de Mexico.
I have found 4 flights, the first is American Airlines, leaving at 2:45 pm with 0 stops. It will cost $151
That sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No but can you search for round trips please?
When are you travelling back?
It will be on Tuesday next week.
I have found 1 convenient flight, the first is American Airlines leaving at 2:45 pm and the return flight is at 2:35 am. It will cost $156
That sounds good, can you help me buy tickets for a short trip?
Please confirm: the flight is from Los Angeles to Mexico City on American Airlines the day after tomorrow and returning next Tuesday. The onward flight leaves at 2:45 pm and the return leaves at 2:35 am. It is an economy flight for 1.
Sounds good, when does the onward get in?
Confirmed tickets and the onward will arrive at 8:05 pm.
thanks for the help.
Do you need anything else?
No thank you
Have a great day!
Could you look up one-way flights for me? I am departing from Chi-town.
What location do you intend to go to, and when do you intend to depart?
I am going to SF, and will depart on March 10th.
I discovered 4 appropriate flights for you. There is a ticket costing $173 for an outbound American Airlines flight departing at 7:05 am with 0 stops.
What time will the onward flight come at? Can I get my money back for the ticket?
The onward flight will come at 9:52 am. Sadly, you cannot get your money back for the ticket.
Do you have other flight alternatives? I prefer to travel in Economy.
I discovered 3 appropriate flights for you. There is a ticket costing $170 for an outbound Delta Airlines flight departing at 2:45 pm with 0 stops.
Do you have other flight alternatives?
There is a ticket costing $184 for an outbound Southwest Airlines flight that departs at 4:35 am with 0 stops.
That flight is perfect for me.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the flight?
No, I do not wish to purchase a ticket. Could you look up round trip flights for me? I'd prefer to return on the 12th of this month.
I discovered 1 convenient flight for your travel. There is a ticket costing $234 for an outbound Southwest Airlines flight that departs on 4:35 am and has a return flight at 8:45 pm.
What airport will the flight leave from?
The flight will leave from O'Hare International Airport.
What time will the onward flight come at, and which airport will it come to?
The target is SFO International Airport, and the onward flight will come at 7:22 am.
That flight is perfect for me. I intend to go on a short travel; could you assist me in purchasing flight tickets?
Please verify the following information: an economy seat for 1 passenger for a Southwest Airlines flight from Chicago to san Francisco. The departure date is on 4:35 am of March 10th, and the returning date is on 8:45 pm on March 12th.
Nope. There's three people in my cohort.
Please verify the following information: 3 passengers for a flight headed to San Francisco.
Nope. There is one person in my cohort.
Please verify the following information: 1 passenger for a flight headed to San Francisco.
Yes, that's perfect for me.
Your ticket is verified.
Thank you for you assistance. that is all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Can you get me a one-way flight, please?
From which location will you be departing from?
I'm going from Philadelphia.
Where do you plan to visit?
I want to go to Paris, France.
When do you choose to leave your current location?
I want to leave on the 10th of this month.
I have found 4 flights which match your request. This one is an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight will depart at 9:45 AM and has 1 stop. The price of the ticket is $273.
That flight sounds great then!
Is there anything else that I may help with?
Can you find me one round trip flights?
When will you be returning?
I want to get back by the 13th.
I have found 1 flight for you. This one is an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight will depart at 9:45 AM. The return flight will depart at 4:05 AM. The price of the ticket is $268.
Okay, I want that flight then. I want to go on a short vacation. Can you get these tickets for me?
Please confirm the following information: the flight will depart from Philadelphia to Paris. The airlines is American Airlines and will depart on March 10th. The return flight is March 13th. The onward flight will depart at 9:45 AM. The return flight will depart at 4:05 AM. The seating class of this ticket is Economy and the number of people in your party is 1.
Yeah, get that please.
Your ticket reservation has been booked successfully.
Thank you! That's what I wanted.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
Can you search me one way flights?
from where will you be leaving and to where do you visit? When do you plan to leave?
Im leaving from Phoenix to Atlanta, GA on 9th of this month.
There is a American Airlines which leaves at 3:55 pm and has 0 stops costs $155
Is there any ticket refundable? Which airport does it arrive?
The destination is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. Sorry there is no refundable.
Thats great to me. Can you find round trip flights for me? I want Economy
When will you come back?
i want to back on the 11th.
I have 1 convenient flight which is an American Airlines flight, onbound flight leaves at 3:55 pm and return flight leaves at 11:40 am costs $242.
When will the onward flight arrives?
It arrives at 11:07 pm
When does the return flight arrives?
The return flight will be arriving at 4:22 pm
Thats great to me. I plan to go on a short trip. Can you help me to get the flight tickets?
Please confirm this : The flight name is American Airlines which is from Phoenix to Atlanta. The departure date is March 9th and return is on March 11th. The onward flight leaves at 3:55 pm and return flight leaves at 11:40 am which is Economy class for 1 passenger.
yes thats correct and perfect.From which airport does the flight depart? Is there any ticket refundable?
Your ticket is booked. Sorry there is no ticket refundable. The flight departs from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Thanks alot for the help. Thats all for now.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find some one way flights please
Where are you going? And where are you coming from and when do you plan to leave?
I'm leaving on the 3rd from Phoenix and going to Seattle, WA.
There's a 8:40 am flight with 1 stop that costs $224 from American Airlines
That sounds good, what about round trip flights?
When are you returning then?
I'll be back on the 5th of this month
I found 1 that'll work for you. An American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 am and has a 8:15 am return flight that totals $238
When does the departing flight arrive? And is that ticket refundable?
It's not refundable, I'm sorry about that. The departing flight arrives at 2:47 pm
That sounds good actually.
Should I get tickets?
Yes please book me tickets.
Confirming that you need 1 economy ticket from Phoenix to Seattle via American Airlines that departs the day after tomorrow at 8:40 am and returns next Tuesday at 8:15 am
Yes that's all correct
I have confirmed your tickets
Which airport does the return flight arrive at and what time?
It arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport at 1:38 pm
Great, that's all I need
OK have a good one
Can you find me one-way flights next Monday?
Where are you going from and where to?
I am going to Sydney, NSW, from Seattle, WA
I have found an American Airlines flightat 8:15 am with 1 stop. It costs $324.
When does the onward flight arrive?
The flight gets in at 1:32 pm
Are there any other flights, I have 4 people in my group.
I have found 3 flights, the first is Delta Airlines leaving at 8:45 am with 1 stop. It will cost $326
That sounds good, can you find me a round trip?
When are you returning?
I want to fly economy, and the 7th of this month.
I have found 1 flight on Delta Airlines that leaves around 8:45 am, the return leaves at 5:50 pm and it costs $344
Where does the flight leave from and is it refundable?
It goes from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport but is not refundable.
That's good for me.
Should I reserve tickets?
No thank you.
Do you need any other help?
No I'm good thanks
Have a great day.
Can you please find oneway flights for a short trip I have coming up soon? There's only one person in my group.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm visiting Portland to see a friend.
Where do you plan on departing from?
I'm leaving from San Diego.
When will you be leaving for your trip?
I'll be leaving on the 12th.
I found an Alaska Airlines outbound flight that leaves at 3:20 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket costs $186.
That sounds good. Could you look for other flights for me? I'd like to come back by the 14th of this month.
I found 1 convenient Alaska Airlines flight for you. The outbound flight departs at 3:20 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:40 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $169.
That flight is exactly what I'm looking for.
Do you want me to buy the tickets?
No thanks. That's everything I needed help with.
Have a nice day!
Can you find me a one way flight for a trip I have coming up? I'd like to get an Economy ticket with American Airlines.
Certainly. From where will you be leaving from, and when would you like to leave?
I'll be leaving from Paris, France on the 3rd of march. As well, there are two people in my group so I will need two tickets.
Where would you like the destination to be?
Make it LA please.
I've found 1 flight that matches your criteria. It is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:05 am. It has 1 stop and will cost $444.
That sounds alright, but I need a return flight as well.
I need to know when you would like to return.
I want to get back on the 5th of March.
I've found 1 flight that matches your criteria. It is an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 4:05 am and the return flight leaves at 9:40 am. The price of a ticket is $373.
That sounds great.
Please confirm the following: 2 Economy tickets on American Airlines flight from Paris to Los Angeles. The departure date is the day after tomorrow at 4:05 am, and the return date at is next Tuesday at 9:40 am.
Confirmed.
Your ticket has been successfully confirmed.
Awesome, thanks for your help.
No problem, can I help you with anything else?
No that will be all.
Okay, enjoy your day.
I have a trip and need to travel to LA on a oneway ticket/
Where and when will you be leaving?
Leaving Phoenix, AZ on the 10th.
There is a 1 stop American Airlines flight leaving at 6:25 am in the amount if $168.
That sounds good.
Would you like to purchase the ticket?
Not now. I want to travel in Economy and there are 3 people in the group.
When will you return?
The 13th of March.
OK, there is an American Airlines flight leaving at 6:25 am and returning at 7:50 am. The ticket price is $135.
When does the return flight arrive?
At 9:18 am.
Which airport will it arrive?
The location is LAX International Airport.
Are there any other flights?
No, sorry. Can I help with anything else.
No, thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
Can you find me one way flights for my upcoming trip?
When do you plan to go? Where will you be leaving from and at what location to you plan to visit?
I will be traveling to Seattle and leaving from SD. I will be heading out on 9th of March. I prefer Economy. In case my plans change, I would only like refundable tickets.
I have located 1 flight that is suitable for you. The outbound flight takes off at 5 pm, with 1 stop. It is a Delta Airlines flight. The ticket cost is $189.
What is the airport of the departing flight?
The departing flight is at SAN International Airport.
That sounds like a good flight. Can you find me some flights for a group party of three?
When will be your returning date?
I will return on 11th of March.
I located 1 flight that is convenient for your trip. It is with Delta Airlines and will leave on an outbound flight at 5 pm. The return flight will take off at 7:45 am. The ticket cost is $207.
What will be the airport of flight departure?
SAN International Airport is the location of flight departure.
That sounds like a great flight for me.
Would you like for me to purchase tickets for it?
No thanks, I'm good.
Do you need any more additional help?
Nope, thank you for your help.
Enjoy your day.
I'll be travelling with my wife to Vancouver. Could you find a one way ticket from Washington for us?
When will you leave exactly?
We want to leave today.
Out of the 3 flights I found the cheapest is from Delta Airlines, leaving at 10 am. It will cost you $281 but there is 1 stop before arrival.
That's great, would you be able to get flights for us to be back the day after tomorrow?
With the same company, you can take Delta Airlines. It will leave at 10 am and it returns at 2:50 am. It will cost you $297.
When will the departure flight arrive? And what about the return flight?
The departure flight will arrive at 7:49 pm. The return flight will arrive at 12:48 pm.
This flight is perfect for me.
Do you wish for me to purchase the tickets for this flight?
I wish to book this flight.I prefer traveling in Economy. We will be two people.
I need you to confirm these details for me : The flight is departing from Washington. It will go to Vancouver. The company is Delta Airlines. Is will depart today, and return the day after tomorrow. Onward trip leaves at 10 am. Return flight leaves at 2:50 am. You will travel in Economy class in seat number 2.
Great/ When will the return flight be arriving? What airport will it be departing from?
The ticket has been confirmed. The flight back will arrive at 12:48 pm. It will take-off from Dulles International Airport
Thank you for your help. That's all for now.
Have a nice day.
I have a trip coming up. I need to find one way flights for three people traveling as a group.
Where are you planning to travel to? Where will you be departing from?
We are traveling from Mexico City to Portland.
When do you plan to depart?
We are leaving on the 3rd of March.
I found 1 flight for you. American Airlines has an outbound flight with 1 stop leaving at 2:35 am. The ticket price is $264.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No, I don't want to buy the tickets right now. Can you search for a return flight? I would like to get back on March 5th.
I found 1 flight. American Airlines has an outbound flight at 2:35 am, and a return flight at 7:20 am, and the ticket is $283.
When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 6:53 pm.
That flight sounds good. I intend it to be a short trip. Can you help me buy flight tickets? I prefer Economy.
You would like to book 3 Economy seats on American Airlines from Mexico City to Portland, leaving the day after tomorrow at 2:35 am, and returning next Tuesday at 7:20 am, is that correct?
Yes, that's right. Which airport does the flight depart from.
Your tickets are booked. The flight departs from Benito Juarez International Airport.
Thanks for your help, that will be all.
Have a great day!
I am leaving for a trip out of Portland next Monday. Can you find me some oneway flights?
Where are you going?
I want to travel on Delta Airlines to SD and am looking for refundable tickets.
I found a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 3:20 pm and costs $107.
That works for me.
Do you want to buy now?
No, not right now.
Do you need help with something else?
I need you to search flights.
What day are you coming back?
I need a ticket for 1 on the 6th of March.
Search found 1 flight for you on Delta Airlines. It leaves at 3:20 pm, the return flight leaves at 5 pm and costs $165.
That works for a short trip. Can you buy tickets?
You want 1 ticket in Economy to fly out of Portland to San Diego on Delta Airlines next Monday at 3:20 pm, and return next Wednesday on a flight that leaves at 5 pm. Is that right?
Yes that is right.
Your booking is complete.
Thanks for everything. That is all.
Have a great day.
I have a trip coming up. Can you find me one-way flights?
Where are you visiting? Where will you be departing from and when do you plan to leave?
I am traveling to Washington from NY on the 3rd of March.
There is an American Airlines flight outbound at 10:55 am with 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $82.
Is the ticket refundable? Which airport will the flight arrive in?
The destination is Dulles International Airport. Unfortunately, the ticket is non-refundable.
That flight sounds good to me. Can you search for more flights? There is one person in my group. Either business or economy class is fine.
When will you be returning?
I want to return on the 5th.
I found 1 convenient flight. There is an American Airlines flight outbound at 10:55 am. The return flight leaves at 6:05 am. The ticket costs $88.
Which airport does the flight arrive to?
The destination is Dulles International Airport.
That flight sounds good. I am planning a short trip. Can you helpme find flight tickets?
Please confirm the following: The flight is from New York to Washington and departs the day after tomorrow at 10:55 am. The return flight is next Tuesday at 6:05 am. American Airlines is the airline, you are sitting economy class, and the total number of passengers is 1.
Yes that sounds good.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I'm going on a trip soon; can you find me a one-way flight?
Where are you going?
I'll be traveling to Atlanta, GA either via business or economy.
When and where will you be departing?
I prefer to travel with United Airlines. I'm leaving from Phoenix on March 1st.
I found 1 great flight for you. There is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm and it has 0 layovers. The ticket price is $177.
Which airport will it depart from, and which airport does it arrive at?
It will land at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. It will depart from Sky Harbor International Airport.
That sounds great. Can you search more flights?
When will you be returning.
I want to get back on the 3rd, and there will be 1 person with me.
I found 1 good flight for your trip. There is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm. The return flight will leave at 9:40 am. The ticket price is $251.
When will the return and outward flights arrive?
The return flight will arrive at 3:47 pm. The onward flight will arrive at 3:52 am.
That sounds great.
Should I buy you tickets?
No thank you, I'm good. That'll be all.
Have a great day!
I have an upcoming trip. Can you find a me a oneway flight? Preferably American Airlines.
Where are planning to visit and when are you leaving? Also, where are you departing from?
I am visiting NY and am leaving on March 9th. I am departing from Washington and four people are in my group.
I found 1 flight for you on American Airlines. This flight leaves at 6:05 am, has 0 stops and costs $100.
Is the flight refundable? Also, what airport is it at?
The flight is nonrefundable and departs from Dulles International Airport.
Nice. Can you search flights for me. I prefer Economy ones.
When are you returning?
I want fly back on 11th of this month.
I found 1 returning flight on American Airlines. It leaves at 10:55 am whereas your outbound flight leaves at 6:05 am. This ticket costs $92.
Works for me.
May I help you with something else?
This will be a short trip. Can you buy both flight tickets?
Please confirm the following details: March 9th, your departing flight leaves from Washington at 6:05 am and goes to New York. Your return flight is scheduled for March 11th at 10:55 am. Both flights are through American Airlines. Seating class is Economy and the number of passengers is 4.
That works. What time and place does my return flight arrive?
Your tickets are booked. Your return flight arrives at 12:05 pm at JFK International Airport.
Thank you! That's all I need.
Have a marvelous day!
I have an upcoming trip, and I'd like a one way flight with United Airlines. I am departing from SFO.
Where are you traveling, and when would you like to depart?
I'd like to fly to Toronto on March 1st.
I've found 1 flight for you. It is a United Airlines flight and departs at 9:15 am. The flight has 1 stop and the ticket costs $265.
Which airport does the flight arrive at?
The flight will arrive at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
Which airport does the flight depart from, and when will the flight arrive?
The flight will depart from SFO International Airport and arrive at 7:19 pm.
Sound good. Can you find another flight for me? I want to return on the 3rd.
I've found 1 flight for you. It is a United Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 9:15 am and the return flight is at 5:35 pm. The ticket costs $286.
Sounds good to me.
Should I book the tickets?
Yes, please. I'd like 2 tickets.
Please confirm the following: you would like 2 Economy class tickets from San Francisco to Toronto. The flight is with United Airlines. The departing flight is today at 9:15 am, and the returning flight is the day after tomorrow at 5:35 pm.
Yes, that sounds correct. Are the tickets refundable? What time does the return flight arrive?
Your tickets have been confirmed. The tickets are unfortunately not refundable. The return flight arrives at 9:12 pm.
Thank you, that will be all.
Have a great day.
I need a one way flight to Chi-town on the 1st of this month.
Where will you be departing?
I will be leaving from Washington.
There are 3 flights. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:50 pm with 0 stops and the ticket costs $119.
When does the flight arrive and is the ticket refundable?
The arrival time is 3:48 pm. No, the ticket in not refundable, sorry.
That sounds good but can you search for something else.
When will you be returning?
I would like the 3rd of the month.
OK, there is 1 flight on American Airlines leaving at 2:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:20 pm. The cost is $165.
Great, can you purchase the tickets?
Yes, please confirm the information: the American Airlines flight from Washington to Chicago departs today and returns the day after tomorrow leaving at 2:50 pm with the return flight leaving at 4:20 pm. The seats are in Economy and there is 1 passenger.
No, there are 3 people in my group.
OK, 3 passengers flying to Chicago.
Great, which airport is the arrival and what time does the return flight arrive?
The airport is O'Hare International Airport and the return flight arrives at 9:45 pm.
Thank you very much.
Have a nice day.
I need a oneway flight for a trip I have coming up.
When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Seattle on the 12th.
Where are you going?
I am going to LA.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 3:45 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket is $123.
That sounds good. Can you look for other options?
When are you coming back?
I want to come home on March 14th.
I found 1 Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 3:45 pm. The return flight departs at 7:10 pm. The cost of the ticket is $137.
That sounds good. I am looking to travel with four people in Economy.
Please confirm; flight from Seattle to Los Angeles on Alaska Airlines. The departure date is March 12th at 3:45 pm. The return flight is March 14th. It leaves at 7:10 pm. The reservation is for 4 people in Economy.
Yes, that will be awesome.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks for your assistance.
Is there anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a one way flight for a trip I have coming up? I need to leave on the 14th of March.
Where will you be travelling to and from?
I am traveling to Los Angeles from Seattle, WA. I only need one ticket, and I actually just remembered I'll need to leave on March 5th, not 14th.
I found one flight that fits your criteria. It is an Alaska Airlines flight, and the ticket costs $144. The outbound flight will leave at 3:45 pm and has 0 stops.
What else is there available? I prefer to travel in Premium Economy, and I would like it if the ticket was refundable in case my plans change.
I have found 1 flight that matches your criteria. The flight is a United Airlines flight, and the ticket costs $189. The outbound flight leaves at 6:20 pm and has 0 stops.
What airports will the flight be flying in and out of?
The destination is LAX International Airport, and the departure airport is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That sounds great, get me that one. Also, can you find me another flight to get back on Thursday next week?
I've found 1 flight that matches your criteria. It is an United Airlines flight, and the ticket costs $230. The outbound flight will leave at 6:20 pm, and the return flight at 8:55 am.
That one sounds good too.
Please confirm the following: 1 Premium Economy ticket for United Airlines flight from Seattle to Los Angeles next Tuesday at 6:20 pm. The return flight is next Thursday at 8:55 am.
Sounds mint, I confirm.
Your ticket has been successfully confirmed.
When will the return flight get back?
The return flight returns at 11:42 am.
Awesome, thank you so much for your help. You've been great.
You're most welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me a one way flight for my upcoming trip?
When do you want to leave, and where are you coming from and going to?
The three of us will travel on the 9th of this month from Atlanta to Washington.
There is a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 5:45 pm, and the ticket costs $105.
Are there other flights?
There is a flight with 0 stops on Southwest Airlines that leaves at 9:40 pm and costs $106.
I like that flight. We will be traveling back on the 11th and want Economy class seats.
There is 1 flight on Southwest Airlines that leaves at 9:40 pm and the return flight is at 2:35 pm. The ticket costs $111.
I like that flight.
Do you want to buy the tickets?
Yes, please buy the ticket.
Please confirm that you want to fly from Atlanta to Washington on Southwest Airlines, leaving on March 9th at 9:40 pm and returning on March 11th at 2:35 pm, with 3 seats in Economy.
Yes please. What time does the return flight arrive?
The ticket is purchased successfully. The return arrives at 4:26 pm.
When does the outgoing flight arrive?
It arrives at 11:31 pm.
Thank you, that will be all.
See you soon!
Can you search for round trip flights to Vegas? I am going on a trip soon.
Where are you leaving from?
Leaving from ATL.
When are you returning?
I am returning March 8th and I would prefer to travel Economy.
When are you planning on leaving?
Leaving on the 1st.
Ok, there is a flight with Southwest Airlines that leaves at 6:30 am and returns at 2:25 pm for $279.
Are there any other available flights?
United Airlines has a flight leaving at 3 pm and returning at 3:05 pm for $277.
That flight sounds better.
Are you ready for me to purchase the ticket now?
Not quite. Can you look for one-way flights?
I found 1 for United Airlines with 1 stop leaving at 3 pm for $255.
What is the arrival airport and is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is no refundable and the flight arrives at McCarran International Airport.
Ok, this flight sounds good. I will take it.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
Can you find me some round trip flights? I'm going to my sister's wedding.
What day would you like to travel, and from which city?
I want to leave the day after tomorrow from Philly.
What city did you want to go to, and what will be the return date?
I'm going to London, UK, and I want to fly back on March 6th.
I found 3 flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight for $382 that leaves Philadelphia at 10:10 am and returning from London at 2:05 pm.
Are there any other flights?
There is a Delta Airlines flight for $322 that leaves Philadelphia at 10:45 am, and leaves London at 3:35 pm.
Which airport would I arrive at?
Arrival is at Heathrow International Airport.
Is the ticket refundable? What time do I arrive back in Philly?
Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable. Arrival in Philadelphia is at 10:26 pm.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to book this flight?
No, I'm good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
How about one-way flights?
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight for $354 that leaves at 10:45 am and has 1 stop.
Is the ticket refundable? What airport will it land in?
Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable. Arrival is at Heathrow International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
Can you look for flights leaving from New York?
Where are you going, when are you coming back? When do you want to leave?
I want United Airlines. I will leave March 5th to go to SF. I want to come home on the 8th.
Here is 1 option. It's a United Airlines flight leaving at 8:20 am. Return flight leaves at 5:50 am and the price for the ticket is $277.
Can I get my money back? What airport?
No, it isn't refundable. The flight leaves from JFK International Airport.
Sounds great.
Can I get you tickets?
No, that's ok. Can you find me a one-way flight for another trip?
There is 1 flight I found. A United Airlines flight leaving at 8:20 am. It will cost $307.
Which airport does the flight arrive in?
SFO International Airport.
And the onward flight?
That flight arrives at 2:06 pm.
Sounds good.
Anything else?
No! Thanks.
Have a good one.
I am looking to purchase a ticket for a flight. Can you search round trip flights for me?
Certainly. Where is it that you are planning to visit and when do you plan to leave?
I am leaving the day after tomorrow and I am traveling to LAX.
And where is it that you will be leaving from?
I am leaving from CDMX.
What time do you plan to return from your trip?
I want to try to return by the 10th of this month.
Okay. I have found 3 flights that match your criteria. There is an American Airlines flight that has an outbound departure time at 8:05 am. The return flight leaves at 2:45 pm. The price for this ticket is $178.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should I buy tickets for this flight?
No, that's alright.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, could you find me one-way flights with the same criteria?
Certainly. I have found 1 flight with American Airlines that matches what you are looking for. The outbound flight leaves at 8:05 am and it has 0 stops. The price for this ticket is $163.
When does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight would arrive at 9:25 am.
Which airport does the flight arrive at and where does it depart from?
The flight departs from Benito Juarez International Airport and the destination is LAX International Airport.
That flight sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Thank you for the assistance.
Certainly. Have a wonderful day.
could you find me a round trip flight?
What dates is this trip for, and where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from LA, on the 7th and would like to return ont he 10th of this month.
Where is the trip heading?
I am travelling to Mexico City.
There's an american airlines flight. the outbound flight leaves at 2:45 pm, and the return flight leaves at 8:05 am. The price is $148.
Are there any other flights? There's two people in my group. Any class is fine for us.
I found 2 convenient flights for you. There's a delta airlines flight. The outbound leaves at 9:15 am, and the return flight leaves at 1:45 pm. The price is $274.
Are there any other available flights?
There's a united airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 4:25 am, and the return flight leaves at 8:45 pm. The price of the ticket is $151.
When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 10:05 pm.
Is it refundable? And where does it depart from?
Unfortunately, it isn't refundable. It departs from LAX international airport.
That works for me.
SHould i buy you the tickets?
No thank you. Could you find me some one-way flights?
There's a United Airlines flight that has 0 stops. It leaves at 4:25 am and costs $126.
That sounds good to me.
Do you need anything else?
NO, thank you for the help.
Have a great day.
Could you look for flights for me?
Where would you like to leave from?
I'd like to fly out of New York City.
Where would you like to go? When are you leaving and when would you like to come back?
I'd like to go to Seattle, WA on March 4th and come back on March 10th.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:40 PM and the return flight leaves at 4 pm. The price is $289.
When will the return flight arrive? And is the ticket refundable?
The return flight will land at 2:14 am. And no, the ticket can't be refunded.
That sounds good.
Should I buy the tickets?
Nope, I'm good for now. I have a trip coming up. Could you find oneway flights for me? There are 3 in my group.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:40 pm and has 1 stop. The price is $257.
Is it refundable? And will will the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 8:45 pm. And no, it's not refundable.
That sounds fine to me.
Anything else I can help you with today?
Nope, thanks for everything.
Have a great day!
I need to go on a trip. Can you search some round trip flights for me? I need to get back Thursday next week.
Where will you be leaving from?
From a Seattle, WA.
When would you like to leave?
On the day after tomorrow.
And what's the destination?
NYC. I want to go on a Southwest Airlines plane.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 am and returns at 8:40 am. The ticket costs $365.
Sounds good to me.
Should I buy the tickets?
No, thank you.
Can I help you in anything else?
Are there any other flights available?
There's 1. A Southwest Airlines plane that leaves at 5:25 am and the ticket costs $365.
From which airport will the flight depart from?
The Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you search for some economy flights?
Where are you leaving from? And when are you coming bac?
I'm returning on the 12th of this month from SD
Where are you planning to go and when do you plan to leave
I'm going to San Francisco and leaving on March 2nd.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 11:10 am and with a return flight at 6:10 am that costs $112
Which airport does the flight arrive at? How many stops does the flight have?
It has 0 stops and arrives at SFO International Airport
That flight sounds good
Should I buy tickets for it?
No it's ok, can you search for one way flights though?
Sure, there's a 0 stop outbound flight at 11:10 am via Alaska Airlines that costs $103
Is it refundable?
No it's not
That sounds great!
Can I help with anything else?
No thanks for your help
Have a wonderful day!
Help me with some plane tickets will you?
Of course, where to?
Los Angeles please.
When will you get back here?
I will return on Wednesday next week.
What airport will you fly from? When do you plan on leaving?
I'm leaving Seattle, WA tomorrow.
There are 5 choices we have to pick from. Try Alaska Airlines. It has a flight that departs at 3:45 pm. It will come back on a flight that departs at 7:10 pm. The price on all that is only $153.
Wow, it almost sounds too good to believe.
How about I get you the tickets?
Nope, not so fast.
What do you need then?
Get me a one way on economy.
There is 1 flight. It's Alaska Airlines, leaving at 3:45 pm. It has 0 stops. The price on that is almost as much as a round trip: $147.
Which airport does that leave?
It's Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
When does that one arrive?
6:32 pm.
Sounds good, I think.
What else is needed now?
Nothing, thanks though.
Great, have a good trip.
Will you find me flights?
When? Where are you leaving from? Where are you visiting?
I want to travel from NY to San Fran on March 1st. I prefer Southwest Airlines.
When are you returning?
7th of March.
I found an outbound flight at 6:30 am with a return flight at 9:20 pm on Southwest Airlines for $231.
Sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No.
Is there anything else?
Will you find me oneway flights?
I found 1 flight on Southwest Airlines that leaves at 6:30 am with 0 stops for $222.
When does the oneward flight arrive? Which airport does it depart from?
It arrives at 9:56 am and departs from JFK International Airport.
Sounds good.
Is there anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
I'd like help finding round trip flights. I'll be leaving on Friday next week.
What destination did you have in mind, and where did you want to fly out of?
I'll be flying out of Los Angeles to head to Seattle on the 4th of this month.
When did you want the return flight to be?
I'd like to return on March 7th.
Alright, let me see here. I've found 5 convenient flights matching that criteria. There's an Alaska Airlines flight at $154. It leaves at 7:10 pm, and the trip back is at 3:45 pm.
I want to travel Economy. What are the other flights that'll work?
I've narrowed it down to 4 flights then. There's an American Airlines flight for $136. It'll leave at 11:45 pm, and the return flight is at 8:15 am.
Let's keep going through available flights. I have four people in my group.
Okay, there are 3 convenient flights still. There's a Delta Airlines flight at $163. This one leaves at 6:50 am. The return flight is at 7:55 am.
When does the flight out there arrive?
It'll land at 9:37 am.
Okay, and which airport is the flight from? When does the return flight arrive?
It's flying out of LAX International Airport. The return flight will touch down at 12:40 pm.
Okay, this flight seems like a good fit.
Do you want me to purchase tickets for it now?
No, that's okay. Can you find me some one-way flights now?
Sure. I've found a Delta Airlines flight at $124. It'll leave at 6:50 am and has 0 layovers.
Hmm, that flight's also a good choice.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, I'm good for now. Thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Could you please search for Premium Economy tickets for a round trip flight.
Where are you planning on visiting? When do you plan on coming back.
I plan to go to Washington and get back on the 9th of March.
Where do you want to leave from? When do you want to leave?
I want to leave from SF next Tuesday.
There is 1 matching your criteria. It is an United Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 12:30 pm and the return flight leaves at 1:30 pm. The price of a ticket is $485.
Which airport does the flight depart from and when does my return flight arrive?
The flight leaves from SFO International Airport. The flight return flight leaves at 5:32 pm.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No, not right now.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can you find me a one-way flight for a group of four people.
There is 1 flight matching your criteria. It is an United Airlines flight leaving at 12:30 pm. There is 1 stop and the ticket price is $481.
Which airport does the flight arrive at?
The flight arrives at Dulles International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like help with anything else?
No, I'm good.
Have a good day.
I am looking for round trip flights, can you help me?
Yes I can. Do you have a preference of where you want to go, where would you be coming from and when you would like to return?
Yes, I will be going to Paris, France leaving from Philadelphia. I will need to return on the 8th.
What day will you be going to Paris?
I will like to leave on the 2nd of this month.
I have found 1 round trip ticket for $355 with Delta Airlines. The outbound flight departs at 2:20 pm and the return flight departs at 5:35 pm, would that work for you?
Yes, that sounds perfect!
Would you like for me to reserve this ticket for you?
No that would okay.
Would like my help with anything else?
Yes, can you find see what one way flights are available.
I have a one-way flight that has 1 stop with Delta Airlines. The outbound flight departs at 2:20 pm and the cost is $333.
Great, that sound good too.
Would you like to reserved this ticket?
No thanks, but thank you for all your help.
You are welcome, have a good day.
I'm thinking about taking a trip. Search round trip flights available by United Airlines please.
Sure, but first please tell me where are you planning to take a trip too? Do you know your depart and return dates?
Yeah, I would like to hit the road on the 13th of this month. I'll be heading out of Philadelphia and traveling over to NYC.
Ok, thanks for that information. What is your departure date?
Oh yeah, I'll be going, hopefully next Tuesday.
That sounds good. One moment while I search for you. I've located a ticket for $61. This convenient flight is with United Airlines departing at 4:45 am and arriving at 10:05 am. I only show this 1 flight.
Alright, when would my return flight be arriving? Find out which airport my flight would be departing from please.
One moment. Your flight would depart from PHL International Airport. I show arrival time for 10:56 am.
That sounds perfect.
Should I proceed and purchase your ticket?
No, please don't. I would like to continue searching one-way flights please.
Ok, no problem. I found 1 flight with United Airlines. The outbound leaves at 4:45 am and has 0 lay overs. This price would be $54. How does that sound?
Find out if the ticket is refundable and when would the onward flight arrive?
Ok, one moment. Unfortunately the ticket would not be refundable. Your onward fight would arrive at 5:36 am.
This flight sounds better to me.
Should I book this flight, or would you like to continue searching more flighs?
No. That will be all.
OK. Have a great day.
Can you find me a flight, a round trip?
Sure. Where are you leaving from? What day would you like to come back?
I'll leave from SF and return the 12th of March
And what city are you going to?
I need to go to Toronto
Departing when?
Later today if I can.
I found 2 flights for you. There's an American Airlines option that leaves at 7:05 am, with the return at 10:05 am for $293.
Anything else?
How about the United Airlines option. It leaves at 9:15 am with the return at 5:35 pm for $289.
Yes that's perfect
Would you like to make a reservation?
No thanks
Anything else I can do to help?
How about a one-way flight instead?
I found 1 flight on United Airlines at 9:15 am with 1 stop for $265
That sounds good
Anything else I can do to help?
No thanks. You've been great
Take care
I need a good ticket to get out of Portland, OR.
When will you leave? Do you know your return date yet?
I'm taking off on the 4th of this month and will return on the 14th.
From whence will you depart?
LAX is my home Airport.
Try Alaska Airlines, they have a good deal. The flight leaves at 5:15 am. You'll get on your return plane at 10:10 am. The ticket for both legs is only $131.
That's a refundable ticket right? Which Airport will the plane arrive at?
Sorry, no refunds. You'll go to PDX International Airport.
What other options are there?
Let's try American Airlines. They have a flight that leave at 11:15 pm. They'll depart to come back at 6 am. It costs $181.
Isn't there something else? There are three of us. I need to leave Next Tuesday.
Well, there is a Southwest Airlines flight. It departs at 4:30 pm. That return leaves at 4:55 pm. The total on this is $141.
Ok, Lets lock in on that choice.
How about I go ahead and get your tickets for you?
No. Find a one-way flight. I want economy.
There is 1 option. It is out of Southwest Airlines. The outbound on that leaves at 4:30 pm. 0 layovers. Your cost is $140.
Where does that one leave from?
Lax International Airport is the port of exit.
What airport will that land in?
It's PDX International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
what other flight might you need?
None, I'm good.
Have a safe trip.
I am looking to book a flight.
What day will you be returning?
I'd like to fly on United Airlines and plan on returning on the 11th.
Where will you be departing from?
I'll be leaving from London, UK and prefer to travel economy.
What day will you departing? Where will your arrival destination be?
I'll be traveling to Atlanta on the 4th of this month.
I've found a flight with United Airlines for $292. The flight leaves at 10:25 pm and returns at 6:15 am.
That sounds like a good option.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
No, but thank you.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Can you help me find one way flights for an upcoming trip with 3 people?
I've found 1 flight on United Airlines for $238. The flight departs at 10:25 pm and has 0 stops.
That sounds great.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
That is all. Thank you!
Have a great day.
Hey, can you look up some round trip flights for me?
Sure thing, where would you like to travel to, and what date will you return?
I'm going to go to Las Vegas for a while - I've never gone; I think I want to come back on the 13th of March.
What city are you traveling from, and what day will you be leaving?
I'm leaving on the 9th from SFO.
Okay, here we go: I've found you an American Airlines flight for $113, it departs at 5:30 pm for Vegas and the return flight leaves at 5:30 am.
Oh, 5:30 is pretty early - what else is available? I'll need three tickets.
Alright, I've got 3 other flights here - Delta Airlines has a departing flight at 10:50 am with the returning flight leaving at 10:50 pm, each ticket is $123.
That's much better, yeah.
Would you like to buy those tickets?
Not just yet, but thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
Yeah, can you look up some one-way flights as well?
Okay - Delta Airlines has 1 flight departing at 10:50 am with 0 stops for $110 - how does that sound?
Yeah, that one sounds good.
Is that everything for today?
That's it, thanks.
Happy to help, have a great day.
Can you help me find a round-trip flight for 1 person in the Economy seating section?
When would you like to leave?
I'd like to leave on March 8th.
When would you like to leave? Where would you like to visit, and when do you plan or returning?
I'd like to travel to Vancouver and leave on the 13th of this month from Seattle.
There is a flight with Delta Airlines that departs at 8:45 am, with a returning flight at 2:50 am. Ticket start at $329.
Does this flight have 1 stop?
That is correct. This flight has 1 stop.
Perfect.
Would you like me to buy a ticket for you?
No, thank you. Do you see any one-way flights?
There is a flight with Delta Airlines that has 1 stop and departs at 8:45 am. Tickets start at $292.
Do you see any other flights that are available?
Sorry, but there are no other flight available that fit your criteria. Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No, thank you. That'll be all.
Enjoy your day.
I am seeking a round trip flight for myself; departing from Mexico city.
Where will you be traveling to and when will you be leaving. Also, what is your return date.
I want to leave for SF on March 3rd and return on the 9th of March.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:55 pm with a return flight that leaves at 1:20 pm. The ticket price is $148.
I like that sound of that flight
Should I purchase a ticket for that flight.
No thank you.
Do you need assistance with anything else.
Can you look up[ some one-way flights for me.
I found 1 American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:55 pm with 0 stops. The ticket price is $133.
What airport and what does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at SFO International Airport at 4:38 pm
I like that sound of that flight.
Can I assist you with anything else.
No thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Hello, could you look for a economy flight back on March 11th for me?
Okay, where are you leaving from and where are you visiting?
I am leaving from Los Angeles on March 9th and I will be going to SF
There are 4 flights I have found that would work for you, what about this Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 5:50 PM? The return flight is at 8:20 PM and this would cost $115
What are the other options, are there any with Southwest Airlines? Also there will be four people total in my group.
There is indeed a flight with Southwest Airlines! It would be at 10:20 PM with a return flight at 12:50 PM, this flight would cost $99 per person!
That flight works great for me
Would you like me to purchase the tickets for you?
No thanks, I have a trip Im saving up for soon. Would you be able to find a oneway flight?
Let me see, what about this Southwest Airlines flight at 10:20 PM with 0 stops that costs $89?
When does the onward flight arrive for that?
At 11:45 PM
Okay, that flight works for me!
Is there anything else you need help with?
No thank you
I hope you have a great day!
Can you please search flights for me?
Where do you want to go, for how long and when do you want to leave?
I am going to Atlanta, leaving March 5th and returning on March 12th.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Chi-town.
I found 3 flights for your trip. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 9:15 pm. The price per ticket is $129.
What other flights are available? I want to travel in economy and I prefer United Airlines.
I found 1 United Airlines flight. It leaves at 9:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 6:15 am. The price per ticket is $129.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should I purchase the tickets?
No thank you.
Shall I help you with anything else?
Can you find me a one-way flight?
There is a United Airlines flight leaving at 9:50 pm that has 0 stops and costs $116 per ticket.
That flight works for me.
Shall I help you with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you search round trip flights?
Where will you be leaving from?
We are two people, leaving from Phoenix. We're traveling to San Francisco.
When are you coming back? And when would you like to leave?
We're leaving on March 3rd, and we'd like to get back the 12th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight. The flight leaves at 6:15 am, and the return flight leaves at 8:10 am. The price of the ticket is $174.
Are there any other avaliable flights. I'd like to travel in Economy Class, and I prefer to fly with United Airlines.
I found 1 flights that might suit you. There is a United Airlines flight, which leaves at 11:50 pm, and returns at 2:15 pm. The price of the ticket is $140.
When does the return flight arrive?
It arrives at 4:22 pm.
Sounds good to me.
Should I buy the tickets for it?
Nope, not right now. Could you find me one-way flights?
There is a United Airlines flight, which leaves at 11:50 pm and has 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $128.
Is it refundable? When does it arrive?
Unfortunately, the ticket isn't refundable. The flight arrives at 1:57 am.
Are there any other flights avaliable?
Sorry, I couldn't fight anything else. Shall I help you with anything else?
Nope. Thanks for your help.
Have a good one!
Can you help me find a round-trip flight for 2 people?
When would you like to leave? Where would you like to visit, and here are you leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Vancouver, BC and I'd like to travel to SFO on the 6th of March.
When would you like to come back?
I'd like to return by the 11th of March.
I was able to locate 1 flight that fit your criteria. There is a flight with Delta Airlines that departs at 3:20 am, with a returning flight that departs at 5:45 pm. The price per ticket is $184.
That sounds pretty good.
Should I buy your tickets for this flight?
No, thank you. Are you able to find any one-way flights?
There is a flight with 1 stop with Delta Airlines that departs at 3:20 am, and the price per ticket is $241.
Are the tickets refundable?
The tickets are not refundable, unfortunately.
Which airport would we be departing from?
This flight will be departing from YVR International Airport.
Excellent. That sounds great.
Would you like my assistance with anything else?
No, thank you. That'll be all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you find me some round trip airline tickets, preferably on Delta Airlines?
What date are you returning from and where are you departing from and traveling to?
I am departing from Portland, OR and traveling to LA. I want to return on March 8th.
When do you plan on departing?
I am departing the day after tomorrow.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines that departs at 9:35 am and returns at 6:50 am for $227.
Is the ticket refundable? Also, when does my return flight arrive?
The ticket is not refundable and the return flight arrives at 12:08 pm.
The flight sounds good to me.
Do you want me to purchase the tickets?
No, thank you. Can you find me one-way tickets instead?
I found a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 9:35 am with 1 stop for $208.
That flight works for me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you
Have a great day
I would like to find round trip flights.
What is your departing and arrival city and date of departure?
I will be traveling from Chicago to London, england on the 2nd of March.
When will you be returning?
I will be returning on the 5th of March.
American Airlines has 3 flights that day. One departs from chicago at 4:30 am with the return flight dearting at 0:10 am. This ticket is $446.
Does this flight have any stops and which airport does the flight arrive?
You will be arriving at Heathrow International Airport and there is 1 stop.
This flight sounds perfect.
Wpuld you like to purchase a ticket?
Not at this time. Will you search for a one-way flight?
American Airlines has an outbound flight with 1 stop that departs at 4:30 am with a ticket price of $401.
What is the departure and arrrival airports?
This flights leaves from O'Hare International Airport and arrives at Heathrow International Airport.
This flight is perfect.
May I help you with anything else today?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a great day!
I need to find a round trip flight.
What date will you be leaving and where would you like to go?
The 6th of this month to Ciudad de Mexico.
Where do you want to fly out of? What date would you like to return?
From Las Vegas and need to come back on the 13th.
What do you think about an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:30 am and the return flight leaves at 8:05 am for $234.
How many lay overs does it have?
It has 1 lay over.
Is it a refundable ticket?
It is a nonrefundable ticket.
That flight sounds great.
Would you like for me to buy the ticket.
No thank you.
Is there anything else I can help with?
I need a one way flight for 3 people.
There is 1 Option it is an American Airlines flight departing at 9:30 am with 1 layover for $197.
What time would it arrive and at what airport?
IT arrives at 8:05 pm at Benito Juarez International Airport.
That sound good.
Is there something else I can help with?
No that will be all.
Have an awesome day!
Can you search for a round trip flight? I want to leave friday next week.
Where are you headed, and when would you like to return?
I am headed to CDMX and I wanna come back March 12th.
Where will you be leaving from, who will be travelling with you?
I'd like to leave from Chi-town, and i have a group of four.
There's an american airlines flight, outbound leaves at 1:20 pm, and the return leaves at 8:05 am. The ticket price is $313.
Are there any other options?
There's a delta airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 5:55 am, and the return flight leaves at 4:40 pm. The ticket price is $337.
Is the ticket refundable?
Yes.
That sounds good to me!
Would you like me to buy the tickets for it?
No thank you, could you find me one-way flights?
I found 1 flight. There's a delta airlines flight leaving at 5:55 am, with 1 stop. The price is $301.
Which airport is that flight to?
The destination is the Benito Juarez International Airport.
Which airport is it departing from?
It departs from the O'Hare International Airport.
THat sounds good to me!
Do you need anything else?
No, thank you for everything.
No problem, have a great day.
Can you find some round trip flights for me please?
Where would you like to visit?
I will be travelling to Seattle.
When would you like to leave?
On the 1st of this month.
Where would you leave from and when are you going to be back?
I will be leaving from Los Angeles and be back on the 4th of this month.
There are 5 convenient for your trip. One is an Alaska Airlines flight that has an outbound flight at 7:10 pm and a return flight at 3:45 pm. The price is $135
That seems good to me.
Should I get these tickets for it?
No thanks, I am good.
Can I help you with anything else?
Is there any one-way flights?
There is 1 suitable flight that is an Alaska Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 7:10 pm with 0 stops and the price of the ticket is $131.
That flight seems pretty good to me.
Can I help you with anything else?
No thank you. Thanks for the help
Have a great day!
Can you search round trip flights to San Francisco?
Where are you planning to leave from, and when? When are you willing to come back?
I am leaving the 9th of this month, from New York City. I'd like to get back on 13th of this month.
I found 4 flights that might suit you. There is an American Airlines flight, leaving at 4:45 pm. The return flight leaves at 8:30 pm. The price of the ticket is $193.
When does my return flight arrive?
It arrives at 5:56 am.
That sounds good to me.
Should I buy you tickets?
Not right now. Could you find me one-way flights?
I found 1 flight that might suit you. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm and has 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $186.
That sounds good to me.
Shall I help you with anything else?
Nope. Thanks a lot.
Have a good one!
I'm looking for an economy flight leaving from ATL.
When would you like to leave?
I'd like to leave March 1st and return on the 8th of this month; I prefer Delta Airlines.
Where would you like to visit?
I'm traveling to Seattle, WA - could you search Southwest Airlines instead?
I've found 1 option: Southwest Airlines has an outbound flight at 1:35 pm that returns at 5:25 am, for $308.
When does the onward flight arrive?
That flight arrives at 6:05 pm.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I have a trip coming up - can you find me 1 ticket for one-way flights?
There is an outbound flight leaving at 1:35 pm with 1 stop through Southwest Airlines; the price of a ticket is $283.
That sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a great day.
Hey, I'm looking for some round trip flights, can you help me out?
Sure thing, can I get some more information first? Where are you leaving from, where would you like to go, and when are you returning?
I'm traveling from Washington to Philadelphia and I'd like to return on the 13th.
What day would you like to leave?
I'm departing March 5th.
I've found 2 possible options; American Airlines has a departing flight at 5:10 pm that returns at 9:45 am for $146.
Where does the departing flight leave from?
Your first flight leaves from Dulles International Airport.
Are there 0 stops or is there a layover? When does the returning flight leave?
There's 1 stop and your return flight departs at 12:05 pm.
What other flights are available?
United Airlines has an outbound flight at 8:40 pm and a returning flight at 4:45 am for $197.
That sounds good, yeah.
Would you like to purchase the tickets today?
Not today, but can you look for one-way flights?
There's 1 United Airlines flight outbound at 8:40 pm with 1 stop for $228.
When does the flight arrive in Philadelphia? Is it refundable?
You would arrive in Philadelphia at 0:51 am, I'm afraid it's non-refundable.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
That's all, thanks.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a round trip flight.
Where are you leaving from and when are you returning?
I am leaving Chicago and want to return on the 5th of this month.
When are you leaving?
I leave on the 3rd of this month.
Where are you going?
I am going to London, UK.
There is an American Airlines flight that costs $400. The outbound flight leaves at 12:30 pm and the return flight leaves at 0:10 am.
What other flights are available in economy?
There is a Delta Airlines flight that costs $308. The outbound flight leaves at 9:15 am and the return flight leaves at 8 am.
What airport does it fly from? Are there any stops?
The flight leaves O'Hare International Airport and has 1 stop.
That is perfect.
Do you want to make the reservation?
Not at this time.
May I further assist you?
I would like 3 tickets for a one-way flight.
I found 1 Delta Airlines flight with 1 stop that costs $314 and it leaves at 9:15 am.
Is it refundable? Which airport does it fly to?
The non-refundable ticket is for a flight to Heathrow International Airport.
That is perfect.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
Can you search for round trip flights leaving from LA for me?
When do you want to leave?
I want to leave March 8th.
When are you coming back? Where are you planning to go?
I want to travel to Portland, OR and I want to get back on March 14th.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 5:15 am and the return flight leaves at 10:10 am. The ticket price is $129.
Which airport does the flight leave from? How many stops does it have.
The flight departs from LAX International Airport and has 0 stops.
Are there any other available flight? I want to travel Economy.
There is an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 11:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 6 am. The ticket price is $184.
Are there any other available flights? There are three people in my group.
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 6:50 am and the return flight leaves at 9:35 am. The ticket price is $223.
That flight sounds good.
Should I purchase tickets?
No, I am good. Can you find me one-way flights?
There is 1 suitable fight. It is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 6:50 am and has 1 stop. The ticket price is $217.
That flight sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
You can look please for round trip flight for my?I want only tickets with the return option my plans are not fixed.
In what date do you plan to leave?
It would be perfect to go on Thursday next week.
In what date do you plan to return?
In 13th of March will be good for me.
Where would you like to visit?
In NY I plan to go
And the leaving is from where?
From Phoenix I want to leave.
I have for you 1 flight with Southwest Airlines.The outbound flight leaves at 4:20 am and return leaves at 1:30 pm.The total cost would be $296.
Tell me how many stops have the flight
Flight has 1 stop
It sounds Okay
Would you like to buy tickets?
No I don't want.One-way flights you can find?
1 Convenient option for you would be with Southwest Airlines.The price is $259 and the outbound flight leaves at 4:20 am.
This flight suits me.
Can I help you with anything else?
No.It's enough. Thanks
Have a great day!
I need to search flights.
When are you wanting to leave and return?
Wednesday next week and i want to come back on the 11th. I prefer economy.
Where are you departing from and where are you visiting?
From London, England to Chi-town.
I see American Airlines that leaves at 2:05 pm, the return flight leaves at 4:30 am and the price is $352.
That sounds good.
Should I book it for you now?
No but I have a trip coming up for a group of 3. Can you find a oneway flight?
1 flight with American Airlines leaves at 2:05 pm with 0 stops and price is $258.
Sounds good.
Doi you need anything else?
No. Thank You
Have a good day
I'm interested in finding a round trip flight.
On what date you want to leave and when?What are your preferences about what you want to visit?
I want to leave from Las Vegas to Portland on March 13th.
On which date you plan the leaving?
I want on 2nd of this month.
According to your criteria I have 4 options.With American Airlines the cost will be $226 and the outbound flight leaves at 5:30 am.Return will be at 7:20 am.
Southwest Airlines is my preferate.Can you find me other flights?
With Southwest Airlines the outbound flight leaves at 2:35 pm and return at 4:55 pm.Total price is $221
Sounds perfect for me
You want to buy tickets?
No, not now.
Can I help you with something else?
Yes ,find me please one-way flights.
Southwest Airlines will be the company that have the outbound that leave at 2:35 pm with 1 stop.Cost for ticket will be $202.
Onward flight arrive at what hour?
Arrive at 7 pm.
The flight depart from witch airport?
McCarran International Airport will be.
Sounds perfect for me.
Can I help you with anything else?
No.Thank you!
Have a great day!
Can you look up some flights for me? I'm leaving from Philly and I want to travel economy.
Where do you want to go? When do you want to return?
I want to go to Toronto, Ontario. I want to return on the 12th.
When do you want to leave?
On the 10th of this month.
I've found 2 possible flights. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm. The return flight is at 12:50 pm. It costs $162.
When does the outbound flight arrive? What airport does it depart from?
It arrives at 8:28 pm. It departs from PHL International Airport.
Okay, that sounds good.
Should I buy the tickets?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
Yeah, can you find me some one-way flights? It's just for one person.
I've found 1 flight for you. It's with American Airlines and leaves at 4:45 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $162.
That sounds great.
Is there anything else?
Not right now, thanks.
Have a great day.
I'd like an economy round trip flight, can you help me search for it?
Sure, where are you leaving from and what date will you be back>
La and on the 12th of this month.
Where are you going?
Ciudad de Mexico.
What day will you be leaving?
the 9th of this month.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:45 pm with a retuning flight at 8:05 am for $167.
Anything else?
There's a 9:15 am Delta airlines flight that returns at 1:45 pm for $253.
I really rather use United Airlines, and I'm traveling to NY. What else is there?
There's 1 United Airlines flight leaving at 8:15 pm and returning at 2:40 pm for $273.
What time and airport is my return flight?
Return flight is arriving at JFK International Airport at 7:57 pm
Perfect.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
No, please find a one-way flight.
There's 1 flight on United Airlines with 0 stops at 8:15 pm for $201.
Is it refundable and where does it depart?
The ticket isn't refundable and the flight leaves from LAX International Airport.
Awesome, thanks.
Would you like anything else?
Nope, that's it.
Have a great day.
Can you look for round trip flights for me? I wanna get back on the 4th.
Where do you wish to visit? Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from Vancouver, BC, and I am travelling to NY.
When do you plan to leave?
We are 3 people in my group, and we're leaving later today.
I found 2 convenient flights. There is a Delta Airlines one that leaves at 3:20 am. The return flight leaves at 6 am, and the price of the ticket is $341.
When does the onward flight arrive?
It arrives at 6:40 pm
Any other avaliable flights? I am leaving from Mexico City.
I found 1 convenient flight for your trip. It's a United Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 0:20 am, and the return flight leaves at 7:05 pm. The price is $264.
What airport does it depart from?
It departs from Benito Juarez International Airport.
Sounds good to me.
Should I buy tickets for it?
Nope, I'm good. Can you find me one-way flights? I like travelling in Economy class.
I found 1 flight that might suit you. There is a United Airlines flight, which leaves at 0:20 am, and has 1 stop. The price is $231.
When does the onward flight arrive?
It arrives at 9:32 am.
Is the ticket for it refundable?
Unfortunately, it is not.
That one sounds good to me.
Shall I help you with anything else?
Nope, thanks for your help
Have a good one!
Will you find me some flights?
Where do you want to visit?
Phoenix
When are you leaving and coming back? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from NYC on 7th of March and get back on 14th of March. I need tickets for 1 person.
I found 2 flights on Southwest Airlines for $316. Outbound flight leaves at 6:50 am and return flight leaves at 7:05 am.
When does onward flight arrive? How many stops?
It arrives at 12:33 pm with 1 stop.
Sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No. Will you find me oneway flights on Economy.
I found a Southwest Airlines flight for $268. It leaves at 6:50 am with 1 stop.
Is it refundable?
No, it isn't.
Any other flights available?
No. Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you find flights for me?
When are you returning and where are you leaving out of?
I want to leave tomorrow from Los Angeles and get back on the 13th.
Where are you going?
I am going to Portland, OR and like Southwest Airlines.
I found 1 flight for you on Southwest Airlines. The flight leaves at 4:30 pm and the return flight departs at 4:55 pm. The cost is $136.
That works for me.
Do you want to buy tickets now?
No, not right now.
Do you need anything else?
Can you find me oneway flights for one person for an upcoming trip?
I found a Southwest Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 4:30 pm and costs $126.
When does the first flight arrive and at what airport?
It arrives at PDX International Airport and arrives at 7 pm.
That will work.
Do you need any more help?
No, that is everything. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Please search for flights on Delta Airlines.
Where do you need to go?
I need to visit San Diego.
When are you coming back? Where will you be leaving from?
I am departing from Seattle, WA and returning next Friday.
When are you leaving?
I am leaving on the 3rd of this month. One person.
Outbound Delta Airlines flights leaves at 8:45 am and the return flight leaves at 11:05 am. The cost of the ticket is $203.
That sounds good.
Should I purchase a ticket?
No, not today.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I have another trip, can you look up oneway flights?
Yes, I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines that leaves at 8:45 am and has 1 stop. The price is $179.
Thats sounds great!
Is there anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks!
Have an awesome day!
I need helping searching for a flight.
When would you be leaving, where would you be going and when would you like to return?
I am going to Chi-town on March 3rd and coming back on the 9th.
What city are you leaving from?
I am leaving form San Francisco. Can you see if United Airlines has available flights?
I have found 1 flight for $245 with United Airlines outbound flight leaves at 9:20 pm and will returning 1:50 pm.
Yes sounds fantastic.
Would you like for me to reserve your tickets now?
No, not today.
Did you need help with anything else?
Yes, I need help finding a one-way flight for another trip I have coming up, but I will need a refundable ticket in case my plans change.
Okay, I have located a flight with 0 stops with United Airlines. This flight leaves at 9:20 pm and cost $171.
When will I arrive at my designation?
You will arrive at 4:07 am.
That's awesome.
Did you need my help for anything else?
No that will be it. Thank you.
No problem, enjoy the rest of your day.
I need to find Economy class flights and need to be back on next Thursday.
Where are you planning to go?
I'll be going to CDMX.
When do you plan to depart and from where will you be leaving?
I'll be flying out from SF next Tuesday.
Of the 2 convenient flights, American Airlines has an outbound flight that leaves at 1:20 pm and a return flight that leaves at 2:55 pm and it is priced at $174.
Are any other flights available? I will need 3 tickets.
There is 1 United Airlines flight priced at $243 with the outbound flight departing at 9:15 am and the return flight leaving at 8:45 pm.
Which airport does the flight depart from and which airport does it arrive at?
The flight departs from SFO International Airport and arrives at Benito Juarez International Airport.
That sounds good to me.
Do you want me to but tickets for you?
No, it's okay. Can you find me one way tickets for an upcoming trip?
A United Airlines flight that leaves at 9:15 am is priced at $210 and it has 1 stop.
Are any other flights available?
Sorry, no other flights seem to be available. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Thank you. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
Please find me some flights.
Where are you leaving from, when are you leaving, and when are you coming back?
I am leaving from Chicago on the 1st of March. I will return on the 13th of this month.
Where are you going?
I am going to San Francisco. There's only one person in my group.
I found 3 flights that match. There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:40 am and the return flight leaves at 10:05 pm. The ticket costs $193.
Are there other flights available? I'm leaving Tuesday next week and would like to travel economy.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 4:35 am. The return flight leaves at 5:50 pm and the ticket costs $195.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
No, thanks. Can you find oneway flights?
I found 1 flight. The flight leaves at 4:35 am through Southwest Airlines. There are 0 stops. The price costs $185.
Can I refund the ticket?
The ticket is non-refundable.
Yes, that sounds good.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Could you find a flight for me?
When are you departing and returning?
I need to leave on Saturday this week, and I plan to return March 6th. Any airline is fine.
What's your destination and city of departure?
I'm heading to LA and leaving from Toronto.
I found 1 convenient flight for you at $242. There is an outbound United Airlines flight leaving at 5:35 pm, with a return flight leaving at 10:50 am.
What is the arrival time for the outbound and return flights?
The outbound flight arrives at 0:32 am and the return flight arrives at 7:19 pm.
That sounds good.
Would you like to buy the tickets?
Not right now. Can you find me a one-way Economy ticket for an upcoming trip?
There's a United Airlines flight with 1 stop, costing $269. The outbound flight leaves at 5:35 pm.
That sounds good.
Would you like help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Thanks for your business, and have a great day!
I need a flight and I don't care about airline.
What is your departure and return and city?
I am going to Philly and departing from Paris, France with a return of the 5th of this month.
What date is the departure?
Departure is Saturday this week.
I found 2 flights. An American Airlines departure of 4:05 am and return of 4:45 pm with a ticket price of $304.
Are there other choices later today and for Economy?
I found 1 flights. An Delta Airlines departure of 5:35 pm and return of 12:20 pm with a ticket price of $368.
That flight is acceptable.
Would you like tickets now?
One I have another trip for a oneway flight.
I have a Delta Airlines flight at 5:35 pm with 1 stop for $369.
What is the departure airport and arrival time?
PHL International Airport is the destination and departing from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
I would like this flight.
Is there anything else you need?
No that is all for today.
Have a great day today.
Can you help me find a flight? I'd like to return on the 9th.
When and where would you like to depart, and what is your destination?
I'm leaving from LA on the 5th of this month, and I'm going to Phoenix.
I've found 4 possible flights. One is an American Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 7:50 am, the return flight is at 7:35 am, and the ticket costs $110.
Which airport does the flight arrive at?
The flight will arrive at Sky Harbor International Airport.
Sounds good.
Should I purchase the tickets?
No, thank you.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I have an upcoming trip and would like one oneway flight ticket.
I've found 1 possible flight with American Airlines. The departing flight is at 7:50 am, the flight has 0, and the ticket costs $112.
When does the flight arrive, and is the ticket refundable?
The flight arrives at 9:18 am. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
Sound good.
Is there something else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
Can you find flights for me?
Where are you departing from, and what is your destination? When would you like to return?
I am leaving from Atlanta, GA and going to London. I'd like to return on the 14th of March.
When would you like to leave?
I'd like to leave on the 4th of this month. I'd prefer to fly with United Airlines.
I've found 1 flight that matches your search. It is a United Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 10:30 am, and the return flight is at 0:25 am. The ticket costs $303.
When does the return flight arrive, and how many stops does the flight have?
The return flight arrives at 9:42 am, and the flight has 1 stop.
Sounds good to me.
Should I help you buy the ticket?
No, thank you. I have an upcoming trip. Can you help me find a oneway flight?
I've found a United Airlines flight. The departing flight is at 10:30 am and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $241.
From which airport does the flight depart?
The flight leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you very much.
Have a nice day.
I need a search done for a flight, please prioritize Delta Airlines flights.
Where are planning to be and until when?
I am planning to be in Vancouver until March 7th when I will return to NY. I will accept both business and economy class.
When are you leaving?
I am going this Sunday.
Delta Airlines has a seat available o 1 flight for $301 that would take you there leaving at 6 am and start your trip home at 2:50 am.
When would I reach my destination?
The flight is scheduled for arrival at 11:11 am.
That is the flight I want.
Are you ready to purchase tickets right now?
Not right now, I have a trip I previously planned approaching. Would you please find 1 one way seat for me?
Delta Airlines offers 1 doable flight for $290, there is 1 stop and the return flight takes off at 6 am.
Where does the flight originate and will the ticket be refundable?
The ticket is nonrefundable and the flight would depart from YVR International Airport.
That one meets the requirements, I'll take it.
Can be of further assistance?
I'm good thank you goodby.
Have a good day.
Can you look up a flight for me
When are you leaving and coming back? Where do you want to go?
I want to go to Mexico City on the 8th and coming back on the 10th.
Where are you traveling from?
I will be traveling from New York City
I have 2 flights for you with Delta Airlines leaves at 8:45 pm and return at 3 pm for $174
What airport will this flight arrive to?
You will arrive at Benito Juarez International Airport
Ok sounds good
Do you want me to book the flights?
No. Can you find me oneway tickets for 2 people in my group?
There is a 0 stop Delta Airlines flight leaves at 8:45 pm for $166
What airport will this be and at what time?
This will be in Benito juarez International Airport at 11:16 pm
ok sounds good
Anything else i can help you with?
No
Have a nice day
Can you search for flights for me
Where are you planning to go? When do you plan to leave and when are you planning on coming back?
I plan to leave on March 4th from San Diego to Seattle. I want to return on the 11th of March
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 12:05 pm and returns at 8:15 am that costs $223
That flight sounds good
Shall I book the tickets?
No it's ok. Can you find me one way flights for another upcoming trip. I need four tickets for economy
I found 1 flight via American Airlines that has 1 stop. it leaves at 12:05 pm and is $237
That flight is good
Shall I help with anything else?
No that's it
Have a wonderful day
Can you find economy flights via United Airlines?
Where do you want to leave from, when do you want to leave, and when are you coming back?
I want to depart from CDMX. I'm leaving on the 3rd of this month and returning on the 12th of March.
Where do you want to go?
I want to go to Phoenix, AZ.
There is 1 flight that matches your trip. The flight is through United Airlines, it leaves at 8:45 pm and the return flight leaves at 11:05 am. The ticket costs $263.
Yes, that sounds great.
Would you like to purchase the ticket?
No, thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
I would like to find oneway flights for three people.
There is 1 flight that matches your trip. It is through United Airlines, it leaves at 8:45 pm and costs $215.
When does the onward flight get here?
The onward flight gets in at 1:18 am.
That sounds great.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I need a flight out of Chicago. Business or economy both work for me.
Where are you going and when are you coming back?
I am going to SF and coming back on the 14th of March.
What day are you leaving?
I need 2 tickets and am leaving on the 8th.
An American Airlines flight departs at 7:05 am and the return flight departs at 3:20 pm. It costs $182.
Can you find something else?
I found a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:40 am and the return flight departs at 10:05 pm. It costs $192.
That works for me.
Do you want to buy tickets now?
No, not right now. Can you find oneway flights for an upcoming trip?
Search revealed 1 flight. It is a Delta Airlines flight that has 0 stops, departs at 10:40 am and costs $181.
What airport does it fly into?
It flies into SFO International Airport.
That works for me.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Will you please assist me in booking a flight?
What are your expected departure and arrival destinations?
I'll be leaving from SFO and arriving in Seattle, WA. I need to return on the 14th.
When would you like to leave?
I'll be leaving on Friday next week.
I've found an Alaska Airlines flight with a ticket price of $138. The outbound flight will depart at 2:55 pm and the return flight departs at 12 pm.
That sounds like a great option.
Would you like me to purchase this ticket?
No, thank you. Will you please find me a one way flight for an up coming trip?
I've found 1 flight with Alaska Airlines for $126 per ticket. The flight will depart at 2:55 pm and has 0 stops.
When will the onward flight arrive?
The expected time of arrival is 5:06 pm.
What is the airport this flight departs from?
This flight will leave from SFO International Airport.
That will work for me.
Can I be of further assistance to you?
No, but thank you.
Enjoy your day.
Can you find me a flight?
When do you want to leave?
On Sunday this week.
Where will you leave from and where do you want to visit? Also, when are you coming back.
I prefer American Airlines. I just want 1 ticket. I am leaving from ATL and traveling to Chi-town. I want to return on the 6th of this month.
I found 1 American Airlines flight. It departs at 9:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 8:50 pm. This flight costs $187.
When does the return flight arrive?
1:41 am.
Sounds great.
Should I purchase a ticket?
No, I am fine.
May I help with something else.
Yes please. Can you search oneway flights.
I found 1 American Airlines flight. This flight leaves at 9:15 pm and has 0 stops. A ticket costs $133.
Sounds great.
May I help you with something else?
No thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you find a flight for me. I want Southwest Airlines and I want to return on the 14th of this month.
Where are you departing from? When do you want to leave? Where are you planning on visiting?
I'm leaving on the 12th. There's two people in my group and we're going to SFO from LAX.
I found 1 flight for you that fits your trip. It's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 10:20 PM and returns at 12:50 pm. The price of the ticket is $98.
When does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight comes back at 11:45 pm.
Which airport does it leave from, and our my tickets refundable?
The flight leaves from LAX International Airport. The tickets aren't refundable, sorry.
Sounds good to me.
Should I buy them?
No, it's okay. I have a trip coming up, can you find me a oneway flight?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight. It leaves at 10:20 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket is $77.
What airport does it leave from, and is it refundable?
It leaves from LAX International Airport. It's not refundable.
Sounds good to me.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, it's okay.
Have a good day.
I need a to find a flight back on Sunday this week.
Where would you like to go? What dates would you like to travel on?
I need to go to Philly on March 1st for two people. I like Delta Airlines.
What city would you like to leave from?
Paris.
I have 1 flight it is Delta Airlines departing 5:35 pm. The return flight departs at 12:20 pm. The price for the ticket is $378.
Does it have more than one stop?
It has 1 stop.
That sounds good.
Would you like to purchase the tickets?
No can you find me a one way ticket?
I have 1 flight on Delta Airlines departing at 5:35 pm and has 1 stop for $369.
Which airport does it depart form?
Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Not, that will be all.
Have a great day!
Will you help me find some flights?
When and where are you traveling?
I am traveling from San Francisco to Chicago day after tomorrow.
When are you returning?
March 8th on Economy.
I found American Airlines for $178 that leaves at 3:20 pm and return flight leaves at 7:05 am.
Are there any flights on United Airlines for tomorrow?
I found 1 flight on United Airlines for $193 with an outbound flight that leaves at 10:10 pm and return flight that leaves at 6:25 pm.
Which airport does it depart from?
SFO International Airport.
Sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No. Will you find me oneway flights?
I found 1 flight on United Airlines for $176. It leaves at 10:10 pm with 0 stops.
Sounds good.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I need a flight that leaves on the 5th of March. Either business or economy is fine.
Sure, where are you leaving from, where are you going and when do you want to return?
It's three of us in the group. We're travelling to Delhi from LA and we want to get back on the 10th of this month.
I found 1 convenient flight for your trip. It's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:30 am and the return flight leaves at 7 pm. It will cost $331.
What airport will my flight depart from and when does my return flight arrive?
The return flight will arrive at 8:04 pm and the flight departs from LAX International Airport
Sounds good.
Should I purchase the tickets?
No, thank you, I have a trip coming up. Can you find me oneway flights?
I've found 1 that's suitable for you. It's also American Airlines. The outbound flight leaves at 6:30 am and has 1 stop. The ticket will be $346.
Which airport will the flight arrive in and when does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 4:07 pm at Indira Gandhi International airport.
Sounds good to me.
May I assist you with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a great day!
Please help me find flights that will leave tomorrow.
Where will you be leaving from and where do you plan to go?
I will bee visiting Vegas. I am leaving from SF and I prefer Economy seating.
When do you plan to go back?
I do planned to be back 9th of this month. There are 2 people in my group and we prefer flights from American Airlines.
I have found 1 flight that is best for you from American Airlines, it departs at 5:30 pm and returns at 5:30 am. It costs $113.
When will it arrive?
Your return flight will arrive at 7:05 am.
Okay, that sounds good.
Should I book the ticket for you?
No, that's alright.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can you help me book one way flight? I plan to go on a trip.
I found a flight from American Airlines that departs at 5:30 pm with 0 stops. It costs $104.
That sounds good.
Do you need further assistance?
No, thank you!
Have a good day!
Please could you search flights preferably with Alaska Airlines?
For sure, which is the departure city?
I am travelling from San Diego.
Which is the returning date?
I will flight back on the 12th.
When are you going to travel?
I want to travel on 1st of March to SF.
There is flight with Alaska Airlines. Departure time is 11:10 am and returning flight departures at 6:10 am. The price is $114.
This is nice for me.
Do you want that I buy tickets?
No that is OK. Could you find me one way flights on business or economy?
There is 1 suitable flight with Alaska Airlines leaving at 11:10 am with 0 stops. The price is $107.
That is really nice for me.
Do you want anything else?
No that is fine.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a family fun getaway. Would you help me search flight options for our trip, please?
Sure, I'll be happy to assist you. Tell me where you want to go for your trip and when you would like to return.
I want to search flights to Atlanta, GA. I want the return date to be the 14th of March.
All right. From what city do you want your departure? And, when do you want your flight to leave?
Let's make the departure for Tuesday next week, flying out of Seattle, WA.
Got it. There is an American Airlines outbound flight, leaving at 9:45 pm, with a return flight at 11:40 am. The ticket costs $241.
Do you show any other available flights, please?
There is a Delta Airlines outbound flight, leaving at 12:15 pm, with a return flight at 4:20 pm. The cost of that ticket is $191.
Great. Is the cost of the ticket refundable?
No, that ticket is not refundable
Okay, that flight will work.
Shall I buy the tickets for you now?
No, thanks, not now but can you search for one-way flights next? I have a trip coming up that I need to make a reservation for.
I show a Delta Airlines outbound flight, leaving at 12:15 pm, with 0 stops. The price of that ticket is $168.
Cool. I'll take that flight.
Is there any other assistance you need at this time?
Nope, really appreciate your help.
Enjoy your day.
Will you help me find a flight on March 4th?
Where are you visiting? When are you leaving and coming back?
I want to leave on 7th of this month from Phoenix to San Francisco. I plan to return on March 12th. I prefer United Airlines.
I found 1 flight on United Airlines for $132. It leaves at 11:50 pm and returns at 2:15 pm.
Which airport is the departing flight?
Sky Harbor International Airport.
Sounds great.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I am planning on a trip. Will you find me oneway flights?
I found 1 flight on United Airlines for $114 that leaves at 11:50 pm with 0 stops.
Sounds good.
Anything else?
No, that's all for now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Will you help find some flights?
When are you leaving and returning?
I am to leave on the 6th and return on March 13th.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Washington on 10th of this month.
Where do you plan to visit?
Paris, France.
I found 2 flights on American Airlines. The outbound flight leaves at 6:05 am and return flight leaves at 4:05 am. The price of the ticket is $289.
Sounds great.
Do you want to buy the tickets?
No. Can you find me oneway flights?
I found 1 flight on American Airlines for $292. The outbound flight departs at 6:05 am with 1 stop.
What's the arrival time of the onward flight? Is the ticket refundable?
It arrives at 10:22 pm. No, the ticket is not refundable.
Sounds good.
Anything else?
No, that's all for now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I'm traveling to Portland, OR. Can you check flights for me?
What day do you plan on leaving and returning? Where would you like to leave from?
Next Wednesday from Ciudad de Mexico returning on the 11th of this month.
I found 3 flights. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:35 am and the return flight leaves at 7:20 am. The ticket is $269.
Does it have zero stops?
There is only 1 stop.
That sounds good.
Would you like me to buy the tickets?
No. I have an upcoming trip. Can you find a oneway flight for me and one more person in my group?
I found an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:35 am with 1 stop. The cost is $275 per ticket.
What airport and what is the arrival time?
The flight leaves from Benito Juarez International Airport and arrives at 7:45 am.
Sounds good to me.
Is there anything else.
No, thank you.
Have a great day!
Can you list flights for me?
When is departure and arrival and what locations?
Departure on the 7th to SFO and return back on the 10th of March.
What is the departure city.
The departure city is Vegas.
An American Airlines departure at 5:30 am is $108 and returns at 5:30 pm.
Are they any stops.
There are 0 stops.
This flight meets my needs.
Would you like tickets reserved?
No, I have a trip coming up and need a oneway flight.
There is 1 flight on American Airlines that departs at 5:30 am and has 0 stops with a ticket price of $104.
When does the departure flight arrive?
It arrives at 7:05 am.
I like this flight, please reserve.
Done, is there anything else you need?
No thank you that is all.
Thank you and have a great day.
Can you find me a flight which leaves on the 5th?
Sure. Where are you going to, where are you departing from, and when do you want to get back?
I am going from ATL to Las Vegas and want to be back on the 14th of March.
There is a Southwest Airlines ticket for $252. It departs at 2:35 pm, and the flight bringing you back is at 12:05 pm.
Sounds great.
Do you want me to purchase the tickets?
Not right now. I'm going on a trip with two others. Can you find me a one-way flight for three people?
There is 1 such flight. It is through Southwest Airlines and costs $242 per ticket. It departs at 2:35 pm and has 1 stop.
Sounds great.
Do you want anything else?
Nothing else. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
I would like to search flights, please.
Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from NY. I prefer to fly Delta Airlines.
When do you plan to depart and come back, and where would you like to fly to?
I am traveling to LAX. I am leaving on the 1st, returning on March 14th, and I would prefer to travel in Economy.
Delta Airlines has an outbound flight at 7:30 am with a return light at 10:55 pm, and the ticket price is $196.
Is the ticket refundable? Which airport does the flight depart from?
Unfortunately the ticket is not refundable. The flight departs from JFK International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No, that's okay. I have another trip coming up. Can I search for one way flights for a group of 2 people?
I found 1 flight. Delta Airlines has an outbound flight at 7:30 am with 0 stops for $168.
Is the ticket refundable? Which airport does the flight depart from?
Unfortunately the ticket is not refundable. The flight departs from JFK International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you for your help.
Have a great day!
Can you search some flights with Economy seating?
When are you coming back and where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Philadelphia. I want to get back on March 12th.
Where are you going to visit and when will you leave?
I'm leaving on the 9th of March and traveling to Chi-town.
There is a American Airlines flight. The outbound lfight leaves at 10:10 am. The return flight leaves at 6:40 pm. The price is $120.
Are there any other flights availble.
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight leave at 4:40 pm. THe return flight leaves at 9:40 pm. The price is $154.
That flight sound good.
Would you like to buy the ticket now?
No thank you. I have a different trip. Can you find me oneway flights?
I found 1 suitable flight for you. There is a Delta Airlines flight.T he outbound flight leaves at 4:40 pm and it has 1 stop. The price is $162.
What airport does it arrive in? Is the ticket refundable?
The destination is O'Hare International Airport. The ticket is nonrefundable.
Then the flight sound good.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you locate a flight for me?
What dates do you plan to leave and return and where do you want to go?
I need to go to New York,I want to leave later today and return on the 11th.
Where are you planning to depart from?
I will traveling from Vancouver. I want to travel in Premium economy class please.
I came up with 2 flights. One is with Delta Airlines. It takes off at 2:50 am and the returning flight is at 6 am. That ticket would cost $460.
When would the return flight get my home? I also need to know it the ticket is a refundable one.
That ticket would not be refundable. The return flight is scheduled for landing at 2:31 pm.
Alright, that will work.
Shall I purchase a ticket for you?
No that's alright. Can you find one way flights? There is trip I have to take soon.
I did find 1. Delta Airlines has a flight that leaves at 2:50 am fo $406.
From which airport?
That would be YVR International Airport.
I like that one.
Do you need anything elso?
I'm good for now thank you.
My your day be stupendous.
Could you please find me some flights of American Airlines?
When and where do you want to travel?
I want to get to Atlanta, GA by United Airlines. I need tickets for two persons and return flight on 7th of March
When should I book your first flight and from which airport?
I want to fly from London, Uk, at the 4th.
I have 1 good flighs for you, by United Airlines. Outbound flight leaves at 10:25 pm and inbound - at 10:30 am. Total price will be $249.
Oh, this flight suits me well.
Should we buy the tickets?
No, I need another one way flight.
The same, United airlines offer flight at 10:25 pm and this is direct flight with 0 stops. Ticket will cost $238.
And from which airport should I fly?
Departure will be from Heathrow International Airport.
Oh, it seems good for me.
Can I do for you something else?
No, thanks a lot
Have a nice day!
Can you help me to search for flights?
From where will you be leaving?
Im leaving from Portland, we are 4 people in my group.
When are you planning to return?
I wanted to get back on March 6th and I'm travelling to NYC.
When are you planning to leave?
This Sunday Im planning to leave.
I found 3 suitable flights for your trip. There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 7:20 am and return flight leaves at 4:45 pm which costs $334.
When and in which airport will my return flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 11:53 pm at JFK International Airport
Thats perfect for me
Should I get the tickets for it?
No Im fine. I have an another trip upcoming so Is there any oneway flights?
There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 7:20 am and has 1 stop which costs $295
Thats so perfect for me
Shall I assist you with anything else?
No thanks a lot for the help
Have a great day
Please search flights for me. I want two tickets.
Where will you be departing from?
From Los Angeles.
Where are you planning to visit and when are you coming back? Also, when do you want to depart Los Angeles?
I am traveling to ATL and leaving from New York. I am leaving on the 3rd of March and want to come back on March 13th.
An American Airlines flight is available. The departing flight leaves at 11:20 am. The return flight leaves at 6:25 am. The ticket costs $122.
Will the flight have 0 stops.
It has 0 stops.
Works for me.
Shall I purchase the tickets for you?
No, I am fine. I have a trip coming up; can you find me a oneway flight?
I found 1 flight for you on American Airlines. This departing flight leaves at 11:20 am, has 0 stops, and costs $130.
Is it refundable? What airport does it originate from?
It is refundable and it originates from JFK International Airport.
Sounds good.
May I help you with something else?
No thanks.
Have a nice day.
I want to book a flight.
Where and when are you traveling from and to?
I am traveling from SF to Chi-town from the 1st of this month until next Tuesday.
American Airlines has a departure flight at 3:20 pm and a return flight at 12:30 pm for $267.
I actually prefer United Airlines. There are two of us flying.
United Airlines has 1 flight, departing at 10:10 pm with a return flight of 4 am, costing $163 per ticket.
That is perfect.
Should I confirm the reservation?
No, that will be all.
May I further assist you?
Can you find me a one way flight in Economy class?
There is 1 United Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 10:10 pm and the ticket costs $142.
Are refunds available, and what airport is it going to?
The ticket is non-refundable and arrives at O'Hare International Airport.
That flight is perfect.
Do you need anything else?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I'm trying to find a flight. I need to return on March 13th.
Where are you traveling to, when will you be leaving, and where will you be leaving from?
I will be leaving on the 1st to go to Seattle, leaving from Chi-town.
I have a flight on American Airlines leaving at 2:50 PM and returning at 4 PM for $252.
What else do you have please?
I have a Delta airlines flight leaving at 3:35 PM and coming back at 11:50 PM for $183.
Do you have anything else available?
I have a flight on Southwest Airlines leaving at 6:15 PM and returning at 5:25 AM for $259.
I like the sound of that one.
Would you like me to book that question mark
No thanks, not quite yet.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Could you look for one way flights for a trip I have coming up?
I found 1 flight for you on Southwest Airlines with 0 stops leaving at 6:15 PM for $181.
That will work for me.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Not today, thank you.
You're very welcome.
Can you help me find a flight?
Where are you departing from?
From Vancouver, BC.
And where are you going?
To LA.
Departure and return dates?
Leaving this Sunday and returning next Thursday.
There's American Airlines leaving at 11 pm and returning 3:05 pm for $193.
Sounds good.
Shall I book it?
No, I'm just looking for an upcoming trip. Can you look for oneway flights?
There's an American Airlines flight leaving at 11 pm with 0 stops for $142.
Leaving from which airport?
From YVR International Airport.
Sounds good.
Anything else I can help with?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Hey, can you search for flights to Sydney?
When is the return date?
Next Wednesday. I am leaving from SF and would like to travel in Economy.
When do you plan to leave?
Later today, if possible.
I found 1 flight you may like. It's a United Airlines flight bound to leave at 1:25 pm. The return flight time is 5:25 am and the ticket will cost you $223.
What time will I return from my destination? And in which airport will I arrive on the way there?
Your return flight arrives at 5:06 am. And the airport in which you'll arrive on the way there is the Kingsford Smith International Airport.
That's great.
Should I but the tickets?
No, that's all.
Can I help you in anything else?
Can you help me find oneway flights for a trip I have coming up?
I found 1 suitable flight for you. A United Airlines flight bound to leave at 1:25 pm. 0 stops and a ticket that costs $219.
This flight is good for me.
Can I assist you in anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
Have a great day.
Please help me finds flight in Economy.
May I ask when are you panning to leave and where do you plan to go? When do you plan to come back?
I want to leave the day after tomorrow to San Francisco and plans to get back on 12th of this month.
And you are leaving from?
I will be leaving from Seattle.
I found a flight at Alaska Airlines that leaves at 12 pm and has a returning flight at 2:55 pm. It costs $132.
It is refundable and from which airport is it?
It departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport but it is not refundable.
Are there any other flights?
I found one from American Airlines that leaves at 10:25 pm and has a returning flight of 2:15 pm for the price of $141.
It sounds good.
Should I book this one?
No, thanks! But can you find me one way flight instead? There are actually 4 people in my group.
I found one from American Airlines that leaves at 10:25 pm and has 0 stops for the price of $116.
That's nice!
Do yo need help with anything else?
No. Thank you!
Have a great day!
Can you look up flights for me?
When are you returning?
The 13th of this month.
And your destination?
Leaving the 8th of March for Vancouver and returning the 12th.
Leaving from where?
From NY.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines leaving at 6 am for $345. The return flight leaves at 3:20 am.
Which airport does it arrive at and does it have 1 stop?
Flying into YVR International Airport with 1 stop.
Sounds good to me.
Should I book tickets?
No, I'm good, I have a oneway flight I need to look up though.
I found 1 flights on Delta Airlines leaving at 6 am for $301.
Sounds good to me.
Can I help with anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you search flights leaving Saturday this week
Where are you going, and when do you want to come back? Also where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Paris, France, headed to Portland, OR. I want to get back on March 11th
There's a Delta Airlines flight that costs $423. Departing flight is at 11:20 am and the return flight leaves at 8:45 am
Which airport does it depart from and which airport does the flight arrive?
It departs from Charles de Gaulle International Airport with a destination at PDX International Airport
That sounds good
Shall I book it?
No not right now thanks
Shall I help with anything else?
I need one way flights for 4 people
I found 1 flight via Delta Airlines that leaves at 11:20 am and costs $386 total
Which airport does the flight arrive at? Is it refundable?
It arrives at PDX International Airport, and sorry it's not
That sounds good
Shall I book it?
No, thanks anyways
No problem. Have a good one
Can you search some flights for me?
Where are you planning to go?
I'm going to San Diego
When and where do you plan to leave from? When are you coming back?
I'm leaving Phoenix on March 10th and returning on the 13th of this month
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:25 am with a 3:15 pm return flight that costs $136
That flight sounds good
Should I book it?
No not right now
Can I help with anything else?
Can you find me one way flights for an upcoming trip?
There's 1 American Airlines flight with 1 stop that leaves at 6:25 am and costs $176
Which airport does it depart from? And what time does the departing flight arrive?
It arrives at 9:34 am and leaves from Sky Harbor International Airport
That sounds good
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for everything
No problem, have a wonderful day
I'm looking for flights, can you find me some?
What is your destination? When will you be back?
Vancouver sounds like fun. I want to be back on March 13th.
When and where do you want to leave?
March 9th I am leaving New York.
I found 2 flights that would fit. Delta Airlines has one outbound that leaves at 7:30 am. The return flight leaves at 3:20 am. Ticket is $349.
Sounds good to me.
Should I buy the tickets?
No thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
How about some oneway flights for an upcoming trip?
I found 1. Delta Airlines and an outbound flight leaving at 7:30 am with 1 stop. Ticket cost is $331.
Is it refundable? When does the onward flight arrive?
Arrival time is 1:59 pm and unfortunately, the ticket is unrefundable.
Sounds like a good flight.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No thank you. You have been a great help.
You are welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Please can you find flights for me? I would prefer to travel in Economy class in American Airlines.
Where do you plan to visit?
I would be flying to Mexico City.
When is your return journey? From where you are planning to leave from and when you plan to start the journey?
My starting point will be Vegas and it would be on 1st of this month and will be returning by 3rd of this month.
The outbound flight, American Airlines will leave at 9:30 am and the return flight will be leaving at 8:05 am. It would cost $247 for your travel.
It sounds great to me.
Do I need to buy tickets for it?
Nope, not now. I have to travel for a trip very shortly. Please can you find me one way flights?
There is 1 suitable flight, American Airlines that would leave at 9:30 am and has 1 stops. It would cost $230.
At which airport does the flight departs and when does the onward flight would arrive?
The flight would depart from McCarran International Airport and the onward flight will be arriving at 8:05 pm.
Sounds great to me.
Do you need any further assistance?
Nope. Thanks much for your help
Have a fantastic day.
Can you help me search for some flights?
Where would you like to go? How long would you like to stay? And, what city would you like to depart from?
I would prefer to fly on American Airlines. I am travelling to Las Vegas, and I would like to depart from New York. I plan to be back on March 12th.
When would you like to depart?
I need to leave on the 5th of March.
I searched your itinerary, and I found 1 flight that will coincide with your trip. American Airlines has a flight that leaves New York at 4:45 pm on the 5th of March. There is a return flight at 5:30 am on March 12th. The cost of the ticket is $307.
This flight option sounds perfect!
Should I go ahead and purchase the tickets?
No, I can handle it.
Can I help you with anything else?
I have a trip that is coming up. Could you help me find one-way tickets?
I have found 1 flight that will work for you. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm. It has 1 stop, and the cost of the ticket is $289.
This flight will work for me.
Would you like me to help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Please have a wonderful day.
Can you search flights leaving from Seattle?
When do you plan to leave?
I want to leave next Tuesday
Where are you going? And when are you coming back?
I am going to Chicago and want to get back on the 11th of March. There are two of us
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4 pm and has a return flight at 2:50 pm that cost $246
Anything else? Maybe via Southwest Airlines
I found 1 flight from Southwest Airlines that leaves at 4:25 am and returns at 2:50 pm. It costs $250
Which airport does it leave from? Is it refundable?
It leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, and yes it is refundable
That sounds good
Should I buy tickets?
No, not right now. Can you find me one way economy flights though?
I found 1 flight on Southwest Airlines with 0 stops that leaves at 4:25 am and costs $178
That sounds good
Can I do anything else?
No that's all thanks
Have a good one!
Could you please help me to search flights?
Where and when do you plan to visit?
I like American Airlines will be leaving on the 5th to New Delhi and back on 9th of this month
Where will you be leaving from?
Im leaving from Vegas in Economy for one people in my group
There is 1 suitable flight for you. Thats an American Airlines leaves at 10:55 am and return flight leaves at 7 pm which costs $365
When and which airport does the flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 9:35 pm to Indira Gandhi International Airport
Thats perfect for me
Should I get the tickets for it?
No I have a trip coming so please find me oneway flights
There is one American Airlines flight which leaves at 10:55 am and has 1 stop which costs $341
WHen will the flight arrives?
The flight arrives at 8:39 pm
Is there any other available flights?
Sorry there are no more flights right now which suits your requests. Shall I assist you with some other thing?
No Thanks for the help
Have a great day
Search for flights departing Mexico City please.
When do you plan to depart and what is your anticipated return date?
I have to leave next Tuesday and plan on returning on the 10th. I will 4 seats and I would like to find a flight with American Airlines if possible.
Do you have a destination in mind?
We are going to go to Chi-town.
American Airlines is offering a flight for $315 per ticket that will take off at 2:35 am with a return flight scheduled for 12:30 pm.
What airport will I leave from?
You would board your plane at the Benito Juarez International Airport.
I want to take that flight.
Would you like to make your ticket purchase made now?
No, it can wait. What I rally need is a one way flight for my impending vacation.
I found 1 American Airlines flight that meets your specifications. The plane will take off at 2:35 am and makes 1 stop. Seats can be purchased for $296.
What time does it touch down and what airport wilI be at?
The plane is slotted for arrival at 1:52 pm. You will be flying into O'Hare International Airport.
I thank that flight is a good fir. I want it.
Do you want some more help?
No you've done more than enough thank you.
Have a fantastic day.
Can you search flights, preferably American Airlines?
Where are you leaving from and going to? When do you want to visit?
I want to go to San Francisco to New York on Monday next week. I need tickets for two people.
When are you returning?
I want to come back next Wednesday.
I found 1 American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm and returns at 8:30 pm. Each ticket is $195.
What airports do the flights leave from and arrive at?
The return flight arrives at the SFO International Airport at 5:56 am.
That sounds good.
Would you like to purchase those tickets?
No thank you. Can you find a oneway flight, preferable Economy?
There is a flight leaving 4:45 pm on American Airlines with 0 stops. The ticket fare is $171.
Yes, that is fine.
What else can I help you with?
Nothing, thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I need a flight.
Where are you going and leaving?
I wan to travel in Economy from LA to London.
When are you returning?
I am going to Chi-town and return on the 8th of this month.
What day are you leaving?
I am departing on March 2nd.
Search revealed 3 flights. I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:30 am and the returning flight departs at 4:30 am. It costs $180.
That works for me.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No, not right now. Can you find oneway flights for an upcoming trip?
Search revealed 1 flight for you. It is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops and leaves at 8:30 am. It costs $163.
What airport does it fly out of and when does the flight arrive?
It flies out of LAX International Airport and arrives at 3:02 pm.
That works for me.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I need help with flights.
Where will you go and where will you depart from?
Leaving ATL and going to Paris.
When will your departure time/date be?
Friday Next week.
When will you return?
12th of March. I really must have Delta Airlines.
There is only 1 option. Delta Airlines has a flight that leaves at 3:40 pm. The return leaves at 5:35 pm. The price on that is $360.
That seems exactly right, I want that.
Should I get tickets for you?
No, I'm looking for a one way trip.
I have 1 flight you'll like. Delta Airlines, leaving 3:40 pm. with 1 stop. Your cost will be $320.
What airport will I arrive at?
Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Perfect.
what else can I help with today?
Nothing much, I'm good.
Have a good flight.
Could you search flights to Chicago for me?
What is your departure city?
I will be leaving from Vancouver. I prefer Delta Airlines and Economy class works just fine.
What will be your date of departure?
I'd like to leave on March 2nd and return on the 9th of March.
I found 1 flight for your trip. It is a Delta Airlines flight. It leaves at 2:50 am and returns at 8:30 am. The cost of the ticket is $249.
That flight sounds great to me.
Should I purchase the ticket?
No, I am good for now.
Can I help you with anything else?
I have another trip coming up. Can you find me a oneway flight?
I found 1 flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines flight. It leaves at 2:50 am and has 0 stops. The cost is $166.
That flight sounds good to me.
May I help you with anything else at this time?
No. Thanks for the help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me flights leaving from CDMX?
Where will you visit and when will you come back?
I am going to Vegas and will come back on the 4th of this month.
When will you leave?
I will leave later today.
I have 1 good flight. It is an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:05 am and returning at 9:30 am. It costs $220.
When will my return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 8:05 pm
That flight sounds good.
Should I purchase the tickets?
Not at the moment. I have a trip coming up soon. Can you find me one way flights?
I have 1 flight that you should like. It's an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:05 am with 1 stop. It costs $204.
That flight sounds perfect.
Would I be able to help you with anything else?
No, that's it.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a flight to Mexico City?
When are you leaving? Where would you like to leave from? And when will you be back?
I'm leaving on the 8th from Los Angeles and I would like to get back on the 14th of March.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves LA at 2:45 pm and returns to LA at 8:05 am. The price is $163.
Are there any other flights? I like to travel in Economy.
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves LA at 9:15 am and returns to LA at 1:45 pm. The ticket costs $253.
That sounds great.
Should I buy the tickets?
Nope, I'm good for now.
Do you need help with anything else?
Could you find me oneway flights for my upcoming trip?
I've found 1 flight for you. There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 9:15 am and has 1 stop. It costs $241.
What airport does the flight go to?
Benito Juarez International Airport.
That sounds great.
Do you need any more help?
No, that will be all. Thanks!
Have a great day!
Can you serach some flights for me? I want to be back on the 12th of March.
Where will you be leaving from? Where are you planning to visit and when do you plan to leave.
I'm leaving on the 1st of March and am traveling to SFO. I 'm leaving from Phoenix, AZ
I found 3 flight for your trip. Thereis an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 7:35 am. The return fligh tleaves at 8:10 am. The price of the tickets is $200.
Are there any other availble flights? I prefer UNited Airlines. I like traveling Economy.
Found 1 flight for the trip. There is an United Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 11:50 pm. The return flight leaves at 2:15 pm. The price is $140.
When does the flight return?
The return flight arrives at 4:22 pm.
That flight sound good.
Should I buy the tickets for it?
No, actuatlly could you find me a different flight? A oneway flight?
There is a United Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 11:50 pm and it has 0 stops. The prices of the ticket is $128.
Is the ticket refundable?
No, the ticket is not refundable.
Any other flights available?
Sorry, I wasn't able to find any other flight. Do you need help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you please search for flights on the 2nd of this month.
Where will you be leaving from?
I am leaving from NY.
Where are you planning to visit? When are you returning?
I am traveling to SF and I'll return next Thursday.
There is an outbound American Airlines flight at 4:45 pm. The return flight leaves at 8:30 pm. The price is $213.
Does it have zero stops? Which airport does the plane leave from?
0 stops on this flight. Leaves from JFK International Airport.
That sounds good.
Should I buy the tickets?
No, not now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I have a trip coming up, can you find me a oneway flight?
American Airlines with 0 stops, leaves at 4:45 pm and the price of the ticket is $198.
That sounds great.
Is there anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you search for some flights for me? I am taking a trip soon.
Where are you visiting and when do you plan on leaving?
I am leaving on March 2nd traveling to Toronto, Canada from ATL.
When will you be returning?
I am returning on the 14th of this month. I prefer United Airlines.
I found 1 flight that matches the criteria. There is a United Airlines flight departing at 12:50 pm and retuning at 5:35 pm for $240.
How many stops does the flight have? Which airport does the flight depart from?
There is 1 stop on the flight. It is departing from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That flight looks good to me.
Do you want me to book the flight?
No, thank you. I have another trip coming up, can you find me oneway flights?
There is a United Airlines flight departing at 12:50 pm with 1 stop for $222.
That flight works for me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you!
Have a great day.
can you find a one way filght for me
where are you traveling from and to? when are you leaving?
Please find me a refundable tickets that is traveling from las vegas to san diego on economy flight on the 14th
i found 3 flights for you. What about american airlines with 0 stop for $79 depart at 7:15 pm
perfect, please find me a bus going there on 3rd of march
there is 1 economy bus ticket for $37 depart at 3:50 pm
what is the bus station called? what station does it arrive
you will leave from union plaza and arrive at santa fe depot
ok perfect, please purchase bus ticket for me
how many do you need
i need 4 tickets
please confirm your booking for 4 economy tickets traveling from las vegas to san diego on march 3rd at 3:50 pm
actually its for two people
please confirm your changes to 2 people depart at 3:50 pm
yes please
your ticket is booked
thank you that's all i need
have a nice aday
Could you help me in finding one way flight?
When will you leave?
I am moving on 6th of March.
From which place you are moving from? Where do you want to go?
I am moving from Vancouver to Seattle.
I searched and found 2 flights for you. It is a Air Canada with 1 stop which leaves at 4:45 pm. The cost of the ticket is $278.
Whether the ticket is refundable? What is the name of the flight arriving airport?
Sorry. the ticket is not refundable. The reaching station is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
It is good for me.
Shall I book tickets?
No. It can be done later.
Do you need any other help?
What about the bus to go there?
When are you leaving? what about March 6th?
I wish to leave on the 5th.
What about a bus moving at 6:40 am. It is an Economy ticket and the cost is $28.
From which station the bus starts?
The starting station is Pacific Central Station.
What is the name of the bus reaching station?
The reaching station is King Street Station.
It is good. I wish to get bus tickets for two persons.
Kindly ensure that, on March 5th, Economy ticket has been booked for 2 persons from Vancouver to Seattle at 6:40 am.
Yes. it is good for me.
Your ticket is booked.
Thank you so much for your help. That is what I want.
Have a fantastic day.
?Can you find me a one way flight from Vancouver, BC?
Where are you going to and when are you leaving?
I am leaving the 4th of this month and going to Portland, OR.
I found 2 flights for you on Air Canada. The first one departs at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop. The cost is $247 per ticket.
That sounds good. Are there any buses going there? I am planning on leaving March 1st.
I found 8 buses for you. There is one leaving at 9:20 am in economy. The cost is $42 per ticket.
That sounds good. I would like to purchase a ticket.
How many do you want to purchase?
2 tickets please.
Please confirm the following details: Purchasing 2 tickets on a bus leaving from Vancouver to Portland in economy, departing at 9:20 am on March 1st.
No, I need it for four people.
Please confirm the following: Purchasing 4 tickets departing from Vancouver.
Yes, that is correct. What bus station an I leaving from?
Your tickets are confirmed. The origin station is Pacific Central Station.
Thank you for you help.
Can I help you with anything else?
No thank you, that is all.
Have a great day.
I need one-way flights leaving March 13th from SF.
Where are you visiting?
I would like to travel Alaska Airlines to LAX.
An outbound flight from Alaska Airlines leaves 7:10 pm with 0 stops priced at $107.
Tell me the airport it leaves from and when the onward flight arrives.
The flight arrives 8:35 pm departing from SFO International Airport.
The flight sounds very good to me. What about the bus there?
When do you wish to leave? What about March 13th?
I will plan to leave March 11th.
I have 10 buses including one leaving 7 am for $43 Economy.
Which bus station am I leaving from?
The Salesforce Transit Center I am leaving from.
What station will the bus reach?
The end destination is Union Station.
That sounds terrific.
Would you like to buy bus tickets?
Yes, I'd like a seat for one.
Please confirm a bus from San Francisco to Los Angeles leaving March 11th at 7 am for 1 person Economy.
Yes, that will work.
The ticket is confirmed.
Thanks so much for all your help. That's all I want.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me one-way flights to San Diego? I need tickets for 3 people.
Where will you be departing from?
I'm travelling from LA.
When are you planning to go?
I will leave on the 14th.
I have an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops for $55. That flight leaves at 7:30 am.
Which airport does it leave from?
That flight leaves from LAX International Airport.
What else is available? I don't care what class.
I have 3 flights for you to choose. American Airlines has a 0 stop flight leaving at 7:40 am for $71.
That flight sounds good. Is there a bus that can get me there?
When do you want to leave? Is that on March 14th?
We are leaving next Thursday.
Okay. There's a bus leaving at 7:40 am. An economy ticket will cost $28.
That sounds good. Please buy bus tickets.
Confirming your request: You are getting 3 economy tickets for the bus from Los Angeles to San Diego on March 7th. The departure time is 7:40 am.
Yes, that's good. What is the name of the station that bus leaves from?
Your tickets are confirmed. The bus will leave from Union Station.
What station does it arrive at?
It arrives at Santa Fe Depot.
Thanks, that was all I needed.
Have a good trip.
Can you get a one-way flight for me?
Sure. Where are you leaving and going?
My trip spans San Diego to SFO.
When will you plan on leaving?
On the 4th, preferably via Alaska Airlines?
How's this Alaska Airlines flight sound? It leaves at 11:10 am, has 0 stops, and a ticket costs $105.
Sounds great to me.
Want to get a ticket there?
No I do not.
Can I help you out further?
Yes. Can you find a bus for me to travel by instead? My group of one leaves on the 6th of this month.
How about a $62 economy ticket for a bus leaving at 7:40 am?
What station is it headed to?
To Salesforce Transit Center.
And what is the name of the initial station?
It's called Santa Fe Depot.
I don't know... What other buses are there?
There's a $52 economy ticket for a bus that leaves at 10 am.
What about something else?
You could perhaps get a $56 economy ticket for a bus leaving at 11:40 am.
Sounds good. I'd like to get tickets.
You want 1 economy ticket for a bus that goes from San Diego to San Francisco on March 6th at 11:40 am?
Yes, that works. What station is the bus going to?
I got the ticket. It's headed to Salesforce Transit Center.
Thanks for helping me get a bus.
Can I help you out with a different matter?
No. Thanks for everything.
Have yourself a wonderful day!
Will you find one-way flights?
Where are you traveling to and from?
From Los Angeles to San Diego.
When?
March 12th.
I found 4 flights. Alaska Airlines offers a flight that leaves at 7:30 am with 0 stops for $65.
Great. Will you find a Flexible ticket on a bus going there on 10th of March?
I found a Flexible ticket bus that leaves at 7:40 am for $49.
What's the origin station?
Union Station.
Great.
Want to buy tickets?
Yes, for 1.
Please confirm 1 Flexible ticket on a bus from Los Angeles to San Diego on March 10th at 7:40 am.
Good.
I've reserved your ticket.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No. That's all.
Have a nice day.
Could you help me in finding one-way flights?
When will you leave? Where do you want to go?
On the 12th I am moving to Las Vegas.
From which place do you want to leave from?
I am moving from Los Angeles.
I searched and found 5 flights for you. It is an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops which will start at 8:20 pm. The ticket price is $89.
From which airport the flight moves from? whether the ticket is refundable?
The flight starts from LAX International Airport. Sorry, the ticket is not refundable.
Is there any other flight options available?
It is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops which will start at 8:25 pm. The ticket price is $86.
It is good for me.
Shall I book ticket for you?
No. It can be done later. What about the bus going there? I wish to leave on tomorrow. It is for two persons.
What about the bus moving at 7:40 am. The cost of the ticket is $39. It is an Economy class ticket.
Is there any other bus options available?
What about the bus moving at 12:30 pm. The cost of the ticket is $37. It is an Economy class ticket.
Is there any other bus options available?
What about the bus moving at 1:40 pm. The cost of the ticket is $38. It is an Economy class ticket.
It is good.
Shall I book ticket on this bus?
Yes. I wish to book a seat.
Kindly ensure that, on March 2nd, Economy ticket has been booked for 2 persons from Los Angeles to Las Vegas at 1:40 pm.
Yes. it is good for me. What is the name of the bus reaching station and starting station?
Your ticket is booked. The starting station is Union Station and the reaching station is Union Plaza.
Thank you so much for your help. That is what I want.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to find one-way flights.
What is your destination and place of departure?
I will be leaving from Portland, OR to Seattle.
What is your date of departure?
My date of departure is this Sunday.
I found an American Airlines which departs at 6 am with 0 stop and the ticket is priced at $89.
Can you check whether the ticket is refundable and the destination of the flight?
The flight arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and the ticket is non refundable.
can you look for two tickets in any other available flight?
I found Delta Airlines which leaves at 9:35 am with 0 stop and the price of the ticket is $70.
Okay. That sounds good to me.
Would you like me to buy the tickets for you?
No.Don't book the tickets now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you find me a bus going there on the 13th?
There are 8 buses suitable to your choices. How about economy ticket in a bus which leaves at 8:40 am and the price of the ticket is $31.
Okay. That sounds good to me.
Would you like me to buy the tickets for the bus?
Yes, Please book tickets for the bus.
Please confirm: You want me to book 2 Economy tickets in a bus leaving at 8:40 am from Portland on March 13th to Seattle.
Yes, That is correct. What is the destination of the bus?
I have successfully reserved your tickets. The bus reaches to King Street Station.
Thank you so much!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Have a nice day.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
I need a one-way flight
What's the destination?
I want to visit San Francisco
What's the departure day?
I wanto to leave on March 9th
What is the city of departure?
The city is Vegas
There's an American Airlines flight at 10:55 am, with 0 stops. It costs $95
What is the destination airport?
The flight arrives in SFO International Airport
Can the ticket be refunded?
Yes, it's possible to refund
It's perfect for me! Are there buses to get to the airport?
Do you want to leave on March 9th?
No, I want to leave on the 14th
There's a bus at 10:50 am. The Economy ticket costs $52
What is the destination station?
The bus reaches Salesforce Transit Center
Ok, It's fine!
Do you want to book tickets?
Yes, I need to reserve a seat
For how many people?
A ticket for 2 people
2 Economy tickets from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 14th at 10:50 am. Do you confirm?
Yes I confirm. What is the departure station?
Union Plaza. Your reservation is confirmed
Thanks so much
Do you need anything else?
No, It's all for now
Have a nice day
I need a hand with finding one way flight.
Sure, when are you leaving and where are you going?
Going to Washington today.
And where are you departing from?
From New York.
There are 3 flights that I found. There's a 10:55 AM American Airlines flight with 0 stops for $85.
Could you tell me some other ones?
Of course. I also have a 2:35 PM Southwest Airlines flight, also with 0 stops and an $85 ticket price.
That sounds fine. I'm going to need a bus ticket as well. That's going to be on March 2nd for 3 people and the ticket type doesn't matter.
I have 8 options for you. There is a 6 AM departure with a $40 economy ticket.
What do you have for a March 11th departure?
I have 7 buses. There's a bus departing at 9:40 AM with a $34 economy ticket.
What bus station does that leave from?
Port Authority Station.
Anything else available?
There's one departing at 11:10 AM and that's a $34 economy ticket.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy tickets now?
Yes I would.
Confirming 3 economy tickets on a bus leaving New York on March 11th at 11:10 AM and heading to Washington.
Sounds great, thanks.
The reservation is complete.
Thank you for your help.
Anything else today?
I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
I want to go for a short trip and for which I need to search for one-way flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
Yes, I can search for you and I want to know the starting place of your travel plan so that I can search in that City.
I am planning to leave from SD and I need the flights from here.
To which place you are planning to visit? and let me know about the starting date of your travel plan.
I want to visit Vancouver, BC for which I am planning to leave from SD on March 9th and we are two persons in our team.
Found an outbound Alaska Airlines flight with 1 stop which leaves at 3:20 pm with ticket price as $198. Check this whether it is convenient or not?
What is the origin Airport of this flight?
It will leave from SAN International Airport and what else information you need from me?
I also want to know the destination Airport for this flight.
It will reach YVR International Airport finally. Is that okay.
Is there any other flight that you found for me?
One more flight which is an outbound flight from Delta Airlines with 1 stop. The price of the ticket is $206 and it will leave at 11:05 am. Hope this is suitable to you.
No, I want to search more and please check for the flight to Las Vegas with refundable tickets as there my be a chance of cancelling my trip.
What about an outbound flight from American Airlines leaves at 4:40 pm for which the price of the ticket is $88. This flight has 0 stops.
Yes, this is perfect to me. Thanks.
How can I help you further?
I want to search for a bus to go there and I need your help to find the one.
Shall I proceed with booking of bus for leaving date as March 9th.
No, change it to 1st of March, that is my planned departure date.
Found 1 bus which leaves at 6:50 pm and the price of the ticket is $35 under Economy class. What do you think about this bus?
I think this will be a good and I choose this for me. Thanks.
Shall I book the tickets now?
Yes, do it for me.
Please confirm to book 2 Economy class tickets in the bus which leaves from San Diego on March 1st at 6:50 pm to Las Vegas.
That is confirmed to proceed further.
Your tickets are booked successfully for the selected bus.
Thank you very much for your help
Do you need anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
Could you find me a one-way flight to New York City?
Sure! Where would you depart from? What is the date you'd plan to depart?
I'd be leaving from Philadelphia on the 10th of March.
Okay, I found 4 flights available. One of them is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops. It leaves at 4:45 pm and costs $63.
Okay, that sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase the tickets now?
No, not now. What about a bus? Possible Flexible tickets for three people?
Would you like to depart March 10th?
No, next Thursday.
Okay, I found a bus that leaves at 8:30 am with Flexible tickets. It'll cost $44 per ticket.
Okay, that sounds good. I'd like to get the tickets.
Okay. You'd like to leave from Philadelphia to New York on March 7th at 8:30 am. It will be for 3 people with Flexible tickets. Is this correct? Please confirm.
Yes, I'd like those tickets.
Okay, your tickets are confirmed and purchased.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Nope, that's it. Thanks again!
You're welcome, have a good day.
I am in need of finding a one-way flight, for which I will leave on 5th of March from Philly.
Can you tell me your destination?
I want to arrive to New York City.
There are 4 flights which match what you want. One of the flight is the American Airlines flight, which has 0 stops and with the outbound flight departing at 4:45 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $61.
Is there some other flight? I will fly off on 2nd of this month.
There are 3 flight which suit what you want. One of the flights is with Delta Airlines which has 0 stops and the outbound flight takes off at 4:40 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $63.
Can you please recommend some other flight?
There is also a Southwest Airlines flight with 0 stops which leaves at 7:45 am, and the ticket for this flight costs $68.
This flight suits me well.
Do you want to buy tickets for this flight?
No, I am not in need of buying tickets for this flight now.
Is there something else I can do for you?
Can you check for a bus to go there?
Can you tell me from where will you depart? How would you like for March 2nd?
I am actually planning to leave on 5th of March, and I want the tickets to be Economy extra ones.
How would you consider having Economy extra tickets for the bus which leaves at 8:30 am? The price for the tickets of this bus is $34.
Is there some other bus you can recommend? I need tickets for four people.
There are 7 buses which you might like. How would you like to have Economy extra ticket for the bus which leaves at 9:50 am. The ticket for this bus costs $36.
Can you tell me which is the arrival destination of this bus?
The arrival destination of this bus is Port Authority Station.
Can you also please tell me the name of the bus station from where I will depart?
The bus station from where your bus leaves is Intercity Terminal.
Is there some other bus you can recommend?
You might also consider having Economy extra ticket for the bus which leaves at 10:10 am. The ticket for this bus would cost you $32.
That seems nice. I would like to have tickets bought for this bus.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy extra ticket for 4 people, for the bus which leaves from Philadelphia on March 5th at 10:10 am to go to New York?
That suits me well. Can you tell me the name of the bus station from where I will depart, and the name of the bus station where I will arrive?
Your requested ticket has been booked. The bus station from where the bus leaves is Intercity Terminal, and the bus station where the bus arrives is Port Authority Station.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can do for you?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you have provided to me.
Have a wonderful time!
I need a one way flight on an economy
when are you leaving? where are you traveling from and going to?
i am traveling from sd to san fran on saturday this week
i would 5 tickets for you. What about alaska airlines with 0 stop for $103 at 11:10 am
ok perfect
would you like to purchase a ticekt
no not yet
what else can i help you
can you find me a bus to get there
are you leaving on march 2nd
no i am leaving on 3rd of this month
i found 6 buses for you. This one is a economy ticket for $60 depart at 7:40 am
ok perfect
would you like to purchase the ticket
yes, please purchase for one people
please confirm your economy ticket for 1 people traveling from san diego to san francisco on march 3rd at 7:40 am
ok perfect, what bus station is this leaving from
you will depart from santa fe depot
thank you
have a nice day
I need a one way flight from Los Angeles please.
Sure, when are you leaving and where are you heading?
Going to Vegas on the 11th.
I have a flight on American Airlines which departs at 8:25 pm and has 0 stops. The fare is $81.
Is that a refundable ticket?
No, I'm sorry.
Okay, that's fine. I need a bus, too, on the 2nd. I'd like an economy fare.
There are 4 buses fitting that description. I have one with a departure at 7:40 am for a $39 economy price.
What else do you have?
There's another one with a 12:30 pm departure and that economy fare is $37.
Any other options?
Sure, there's a bus which leaves at 1:40 pm and the economy fare for that one is $38.
Could you tell me what bus stations we're talking about?
Yes, it leaves from Union Station and the destination is Union Plaza.
Sounds good to me. May I buy tickets?
How many please?
Just 1 person.
Confirming 1 economy ticket for a bus from Los Angeles to Las Vegas on March 2nd, departing at 1:40 pm.
Sorry, make that two people please.
Confirming a bus leaving on March 2nd for 2 passengers.
Great, thank you.
The reservation has been booked.
Thanks for your assistance today.
Certainly. Will there be anything else?
No, I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
I need your support for my next trip, I need one-way plane tickets
When are you leaving and where are you headed to?
Departure day is the 1st of this month and I need to reach portland, or
Where are you leaving from?
I'll depart from vancouver
Then you can fly with air canada, you'll leave at 8:05 am and pay $235 for the ticket. The flight has 1 stops
Where will I arrive?
you'll land in pdx international airport
May I ask for a refund if I have to change my plans? Tell me the name of the departure airport
you'll leave from yvr international airport and the ticket won't be refunded
that's okay. I was thinking that I could also travel by bus
Do you want to depart on march 1st?
No, the 13th of this month works for me
there are 8 buses, one is leaving at 9:20 am and the economy ticket costs $43
I like it
I am able to buy tickets
yes, buy 4 of them
before I do that, I need you to confirm me this recap. I am about to buy 4 economy bus tickets to travel from vancouver on march 13th at 9:20 am to portland
yes, go on
tickets have been reserved
where am I leaving from?
you're leaving from pacific central station
where will I arrive to?
You'll reach portland bus station
thank you for your helping hand
you're welcome, I can assist you more if you need me
no, that's all, bye
goodbye sir
I want to search for one-way flight for which I need your help to search for the suitable one.
What is the start and end place of your travel plan and let know the date when you are leaving, so that I can search according to your convenient dates.
I have planned to travel from New York on 4th of this month to Washington. Is that information is enough to search for the flight or do you want more.
That is enough. Searched and found an outbound flight from American Airlines which leaves at 10:55 am with 0 stops for which the cost is $91.
Can you check whether the ticket will be refundable or not and also let me know the arrival time of onward flight for my reference.
The arrival time of onward flight i at 12:05 pm and the ticket will not be refundable.
That's okay. I will go with this flight. Thanks.
Do you want any more help?
Yes, search for a bus to go there?
Shall I proceed with the searching process for departure date as March 4th?
No, search it for this Saturday.
Found 8 results. What about a bus leaves at 6 am for which the price for Economy class ticket is $40.
That's the one I want. Thanks.
How can I help you further?
I need your help to purchase tickets on this bus and it is for 1 person.
Need your confirmation to book 1 ticket under Economy class i n a bus leaving from New York on March 2nd at 6 am to Washington.
That is okay to proceed.
I have booked the tickets successfully.
Thanks and that's all I want for now.
Have a good day.
I'd like to find a flight.
Where would you like to go, where will you be leaving from and when do you want to leave?
I'm going to New York City from Philly on the 5th.
There are 4 flights that meet your criteria. How about an American Airlines flight leaving at 4:45 pm that has 0 stops and costs $61 per ticket?
Can you find other options for me?
How about a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 4:40 pm that has 0 stops and costs $57 per ticket.
I think I'd like to keep searching please. I'd like to fly with united Airlines if possible. There will be 4 people travelling.
There is 1 United Airlines flight leaving at 4:45 am with 0 stops and a cost of $54 per ticket.
That sounds great.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Not right now thanks.
Do you need help with anything else?
What are the other options to travel there? can I take a bus?
Will you be leaving on March 5th?
I'd like to leave next Thursday.
There is a bus leaving at 8:30 am and the price for an economy ticket is $24.
That's perfect thanks.
Would you like to buy a bus ticket?
Yes please, go ahead and purchase a ticket.
Okay sure. So to confirm: You would like to book 4 economy bus tickets from Philadelphia to New York leaving on March 7th at 8:30 am.
Yes that's correct.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks for your help. That's all for now.
Enjoy your day.
I need to book a one-way flight.
Sure, what's your destination and when and where are you leaving from?
I'm going from Seattle to Portland, OR on the 3rd.
Okay, I found 3 flights that look right. How about an American Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 8:05 am? It's $75.
Is it refundable and when does it land in Portland?
It's not refundable, sorry. It arrives at 9:03 am.
Sounds good, but check on flexible bus tickets too. Look for something leaving the 13th of March.
Sure thing, there's 10 you may like. I found a $50 flexible ticket for the bus leaving at 6:10 am.
Anything else? Try searching for four economy extra tickets.
Sure, I found 9 options. There's a $35 economy extra seat on the bus departing at 6:30 am.
Let's buy those.
Sure, please confirm you'd like 4 economy extra tickets for the bus from Seattle to Portland leaving March 13th at 6:30 am.
Sounds good to me.
I've confirmed your tickets.
Okay, what bus station am I leaving from?
It's King Street Station.
Great, thanks for doing that.
Sure thing, need anything else?
Nope, that's all for now.
Enjoy your day.
find one-way flights
where will you visit and when?
lax leaving 11th of this month from san diego
2 flights alaska airlines 3:20 pm 0 stops $54 dollars
what airport is it at?
san international airport to lax international airport
any other flights?
american airlines leaves 9:50 am with 0 stops and $62 bucks
that works for me
wanna get tickets?
no I don't and bus?
how about march 11th for you?
tomorrow then please
6:10 am $29 and economy
what bus place?
santa fe depot
what station then?
the union station
any other buses?
6:50 am $27 and economy
any other buses?
8:30 am $29 and economy
that is good
wanna get tickets?
yes I do 3
confirm san diego los angeles march 2nd leaves 8:30 am for 3 and economy
what station now?
origin is santa fe depot and going ti union station
thanks a lot
anything else now?
no thank you
have a good one
I need a Premium Economy one-way ticket. Leaving March 13th, going to SFO.
And where will you be leaving from?
Leaving from Vegas.
There is a $152 American Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 10:55 am. Would that work?
Yeah, that works. What about the bus going there? I want to leave on the 14th of March and prefer Flexible tickets.
There are 6 such buses. How about a Flexible ticket for $72, leaving at 10:50 am.
What else is there? I need it for 4 people. Really any type of ticket is fine.
Alright, I found 5 possibilities. There is a 12:50 pm Economy ticket for $57.
And where does that go?
Destination station is Salesforce Transit Center.
Sounds perfect, thanks.
Is there anything else you need assistance with?
Yea, go ahead and purchase those bus tickets.
Alright, please confirm the following. You want a 4 Economy tickets for the bus from San Francisco to Las Vegas leaving March 14th at 12:50 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What is the station I will be leaving from?
Your purchase is confirmed. You will be leaving from Union Plaza.
Perfect, thanks for the help.
Enjoy your trip!
Can you get a one-way flight for me?
Can you give me your to-and-from destinations, plus the time you're leaving?
My trip from Vegas to Atlanta, GA happens on Thursday next week.
There's a 1 stop, $269 American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:40 am. Would you like that one?
Not sure. Can you find another flight that can take 1 person to SD?
Okay. How's this 0 stop $89 Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 7:50 pm?
What airport does it leave from?
McCarran International Airport.
Sounds good. How about a bus to there?
Want to depart on March 7th?
I'd prefer Monday next week.
I found 1 bus for you, which leaves at 3:50 pm and an economy ticket for which costs $37.
Sounds good. I'd like to get a ticket.
Okay, so you want 1 economy ticket for a bus that leaves from Las Vegas to San Diego on March 4th at 3:50 pm?
Yes. What bus stations will it travel between?
I confirmed your ticket. It'll go from Union Plaza to Santa Fe Depot.
Thanks for the help.
Can I help you out further?
No. Thank you.
Have yourself a wonderful day.
I need an economy one-way flight on American Airlines.
Sure, where to and where are you leaving from? Also which day would you like to leave?
Friday next week I'm going to vegas from SF
There's 1 american airlines flight with 0 stops at 5:30 pm costing $102
Great, I'll need a bus and I want to leave on the 13th of this month.
There's 7 buses you might like. How about an economy seat that's $54 and leaves at 7:20 am?
Is there anything else? I want an economy extra ticket and want to leave march 6th.
There's 6 buses. Would you like a economy extra 7:50 am bus for $58?
Yes, that sounds perfect.
Should I purchase this ticket?
Yes, please.
How many would you like?
Three.
Please confirm: 3 economy extra tickets leaving from San Francisco and arriving at Las Vegas around 7:50 am on march 6th
Perfect, what's the name of the station I'm leaving from?
Confirmed and the station is Salesforce Transit Center.
Awesome, thanks.
Is there anything else?
Nope, that's all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Please search for one-way flights.
When are leaving and returning and where are you going?
I am traveling from Las Vegas to San Francisco on the 9th of March.
American Airlines has a flight with 0 stops that leaves at 10:55 am with a ticket price of $95.
That flight works. Is there a bus I can take there?
Are you still planning to depart on March 9th?
No, I am planning to leave March 10th.
You can purchase an economy ticket for $49 on the bus leaving at 10:50 am.
What stations do I depart and arrive?
You will leave from Union Plaza and arrive at Salesforce Transit Center.
Great. I would like to purchase 2 bus tickets.
Please confirm 2 economy tickets on the bus leaving Las Vegas March 10th at 10:50 am and arriving in San Francisco.
Yes, that is right.
Ticket purchase confirmed.
Your help is appreciated! That is all I need at this time.
Enjoy the day!
I'm looking for a one-way flight.
What city are you departing from?
I'm leaving from New York.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm traveling to Washington on the 10th and I prefer Southwest Airlines.
I found 1 flight that may work. It is a Southwest Airlines flight departing at 5:55 pm with 0 stops for $97.
That flight works for me.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the flight now?
No, maybe later.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I'd like to find bus tickets there. I prefer economy extra.
What date are you departing on? Does March 10th work?
I'm planning on leaving Thursday next week.
There is a bus leaving at 6 am for $42 and it is in economy extra.
That sounds good, I'd like to purchase tickets.
How many tickets do you need?
I only need one ticket.
Okay, I have 1 economy extra bus ticket departing New York on March 7th at 6 am traveling to Washington, correct?
No, I need 3 tickets.
Okay, 3 tickets for the bus leaving at 6 am, right?
Yes, that is right.
I have purchased the tickets.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a great day!.
Could you help me find one way flight from San Fran to SD leaving on the 11th of this month?
I found 5 flights for you. An Alaska Airlines outbound flight with 0 stops leaves at 6:10 am for $115.
Where is the destination airport of the flight?
The flight will arrive at SAN International Airport.
Were there any other flights available? I like American Airlines.
I found an American Airlines outbound flight with 1 stop leaving at 12:15 pm for $157.
That flight works for me.
Were you looking to buy tickets for this flight?
No, I did not want to buy a ticket, but are there any buses going there?
When were you planning to leave? Would March 11th work for you?
I'd like to leave on the 14th.
There is a bus leaving at 11 am for $58 in Economy class.
Did you have any other buses available?
There is also a bus leaving at 1:40 pm for $53 in Economy class.
That will work for me. I'd like to buy a bus ticket for 1 person.
Please confirm you're booking a bus ticket for 1 person in Economy class from San Francisco to San Diego leaving on March 14th at 1:40 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What are the origin and destination stations of this bus?
Your reservation has been made. The bus will leave from Salesforce Transit Center and will arrive at Santa Fe Depot.
Thank you, that will be all I neeed.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a one-way flight.
Where are you leaving from? Where are you going to?
I am leaving San Diego for Los Angeles. I need 2 tickets.
When are you leaving?
I am leaving on the 10th of this month.
I found 2 options including Alaska Airlines leaving at 3:20 pm with 0 stops. The ticket price is $53.
Anything else?
I found an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:50 am with 0 stops. The ticket price is $60.
When does the flight arrive? Is the ticket refundable?
It arrives at 10:44 am and the ticket is refundable.
Perfect. I'll need a bus ride to the airport.
When are you leaving? March 10th?
I am leaving March 3rd and I want economy tickets.
I found 10 options beginning with a bus leaving at 6:10 am. It is $26 for an economy ticket.
What are the names of the bus stations?
You are leaving from Santa Fe Depot and arriving at Union Station.
That will work.
Are you ready to buy bus tickets?
Yes, I am.
Please confirm, 2 economy tickets on the bus leaving at 6:10 am on March 3rd. Leaving from San Diego for Los Angeles.
Yes, that is correct.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks!`
Anything else?
No, thanks for everything.
Have a good day.
I need a one-way flight on United Airlines in economy.
Where are you leaving from? Where are you going? What time are you leaving?
I am traveling to San Fran to SD on the 10th of March.
I found a United Airlines flight leaving at 7:20 am with 0 stops. The ticket is $105.
What airport does the plane leave from? Is the ticket refundable?
The flight leaves from SAN International Airport and the ticket is non refundable.
That is perfect. I'll need a bus to get there on the 4th.
I found 6 options, including a bus leaving at 7:40 am. The ticket price is $61 for economy.
That sounds perfect.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
Yes, please reserve me a seat.
How many tickets?
I need four tickets.
Please confirm, 4 economy tickets leaving San Diego at 7:40 am for San Francisco on March 4th.
No, I need 2 tickets.
Please confirm, 2 tickets on the bus to San Diego.
That is correct. What is the name of the stations?
Your ticket is reserved. You are leaving from Santa Fe Depot and arriving at Salesforce Transit Center.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Can you get me a one-way flight?
Sure. When do you plan on going?
I plan to travel from Philadelphia to NYC on the 4th of this month.
I found 4 flights that could fit your traveling needs. There's a $64 0 stop American Airlines flight that departs at 4:45 pm.
Any other choices?
Yes. You could instead go with a $54 0 stop Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 4:40 pm.
What else is there? Can you try to find a premium economy United Airlines flight?
I found 1 United Airlines flight that fits your request. It's a $91 ticket for a flight that leaves at 4:45 am and has 0 stops.
Sounds good, but I'm thinking I'd rather travel by bus.
Want to leave on March 4th?
No. The 1st of this month.
I found 8 buses. Want to get a $24 economy ticket for one leaving at 8:30 am?
No. What else is there?
You could instead get a $23 economy ticket for a bus leaving at 9:50 am.
What stations does it travel between?
Between Intercity Terminal and Port Authority Station.
Sounds good to me.
Want to buy tickets?
Yes I do.
How many tickets?
Just 1 ticket.
You want 1 economy ticket for a bus going from Philadelphia to New York on March 1st at 9:50 am?
Wait, actually, get two tickets.
You want 2 economy tickets?
Yes, I do.
I got the tickets for you.
Thank you very much for your help getting me a bus. I need nothing more.
Have a great time in New York!
My friends and I decided to go on this trip last minute. Can you find me a one-way flight ticket?
Sure, where are you flying out from and when?
I'd be flying out from SF on the 14th of this month.
Ok, and where are you going?
I'm going to LA.
Alright, I found 4 possible flights. There's an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops for $103 that leaves at 7:10 pm. Does that work?
Is it refundable? And what's the arrival time in LA?
Unfortunately it's not refundable, and it lands at 8:35 pm.
Ok, that's fine. Can you check buses to get there?
Do you need the bus for March 14th also?
No, the bus would be for the 13th of this month.
Ok, I found an Economy bus ticket for $47 that leaves at 7 am on that day. How about that?
What station does it leave from and go to?
It would be from Salesforce Transit Center to Union Station.
Ok, that sounds perfect. Can you buy me bus tickets?
Sure, how many do you need?
I need 4 total.
Ok, to confirm, you want 4 Economy bus tickets from San Francisco to Los Angeles leaving on March 13th at 7 am. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Ok, your tickets have been bought.
Great, thanks for your help!
Anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Sure, have a good day.
I need some one-way flights.
What city are you planning to visit?
I am visiting LAX.
Where are you departing from and when?
I will be leaving San Fran the 10th of this month.
I found 4 flights that fit your criteria. One being a Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops and 7:10 pm departure. The cost of this ticket is $91.
That flight will work.
Would you like me to make reservations?
No. But how much is the bus to go there?
Would you want to depart on March 10th?
No. I am departing on the 8th of this month.
I have found a total of 10 buses. There is a 7 am bus departing and is $46 for an Economy ticket.
That sounds great.
Is there anything else I can do?
Yes, I would like to purchase tickets.
How many people will be traveling?
Their will be four people traveling.
So you would like me to to buy tickets for 4 Economy tickets leaving San Francisco at 7 am on March 8th with a destination of Los Angeles?
Yes. What station would I be leaving from and which station do I arrive at.
You will depart from Salesforce Transit Center and arrive at Union Station. Your tickets are reserverd.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else I can do?
No. I am all set. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you find me a one way flight? I want to travel Economy.
When would you like to leave?
I want to leave on the 12th of March and I enjoy traveling in Business.
Where are you wanting to go?
I want to go to SFO.
Where are you leaving from?
There's 1 person in my group and I'm leaving from SD.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 11:10 am and has 0 stops. It costs $211.
When does the onward flight arrive and where is it leaving from?
The onward flight will arrive at 12:50 pm and leaves from SAN International Airport.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy tickets now?
No, I don't want to buy a ticket.
Is there anything else I can help with?
What about a bus going there?
When do you want to leave? Does March 12th work?
I'd like to leave on the 8th.
I have found 6 buses that would work for you. How about one that leaves at 7:40 am and costs $53 for an Economy ticket?
Where is it leaving from and where is it going?
It's leaving from Santa Fe Depot and heading to Salesforce Transit Center.
Are there any other options?
How about a bus that leaves at 10 am and costs $60 for an Economy ticket?
That works for me.
Would you like to buy a ticket?
Yes, I'd like a seat.
Please confirm the following: You want 1 Economy ticket on a bus leaving from San Diego for San Francisco on March 8th at 10 am.
Yes, that's right.
Your ticket has been bought.
Thanks for everything. That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I will be traveling with some friends, can you find some one-way flights?
From where will you leave from? When do you want to fly?
Look for flights in Vancouver, BC on the 5th of March.
Where do you want to go?
Search for something to Portland, OR.
There is an Air Canada flight that takes off at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop. It has a cost of $266.
From which airport does it leaves? And to which one does it arrive?
It departs from YVR International Airport an it arrives to PDX International Airport.
What other flights are there.
There is also a Delta Airlines flight that takes off at 12:20 pm and has 1 stop. It has a cost of $287.
Is there any Economy class flight?
There is a flight from United Airlines that takes off at 6:05 pm and has 1 stop. It has a cost of $217.
That sounds great. I also want to find some buses to compare.
Do you want to depart on March 5th for the bus?
No, search for the 12th of this month.
There are 8 buses you might like. There is am Economy class bus ticket that departs at 9:20 am and has a cost of $45.
Sounds great, I prefer to book the bus than the airplane.
How many bus tickets do you need?
Get me for three people please.
Please confirm: Booking 3 Economy class bus tickets. Leaving from Vancouver on March 12th at 9:20 am going to Portland.
That is correct.
The tickets have been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I would like to book a one-way flight.
When are you leaving and where are you traveling?
I am leaving from Vancouver traveling to Portland, OR on the 12th.
There is Air Canada that leaves at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop for the price of $224.
That flight sounds good to me.
Can I help with anything else?
I would like to find a bus to go there for two people.
When would yo like to leave on March 12th?
I would like to leave this Sunday.
There is a economy ticket leaving at 9:20 am for the cost of $47.
That flight sounds good
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, I would need a seat.
Booking 1 economy ticket for 2 seats for Vancouver to Portland on March 3rd at 9:20 am.
Yes, that ticket works for me.
Your ticket has been purchased.
Thank you that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
find one way flight
where are you going to visit and when do you plan to leave and where from?
I am going to san diego and there are three people oin the group and leaving friday next week and am going from delhi
american airlines leaves at 7 pm with 1 stop and price is $344
what airport does it arrive at?
destination is san international airport
is it a refundable ticket?
ticket does not matter
I am going from vegas
delta airlines leaves at 5:05 pm and 0 stops and ticket is $97
one person and bus is going there
what about march 8th?
what about the 6th of march?
bus leaves at 5:50 pm and is $44 and 1 bus and economy ticket for 3:50 pm
sounds great to me
can I assist with anything else?
I want tickets
confirm las vegas to san diego that leaves march 6th at 3:50 pm and 1 person economy
yes that is fine.
ticket is good for santa fe depot
thanks for help
have a good one
I'm traveling with 4 more people and we need a one-way flight
Where are you leaving from?
The departure city is las vegas
Where are you going to?
We're going to SF
When do you want to leave?
The departure date is the 10th of march
There are 4 flights. The one I suggest you is from american airlines and the ticket is $99. The flight has 0 stops and it leaves at 10:55 am
go to the next option
Delta airlines has this flight leaving at 10:50 pm and it has 0 stops, the price for the ticket is $94
May I ask for a refund eventually?
no you can't
look for another flight
You can travel with southwest airlines leaving at 9:55 am. The flight has 0 stops and the ticket is $95
This one can be good for us
I can buy the tickets now if you like
no, I don't need you to do it
May I assist you with something else?
yes, you can, you can find me a bus to get there
Is march 10th a good day for you to leave?
No, the perfect day is the 1st
There 6 buses to chose from. One leaves at 10:50 am the economy ticket costs $55
Okay, please tell me the names of both stations
You will leave from union plaza to reach salesforce transit center
look for more options for two people, I want economy tickets
there are 5 more solutions good for you. You can leave at 12:50 pm and you'll pay $48 for an economy ticket
look again
you can leave at 2:40 pm and the economy ticket is $50
I want to buy the tickets
Good, just tell me if I got this right. You're buying 2 economy bus tickets from las vegas to san francisco. You'll leave on march 1st at 2:40 pm
yes. Tell me the name of the final station
tickets are yours. It's salesforce transit center
Now tell me the name of the departure station?
It's union plaza
Great, I need to leave you now, bye
goodbye to you
I need a one way flight.
Where are you going?
I am going to Portland, OR.
Where and when are you leaving?
I am departing Seattle next Monday.
American Airlines has a flight with 0 transfers, a departure time of 8:05 am and costs $72.
Find me a flight for three people on United Airlines.
Search revealed 1 result. United Airlines has a flight with 0 transfers, a departure time of 4:15 am and a cost of $80.
Does this flight offer refunds and what time does it land?
The flight lands at 5:13 am and it does not offer refunds.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets?
No, not right now.
Do you need something more?
Find me a bus to there.
Are you departing on March 4th?
No, I want to depart on the 13th.
Search revealed 10 results. I found an Economy bus that departs at 6:10 am and costs $30.
What bus station does it arrive at and depart from?
The departure station is King Street Station and the arrival station is Portland Bus Station.
What else do you have?
There is an Economy bus departing at 6:30 am and costs $25.
What else can you find?
There is an Economy bus depearting at 8:30 am and costs $33.
That works for me.
Shall I buy you tickets?
Yes, book me that bus.
You want 3 Economy tickets for a bus departing Seattle at 8:30 am and headed to Portland on March 13th. Is that right?
That is right and what is the arrival bus station?
Your ticket is booked and you are headed to the Portland Bus Station.
What is the departure bus station.
You are departing from the King Street Station.
Thanks a bunch. That is all.
Have a good day.
I need help with one-way flights.
Where and when are you leaving from, and where are you visiting?
I am going to SFO tomorrow from LA.
I see an Alaska Airlines flight leaving 5:50 pm with 0 stops and $92.
That sounds nice to me.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No thanks no tickets.
Can I assist you with anything else?
What about the bus going there?
When do you wish to leave? What about March 2nd?
I would like to leave on the 6th of March.
What about a bus leaving 6:20 am for $53 Economy class.
I have a preference for Economy, but are any other buses available?
What about a bus that leaves at 8:20 am and is $47 for Economy class?
That will work. I'd like 4 tickets.
Please confirm that you'd like a bus to leave from Los Angeles to San Francisco March 6th at 8:20 am for 4 people Economy class.
Yes, that will work for me. Which bus station am I leaving from
The ticket is confirmed leaving from Union Station.
Thanks so much. That will be all.
Have a wonderful day.
Hi there, could you help me search for one-way flights with Alaska Airlines for one on the 14th of this month?
Sure, where will you be departing from and travelling to?
I will be departing from San Diego to LAX.
Would you like an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 layovers which depart at 8:50 pm? This will cost you $67.
Do you know which airport does this flight depart from?
You will depart from SAN International Airport.
Sure, this sounds great to me!
Would you like to make a flight reservation?
No, that is not necessary. Thanks!1
Would you require further assistance?
Could you help me search for buses travelling there too? Would like to make a comparison.
When do you intend do depart? Would you like to depart on March 14th?
No, I will likely depart on 6th of this month.
Sure, would you like an Economy bus departing at 6:10 am costing $30?
Are there any alternatives?
How about an Economy bus departing at 6:50 am costing $26?
No thanks, are there any alternatives?
How about an Economy bus departing at 8:30 am costing $28?
This sounds great!
Would you like to make a bus reservation then?
Sure, that will be great.
Please confirm your bus reservation for an Economy ticket for 1 from San Diego to Los Angeles on the March 6th at 8:30 am.
Sure, this is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made!
Thank you, that is all the assistance I need!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
Can you find me flights with Alaska Airlines?
Where are you departing from and travelling to? What date will you be departing?
I am travelling on March 9th from Vancouver, BC to Seattle, WA.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 12 pm and has 1 stop, costing $222 altogether.
Can I get it refunded if need be and what time will it arrive?
It arrives at 8:12 pm but sorry it is not refundable.
Are there any other options I actually prefer united Airlines.
There is 1 flight with United Airlines which has 1 stop and it departs at 12:30 pm. It costs $255.
That flight suits me fine.
Would you like me to purchase a ticket for you?
No i do not.
Can I assist you with anything more?
Could you check buses travelling there?
Do yu want to depart on March 9th?
No on March 12th.
There are 9 buses. One leaves at 6:40 am and costs $27 for economy.
Which station does this depart from and arrive at?
It departs from King Street Station and arrives at Pacific Central Station.
That sounds just what I need, could you get me two tickets.
To confirm then that is 2 economy tickets for the bus going from Seattle to Vancouver. It leaves at 6:40 am on March 12th.
No sorry it is just for one person now.
To confirm then that is 1 economy ticket for the bus.
Yes that is correct.
Your booking has been confirmed.
Thanks very much.
Do you nee any more assistance?
No thanks for helping me today.
Have a lovely day.
Hello! I am going on a trip. Please can you help me to book a one-way flight in Economy class?
Sure! Where are you flying from?
I'll be leaving from LAX.
Which is your destination?
I'll be travelling to San Francisco.
So, when is your plan to leave from LAX?
I'll be leaving on Tuesday next week.
Okay! You got a 0 stop, Alaska Airlines flight which leaves at 5:50 pm and the cost of your travel will be $95. Do you prefer this flight?
Yup! Sounds great to me.
Can I book tickets for you in this flight?
Nope, not right now I wish to get tickets for this flight.
That's okay. Do you want me to help you on anything else?
Yup! Do you have bus transportation to reach there?
Let me check. Do you have any plan to travel on March 5th?
Nope, I'm planning to travel on 9th of this month and I prefer to travel in Economy class.
Okay! There is an economy ticket available in the bus leaving at 6:20 am and the cost of the ticket will be $49.
Please may I know if any other buses available, for I wish to travel with Flexible tickets and 4 of us will be travelling for this journey.
Okay! There is Flexible ticket available in the bus leaving at 8:20 am and the ticket price will be $60. Do you wish to have a ride in this bus?
From which station, the bus will leave from?
It will leave from the Union Station.
Hmmmm....Please can you look into if any other buses available for I'm planning to travel on 6th of this month and 2 of us will be travelling in this journey.
Okay! Please give me a moment.....Here you go.... I can find 8 buses for you. Do you wish to get a Flexible ticket in the bus that is leaving at 8:30 am and the ticket cost will come around $77?
Let me think of it...From which station, did the bus starts?
It will start from Union Station.
Sounds good. Please can you buy me tickets for this bus?
Sure! Please confirm me that you wish to buy 2 Flexible tickets for the bus leaving at 8:30 am from Los Angeles on March 6th and which is heading to San Francisco, right?
Yup, that will work for me. May I know which is the destination station of the bus?
The destination is at Salesforce Transit Center and I wish to acknowledge that your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks a bunch for your help. I'm done with.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you please find me one-way flights to SFO?
What's your origin city?
I wish to leave from San Diego.
Please give me your travel date.
I'd like to leave on March 10th.
There's an 11:10 am outbound flight with 0 stops on Alaska Airlines, at $102 per ticket.
What's the destination airport?
SFO International Airport is the arrival airport.
That flight works for me.
Should I go ahead and purchase tickets for it?
No, I'm not interested in purchasing a ticket.
Will you be needing my help with anything else?
Could you find me a bus going there on the 3rd of March?
I've found a 7:40 am outbound bus that charges $60 for an Economy ticket.
What's the destination station?
The arrival station is Salesforce Transit Center.
That works for me.
Would you like to purchase tickets on this bus?
Yes. Please reserve 4 seats.
Please confirm that you'd like 4 Economy tickets on the March 3rd, 7:40 am outbound bus from San Diego to San Francisco.
That is correct. What's the origin station?
I have successfully confirmed your ticket. The departure station is Santa Fe Depot.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Will you be needing my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you, and do have yourself a wonderful day!
I will be visiting some friends, are there one way flights available?
Where do you want to go?
Going to LA.
Where do you want to leave from and when do you want to leave?
Look for lights leaving from Vegas next Tuesday.
There are 4 flights you might like. There is an American Airlines flight that departs at 9:30 am and has 0 stops. It has a cost of $86.
At what time does it arrive and from which airport it leaves?
It leaves from McCarran International Airport and it arrives to its destination at 10:40 am.
Are there other flights? It is just for one person.
There are 3 flights you might like. There is an Delta Airlines flight that departs at 12:20 pm and has 0 stops. It has a cost of $83.
That sounds great. But I also want to know about bus. Is there any going there.
Do you want to depart on March 5th?
No, find a bus that leaves Thursday next week.
There is a bus that leaves at 7:20 am. It is an Economy class ticket and has a cost of $43.
From what station does it leaves? And to which one it arrives?
It departs from Union Plaza and arrives to Union Station.
That sounds great, I prefer to buy the bus ticket.
Please confirm: Booking 1 Economy class bus ticket from Las Vegas to Los Angeles. Leavein on March 7th at 7:20 am.
That is correct.
The ticket has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a one-way flight?
Where would you leave to and from? When would you like to leave?
I'm traveling to San Francisco from Las Vegas on the 8th of March.
There's a flight with American Airlines at 5:30 am with 0 stops. It will cost $98.
Any other flights?
Delta airlines has a flight with 0 stops that leaves at 10:50 pm for $99.
When does the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at your desired location at 0:25 am.
Which airport will it leave from?
It leaves from McCarran International Airport.
Any other flights available? Possible Premium Economy?
I found 2 flights: Southwest Airlines leaves at 9:55 am with 0 stops. It costs $178.
Okay, what about a bus ticket instead?
Do you want to depart March 8th?
I'd plan to leave this Sunday.
How about a bus leaving at 10:50 am for $51 with an Economy ticket.
Okay, yes, sounds good.
Do you want to purchase this bus ride?
Yes, I'd like to reserve 2 seats.
Okay, you'd like to leave from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 3rd. It departs at 10:50 am. 2 Economy tickets. Is this okay?
Yes.
Okay, it's reserved.
Thanks so much.
Have a good day!
I need to find some one way flights. Can you help?
Yes, I can help you with that. Can you tell me your departure date and city?
I'm leaving on Tuesday next week from Vancouver, BC.
What is your destination?
I'm traveling to Seattle.
I found an Air Canada flight that leaves at 4:45 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $273.
What is the departure airport?
YVR International Airport.
What is the arrival airport?
Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That flight sounds nice.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No, I don't want to purchase now.
Is there anything else that you need?
How about a bus?
What is your departure date? March 5th?
I want to leave on the 11th of March.
I found 10 buses. How about an Economy ticket that leaves at 6:40 am? It costs $26.
What is the departure and arrival stations?
The bus departs from Pacific Central Station and arrives at King Street Station.
Any other buses? I would like Flexible tickets for 2 people.
I found 9 buses for you. A Flexible ticket that leaves at 8:10 am and costs $47 is available.
Anything else?
There is a 8:30 am bus. It is Flexible and costs $50.
I'd like to buy some tickets.
You want to book 2 Flexible tickets on the Vancouver to Seattle bus that leaves on March 11th at 8:30 am?
Yes. What is the departure and arrival stations?
The bus departs from Pacific Central Station and arrives at King Street Station. Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Anything else that you need today?
No, thank you.
You are welcome. Have a great day.
I need one-way flights leaving from Los Angeles.
When and where are you leaving from and visiting?
I am leaving next Friday to travel to SD.
I have 4 suitable flights for you. There is an Alaska Airlines flight outbound 7:30 am with 0 stops at $66.
That sounds great to me.
Would you like to buy tickets for it?
No, I don't wish to buy tickets. What about the bus going there?
When do you want to leave? Does March 8th sound good?
I would like to leave the 14th of this month.
What about a bus leaving 7:40 am for $24 Economy.
What is the name of the bus station I will be leaving from and where is it going?
You'll be leaving Union Station going to Santa Fe Depot.
That sounds great. I'd like to buy 3 tickets.
Please confirm for a bus leaving Los Angeles to San Diego on March 14th at 7:40 am for 3 people Economy.
Yes, that will work for me.
The ticket is confirmed.
Thanks so much. That is all I would like.
Have a very nice day.
I need a one-way flight for one person.
Where are you leaving from? Where are you going? When will you leave?
I am leaving from San Diego and traveling to SF. I want to go on the 1st.
I have an Alaska Airlines flight for $107 that leaves at 11:10 am. There are 0 stops on that one.
What else is available?
American Airlines has a flight at 9:20 pm for $101. That one also has 0 stops.
What else is available? I prefer an economy ticket.
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 7:55 pm for $108. There are 0 stops on that flight.
That one sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets now?
No, not now.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Does the bus go there?
When do you want to leave? March 1st?
I want to leave on the 4th of this month. I'd prefer economy extra tickets.
I have a bus leaving at 7:40 am for $71. That's an economy extra ticket.
What else is available?
I also have one leaving at 10 am for $53. That's also an economy extra ticket.
Are there any others?
I have one leaving at 11:40 am. That one will be $64 for an economy extra ticket.
That sounds good. Please buy tickets on that bus.
Please confirm your request: You are getting 1 economy extra ticket. The bus leaves from San Diego on March 4th at 11:40 am. Your destination is San Francisco.
Yes, that's right.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks very much. That's all for now.
Have a good day.
I want to find tickets for a one-way flight.
Can you tell me from where you will take the flight from, and what is your destination? When do you want to have the flight for?
I want to fly from San Diego to arrive in LAX, and I want to leave for my flight on March 12th.
There are 2 flights which match what you requested. One of the flights is the Alaska Airlines flight which has 0 stops and leaves at 3:20 pm. The ticket for this flight will cost you $64.
Is there some other flight you can suggest? I am in need of tickets for four people.
There is 1 flight which you might like. It is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops, and it leaves at 9:50 am. This flight ticket costs $64.
Can you tell me the airport where the flight will arrive at?
The arrival airport of this flight is LAX International Airport.
This flights seems as what I want.
Is there something else I can do for you?
Can you check for a bus to go there? I want to have Economy tickets, and I want to leave on 10th of this month.
How would you like having Economy tickets for a bus which leaves at 6:10 am? The ticket for this bus costs $31.
Is there some other bus which you can suggest? I want to have tickets which are Flexible, and I will be leaving on the 14th.
There are 9 buses which match what you want. How would you like having Flexible ticket for the bus which leaves at 6:50 am. The ticket for this bus costs $47.
That seems nice.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I want to book the bus tickets.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Flexible tickets for 4 people for the bus which leaves on March 14th at 6:50 am from San Diego, and arrives in Los Angeles.
That suits me well.
Your requested tickets have been booked.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can do to help you?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided.
Have a good time!
Find a one way refundable flight from SFO.
Date of departure? Destination?
Going to LA March 4th.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight with 1 stop leaving 5:10 pm for $179.
Getting into which airport? Leaving which one?
Departing SFO International Airport and arriving LAX International Airport.
Sounds good. Find the bus there, too.
Departing March 4th?
No, March 10th.
There's an economy seat for 7 am for $46.
Ok. Get tickets on it for 3.
Please confirm: 3 economy bus tickets from San Francisco to Los Angeles on March 10th at 7 am.
Yup. Which station does it leave from?
Your seats are booked. Leaving from Salesforce Transit Center.
Getting into where?
Union Station.
Ok, thanks.
Can I help with something else?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Find me a one way flight.
Departure date and city? Destination?
Leaving Vancouver March 4th headed to Seattle.
There's an Air Canada flight with 1 stop leaving 4:45 pm for $265.
Ok.
Do you want tickets?
No, find a bus to there.
Is this for March 4th?
Leaving March 14th.
There's an economy seat departing 6:40 am for $28.
Leaving which station?
Pacific Central Station.
Arriving where?
King Street Station.
What else did you find?
There's an economy seat leaving 8:10 am for $30.
Ok, get two tickets.
Please confirm: 2 economy tickets on a bus from Vancouver to Seattle on March 14th at 8:10 am.
Great.
Your seats are booked.
Where does that get in? Where's it leave from?
It leaves from Pacific Central Station and arrives at King Street Station.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a nice day.
I need one-way flights.
When are you leaving, and where are you going?
I'm leaving later today to Philadelphia.
Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from New York City and I want Premium Economy.
I found 4 flights that match your criteria. There's a $104, 0 stop American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:45 pm.
When does the flight arrive, and is the ticket refundable?
The flight lands at 4:36 pm, but the ticket isn't refundable.
Are there any other flights?
There's a $90, 0 stop Delta Airlines flight leaving at 11:10 am.
Any other flights?
There's a $91, 0 stop Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 3:40 pm.
Flight sounds nice, but what about a bus going there?
Do you want to depart on March 1st or some other date?
I want to leave on the 14th of this month.
There's a bus with a $23 economy ticket leaving at 7:40 am.
What station is the bus going to?
Intercity Terminal.
What bus station am I leaving from?
Port Authority Station.
Are there any other buses with economy tickets?
There's a $26 economy ticket on a bus leaving at 8 am.
Ok sounds good, can I get a ticket for one person?
Confirm the following please: You want 1 economy ticket on a bus going from New York to Philadelphia on March 14th at 8 am.
Yeah, that works. What station does the bus arrive at?
Your ticket is booked, and your destination is Intercity Terminal.
That's all I need, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight/
What are the cities you are traveling between and what date are you departing on?
I'm traveling from Vancouver to Seattle next Wednesday.
Okay, there is an Air Canada flight departing at 4:45 pm with 1 stop for $278.
Are there any other flight?
What about a Delta Airlines flight departing at 2:50 am with 1 stop for $353?
What airport am I departing from and arriving at?
The flight departs from YVR International Airport and arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That flight sounds great! Are there any buses going there?
Are you leaving on March 6th?
No, I'm planning on leaving on March 10th.
I found 10 buses. There is a bus leaving at 6:40 am in economy for $30.
That sounds great!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I'd like to purchase 2 bus tickets.
Okay, I have 2 economy tickets for the bus departing Vancouver on March 10th at 6:40 am and arriving in Seattle, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully purchased the tickets.
Thanks, that is all I needed.
Have a great day!
I need a one-way plane ticket.
Starting where?
Starting in NY with United Airlines preferred.
When and where are you traveling to?
I'm going to Washington on the 6th.
United Airlines has 1 nice flight with 0 stops leaving at 5:10 am for $72.
Sounds great. I want to leave the 2nd. I need Flexible tickets for 3.
A Flexible ticket choice is a bus leaving at 6 am for $60.
Make the purchase please.
With your permission 3 Flexible bus tickets leaving at 6 am from New York going to Washington on March 2nd will be purchased.
Perfect. What are the departing and arriving bus stations named?
The purchase was a success. The bus leaves Port Authority Station and arrives at Union Station.
You're the best.
Do you need further assistance?
I'm fine thanks to you.
Enjoy the day.
I need to book a one way flight
Sure, where od you want to go?
Going to SFO
What is your departure date?
7th of March
And your departure city?
Flying out of LAX please
I have 4 flights that match. There's a 0 stop Alaska Airlines flight departing 5:50 pm. The one way ticket is $92.
What else is available, I need a refundable ticket just in case.
Okay there's a 0 stop American Airlines flight departing 3:15 pm. The one way ticket is $107.
Okay sounds good
Would you like me to book you a ticket?
No, thanks. Is there a bus instead?
Still departing March 7th?
No, can you look for buses leaving on the 1st.
There is a bus departing at 6:20 am. An economy ticket is $45.
Can you check other times? I'm after 4 economy extra tickets.
There's 9 buses that match. There's on departing 8:20 am. Economy extra tickets are $62
What else is there? Can you check for 2 tickets, any class is fine.
Okay there's 8 buses that match. There's one departing 8:30 am. Economy tickets are $48.
What bus station does it leave from?
It departs Union Station.
Okay can you book those tickets please.
Conforming you want to book 2 economy tickets for the 8:30 am bus from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 1st?
Yes thank you. Where does the bus get in?
I have confirmed the tickets for you. The bus arrives at Salesforce Transit Center.
Thank, thats all good.
Have a great day.
I want a one-way flight. I want travel in Premium Economy.
Where are you going? What day are you leaving?
I am traveling to San Diego and leaving on March 10th.
Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from LA.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight available. The Outbound flight departs at 7:30 am and has 0 stops. It costs $105.
What other flights are there?
There is an open American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 7:40 am, has 0 stops, and costs $104.
What else is there?
A Southwest Airlines flight is available too. The outbound portion leaves at 1 pm and has 0 stops. A ticket costs $107.
Sounds great. Southwest is a good airline.
May I help you with another task?
Book a bus for me please. I like economy tickets.
Are you leaving on March 10th?
No, I want to leave tomorrow.
One bus is leaving at 7:40 am. An economy tickets is $28.
What other buses are open? I want to leave on the 6th of this month.
There is another bus leaving at 7:50 am. An economy ticket is $23.
That sounds great!
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Yes, make it for 4.
Please confirm the following details: Booking 4 economy tickets for the bus leaving Los Angeles and arriving in San Diego. This bus leaves on March 6th at 7:50 am.
Yes that is right. What bus stations am I dealing with?
You ticket has been confirmed! You will depart from Union Station and arrive at Santa Fe Depot.
Thanks for the assistance!
May I help you further?
No thanks! I'm good.
Have a nice day!
I need some one-way flights.
Where are you going? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Vancouver going to Seattle, WA. I love Air Canada.
When are you leaving?
On the 9th of March.
I found 1 Air Canada flight leaving at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket price is $263.
When does the onward flight get here?
It arrives at 2:32 am.
I need a bus going there on the 10th.
I found 10 buses. First, one leaving at 6:40 am for $30. It is an economy seat.
That is perfect, please buy 1 ticket.
Please confirm, bus leaving from Vancouver to Seattle on March 10th leaving at 6:40 am. 1 seat in economy.
No, I need 2 tickets.
Please confirm, 2 tickets leaving from Vancouver.
Yes, that is correct. What is the name on the station?
Pacific Central Station.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Help me look for one way flights.
Where will you be traveling out of?
I'll be traveling from San Francisco.
Where will you be going?
I'll be going to LA.
And when will you be leaving?
I'll be leaving on next Tuesday.
There are 4 flights that fit your schedule. There's Alaska Airlines departing at 8:20 pm with 0 stops. It costs $102 per ticket.
I like the sound of that.
Would you like me to buy you a ticket?
No, that won't be necessary.
Can I do anything else for you?
Tell me about buses that are going there.
When will you be leaving? What do you think of March 5th?
I'm going to leave later today.
There's a bus that leaves at 7 am. An Economy ticket costs $50.
That'll work. Please buy the bus ticket.
How many ticket would you like?
Just 1 ticket please.
You want me to purchase 1 Economy ticket for San Francisco to Los Angeles on March 1st at 7 am. Is that correct?
Yes, please purchase it. Also, what is the departure station and what's the arrival station.
I've purchased the ticket for you. The departure station is Salesforce transit Center and the arrival station is Union Station.
Thanks for the help, that's all I need.
Have an excellent day.
I need a one-way flight on Alaska Airlines from Vancouver, BC. Can you help me?
Where are you departing from?
I will be leaving Seattle to head to Vancouver
What date are you planning to leave?
I wish to leave on Friday next week.
There is 1 flight. Alaska Airlines has a flight departing at 3:45 pm, with 1 stop. Ticket cost is $266
What airport does it depart from?
Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. Any interest?
What is the arrival time and airport in Vancouver please?
YVR International Airport at 11:44 pm in Vancouver.
That sounds perfect
Do you need naything else?
Can you check a bus to Vancouver also please?
On what date shall I check? Perhaps March 8th?
I would like to leave on the 4th.
There is a bus departing at 6:40 am. An economy ticket is $26
That sounds good to me.
Do you wish to reserve a ticket?
Yes. I need to purchase 3 tickets please. Can you do that for me?
To confirm: You wish to purchase 3 economy bus tickets, leaving Seattle March 4th at 6:40 am to Vancouver. Is this correct?
Yes it is
Your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks for your help
Is there anything else I can help with?
No that's all for now
Have a great day
I am in a plan to go for a short trip and for which I need to search for one-way flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
From what date do you want me to book the flight and to which place you are planning to visit? I want to know this to short-list my searching process.
Please search for the flight on 4th of March to SD. What else details you need to search?
Let me know the place where you want to leave from?
I am planning to leave from SF and search for the flights from here.
Got 4 results based on your requirements. What about an outbound flight from Alaska Airlines with 0 stops which leaves at 6:10 am. The price of ticket for the same is $113? Is that okay to you?
I want to know some more details. Can you get me the name of Airport to which the flight will arrive finally?.
The flight will finally reach the destination at SAN International Airport
Also let me know the time of arrival of Onward flight. One more thing, can you check about the tickets whether they are refundable as I may cancel the trip at any time.
The onward flight will arrive at 7:50 am. Sorry, the tickets are not refundable. Is there any possibility to adjust with this flight?
Sorry I can't. Please search for something else that will be suitable to my requirements.
Searched and found an outbound flight from Delta Airlines which leaves at 9:45 pm with 0 stops for which the price of the ticket is $110. Hope this will suit you.
This is also not suitable to me. Please continue with searching the suitable one and I need to book the flight for 4 persons
What about an outbound flight from Southwest Airlines leaves at 5:10 pm with 0 stops for which the price of the ticket is $114?
I think this will be suitable to me. Thanks for your help to find the best one.
Do you need any more help from me?
Yes, I need one more favor from you. I want to search for a bus to go to the Airport on 11th of this month under Economy class. I want to purchase tickets to that bus for three persons. Can you help me to do this?
Found 6 results base on your requirement. A bus leaving at 11 am for which the price of the Economy class ticket is $49. How about this?
Search for something else.
How about a bus leaving at 1:40 pm for which the price of the Economy class ticket is $55.
That is okay for me. Thanks.
How can I help you further? Shall I go with tickets booking to this bus?
Yes, please do it for me.
Please confirm to book 3 Economy class tickets to the bus leaves from San Francisco on March 11th at 1:40 pm to San Diego.
That is okay to proceed. Also let me know the names of Origin and final station of this bus.
This bus will leave from Salesforce Transit Center to the final station at Santa Fe Depot and your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Any thing else you need?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
find me flight from alaska airlines
when will you leave?
I am going on march 6th
where are you going?
I am going to LA
where are you leaving from?
I am going from San Francisco
there is 1 flight from alaska airlines and it leaves at 8:20 pm and has 0 stops and it is $96
that sounds great
wanna get tickets for it?
no I do not
anything else for you?
I will leave the 8th of this month
10 buses found and it leaves at 7 am and is $46 and is an economy
that is good
anything else for you?
I wanna get 1 ticket
bus leaves from san francisco and heads to los angeles March 8th and leaves at 7 am for 1 person and is economy
what is the bus station?
it is salesforce transit center and heading to union station
thank you very much
anything else for you?
no thank you
have a good one
Hello! Please can you find me a flight with one-way trip?
Sure! When is your journey? From where will you be starting your journey?
I'll be leaving on the 4th from Portland, OR and would like to travel in Premium Economy.
Okay! Where are you flying?
I'll be travelling to Vancouver BC.
Okay! The Alaska Airlines outbound flight will leave at 10:10 am and it has only 1 stop. The cost of the ticket will be $418.
Which is the arrival airport of the flight?
The flight will arrive at YVR International Airport.
Do you have any other flights available, for I prefer American Airlines and wish to book for four people
Yup, I found 1 suitable flights. The one, American Airlines outbound flight will leave at 6:20 am and it has only 1 stop. The cost of your travel will be $361.
Sounds good to me. Do you have any bus transportation to reach there. Any type of tickets will be fine to me.
Is March 4th okay for you? or otherwise when do you wish to depart?
I'll be departing on the 6th.
Hey! I have 8 buses for you. Do you prefer to travel in the bus that leaves at 6:50 am and you can have Economy ticket and the fare will come around $46
Sure! Which is the source and destination station of the bus?
The bus will start at Portland Bus Station and it will reach at Pacific Central Station.
Do you have any other buses available?
Yup, there is one bus leaving at 8:10 am and you have Economy tickets in this bus and the cost will be $44.
Sounds good to me.
Can I get tickets for you to travel in this bus?
Yup! Please reserve a seat for me in this bus.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to travel to Vancouver from Portland on March 6th at 8:10 am and you wish to reserved 4 Economy tickets, right?
Yup, that works for me. At which station the bus starts and ends its journey?
It will start at Portland Bus Station and will end at Pacific Central Station and your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks much for your help.
Do you need any other assistance?
Nope, thanks a lot.
Have a wonderful day.
please look for a one way flight for me
where are you traveling from and to? when are you leaving
i am traveling from vancouver to seattle on 2nd of this month
i found you an air canada with 1 stop for $284 depart at 4:45 pm
what airport does it arrive
you will arrive at seattle-tacoma international airport
what time does onward flight arrive
you will arrive at 2:32 am
ok perfect
would you like to purchase a ticket
no, i need to find a bus to get there
is this bus for march 2nd?
no, i am leaving on 9th of march
i found 10 buses matches your requirement. What about economy ticket for $27 depart at 6:40 am
what bus station am i leaving from and going to
you will depart from pacific central station and arrive at king street station
are they any more economy extra tickets for 2 available
i found 9 buses. Economy extra tickets is for $38 depart at 8:10 am
ok, please purchase bus ticket for me
please confirm your purchase for 2 economy extra from vancouver to seattle depart on march 9th at 8:10 am
ok perfect
your ticket is booked
thank you
have a nice day
I need help finding a one-way flight.
I'd be happy to help. Where do you want to go?
I want to go to Philadelphia on the 1st of this month.
Ok, and where do you want to fly from?
I'll be leaving from Washington.
I was able to find 3 flights that match your requirements. American Airlines has a flight leaving at 8 am with 1 stop. The cost would be $138.
Which airport does that flight leave from and when would I arrive in Philadelphia?
The flight leaves from Dulles International Airport and will arrive at your destination at 11:36 am.
That might work.
Would you like me to book you a ticket for that flight?
No thanks. Can you look for one flexible bus ticket there that leaves on the 8th?
Yes, there are 8 buses available. The first leaves at 7:10 am and costs $50 for a flexible ticket.
Ok, can you buy that bus ticket for me?
Please confirm you would like to purchase 1 flexible bus ticket from Washington to Philadelphia, leaving on March 8th at 7:10 am.
Yes, buy the ticket. What station do I leave from and arrive at?
Your ticket has been purchased. Your bus leaves from Union Station and arrives at Intercity Terminal.
Thats. I don't need anything else.
Have a safe trip.
Can you please help me finding a one way flight?
From which place are you planning to leave and also where and when will you be leaving?
I am leaving from LAX to San Diego on 10th of March.
There is Alaska Airlines which departs at 7:30 am and it has 0 stop.s It will cost you $60.
Are there other options available? There are 4 people in my group.
There are 2 suitable flights that I have found. There is American Airlines which departs at 7:40 am and it has 0 stops. It will cost you $69.
That flight is perfect for me.
Would you like to book tickets for the same?
No, I don't want to buy tickets.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Which bus goes there?
When do you place you depart? How about March 10th?
I am planning to leave on next Friday.
There are 10 buses that I have found. the bus leave at 7:40 am and it will cost you $27. It is an economy ticket.
That sounds good to me. I would like to buy tickets for the same.
Please confirm the details: The bus leaves from Los Angeles to San Diego on March 8th at 7:40 am. Booking is done for 4 people and it is an economy ticket.
Yes. Which bus station does bus reach and from which station does it departs?
The ticket is now confirmed. The bus leaves from Union Station and will go to Santa Fe Depot.
Thanks a lot for your assistance.
Have a nice day.
I am in a plan to go for a short trip and for which I need to search for one-way flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
From what date do you want me to book the flight and from which place you are planning to leave? I want to know this to short-list my searching process.
I want to search for the flight from New York on next Wednesday.
To which place you are planning to visit?
I am planning to travel to Washington.
What about an outbound flight from American Airlines with 0 stops which leaves at 6:05 am. The price of ticket for the same is $80? Is that okay to you?
I want to know some more details. Can you get me the name of Airport to which the flight will arrive finally and at what time?.
Th onward flight arrives at 7:15 am to its final destination at Dulles international Airport.
Can you search for some other flights particularly with United Airlines?
How about an outbound flight from United Airlines which leaves at 5:10 am with 0 stops for which the cost of ticket will be $72. What is your opinion on this flight?
Yes, this is the one I want to book.
Shall I proceed with tickets booking?
No, not now.
How can I help you further?
I want search for a bus to go there, can you search for the suitable one?
Yes, let me know the departure date. Shall I proceed with March 6th?
No, I want to book the bus from 9th of March.
Got 8 buses and what about a bus leaves at 6 am and the price of the Economy class ticket is $33?.
Can you search for some other buses with flexible tickets?
Got 7 results. How about a bus leaves at 9:40 am the price for the flexible ticket is $57?.
I want to know the name of origin station to decide further.
The Bus will leave from Port Authority Station. Was that information useful?.
Yes, I choose this bus and Please book 2 tickets for me.
Need your confirmation to book 2 flexible tickets to the bus which leaves from New York on March 9th at 9:40 am to Washington.
That is correct and you can proceed further.
I have booked the tickets successfully.
Thank you for your help.
What else you want to do?
No, thanks for the same.
Have a good day.
Please search for one-way flights from LAX.
When would you like to leave and what is your destination?
I would like to to leave on the 12th of MArch to SD.
There are 4 flights available for this travel. Alaska Airlines has a flight with 0 stops leaving at 7:30 am for a ticket price of $65.
That one is good. Can I take a bus there?
Do you plan to depart on March 12th?
No, I would like to leave on the 13th.
I found 10 buses for your travel. There is one that leaves at 7:40 am and the economy ticket is $24.
That one works. I would like to buy a bus ticket.
How many tickets should I purchase?
There are 3 people.
Pleaase confirm 3 economy tickets on the March 13th bus from Los Angeles to San Diego leaving at 7:40 am.
Yes. What the origin and destination names of the bus stations?
You are leaving from Union Station and arriving at Santa Fe Depot.
Thank you for your assistance. That is all I need today.
Enjoy your day!
four in the group and I want southwest airlines and am leaving from sf.
where are you headed?
Las vegas on the 11th
southwest airlines leaves at 12:50 pm and has 1 stop for $165
I want economy tickets
will you leave march 11th?
I am going on 8th of march and want flexible tickets
7 buses found leaving at 7:20 am and the price is $66 and it is flexible
that is good
wanna get tickets on it?
yes I want to
confirm bus leaving san francisco to las vegas on march 8th at 7:20 am for 4 people and it is flexible
yes, what station?
union plaza station
thank you a lot
anything else for you?
No I am well
Have a nice day
Can you help me book a one way flight?
Sure, where are you going?
I'm going to Las Vegas and find a Delta Airlines flight if you can.
Okay, when are you leaving and where from?
On March 9th from SFO.
I found 1 flight for you. It's a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops that departs at 10:50 am and costs $110.
Great, what about a bus?
A bus for March 9th?
No, for the 14th.
I found 7 that fit. There's an economy ticket for $47 on a bus departing at 7:20 am.
What's the destination and arrival bus station?
It leaves from Salesforce Transit Center and arrives in Union Plaza.
What other buses?
I found an economy ticket for $51 on the bus that leaves at 7:50 am.
Great, buy four tickets for that one.
Sure, can you confirm you'd like 4 economy tickets for the bus from San Francisco to Las Vegas departing March 14th at 7:50 am?
Yes, that's great.
Your ticket is reserved.
Thanks, that's it.
Have a great day.
I need a one way flight for 2 people.
Where and when are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing Vegas and going to SFO on the 7th of March.
American Airlines has a 0 transfer flight that departs at 5:30 am and costs $104.
Does this flight have refunds?
They do not have refunds for this flight.
That works for me. Can you find me a bus to get there?
Are you departing March 7th?
No, I will depart March 6th.
Search found 6 results for you including an Economy ticket with a 10:50 am departure time and a cost of $50.
Try to find me some Flexible tickets on some other bus.
Search located 5 results for you. There is a Flexible ticket on a bus that departs at 12:50 pm and costs $84.
What is the departure and arrival station?
You will depart Union Plaza and arrive at Salesforce Transit Center.
What else can you find?
There is a Flexible ticket on a bus departing at 2:40 pm that costs $76.
That is perfect.
Do you need something more?
Buy me some bus tickets.
You want 2 Flexible tickets with a departure time of 2:40 pm on March 6th that goes from Las Vegas to San Francisco. Is that right?
That is right. What is the departure and arrival bus station?
Your tickets are booked. You are departing Union Plaza and arriving at Salesforce Transit Center.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I need four one-way tickets for Alaska Airlines leaving SF.
Where is your destination?
I'm going to San Diego. I'd like an Economy flight.
When do you plan to leave?
I'm leaving on the 7th of this month.
I found 1 flight. There is an Alaska Airlines flight for $102. It leaves at 6:10 am and has 0 stops.
That sounds good.
Do you want to book tickets for it?
No, thank you.
Do you need help with anyting else?
Are there any buses going there?
Do you want to depart on March 7th?
No, I'm leaving next Friday.
There is a bus leaving at 11 am. It is $51 for an Economy ticket.
That sounds good. I'd like to buy tickets.
Please confirm: You want 4 Economy tickets for the bus from San Francisco to San Diego leaving on March 8th at 11 am. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets have been confirmed.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I need a one-way flight for the 1st of March.
Where are you leaving from? Where are you visiting?
I'm going from Los Angeles to Vegas.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:25 pm and costs $76 with 0 stops.
When will the onward flight get here? What airport would I go to?
The onward flight comes at 9:35 pm. The flight leaves from LAX International Airport.
What else is there? I want Delta Airlines. It's for 1 person.
I found a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:15 pm and costs $83 with 0 stops.
That's a good one.
Would you like tickets?
Not right now. I'd like a bus to get there. I'm leaving on March 13th. I want flexible tickets.
A bus is leaving at 7:40 am and costs $53. It's a flexible ticket.
What bus station is it at?
Union Station.
That's good. I'd like bus tickets.
1 flexible bus ticket to go to Las Vegas from Los Angeles on March 13th at 7:40 am. Is this correct?
Yes, that's correct. What station does it end up at?
Your ticket is booked. The bus goes to Union Plaza.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me find a one-way flight on American Airlines.
Where are you departing from and on what day?
I am leaving next Tuesday from LA traveling to San Francisco.
There is 1 flight available. American Airlines has a flight leaving 6:30 am with 0 stops. Ticket cost is $93.
That flight sounds great. Could you check for a bus ticket?
What departure date shall I check for March 5th?
I will leave next Wednesday
There are 10 buses. One bus leaves at 6:20 am. The economy ticket is $53.
What station does it arrive at?
Salesforce Transit Center is the destination.
That sounds good to me
Do you wish to purchase tickets?
Yes I need to reserve 2 seats.
To confirm: You wish to purchase 2 economy bus tickets for March 6th, leaving Los Angeles at 6:20 am for San Francisco. Is this correct?
Yes that sounds good to me
Your tickets are reserved
Thank You so much
Is there anything else I can do?
No thats all I need thanks
Have a nice day
I want to search for a One-way flight to travel to my desired place and I need to book it in Premium Economy class. Can you help me to do so?
Yes, let me know about your desired City to which you are planning to visit, so that I can search as per your requirements.
I want to book the flights with American Airlines on 10th of this month to New York City.
From which place do you want the flight to leave?
I am planning to leave from Washington.
Found 1 flight with American Airlines which is an outbound flight leaves at 6:05 am and it has 0 stops. The price for the ticket is $129. What about your opinion on this?
What is the expected date of Arrival of that onward flight and to which Airport?
The onward flight will arrive at JFK International Airport at 7:15 am.
I can go with this flight and I need a bus to go there. Can you find the one with Economy tickets for two persons?
Shall I search the bus for departure date March 10th?
No, please search if on the 1st.
Found 8 buses and the one is leaving at 8:10 am and the cost for the Economy class ticket is $37. Is that convenient to you?
Yes, that is perfect. please book the tickets for me.
Please confirm to book 2 Economy class tickets to the bus which leaves Washington on March 1st at 8:10 am to New York.
That is correct. Please proceed.
Your tickets are booked successfully.
Thanks for your help. That's all I want.
Have a good day.
can you find me a one way flight with air canada leaving from vancouver
where are you travling to and when
i am traveling from seattle, wa on 10th of march
i found 1 flights with air canada. It has 1 stop for $252 depart at 4:45 pm
what airport is this depart from
it will depart from yvr international airport
what airport will this arrive at and when
you will arrive at seattle-tacoma international airport at 2:32 am
perfect, please find me a economy extra bus ticket for 3 people leaving on 13th of this month
i found you an economy extra ticket for $41 depart at 6:40 am
perfect, please buy the bus ticket for me
please confirm your bus ticket for 3 economy extra tickets traveling from vancouver to seattle on march 13th at 6:40 am
perfect, what station will this reach
you will arrive at king street station
what station am i leaving from
you will leave from pacific central station
thank you
what else can i do for you
no that's it
have a nice day
I need help finding one way tickets, Economy class, from Los Angeles. I'm going to leave on the 12th of this month.
Where will you be traveling to?
I'll be visiting San Diego.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight with a departure that leaves at 7:30 am with 0 stops. It costs $65 per ticket.
Is it a refundable ticket. And when does the departure flight arrive?
The departing flight arrives at 8:24 am, and the ticket can be refunded.
That works for me. Now what about buses going there?
When would you like to leave? Might I suggest March 12th?
Yeah, that sounds good.
There'a bus that departs at 7:40 am. An Economy ticket is $27.
Okay, that works.
Would you like me to book you the bus tickets?
Yes, please do. Book me tickets for 4 people.
I'll book you 4 Economy bus tickets for Los Angeles to San Diego departing on March 12th at 7:40 am, is that okay with you?
Yeah, that's okay by me. What's the arrival station?
I've purchased the tickets. The bus will arrive at Santa Fe Depot.
Thanks for all the help. I don't need any more assistance.
Have a terrific rest of your day.
Could you help me find a one-way flight? There are 3 people in my group and I like United Airlines.
When were you planning on leaving?
I'd like to leave next Monday from SF.
Where were you planning to visit?
I'm going to Las Vegas.
I found 1 flight for you. There is a United Airlines outbound flight with 0 stops leaving at 7:15 pm for $108.
That will work for me. Is there also a bus going there?
When were you planning to leave? Will March 4th work for you?
I'd like to leave on the 2nd of this month.
I found 7 buses. One bus leaves at 7:20 am for $49 and it is a Economy ticket.
That will work for me. I'd like to buy bus tickets.
Please confirm you're booking 3 bus tickets in Economy from San Francisco to Las Vegas on March 2nd at 7:20 am.
Yes, that is correct.
Your ticket has been booked.
What are the names of the origin and destination bus stations?
The bus will leave from Salesforce Transit Center and will arrive at Union Plaza.
Thank you for your help. That will be all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me a one-way flight with American Airlines?
Where will you be leaving from, and what is your departure date?
I'm leaving from San Francisco on March 3rd.
Where is your destination?
I'm going to SD.
There is an American Airlines flight for $154 that leaves at 12:15 pm and has 1 stop.
That sounds good.
Do you want to buy a ticket for it?
No, thank you. How about buses? I want to leave on the 6th of this month. I'd like two Flexible tickets, please.
I found 6 buses. There is bus leaving at 11 am. It's $73 for a Flexible ticket.
What bus station does it leave from?
The bus leaves from Salesforce Transit Center.
And what station does it arrive at?
It arrives at Santa Fe Depot.
Sounds good. I'll take two tickets, please.
So you want 2 Flexible tickets for the March 6th bus from San Francisco to San Diego leaving at 11 am. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I am interested in find a one way flight to go to SD.
Can you tell me the date when you will be traveling, and the city where you will leave from?
I want to fly from LA next Tuesday.
There are 4 flights which match what you want. How would you like flying with a flight of Alaska Airlines which has 0 stops and departs at 7:30 am? The ticket of this flight costs $70.
Can you tell me where the flight will be landing, and if it is a redeye flight?
The flight will be landing at SAN International Airport, and it is not an overnight flight.
Is there some other flight you can suggest?
How would you like flying with a flight of American Airlines which has 0 stops and leaves at 7:40 am? The ticket of this flight costs $73.
I want you to find me some other flight. I will take my flight on March 2nd.
There is 1 flight which matches your request. Would you like having a flight of the Southwest Airlines which has 0 stops and leaves at 3:25 pm? The ticket of this flight costs $66.
Alright. Could you look for a bus I can take to go there?
Are you planning to leave on March 2nd?
That would suits me well. I need ticket just for one person.
There are 10 buses which match what you want. One of the buses leaves at 7:40 am, it has 0 transfer, and the ticket costs $28.
Can you tell me the station where the bus arrives, and from which station will the bus leave from?
The station from where the bus leaves is Union Station, and it will arrive at the Santa Fe Depot station.
This seems nice. I want to make a booking for this bus.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy ticket for 1 person for the bus which leaves from Los Angeles on March 2nd at 7:40 am to arrive in San Diego?
Alright, that fits with what I want.
Your requested ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help very much. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I will be flying soon, I want a flight from Delta Airlines.
Where will you fly from?
Look for 2 Economy class tickets departing from Los Angeles.
What is the destination?
Going to Las Vegas.
When do you want to fly?
Look for flights on March 4th.
There is 1 flight you might like. There is a Delta Airlines flight that takes off at 10:15 pm and has 0 stops. It has a cost of $74.
That's great. I also want to find a bus option for there. Make it for the 8th of March.
There is a bus that departs at 7:40 am and has 0 transfers. It has a cost of $39.
From which station does it departs and to which ones does it arrive?
It departs from Union Station and arrives to Union Plaza.
That sounds great.
Do you want to book a bus ticket?
Yes, I want to book it.
Please confirm: Booking 2 bus tickets from Los Angeles to Las Vegas. Departing on March 8th at 7:40 am.
That is correct.
The ticket has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a one way flight from SF to San Diego?
Sure, what is your travel date?
I need to go next Friday.
There are 5 flights available that day. Alaska Airlines has a flight for $99 with 0 stops that leaves at 6:10 am.
Is it an overnight flight? When will it arrive?
No, it is not an overnight flight and will arrive at your destination at 7:50 am.
Can you also look for a bus to get there instead?
Yes, will you be leaving on March 8th?
No, the 10th.
There are 6 buses available. The first leaves at 11 am, has 0 transfers and costs $58.
Great. Please book 4 tickets for that bus.
Please confirm yu would like to reserve 4 bus tickets from San Francisco to San Diego, leaving on March 10th at 11 am.
Actually, I just need 2 tickets.
Ok, you need 2 bus tickets to San Diego, correct?
Yes, please reserve them.
Ok, I have confirmed your ticket reservation.
What bus station will I arrive at?
The bus will arrive at the Santa Fe Depot.
Alright. What station do I depart from?
Your bus leaves from the Salesforce Transit Center.
Great! That's all for now.
Have a wonderful trip.
I will be traveling soon and I need a one way flight. Can you find me something?
From where are you leaving?
I will leave from Washington.
Where do you want to go to? And when do you want to fly?
I want to fly on March 9th to New York City.
There are 2 flights you might like. There is an American Airlines flight that takes of at 6:05 am and has 0 stops. It has a price of $100.
What is the other option?
There is an Southwest Airlines flight that takes of at 5:45 pm and has 0 stops. It has a price of $80.
That sounds great, I would also like to know what buses arrive there.
Do you also plan to leave on March 9th?
No, plan for something departing on March 4th.
There is a bus that departs at 8:10 am and has 0 transfers. It has a cost of $38.
That sounds great, I want to book it. Please book just one ticket.
Please confirm: Booking 1 bus ticket from Washington to New York on March 4th departing at 8:10 am
That is correct.
The ticket has been booked.
From what station does it leaves? And to which ones it arrives?
The bus leaves from Union Station and arrives to Port Authority Station.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I would like a one-way flight from Washington, please.
Where is your desired destination? On which date would you like to travel?
I want to leave on the 5th of March to Philadelphia.
There are 3 flight which match your selection. Would you like to fly with American Airlines? This flight is at 8 AM with 1 stop. The ticket price is $127.
Okay, now I need a bus to that destination.
Would you like to begin your travel on March 5th?
No, March 9th and I have three people in my party.
The bus will depart at 7:10 AM and has 0 transfers. The ticket price is $27.
What's the station that I leave from?
The origin station is designated as Union Station.
Which bus station do I arrive at?
The designated destination station is Intercity Terminal.
Okay, that sounds great. I need to reserve a bus.
Please confirm the following information: I need one ticket to the bus leaving from Washington and to Philadelphia. The bus will depart on March 9th at 7:10 AM. There are 3 people in your party.
Yeah, that sounds great.
Your ticket is now confirmed.
Thank you for that!
Of course. Is there anything else that I may help you with?
No, thank you.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
My boss is sending my and some colleagues to mediate some disagreements between the managers at our regional office, and we're not sure how long this is going to take. So, your help would ge greatly appreciated to get a one-way flight set up.
I'll be happy to help you with that. What's the airport and date of departure, and where are you going?
We need to fly out of Los Angeles on the 13th of March and land in Las Vegas, please.
Okay. American Airlines is offering a flight with 0 stops, leaving at 8:25 pm for $93. That's one of 4 flight options so far.
That's for one passenger and First Class seating, right?
The information is for 1 passenger in Economy seating
Right. Maybe, I can compare that with a bus ride, if you could look that up, please.
You would leave on March 13th, correct?
Yes, the same departure date.
All right. of the 4 bus options I'm showing, there is a bus leaving at 7:40 am with 0 transfers for a total of $33 per passenger.
What bus depot would that be and where would the bus arrive?
The bus ride would originate at Union Station and arrive at Union Plaza.
I think I'll go with setting up the bus ride.
You want tickets for how many passengers?
Make that four riders, please.
On it. Would you like to confirm 4 bus tickets, leaving Los Angeles on March 13th at 7:40 am, going to Las Vegas.
I'm happy with that.
Your bus tickets are all set up for your trip.
Nice work, and thanks so much.
Would you like more information at this time?
Nope, that's all we need to do right now. Thanks again.
Okay, and hope you have a very pleasant day.
Find one way flights.
Departure city?
Vancouver.
Destination? Departure date?
Look up economy flights next Thursday to Seattle, WA.
There's an Air Canada flight with 1 stop leaving 4:45 pm for $280.
Ok. Find a bus there, for 1 person.
Leaving March 7th?
No, March 8th.
There's a bus with 0 transfers leaving 6:40 am for $29.
What else? Leaving March 2nd.
There's a bus with 0 transfers leaving 8:10 am for $26.
Anything else?
There's a bus with 0 transfers leaving 8:30 am for $25.
Ok, good, reserve it.
Please confirm: ticket for 1 on bus going from Vancouver to Seattle on March 2nd at 8:30 am.
Yes. What station is that leaving from? Where's it get into?
Your seat is reserved. The bus leaves from Pacific Central Station and arrives King Street Station.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I need to get flight that's for one-way.
Can you tell me your destination?
I will be taking a flight to NYC.
What is the location of your departure?
Check out the flights leaving from Philly.
What is the best travel date?
I need to go later today.
I was able to get 4 flights. Do you think you'd like American Airlines? There is a flight that leaves at 4:45 pm and has 0 stops. Your ticket will be $67.
What is the airport that the flight is taking off?
It will leave from PHL International Airport.
Alright. Would you look for some buses that are heading there? It would be for 2 people and a departure date of the 5th of this month.
There is a bus that will depart at 8:30 am and will have 0 transfers. You can purchase a ticket for $24.
What are the departure and arrival bus stations?
Your departure station is Intercity Terminal and your arrival station is Port Authority Station.
Can you see if there are some other bus options?
There is a bus with 0 transfers that leaves at 9:50 am and has a ticket price of $26.
That sounds just right, so reserve that bus.
Please approve these items: You would like to purchase a ticket for 2 people for the bus that will leave Philadelphia on March 5th at 9:50 am and travel to New York.
Yes, that is correct.
I have verified your ticket purchase.
I really appreciate all your help.
Do you want my help with something else?
Nope, thanks for all your help though.
Have a blessed day.
Hey, I need to go on a short trip. Help me find a one way flight.
For which date? Where are you departing from?
I want to travel on the day after tomorrow leaving from SFO.
Where do you plan to go?
To Vegas please.
There's a Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 6:05 am with 0 stops that's costs $96. Do you want it?
Find me something else. 4 Economy tickets please.
I found 3 other flights. There's a American Airlines one that takes off at 12:15 pm with 1 stop and a ticket that costs $163.
Okay. I think I'll be traveling on a bus. Can you help me find one that leaves on the 5th of March?
I found 7. There's one that departs at 7:20 am with 0 transfers and it costs $49.
In which bus station will I arrive?
At Union Plaza.
From which bus station will I be leaving from?
From Salesforce Transit Center.
Any other bus available?
There's one that departs at 7:50 am with a $54 ticket that has 0 transfers.
Sounds good. I want it.
So 4 tickets to a bus from San Francisco to Las Vegas that leaves on March 5th at 7:50 am?
Yes, that's it. From which bus station will I be leaving from and arriving?
You'll leave from Salesforce Transit Center and arrive at Union Plaza.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you further?
No, thanks a lot.
Have an amazing day.
I need a one way plane ticket.
What day are you departing?
I am departing March 4th.
What city are you leaving from?
I am flying out of Las Vegas.
What city are you travelling to?
I am travelling to LAX.
American Airlines has a flight with 0 stops, a 9:30 am departure and a total cost of $88.
I see. Can you look for bus trips there?
Will you be departing March 4th?
No, one person will be departing on the 7th.
Search revealed 4 results. There is a bus with 0 transfers departing at 7:20 am and costs $43.
What else do you have?
There is a bus with 0 transfers departing at 10:20 am and costs $36.
Can you find something for 3 people departing on the 11th?
Search revealed 2 results. There is a bus departing at 11:50 am with 0 transfers and a cost of $43 a person.
That works for me.
Do you need something more?
Get me those bus tickets.
You want 3 bus tickets from Las Vegas to Los Angeles on March 11th with a departure time of 11:50 am. Is that right?
That is right? What bus stations am I leaving from and arriving at?
Your tickets are booked. You are departing Union Plaza and arriving at Union Station.
That a bunch. That is everything.
Have a good day.
I need a one way flight on Southwest Airlines.
Which date and where do you want to depart?
I would like to leave from San Francisco on Friday next week.
Where will you be going?
I want to travel to San Diego on the 10th.
There is 1 flight on Southwest Airlines leaving at 5:10 pm with 0 stops for a price of $111.
Can you look for a bus, too on the 1st of March.
There are 6. One departs at 11 am with 0 transfers for $58.
Which bus station?
The departing station is Salesforce Transit Center.
And the arrival station?
The arrival destination is Santa Fe Depot.
Please reserve the bus for 4 people.
Please confirm the tickets for 4 people leaving San Francisco for San Diego on March 1st at 11 am.
That is great.
Your ticket is booked.
Thank you very much.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, I am good.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a one way flight on American Airlines in premium economy class? I'll be traveling on the 10th.
Where will you be going?
I'm going to San Diego.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Vegas.
I found 1 matching flight, which has 0 stops and costs $134. It's on American Airlines and departs at 8:20 am.
When will I reach my destination?
It arrives at 9:34 am.
What airports does it travel between?
It will leave McCarran International Airport and arrive at SAN International Airport.
Can you find me a bus that does there?
Will you leave on March 10th?
No, I'm leaving on March 9th.
I found 1 matching bus. It leaves at 3:50 pm, costs $42, and has 0 transfers.
Which bus stations does it travel between?
You'll leave Union Plaza and arrive at Santa Fe Depot.
That sounds like it'll work.
Can I help you with something else?
I'd like to reserve a bus ticket.
How many tickets will you need?
Just 1 ticket please.
Please confirm: you need 1 ticket for the bus from Las Vegas to San Diego on March 9th at 3:50 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
Your ticket has been booked!
Thanks for the help! That'll be all.
Have a nice day!
I am interested in finding a one way flight.
Can you tell me where you want to go, and what date you want to have the trip? Could you also please tell me where you will leave from?
I want to leave for my flight on the 9th from SFO, and I want to arrive to SD.
How would you like flying with a flight of Alaska Airlines which has 0 stops and leaves at 10:45 am? The ticket for this flight will cost you $122.
Can you suggest some other flight?
There is another flight of American Airlines with 1 stop. and leaves at 5:30 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $183.
Alright. Can you find me a bus to go there? I want to leave on the 3rd, and I want the bus for 4 people.
There are 6 buses which match what you want. One of the buses has 0 transfers and leaves at 11 am. The ticket for this bus costs $56.
That seems nice. I want to buy tickets for this bus.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy tickets for 4 people for the bus which leaves from San Francisco on March 3rd at 11 am, and it arrives in San Diego.
That suits me well. Can you tell me the bus station where I will arrive, and the bus station where I will leave from?
Your requested ticket has been booked. The bus station that you will leave from is Salesforce Transit Center, and the arrival station of your bus is Santa Fe Depot.
I appreciate your help very much. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I need a one way flight.
Sure, what day are you leaving and where do you plan on going? Also, which city are you leaving from?
I'm located in Vancouver and I want to go to las vegas on the 10th of this month
There are 3 flights. How about an Air Canada flight with 1 stop at 4:45 pm for $221?
No, I'd rather fly Southwest Airlines from SD.
How about a 0 stop Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 6:45 pm for $89?
Sure, can you help book a bus for 3 people on the 12th of march?
Yes, I've found 1 bus that has 0 transfers leaving at 6:50 pm for $43.
Awesome.
Would you like to book this?
Yes.
Please confirm: 3 bus tickets leaving San Diego and going to Las Vegas at 6:50 pm on March 12th
Perfect, thanks so much.
Confirmed.
What's the name of the station?
Union Plaza
Great, thanks.
Is there something else you need?
Nope, that's all. Thanks so much.
Have a wonderful day.
I need an economy flight from Los Angeles.
Where are you travelling to?
From San Francisco.
What date will you be leaving on?
On 13th of this month.
There are 5 options, one is with Alaska Airlines with 0 stops departing at 5:50 pm, costing $107.
would this be a redeye flight?
No it is not.
fine, what about a bus going there instead? From 12th of this month for three passengers.
There are 10 available options, one is a bus that has 0 transfers leaving at 6:20 am and costing $43.
Which station will it arrive at?
At Salesforce Transit Center.
Which station does it depart from?
From union Station.
Where else is there?
There is a bus with 0 transfers leaving at 8:20 am and costing $56.
I like that sound of that, please book me tickets.
To confirm then that is 3 bus tickets from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 12th departing at 8:20 am.
yes that suits fine.
Your tickets are now booked.
Which station am i departing from?
from union Station
and which station does it arrive at again?
At Salesforce Transit Center.
Great thanks that is all for today.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you help me book a flight from Las Vegas to SF?
On what day?
I'll be leaving on the 3rd of March.
I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops departing at 10:55 am for $96.
Sure, that works.
Anything else I can help with right now?
Help me find a bus to get there.
Will you be leaving March 3rd?
No, the 13th.
Okay, I found one with 0 transfers that leaves at 10:50 am. It's $45.
That sounds great.
Should I buy you tickets?
Yes, that's what I want.
How many tickets should I get?
Get four tickets.
Sure, can you confirm that you'd like 4 tickets on the bus from Las Vegas to San Francisco leaving on March 13th at 10:50 am?
Yes, what's the departure station?
Okay, I confirmed your ticket. You'll be leaving from Union Plaza.
Great, thanks a lot.
Anything else you need?
Nope, that's all for now.
Enjoy your day.
Hi there, could you help me search for a one-way flight from Phoenix, AZ please?
Sure, what is your intended date of travel?
I will be travelling from 7th of March please.
And where are you planning to visit?
I will be visiting Las Vegas alone, so 1 ticket will suffice. Could you also change my departure location to San Fran please?
Sure, would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines which has 0 layovers and departs at 8:15 pm? This will cost you $106.
Do you know where does the flight land and what time will it arrive there?
Your flight will land at McCarran International Airport at 9:50 pm.
Sure, could you also help me search for a bus travelling there?
Will you be leaving on the March 7th?
Yes, I am planning to depart on the 3rd of this month.
There are 7 buses available, one of which departs at 7:20 am and has 0 transfers which will cost you $46.
I see, which bus station does this bus depart from?
You will be departing from the Salesforce Transit Center.
Sure, are there any buses available which departs on next Wednesday?
There is a bus with 0 transfers which departs at 7:50 am and costs $48.
That sounds great! Could you help me purchase the bus tickets?
Yes, please confirm your reservation for 1 for the bus ride from San Francisco to Las Vegas on March 6th at 7:50 am.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made!
May I know which bus station am I departing and arriving at?
You will be travelling from Salesforce Transit Center to Union Plaza.
I see, thanks for your kind assistance!
No issues! Do you require further assistance?
No, that is all the help I need today.
Sure, have an enjoyable trip!
I'm looking for a one way flight from Washington. I'd like 1 Economy class ticket.
Where will you be going and on what day will you be going there?
I'll be going to New York City and I want to go on the 1st of this month.
Are you okay with American Airlines? There's a flight that leaves at 6:05 am with 0 stops. The ticket cost is $90.
No, that won't do, let's look for something else.
Are you okay with Southwest Airlines? There's a flight that leaves at 4:50 pm with 0 stops. The ticket cost is $70.
What's the departure airport?
The departure airport is Dulles International Airport.
Alright. I need help looking for a bus that goes there.
Do you want to leave on March 1st?
I'm going to leave on March 13th.
There's a bus that leaves at 8:10 am with 0 transfers. A ticket is $32.
That could work. Get me that ticket.
I'll get you 1 bus ticket from Washington to New York on March 13th at 8:10 am. Is that right?
Yeah, book it please. Which bus station will I be arriving at?
I've booked the ticket. You'll be arriving at Port Authority Station.
And what station am I departing from?
You'll be departing from Union Station.
Thanks for all the help.
Can I do anything else to help you?
No, thanks again.
Have a terrific day.
I need 4 tickets for a one way flight leaving from Seattle on United Airlines.
What will your final detestation be?
I need to go to Portland for work.
What date do you need to leave?
I have to leave on the 13th of this month.
Have 1 flight for you it is a United Airlines flight at 4:15 am with 0 layovers and costs $74.
What airport does it depart from?
It leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Awesome I need a bus to get there.
Will you be leaving on March 13th?
No i need to leave on March 5th.
How about a bus that departs at 6:10 am with 0 transfers for $30. If you would prefer another time I have 10 more options for you.
That sounds great.
IS there anything else for you?
I want to book tickets for the bus.
Just to confirm you need 4 tickets for the March 5th bus that departs Portland at 6:10 am headed to Seattle.
Yea that is good. What station does it depart from and what station does it arrive?
Your tickets are booked. It departs from King Street Station and arrives at Portland Bus Station.
Thanks that will be all
Have a fantastic day.
Can you help me get a one-way flight?
Of course - what city are you leaving from and going to? What date will you leave?
I'm going from SFO to Las Vegas on March 13th.
I've found 4 options - Alaska Airlines has an 8:15 pm flight with 0 stops for $106.
Can you get me a bus going there?
Will you leave March 13th?
I'd leave on the 8th of March.
I've got 7 options here, there's a bus leaving at 7:20 am with 0 transfers for $46.
I need four tickets - what other buses are there?
I've got 6 more options; there's one leaving at 7:50 am with 0 stops for $61.
Yeah, let's get those tickets.
So you'd like 4 tickets for a bus leaving March 8th at 7:50 am leaving from San Francisco to Las Vegas?
Yeah, great.
Those tickets have been purchased.
Alright, thanks.
Can I do anything else for you?
That's it for now.
Have a safe journey.
I need to find 1 ticket for a one way flight on Southwest Airlines.
I can help with that. Where will you be flying from?
I want to leave from SF.
OK, when do you want to leave and where do you want to go?
I need to fly to LAX on March 7th.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight available that day that leaves at 12:50 pm. The flight has 0 layovers and costs $91.
Can you also check for a bus to get there on Monday next week?
Yes, there are 10 buses available. The first departs at 7 am, has 0 transfers, and costs $45.
What other buses are there that day?
There is a bus leaving a 7:40 am that also has 0 transfers for $45.
What other buses are there on March 5th?
How about an 8:40 am departure with 0 transfers for $44?
Yes, I want to get a ticket for that bus.
Please confirm you would like 1 bus ticket from San Francisco to Los Angeles, leaving on March 5th at 8:40 am.
Yes, reserve it please.
Your ticket reservation has been made.
What bus station does that bus arrive at?
You will arrive at Union Station.
Ok, what station do I leave from?
The bus departs from the Salesforce Transit Center.
Great! I'm done now.
Have a safe trip.
I am in a plan to go for a trip and for which I need to search for one-way flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
From what date and form which City do you want me to book the flight and to which place you are planning to visit? I want to know this to short-list my searching process.
I want to book it from SFO on 11th of this month to San Diego.
What about a flight from Alaska Airlines which takes off at 6:10 am with 0 stops for which the ticket cost is $115?.
Search for something else.
How about a flight from American Airlines which takes off at 12:15 pm with 1 stop for which the ticket cost is $157?
That is okay. I want you to search for a bus to go there.
Shall I proceed with searching for March 11th?
No, I am planning to leave on March 2nd and you can search for that date.
How about a bus leaves at 11 am with 0 transfers for which the cost will be $55?
Anything else you have in your list?
What about a bus leaves at 1:40 pm with 0 transfers for which the cost will be $56?
I want some more details to decide and can you tell about the origin station of this bus.
This bus will leave from the station name Salesforce Transit Center.
What about the destination?
It will finally reach the destination station at Santa Fe Depot.
That's great. Thanks.
Shall I book the tickets on this bus?
Yes, I want the same for 3 persons.
Please confirm to book 3 tickets in a bus which leaves from San Francisco on March 2nd at 1:40 pm to San Diego.
That is correct to proceed.
Your tickets are booked successfully.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all for now.
Have a good day.
Hello! I'd like to find a one-way flight out of New York City on the 9th of March.
Where will you be traveling to?
I'm going to Washington.
There is an American Airlines flight available for $85 per ticket. It leaves at 10:55 am and has 0 stops.
What airport does this land in and is it a redeye?
It is not an overnight flight. It will arrive at Dulles International Airport.
I'd like to hear some other options.
Delta Airlines has a flight that leaves at 7:20 am and also has 0 stops. The ticket price is $89.
Can you check for any buses that leave on the 14th of March?
There are 8 that match your criteria. The first costs $34. It has 0 transfers and leaves at 6 am.
That works for me.
Would you like to purchase your tickets?
Yes, please. There are 2 of us.
You'd like 2 tickets for the 6 am bus leaving New York for arrival in Washington on March 14th. Is this correct?
That's correct. Can you tell which station that will arrive at?
It will arrive at Union Station. Your tickets have been successfully purchased.
I think we've got everything covered. Thank you!
You're welcome. Have a wonderful trip!
Please find me a one-way Economy class ticket on United Airlines for Tuesday next week.
What's your destination?
My destination is Vancouver, BC.
What's your departure city?
Please search for flights from Portland.
I found 1 United Airlines flight with 1 stop, leaving at 10:35 am, at $252 per passenger.
Which airport is the flight destined for?
The flight's destination is YVR International Airport.
Please find out whether it's an overnight flight. What number of passengers did you get for this?
It's not a red-eye flight, and it's for 1 passenger.
Okay, thanks. Let's try something else. Please help me find a bus going there.
Will you be leaving on March 5th?
No, I intent to leave on the 11th.
I found a bus with 0 transfers, leaving at 6:50 am and costing $39.
What's the origin bus station?
The bus will leave from Portland Bus Station.
What other bus options are there?
There's an 8:10 am bus with 0 transfers, costing $36.
Okay thanks, but there's been a change of plans. Could you search for two tickets on a bus leaving this Sunday?
Sure, no problem. How about the 10:20 am bus with 0 transfers, costing $36?
Please find out the origin and destination bus stations.
The bus will leave from Portland Bus Station and arrive at Pacific Central Station.
I like the sound of that.
Would you like to purchase the bus tickets?
Yes, please book the tickets.
Please confirm that you'd like to but 2 tickets for the 10:20 am, March 3rd bus from Portland to Vancouver.
That is correct.
I have successfully confirmed your tickets.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you, and do have yourself a wonderful day!
I am looking for a one way flight.
Where did you want to go exactly? What date were you planning on travelling?
I wanted to leave on the day after tomorrow going to Portland, OR.
What city did you want to depart from?
I want to depart from Vancouver and I was hoping to travel with Delta Airlines.
I have 1 flight that matches your description. Would you like this Delta Airlines flight with 1 stop, that takes off at 12:20 pm. It will cost $252.
Is this for one passenger?
Yes, it is for 1 passenger.
Okay, can you find me a bus going to the airport.
When are you planning on leaving, March 3rd?
No, actually I want to leave on the 10th.
The bus will depart at 9:20 am and it will cost $39. This journey has 0 transfers.
What is the station that I will be leaving from, and where will I be arriving to?
You will leave from Pacific Central Station. You wil arrive at Portland Bus Station.
That sounds really great. Is this for 2 people?
Yes, It is for 2 people. Let's confirm the details. You are going to Portland from Vancouver, at 9:20 am on March 10th.
This is exactly what I want.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Thank you have a nice day.
I need to get a flight that is only one way.
Tell me the city you will be leaving out of and the city you are going to?
I'll be leaving from LAX and going to Las Vegas, so check those flights.
What is your preferred travel date?
Friday next week is the date I'll be going.
How about American Airlines? They have a flight that will be leaving out at 8:25 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket will be $93.
What is the airport that is is leaving from?
It will depart from LAX International Airport.
That doesn't work for me, look for others. I will need four tickets.
What do you think about Delta Airlines? There is a flight with 0 stops and leaves at 10:15 pm. You can purchase a ticket for $88.
Where will it arrive at? Is it a flight that will be a redeye?
No, it isn't traveling overnight. McCarran International Airport is the flight.
Sure. Can you look for buses traveling there? I will be heading out on the 13th.
There is a departing bus at 7:40 am and has 0 transfers. You can get a ticket for $33.
Look for other buses. I will be traveling on 12th of March.
There's a bus leaving at 12:30 pm and has 0 transfers, with a ticket cost of $44.
That will work good.
Do you want to purchase some bus tickets for this one?
Yeah, I want to book the tickets.
Please approve the upcoming details: You would like a bus ticket that is going from Los Angeles to Las Vegas. The bus will depart on March 12th at 12:30 pm and there will be 4 people.
Yep, that sounds good.
I have verified your ticket.
I really appreciate all of your help and I'm done.
Enjoy the day!
I would like to find a one way flight.
Which city are you wanting to leave from?
Find me flights from Vancouver, BC.
On which date do you want to travel?
I want to begin traveling on March 5th.
Where are you going to go?
I am going to fly to Seattle.
Do you want to fly with Air Canada? The flight will leave at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop. The price will be $273.
Okay, can you help my find a bus going there?
Do you want to leave on March 5th?
I am wanting to leave on March 8th and need tickets for one person.
I have located 10 buses for you, one is leaving at 6:40 am the price is $29. There are 0 transfers.
Are there other buses available?
The bus will leave at 8:10 am and the price is $28. This one has 0 transfers.
Can you find any other available buses? I am wanting to leave on the 9th of this month.
The bus will leave at 8:30 am and the price is $25. This bus has 0 transfers.
That sounds fine. I would like to reserve this bus.
Okay, please confirm these details: you would like a ticket on the bus leaving from Vancouver and going to Seattle on March 9th at 8:30 am. The ticket is for 1 person.
Yes that is fine with me.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks very much for your help. That is all I was needing.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a one way flight on American Airlines, so I can use my miles.
Where will you be travelling to?
I'm going to Las Vegas.
DEparting from what city?
FLying out of San Diego.
When would you like to go?
I'd liketo leave on the 2nd.
American Airlines had a flight that leaves at 4:40 pm and has 0 connections. The fare is $83.
That's kind of late in the day. Is it a redeye flight? How many seats are available?
At least 1 seat is available. It is not an overnight flight.
Ok. What about buses instead.
Leaving on March 2nd?
Yes.
There is 1 bus available, departing at 6:50 pm, with 0 transfers. The fare is $39.
What are the departure and arrival bus stations?
The bus departs from Santa Fe Depot, and arrives at Union Plaza.
Ok. That works.
Do you want to book that bus?
Yes. I need four tickets.
You want 4 seats on the San Diego to Las Vegas bus on March 2nd at 6:50 PM. Is that correct?
Yes. That is correct.
Your reservation is confirmed.
That's great, thanks!
Do you require anything further?
Nope. I'm good for now.
Let me know if I can be of any furhter assistance.
I need a premium economy one way ticket to Las Vegas.
What is the date and departing city?
The date is March 11th and I leave from Los Angeles.
I have an Alaska Airlines that leaves at 8:20 pm with 0 stops for $133.
I also need a bus for 4 to there.
Is March 11th still departing date?
No, I leave on the 14th of this month.
I found 4. I have one leaving at 7:40 am with 0 transfers for $40.
How about departure of 13th of March for 3?
I have one leaving at 12:30 pm with 0 transfers for $36.
This is the one I want.
Do you want tickets?
Yes, go ahead and buy.
Confirm bus to Las Vegas leaving at 12:30 pm to Los Angeles on March 13th for 3.
Yes, what is departure station?
It leaves from Union Station.
Thank you for the help.
Is there anything else?
No that is all.
Have a great time.
Hey, can you get me a flight leaving on the 10th of this month?
Sure, where are you going? Where are you departing from?
I'd like to fly Delta Airlines from NY to Philadelphia.
Great, I found 1 Delta Airlines flight for you. It departs at 11:10 am with 0 stops and costs $61.
Great, can you get me a bus too?
Sure, for March 10th?
No, on the 5th of this month.
Okay, I found a bus that departs at 7:40 am with 0 transfers for $21.
Great, any buses on the 13th? I need 4 seats.
Sure, I found 6 available buses. The first departs at 8 am with 0 transfers for $22.
And where is that departing from?
It departs from the Port Authority Station.
Okay, anything else? Something with 2 seats would be good.
Sure, I found 5 buses. One departs at 11:30 am with 0 transfers for $22.
Okay, which station does it depart from and arrive at?
It departs from the Port Authority Station and arrives at the Intercity Terminal.
Great, please buy the tickets.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like 2 tickets for the 11:30 am bus from New York to Philadelphia on March 13th.
Yes, that's perfect.
Okay, your ticket is reserved.
Thanks so much.
That's okay, is there anything else?
No, that's all.
Okay, see you.
I need a one flight for the 13th of this month.
Where are you planning to go?
I need to a flight out to Vegas.
Okay, can you tell which city you are departing from?
I'm flying out of San Diego. Can you find me Premium Economy class tickets with Alaska Airlines?
I found 1 flight for you. There is a flight taking of rom Alaska Airlines at 6:30 am with 0 stops. The total ticket cost is $150.
What airport is it flying to and what time will it arrive?
The flight will arrive at McCarran International Airport at 7:44 am.
Okay thanks. Can you make a search for busses headed that way? I need a ticket for one and will be leaving sometime on Sunday this week.
Okay no problem. I found 1 bus for you. The bus is departing at 6:50 pm and has 0 transfers. Your total ticket cost will be $41.
Okay, that sounds good. Go ahead and reserve a seat for me.
No problem. I just need you to confirm the following for me: You want to purchase 1 bus ticket from San Diego to Las Vegas for March 3rd at 6:50 pm. Correct?
Yeah, that works for me. Can you tell me what station the bus leaves from?
The bus will be leaving from Santa Fe Depot. Your ticket has been purchased. Enjoy your trip!
Thanks a lot. That's all I need.
Thank you! Have a great day.
I need to find a one way flight to NYC on American Airlines.
What is the name of the city you are departing from?
I will be departing from Philly.
What date are you traveling?
I wish to travel next Thursday.
I found 1 flight for you with American Airlines departing at 4:45 pm with 0 stops for $64.
Sounds great! Can you search for a bus going there?
Are you departing on March 7th?
No, I will be leaving on the 10th.
There is a bus for $22 with 0 transfers that departs at 8:30 am.
Can you tell me the name of the bus station I will be leaving from and the name of the one I will arrive at?
You will start out at Intercity Terminal and your destination station is Port Authority Station.
Are there any busses available for 4 people?
There is a bus for $22 that departs at 9:50 am and has 0 transfers.
Ok, Are there any others?
There is a bus for $24 that has 0 transfers and departs at 10:10 am.
Ok, I would like to reserve that one please!
Please confirm that you would like a bus ticket from Philadelphia to New York on March 10th leaving at 10:10 am for 4 people.
Yes, that will be perfect!
I have confirmed your ticket.
Can you tell me the names of the bus stations I will be leaving from and the one I am arriving at?
The one you are leaving from is intercity Terminal and your destination station is Port Authority Station.
Ok, thank you for all your help!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thank you, thank you for your help though!
Have a wonderful day!
I'm looking for a one-way flight. I prefer United Airlines and just need one ticket.
Where are you flying to?
I'm going to Vancouver.
What date did you want to leave?
I'd like to go on the 5th of March.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'm leaving from Seattle.
I found a United Airlines flight that takes off at 12:30 pm with 1 stop. The ticket is $267.
Can you check on a bus going there. Let's make it March 2nd for three.
I found one that leaves at 6:40 am with 0 transfers for $26.
Are there any other buses?
There's one that leaves at 7:40 am with 0 transfers for $28.
Where does it leave from and where does it arrive?
It leaves from King Street Station and arrives at Pacific Central Station.
That will work.
Would you like to buy tickets?
Yes, let's do that.
To confirm: You want 3 tickets on the bus leaving at 7:40 am from Seattle to Vancouver on March 2nd.
Yes that's right.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank's so much.
Is there anything else you need?
Not just now. Thanks again.
Have a wonderful day.
i am looking for a premium economy to mexico city
what city are you traveling from
i need 4 tickets on delta airlines from seattle
when would you like to fly
i need 1 tickets flying to portland, or on 13th of march
i found 1 flights with delta airlines with 0 stop for $119 at 7:55 am
when does it arrive
you will arrive at 8:53 am
sure
what else can i do for you
i need a bus ticket to get there wednesday next week
i found a bus with 0 transfer for $33 depart at 6:10 am
ok perfect
would you like to buy the ticket
yes please
please confirm your purchase of 1 ticket from seattle to portland on march 6th at 6:10 am
yes please, what is the end destination
you will arrive at portland bus station
what station am i leaving from
you will depart from king street station
ok thank you
have a nice day
Find me a one way flight.
Can you give me your departure date?
I'm leaving on March 13th.
What is your departure city and destination?
Find me some Economy flights from SF to LAX. Preferably on Alaska Airlines.
I have found 1 flight on Alaska Airlines. It departs at 7:10 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $107.
Is this for three passengers?
No. It is for 1 passenger.
Oh. Can you find me a bus, instead?
Do you still want to leave on March 13th?
Yes, that works.
I found a bus that departs at 7 am. It has 0 transfers and cost $47.
Sounds good, can you get me some tickets?
How many do you need?
I need two tickets.
Please confirm that you want 2 bus tickets from San Francisco to Los Angeles. The bus departs on March 13th at 7 am.
Yes that works.
Your tickets are booked.
Thanks a lot. That's all I need.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
I need you to help me with a plane reservation. I'm looking to fly Premium Economy on the 11th of this month. I want to take off from San Diego.
Where do you want to end up?
I want to get to LA.
You have 3 choices. Alaska Airlines has some very low rates now. They have a flight that takes of at 6:45 am with 0 layovers or stops and it only costs $119.
What about transportation to get there? How about a bus that will leave on the 3rd? 1 ticket only.
There is a bus you can hop on at 6:10 am. It only costs $26 and it has 0 transfers.
Fine, can you set it up for me?
Sure, I have: 1 ticket for a bus Leaving from San Diego going to Los Angeles. You'll leave on March 3rd at 6:10 am.
Fine, I got a ticket to ride.
Indeed you do.
Fine, thanks a lot.
Have a safe trip.
Hello, could you help me search for a one way flight please?
May I know where do you intend to depart from and when are you travelling?
I would like to travel from SD on the 5th of this month.
Sure, and where do you plan to travel to?
I plan to travel to SFO.
There are 4 available flights for you, would you like an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 layovers which departs at 11:10 am and will set you back $100?
Are there any alternatives?
Would you like an American Airlines flight with 0 layovers which departs at 12:05 pm and will set you back $110?
May I know what time will this flight reach the destination?
You will be reaching at around 1:45 pm.
Could you also help me search for a bus travelling there for three people which departs on the 14th?
There are 6 buses which might suit you, one of which departs at 7:40 am with 0 transfers and costs you $57.
I see, that sounds great!
Would you like me to purchase the bus tickets?
Yes please, do help me. Thank you!
Please confirm your purchase of 3 bus tickets from San Diego to San Francisco on March 14th o 7:40 am.
Sure, that is fine with me. May I know which bus station will I be departing and arriving at?
Your reservation has been made! You will be departing from Santa Fe Depot and arriving at Salesforce Transit Center.
Sure, thank you for your kind assistance!
No worries, do you need any other help?
No, that is all I need for now, thank you!
Sure, have a safe trip!
Find one way flights.
Leaving from where? Going to where? Leaving which date?
Going San Fran to LAX on the 5th of this month.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving 8:20 pm for $102.
Find something else in premium economy.
There's an American Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving 3:50 pm for $145.
Ok. Find a bus there, too.
Leaving March 5th?
No, the 11th of this month.
I found 10 matches. There's a 7 am bus with 0 stops for $43.
Which station does that depart and arrive?
Leaving from Salesforce Transit Center and arriving in Union Station.
Ok.
Do you want tickets?
Yes, 3.
Please confirm: 3 tickets on a bus from San Francisco to Los Angeles at 7 am on March 11th.
Yes.
Your seats are booked.
Thanks, bye.
Have a nice day.
I need to find 3 one-way tickets on United Airlines in any class please.
Where are you planning to depart from and when are you traveling? Where are you planning to go?
I am leaving from Vegas on March 14th and flying to Los Angeles.
I found 1 flight for you on United Airlines. The flight departs at 12:05 pm and has 0 stops. The cost is $118 per ticket.
Ok, can you search for a bus traveling there, leaving on the 7th of this month?
I found a bus departing at 7:20 am with 0 transfers. The ticket costs $43 per ticket.
That sounds good.
Do you want to purchase tickets for the bus?
Yes please.
Please confirm the following details: Purchasing 3 tickets from Las Vegas to Los Angeles on March 7th, departing at 7:20 am.
Correct. What station am I leaving from?
Your tickets are confirmed. You are leaving from Union Plaza.
What station am I arriving at?
Union Station is the destination.
Thank you for you help. That is all I need for now.
You are welcome. Have a good day.
I would like to find a one-way flight.
Where are you traveling and when are you planning on leaving?
I would like two tickets for Vancouver to Portland OR.
On what date are you traveling?
I would like to travel on March 11th.
There is a flight with Air Canada that leaves at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop for the cost of $254.
Which airport does the flight leave from and arrives?
The flight leaves from YVR International Airport and arrives at PDX International Airport.
Can you find a bus going there on the 4th of this month?
The bus departs at 9:20 am for the cost of $34 and has 0 transfer.
I would like to reserve the bus.
Booking 2 seats for Vancouver to Portland on March 4th leaving at 9:20 am
Yes, that is perfect.
Your ticket has been purchased.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I'd like 1 one-way flight with Air Canada for Wednesday next week.
What city are you leaving from? Where are you going?
I need 2 tickets. I'm going from Vancouver to Seattle.
I found 1 Air Canada flight. It takes off at 4:45 pm and costs $278 with 1 stop.
That's fine. I'd like a bus to go there.
Are you leaving on March 6th?
I'm leaving on the 10th of March.
A bus leaves at 6:40 am and costs $30 with 0 transfers.
That's good. I'd like a ticket.
You want 2 tickets for the bus going from Vancouver to Seattle that leaves at 6:40 am on March 10th. Is this right?
Yes, that's it.
Your tickets have been booked.
Thanks. That is all.
Have a nice day.
I want 3 tickets for a one-way flight.
On what day?
On the 8th of March.
What cities will the flight travel between?
From LA to SFO.
Want to take a 0 stop, $85 Alaska Airlines flight? It leaves at 7:10 pm.
Sure. Can you also find me a bus for two leaving on the 1st of this month?
There's a bus that leaves at 7 am, costs $50, and has 0 transfers.
What bus stations will it travel between?
Between Salesforce Transit Center and Union Station.
What other buses are available?
A $41 bus that departs at 7:40 am and has 0 transfers.
And any more buses?
There's a 0 transfer $41 bus that leaves at 8:40 am.
That's the one. I want to reserve it.
So, you want to book 2 tickets for a bus that travels from San Francisco to Los Angeles starting on March 1st at 8:40 am?
That's correct. What bus station should I depart from?
I booked the ticket. You leave from Salesforce Transit Center.
Thanks for helping me out, there.
Can I help further?
Not now. Thank you very much.
Have a wonderful day.
I am in need of finding a one way flight ticket.
Can you tell me where you want to arrive?
I will be leaving for my trip on 7th of March, and I want to arrive in SF.
Can you tell me from which city will you leave for your trip?
I would like to have 1 ticket with a flight of United Airlines, and I will be leaving from Vegas.
How would you consider flying with a flight of United Airlines which has 0 stops and leaves at 3:05 pm? The ticket for this flight will cost you $101.
Can you tell me the time when the flight arrives at the destination?
Your flight is expected to arrive at 4:40 pm.
Alright. Though I need you to also find me a bus to go there. I will be leaving on 11th of March.
There is a bus with 0 transfers which leaves at 10:50 am, and it will cost you $56.
That seems right.
Would you like having tickets bought for this bus trip?
Yes, I want to buy tickets for this bus.
Can you please confirm that you want tickets for 1 person for the bus which leaves from Las Vegas on March 11th at 10:50 am, and arrives in San Francisco?
Alright, I want that. Can you tell me the bus station that I will arrive at? Also please tell me from which bus station will I leave from?
Your requested ticket has been booked. The bus will be leaving from Union Plaza, and the destination will be Salesforce Transit Center.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided.
Have a good time!
I'm looking for a one way flight for four leaving from NYC.
When did you want to leave and to go where?
The 6th of March to Washington.
There's an American Airlines flight leaving at 6:05 am with 0 stops for $80.
Where does it land?
Dulles International Airport.
Which airport does it leave from?
From JFK International Airport.
Can you check on a bus instead?
Did you still want to leave March 6th?
No make it next Monday. Still for four.
I found 8 buses. One leaves at 6 am with 0 transfers for $39.
Which station does it leave from and arrive to?
You'd leave from Port Authority Station and arrive at Union Station.
What else is available? Lets change it to the 7th of this month.
There's one leaving at 9:40 am with 0 transfers for $32.
I'd like to get tickets for this one.
To confirm: You want 4 tickets on the bus leaving March 7th at 9:40 am from New York to Washington.
You got it.
Your tickets are confirmed.
What station does this leave from and arrive at?
From Port Authority Station to Union Station.
Thanks so much. That's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I like to search a one way flight.
From which city you want to depart?
Search for flights from SF
Where are you want to go?
I want to fly San Diego
On which date you want to travel?
I like to travel on next monday.
I have short listed 4 flights of your liking. One among them is Alaska Airlines which leaves at 6:10 am with 0 stops and ticket cost is $113
Is it for 4 passengers?
No, it is for 1 passenger.
Fine. Could you help me to find for a bus going there?
Are you decided to leave on march 4th?
I am moving on the 8th
I have selected 6 buses for you and one bus among them starts at 11 am with 0 transfer amd cost is $51
Which bus station i will be reaching?
The reaching station is Santa Fe Depot.
Can i know the bus station i am leaving from?
Salesforce Transit Center is the origin station.
That is cool. i like to reserve the bus.
How many tickets you want?
I need ticket for one people.
Please give confirmation details: You need 1 bus ticket leaving from San Francisco to San Diego on March 8th at 11 am
That is fine
Your ticket booking is done
Thank you very much
Is there any other help?
No, Thank you
Have a nice day
I need a one way flight.
What is your departure city?
I'm departing from NY on the 9th of this month.
What is your destination city?
I'm going to Washington.
I found you 4 flights. How about American Airlines? There is a flight that departs at 10:55 am. It has 0 stops and costs $85.
Find me something in Premium Economy class.
How about Southwest Airlines? There is a flight that departs at 2:35 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $139.
Is this flight a redeye?
No, it is not an overnight flight.
Can you find me something on United Airlines for Saturday this week?
I found a flight on United Airlines that departs at 5:10 am. There are 0 stops and the ticket costs $126.
How many passengers is this information for? When does the flight arrive at my destination?
This information is for 1 traveler. The flight arrives at 6:20 am.
Can you find me a bus instead? I need four tickets departing on 1st of March.
There is a bus departing at 6 am. There are 0 transfers and it costs $34.
Any other buses?
There is a bus that departs at 9:40 am with 0 transfers. It cost $43.
Sounds good. I want to book tickets.
Confirming that you want 4 bus tickets from New York to Washington departing on March 1st at 9:40 am.
That works. What is the departure station?
Your bus will depart from the Port Authority Station. I have confirmed your tickets.
What is the arrival station?
You will be arriving at Union Station.
Thanks a lot. That's all.
You're welcome. Have a great day!
I'm looking for a one way flight and I need your help
I can do that for you, just tell me when you want to travel and where are you going to
I need to be in los angeles and I'll leave this saturday
Where are you leaving from?
the flight must be from san francisco
is alaska airlines good enough for you? The plane takes off at 8:20 pm and it has 0 stops, the price for the tickets is $100
look further
what about american airlines? you'll take off at 3:50 pm and pay $104 for the ticket. Stops are 0
Got it, now let's change transportation type, look for buses going there, leaving date is march 10th
you can leave at 7 am and pay $46 for the 0 transfers trip
tell me the name of the final station
it's union station
now tell me the name of the station I will be leaving from
it's salesforce transit center
look for more options
you can leave at 7:40 am and pay $49, transfers are 0
look again and keep in mind that it's for 4 people
there are 8 more solutions for you. You can think about departing at 8:40 am and pay $47 for a trip with 0 transfers
cool, this may actually work for me, take the seats
confirm me what I am about to do. You need 4 bus tickets to leave from san francisco on march 10th at 8:40 am to los angeles
that's correct. tell me the names of both stations
tickets are reserved. you'll leave from salesforce transit center and reach union station
thanks a lot
do you still need my services?
no I don't, thank you and good bye
bye sir
I need a one way flight please.
From which city and on which day.
I need to leave for Washington on March 14th.
Where will you be travelling to?
I am going to NY.
I found 2, how about American Airlines which dpearts at 6:05 am and has 0 stops? The ticket costs $85.
Okay, can you find a bus to NY.
Will you be departing on March 14th?
No I need one on March 4th.
I found 8, the first departs at 8:10 am, has 0 transfers, and costs $38.
Sounds good, I need a ticket for one.
You want a ticket for 1 from Washington to New York on march 4th from 8:10 am, correct?
Yes that is correct. Which station does it depart from?
It leaves from Union Station.
Thanks for your help.
Can I do anything more for you?
No that will be all thanks.
Have a great day, goodbye.
Looking for a one way flight please.
Alright, let's get started. Please tell me which city would you like to leave from and on which date are you considering?
Well, I will need two tickets for Tuesday next week departing from Seattle, WA.
Where would you like to travel to?
I need to go to Vancouver.
I've got 5 options for you to pick from. Let's start with Alaska Airlines flight departing at 3:45 pm with 1 stop and this ticket will be a total of $291.
Hold that thought, Let's check buses as well.
Sure, will this also be for March 5th departure date.
No, check for the 1st please.
Ok, there are 9 buses. May I suggest the one leaving at 6:40 am and it has 0 transfers for $27 total.
That sounds pretty reasonable. Let's book it now.
Sure, but first please confirm reservation for 2 people leaving at 6:40 am on March 1st from Seattle headed to Vancouver. Is this correct?
Yeah, that's right. I need bus station details for where I will be leaving from and arriving at please.
Great news, I was able to purchase tickets for you. You will depart form King Street Station and arriving at Pacific Central Station.
Awesome, thank you.
Your welcome. Can I assist with anything else?
Nope, that was all. Good bye.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to book a one way flight.
Which place would you like to travel and on which date?
I would like to travel to Las Vegas on 11th of this month and want 2 tickets.
From which city would you like to depart?
I am looking for flights from SD.
There are 4 flights available. One is Alaska airlines which takes off at 10:45 pm and has 0 stops. It will cost you $78.
Ok. Can you please help me in searching a bus on the 8th?
There is 1 bus. It departs at 6:50 pm and it will cost you $40. It has 0 transfers.
That's perfect. I want to reserve seats in bus
Can you please confirm the details: The bus will be leaving from San Diego to Las Vegas on March 8th at 6:50 pm. Ticket is booked for 2 people.
Yes. Perfect. For which bus station does the bus leave?
The ticket is now confirmed. The destination station will be Union Plaza.
Thanks a lot for your assistance.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me find a one way flight with American Airlines?
I'd be happy to assist. What is your travel date and where are you planning to go? Where are you traveling from?
I'd like to travel from Las Vegas to SD today.
American Airlines is offering 1 flight that departs at 8:20 am with 0 stops. The total price of the ticket is $78.
I'd like to see if I can find four tickets for a bus next Wednesday.
There is 1 bus and it leaves at 3:50 pm. It has 0 transfers and the ticket price is $44.
I'd like to purchase tickets for that bus.
You'd like 4 tickets for the bus Leaving Las Vegas on March 6th at 3:50 pm. It is scheduled to arrive in San Diego. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your tickets have been purchased.
Thank you for your help. That will be everything for now.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I need 2 tickets, one way plane, please.
what city will you leave? Where are you going?
I'm curious about flying from Portland OR to Seattle.
when is your date of departure?
I'll take off on the 10th of this month.
How about the 9:15 pm American airlines? It has 0 stops and only runs you $62.
Fine, but what about a bus there? It's for three.
You're leaving on March 10th?
Nope, the 7th.
Well, a bus leaves at 8:40 am. It has 0 transfers and only costs $34.
Are there other buses?
There is a $30 bus that leaves at 9:30 am and has 0 transfers.
What about something else on March 3rd?
There are 6 others. One leaves at 10:10 am and has 0 transfers. It costs $36.
Fine get me some seats.
To be clear: 3 tickets for bus leaving at 10:10 am on Marh 3rd. from Portland and going to Seattle? It's on March 3rd.
Yes, but tell me what station I'm headed to.
You have a ticket and you'll end up at King Street Station.
Fine, thanks so much.
Have a good trip.
I need 1 ticket from san diego to las vegas
when are you traveling
i need to travel on the 14th
i found 4 flights for you. Alaska airlines with 0 stop for $79 depart at 6:30 am
what airport does it depart from and is this a overnight flight
this is a overnight flight depart from san international airport
what else can you find
what about american airlines with 0 stop for $78 depart at 4:40 pm
what else do you have? can you find an economy on day after tomorrow
i found 2 economy for you.Southwest airlines with 0 stop for $82 depart at 8:25 pm
ok, can you find me a bus going there
are you leaving on march 3rd
i am leaving on march 10th
I found 1 bus with 0 transfer for $46 depart at 6:50 pm
what bus station am i leaving from and arrive to
you will depart from santa fe depot and arrive at union plaza
perfect please reserve it for me
please confirm your booking for 1 ticket from san diego to las vegas on march 10th at 6:50 pm
yes please
your ticket is booked
thank you
have a nice day
I need a one way flight.
What is destination, departure and travel date?
I leave LA to San Fran on the 12th.
I have an Alaska Airlines leaving at 5:50 pm with 0 stops at $97.
This is a redeye flight?
No it is not overnight.
I need one bus ticket leaving on the 2nd of this month too.
I have one leaving at 6:20 am with 0 transfers for $50.
What is departure and arrival stations?
The departure is Union Station and arrival is Salesforce Transit Center.
I would like to reserve.
Confirm bus leaving Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 2nd at 6:20 am for 1.
Yes I confirm that.
You are now confirmed.
That is all I need.
Have a nice day.
Find one way flights from Vancouver.
Destination and departure date?
14th of March to Seattle, WA.
I found 3 flights. There's an Air Canada one with 1 stop leaving 4:45 pm for $256.
Ok. Look up buses to there on the 7th.
There's a bus with 0 transfers leaving 6:40 am for $26.
Anything else?
There's an 8:10 am bus with 0 transfers for $25.
Good.
Do you want tickets?
Yes, 4.
Please confirm: 4 bus tickets from Vancouver to Seattle at 8:10 am on March 7th.
Yes. What stations is that to and from?
Your seats are booked. It's leaving from Pacific Central Station and arrives King Street Station.
Thanks. Ok that's all.
Have a nice day.
I need to find a one way flight.
What is your destination?
Please find me a Premium Economy ticket with American Airlines going to New York City.
What city will you be traveling from and when?
I am looking to leave from Philly on the 9th.
I have found 1 flight with American Airlines with 0 stops. It leaves at 5:35 pm and cost $100.
I need help finding a bus going there on the 14th of this month.
I have found a bus that departs at 8:30 am with 0 transfers. It costs $20.
What is the name of the bust stations I will be departing from and arriving at.
You will depart from Intercity Terminal and will arrive at Port Authority Station.
Is there any others for 13th of March. There will be 2 of us.
Yes I have found 7 buses. One costs $23 with 0 transfers and leaves at 9:50 am.
That sounds great.
Anything else I can do.
Yes, I would like to reserve the bus.
So you would like me to reserve a bus On March 13th for 2 people that leaves Philadelphia at 9:50 am going to New York?
Yes. What bus station will be arriving.
You will be arriving at Port Authority Station. Your reservations have been make.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, I am all set. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight.
Where did you want to go?
To San Diego.
From what city and what date did you want to leave?
I want to go on March 14th from San Fran.
I found 5 flights. There's one on Alaska airlines leaving at 6:10 am with 0 stops. The cost is $107.
Can you check on a bus?
Did you still want to leave March 14th?
No, look for the 1st of this month.
I found 6 buses. The first leaves at 11 am with 0 transfers for $58.
Where does it leave from and where does it arrive?
You'll leave from Salesforce Transit Center and arrive at Santa Fe Depot.
That one works.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Yes, get 2 tickets.
To verify: You want 2 tickets for the bus from San Francisco to San Diego that leaves March 1st at 11 am.
No, make it four tickets.
So that's 4 tickets on the 11 am bus.
That is right.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you so much. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a one way flight to Seattle, WA please.
Sure, I can help with that. What date are you planning to travel on?
I'm trying to hit the road by the 6th of this month.
Which city will you be departing from?
Portland, OR hopefully.
Ok, I found 3 flights for you. Let's start with American Airlines departing at 9:15 pm with 0 layovers. This ticket will run $59.
What time and where will this flight arrive?
This flight would arrive at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport at 10:13 pm.
More options please.
Sure, Southwest Airlines has a flight departing at 4:40 am and has 0 layovers. This ticket will run you $70.
I see. Let's search buses also please.
No problem, will you still be departing on March 6th?
No, I would prefer the 1st of March.
There is a bus departing at 8:40 am and has 0 transfers. This ticket will run you $34.
Which bus stations will I depart from and arrive at?
You would leave Portland Bus Station and arriving at King Street Station.
Ok, that sounds pretty good.
Should I buy a ticket now?
Yeah, go ahead and reserve one ticket.
I will need you to confirm 1 ticket for Portland to Seattle departing on March 1st at 8:40 am. Is this correct?
Yes, please book.
Great, I was able to reserve that ticket you requested.
Ok, thanks for your help.
Your welcome, Can I assist with anything else?
No, that will be all. Good bye.
Alright, Good bye.
I'm looking for flights that are one way.
What's the date you'll be leaving?
I'll be leaving on the 7th of this month.
What's your departure city and where will you be traveling to?
I'm going to go from NY to Washington.
I've found 3 flights. How about American Airlines? It leaves at 10:55 am with 0 stops and costs $87 per ticket.
Alright. What about buses heading there?
Will you be leaving on March 7th?
No, I want to leave on March 9th.
I've found 8 buses. There's a bus that leaves at 6 am with 0 transfers and is $33.
Is there another bus I could take?
There's a bus that leaves at 9:40 am with 0 transfers and is $37.
That won't work, is there another bus?
There's a bus that leaves at 11:10 am with 0 transfers and is $41.
Okay, that works.
Do you want to book tickets?
Yes, I do want to book tickets.
How many tickets would you like to book?
I'll need tickets for 4 people.
You want 4 tickets for a bus from New York to Washington on March 9th at 11:10 am. Shall I book the tickets?
Yes, book them.
I've booked the tickets.
Thanks a lot for helping me.
Do you need anything else?
No, thanks again.
Have a terrific day.
I want to find a one way flight that leaves on the 7th.
Where will you be going?
I'm going to Philly.
And where will you be traveling from?
I'm traveling from Washington.
I've found 3 flights. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:10 pm, has 1 stop, and a ticket costs $136.
Is that for one person?
Yes, that's for 1 person.
Where will the flight be landing?
It will land in PHL International Airport.
Alright. Let's look for buses that go there.
Will you be leaving on March 7th?
No, I'll be leaving on March 12th.
There's a bus that leaves at 7:10 am with 0 transfers for $30.
What other buses are available? How about one for 2 people leaving this Saturday?
There's a bus that leaves at 7:50 am with 0 transfers for $25.
What else is there?
There's a bus that leaves at 8:40 am with 0 transfers for $26.
That'll work, I want to get tickets.
I'll get you 2 tickets for a bus that leaves on March 2nd at 8:40 am traveling from Washington to Philadelphia. Is that correct?
Yeah, that what I want. What station will it arrive at?
I've booked the tickets. The bus will arrive at Intercity Terminal.
Thanks for helping me out.
Do you need me for anything else?
No, thanks again.
Have a terrific day.
I want to find a one way flight
When do you want to travel?
I want to leave on the 14th of March
What city are you departing from? And where are you planning to go?
I want to leave on the 2nd of this month from Washington heading to NYC
I found 2 flights. What about American Airlines and their 0 stop flight at 6:05 am that costs $88?
Find me something else I can ride
Maybe Southwest Airlines and their 0 stop flight at 4:50 pm and will run you $83
When does that flight arrive at the destination, and is it a redeye?
It arrives at 6 pm and no, it's not an overnight flight
OK, can you help me find a bus headed there instead?
Do you want to leave on March 2nd?
Actually I want to leave on the 12th of this month
There's a 8:10 am bus with 0 transfers that'll cost $36
What else can you find?
I found a 8:20 am bus for 0 transfers and is also $36
What's the bust station that I would leave from and arrive at?
You leave from Union Station and will arrive at Port Authority Station
What other buses can I take?
How about a 11:10 am bus with 0 transfers and costs $40?
That's good, get me four seats
Confirming you want 4 seats on the 11:10 am bus leaving on March 12th from Washington to New York
Yes please. What station am I leaving and coming from?
You're confirmed! You'll be leaving Union Station and arriving at Port Authority Station
Thanks for all your help
Can I do something else for you?
For now, I've got all I need, thank you
You're very welcome.
I need a 1 way ticket. I have no preference regarding airline.
What city will you leave? What date do you want to go?
I need a ticket from Paris on the 3rd of this month. How about economy priced?
Where will you go?
I need 3 for LA please.
You can opt for Air France. It departs at 9:15 pm with 0 stops. It will cost you $226.
Nope, try Premium Economy. I might leave from SD instead.
You'll probably like Alaska Airlines. They depart at 3:20 pm with 0 stops. It only costs $119.
well, you won't believe this but I want San Francisco now. (Crazy right?).
You can take off on Delta Airlines. Their flight leaves at 7:55 pm. It has 0 stops. It costs only $150.
Fine, but I'm moody so get me a bus to go there. I can't be bothered to wait in line at the airport. I'll leave on the 8th.
Well, there are 6 buses. What about the 7:40 am bus with 0 transfers. It only costs $53.
Fine, something I can finally afford. Get me tickets.
Sure to be clear: 3 tickets from San Diego, going to San Francisco. It will leave at 7:40 am on March 8th.
Fine, what bus station will I end up at?
You have 3 tickets. You're destination is Salesforce Transit Center.
Great, thanks for putting up with my moodiness.
Can I answer any other questions?
Not a one, thanks though.
Have safe travels.
I need a one way flight.
Can you give me your departure city and date?
Find me flights from NYC to Washington for March 6th.
How about American Airlines? They have a flight that departs at 6:05 am and has 0 stops. The ticket is $80.
How about a bus? I need 4 tickets for next Friday.
I found 8 buses. One departs at 6 am and has 0 transfers. The ticket costs $33.
What is my arrival station?
You will arrive at Union Station.
What is my departure station?
You will be departing from Port Authority Station.
Are there any other buses available for tomorrow?
I found 9:40 am departure with 0 transfers. The ticket costs $36.
Sounds good. Can you reserve a seat for me?
Confirming that you want 4 tickets on the New York to Washington bus that departs on March 2nd at 9:40 am.
Yes, that works.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks a lot, that's all I need.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
Can you help me find a one-way flight?
Sure, I need to know a few things first: What city are you leaving from, where will you travel to, and what date will you depart?
I want to leave later today, I know it's last minute but I need to get to Vancouver, I'm leaving from Seattle.
Do you like Alaska Airlines? There's a flight at 3:45 pm with 1 stop for $275.
I need something sooner than that, in Economy.
Alright, I have 4 options here - does American Airlines work? It leaves at 8:15 am with 1 stop for $233.
Where does it touch down?
This flight lands at YVR International Airport.
Where does it leave from? Is this for 2 people?
This is for 1 person, from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Can you get me a bus there?
Leaving on March 1st?
Yeah, as soon as possible.
I've got 9 options, but the soonest is 6:40 am with 0 transfers for $27.
Great, I need a ticket for one person.
So you'd like a bus ticket for 1 person leaving March 1st at 6:40 am from Seattle, going to Vancouver?
That's right, what station do I leave from?
This ticket is for King Street station, it's been purchased.
That's all I need, thanks.
Have a great trip.
I want a one way plane ticket out of San Francisco.
Where are you going and what dates are you travelling on?
I am travelling to SD on the 14th of this month.
Search revealed 5 results. Alaska Airlines has a flight with 0 stops, a departure time of 6:10 am and a ticket cost of $107.
Is this an overnight flight and a First Class ticket?
It is an economy flight and it does not fly overnight.
I see. Find me a bus to there that departs on the 13th.
There is a bus with 0 transfers, a departure time of 11 am and a cost of $52.
What is the arrival bus station?
You will be arriving at Santa Fe Depot.
What else can you find?
I found a bus with 0 transfers, a departure time of 1:40 pm and a cost of $49.
What is the departure bus station?
You will be departing out of Salesforce Transit Center.
That works for me. Get me bus tickets.
How many people are going?
There are 4 people going.
You want 4 tickets for a bus from San Francisco to San Diego on March 13th with a departure time of 1:40 pm. Is that right?
That is perfect. What is the destination bus station?
Your ticket is booked and you will be arriving at Santa Fe Depot.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything.
Have a good day.
I will be traveling with some friends soon. Please find a one way flight.
Where are you flying to? And from where will you leave?
I will be going from San Francisco to LAX.
When do you want to fly?
Search for flights on the 4th of this month.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight that takes off at 7:10 pm and has 0 stops. It has a cost of $93.
Sounds good but for now lets search for buses. Is there something for 3 people for the 12th of this month?
There are 10 buses you might like. There is a bus that departs at 7 am and has 0 transfers. It has a cost of $51.
What other buses are there?
There is also a bus that departs at 7:40 am and has 0 transfers. It has a cost of $47.
From which station does it leave? And to which one it arrives?
It leaves from Salesforce Transit Center and reaches Union Station.
What other buses are there?
There is also a bus that departs at 8:40 am and has 0 transfers. It has a cost of $43.
That sounds great, I want to book it.
Please confirm: Booking 3 bus tickets from San Francisco to Los Angeles. Departing on March 12th at 8:40 am.
That is correct. Can you repeat again from which station it leaves and to which one it arrives?
The tickets have been booked. It leaves from Salesforce Transit Center and reaches Union Station.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I'd like a one way flight please.
What city and date and departing location are you seeking?
I would like to start travelling on the 14th of March from Los Angeles to Las Vegas
Would you want to fly Alaska Airlines taking off 8:20 pm with 0 stops for $88?
What is the number of passengers and the airport you are leaving from?
I'm leaving from LAX International Airport with 1 traveller.
Ok. Could you help me find a bus going there?
Would you plan to leave March 14th?
Yes, that is fine.
I have 4 buses leaving 7:40 am costing $40 with 0 transfers.
Which bus station am I leaving from?
You are leaving from Union Station.
That sounds great for me.
What else can I do for you?
I would like to reserve the bus.
What is the number of tickets needed?
I need for two people.
Please confirm a ticket from Los Angeles to Las Vegas leaving March 14th at 7:40 am for 2 people.
Yes, that will work for me.
The ticket is confirmed.
Thanks so much for the help.
Can I assist you with anything else?
No thanks so much.
Have a wonderful day.
I want a one-way flight. I'm in Los Angeles.
What date are you leaving?
On the 14th of this month.
Where are you going?
Vegas.
An Alaska Airlines flight leaves at 8:20 pm and costs $88 with 0 stops.
I'd like a bus to get there.
Are you leaving on March 14th?
I'm leaving March 12th.
A bus leaves at 7:40 am and costs $38 with 0 transfers.
What else is there? I need 4 tickets.
I found 3 buses. A bus leaves at 12:30 pm and costs $44 with 0 transfers.
What station would I be leaving from?
The station is Union Station.
I'd like to reserve it.
You want 4 bus tickets from Los Angeles to Las Vegas for March 12th that leaves at 12:30 pm. Is this right?
Yes, that's it.
Your tickets are booked.
What station would I arrive at?
Union Plaza is the destination station.
Thanks That's all.
Have a nice day.
I wish to search a one way flight to NYC on 9th of this month. I need two tickets.
From which city do you want to start from?
I am looking for flights from Washington.
Are you like to fly in American Airlines with 0 stops? It will start at 6:05 am. The cost of the ticket is $100.
What is the name of the airport from which the flight starts? Is it a redeye flight?
It starts from Dulles International Airport and it is not an overnight flight.
Search some thing for me.
Are you interested in flying with Southwest Airlines which starts at 5:45 pm and 0 stops. The cost of the ticket is $80.
Ok. Could you help me in searching a bus to go there on 8th of this month?
The bus starts at 8:10 am with 0 transfers. It costs $35.
What is the name of the station that I am reaching?
The reaching station is Port Authority Station.
Is there any buses available on next Tuesday.
The bus starts at 8:20 am with 0 transfers. It costs $39.
Is there any other buses available? I need it for 3 persons.
I searched and found 6 buses for you. It starts at 11:10 am and has 0 transfers. The cost of the bus is $38.
It is good.
Shall I book the ticket?
Yes. Please go ahead.
Kindly ensure that, on March 5th, ticket has been booked for 3 persons from Washington to New York at 11:10 am.
Yes. it is good for me.
Your ticket is booked.
What is the name of the reaching station?
The reaching station is Port Authority Station.
Thank you so much for your help.
Can I do any help for you?
No. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
Look for a one way flight
From where do you want do depart and where to go?
Get the flights from Los Angeles to SD
When are planning to go?
I wish to start on March 7th
There are 4 flights. How about Alaska Airlines that takes off at 7:30 am and also has 0 stops. The cost is $66
Which type of flight is that? Where is the destination?
The landing is SAN International Airport. This is not overnight flight
Find me a bus to go there
Are you planning to leave on March 7th
No. On 11th of March
There are 10 buses. How about the bus which departs at 7:40 am which has 0 transfers. The cost is $26
Is there any other buses on 3rd of March
There are 9 buses. How about the bus which departs at 7:50 am and has 0 transfers. the cost is $23
Do you have any other buses?
How about the bus which departs at 9:20 am and has 0 transfers? The cost is $27
Where is the bus station?
The station is Union Station
What is the destination
It is Santa Fe Depot
That's nice. Reserve the bus for three people
Please confirm this: You want a ticket on the bus leaving from Los Angeles to San Diego. The bus leaves on March 3rd at 9:20 am. It is for 3 people
That's perfect
Ticket booked successfully
Thank you so much
Do you want anything else?
No That's all for now
Have a nice day
Hi, could you help me search for one way flights with Delta Airlines please?
Sure, any preference on the departing location of your flight?
I will be departing from Vancouver, where I stay.
Sure, and will you be travelling?
I will be travelling from the 4th of this month.
Where will you be going?
I will be travelling to Portland, OR for a short holiday.
I see! There is 1 Delta Airlines flight with 1 layover which departs at 12:20 pm and will cost you $277.
Is this a redeye flight?
No, it is not an overnight flight.
And where does this flight arrive at?
You will be arriving at the PDX International Airport.
Sure, could you help me search for a bus travelling there too?
Will you be departing on the March 4th too?
No, I will be departing on Friday next week instead.
Sure, there are 8 buses which you may like, one of which departs at 9:20 am with 0 transfers and costs $39.
Are there any alternatives?
How about a bus which departs at 9:30 am with 0 transfers and costs $37?
That sounds perfect!
Would you like me to make a reservation for the bus tickets?
Sure, could you help me do so please?
How many tickets are you looking to purchase?
Three tickets, please.
Sure, please confirm your purchase of 3 tickets for the bus ride from Vancouver to Portland on March 8th at 9:30 am.
I am fine with that!
Your reservation has been made.
Sure, that is all the help I need, thank you so much!
No worries, have a great day ahead!
I am interested in finding a one way flight.
Can you tell me the city from you will depart from? Can you tell me the date that you want to have travel?
I will begin my trip on the 14th, and I will leave from San Diego.
Can you tell me where you want to arrive?
My destination is Vegas.
There are 4 flights which match what you requested. How would you like having a flight with Alaska Airlines which has 0 stops and leaves at 6:30 am. The ticket for this flight costs $79.
Can you tell me if the ticket for this flight is an economy or business one? Could you please also tell me where the flight is going to land at?
The ticket is an Economy one. The flight will arrive at McCarran International Airport.
Alright. I want to find a bus for one person to go there. I want to leave on 7th of this month.
There is a bus with 0 transfers which leaves at 6:50 pm. The ticket of this bus costs $40.
Can you tell me the bus station where I will be leaving from, and the bus station where I will arrive at?
The station from where the bus leaves is Santa Fe Depot, and the arrival station is Union Plaza.
That seems nice. I want to book tickets for this bus.
Can you please confirm that you want to book ticket for 1 person for the bus which leaves from San Diego on March 7th at 6:50 pm, and arrives in Las Vegas?
That suits me well.
Your requested ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help very much. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I will be travelling with friends, I need four tickets.
That's nice. Where will you be leaving from and where do you plan to go?
We would like to leave on 3rd of March, we filed a leave on that day and we are plying to SF.
From where will you be coming from?
We will be coming from San Diego.
There's 5 flights from Alaska Airlines, one of it has 0 stops that will leave at 5:10 pm. It costs $101.
Okay,may I ask where will it land so that I could tell my brother to pick us up and where will it be coming from?
It is from the nearest airport here, SFO International Airport and will arrive at SAN International Airport.
My brother is far from SAN Airport, please find me something else.
How about a flight with American Airlines that will leave at 9:20 pm with 0 stops. It costs $113.
Yes, I prefer American Airlines. Can you help me search for a bus going thee? Still for four people.
Not a problem, you will leave on March 3rd. Right?
No, we're planning to leave on the 6th. A friend changed his mind.
Okay, there's 6 buses for you, one of it costs $62 with 0 stops that leaves at 7:40 am.
That's perfect, can you also assist me in booking this?
Yes, sure. To confirm the details, you will be leaving from San Diego to San Francisco on March 6th at 7:40 am for 4 people.
Yes, everything is good. Which bus station will we be leaving from?
Booking has been confirmed and the destinationn is Salesforce Transit Center.
Thank you so much!
Do you need help with anything else?
No,that would be all. Thank you!
Have a good day!
I will be needing a flight, I need a break from work.
Where will you be leaving from and where do you plan to go?
I will be coming from here, Las Vegas. I will viist my parents at San Fran.
When are you leaving?
It is urgent, I can't stand my boss. I want to leave later today.
Okay, there's a flight from American Airlines that will leave at 10:55 am with 0 stops. It costs $117. DO you like it?
I don't care which airlines will it come from, as long as it can be my escape. What time will I arrive at my destination and is it a premium economy class?
It is just an economy ticket and it will arrive at SFO at 12:30 pm.
Okay I guess I'll just bring food with me. Can you help me look for a bus going there?
Will you leave on March 1st?
Yes and I'll be bringing my family with me so its for 4 persons.
That is noted. There's a bus that will leave at 10:50 am with 0 transfers too. It costs $55 per person.
My mom cannot go with us, are there other trips for three people?
Yes, one that will leave at 12:50 pm with 0 transfers. It costs $48.
It is not convenient for me. Are there other trips available?
There's still one that leaves at 2:40 pm with 0 transfers. This one costs $50 per person.
Okay, I think that's the best one. From which station will this arrive?
It will reach the Salesforce Transit Center.
And from which station we will leave? I do hope that its from somewhere not too far from here.
Yes, Union Plaza is just 10 minuted drive away from your place.
That's great. Please secure tickets for me.
Not a problem, I will purchase 3 bus tickets from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 1st that will leave at 2:40 pm.
Yes, everything is good.
Booking is successful.
Thanks, really. That would be all.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I want to find a one-way flight in economy to SD.
What date would you like to travel, and where are you departing from?
I am traveling from Portland to Seattle, WA on March 5th.
There is an American Airlines flight departing at 6 am that has 0 stops for $74.
Thanks. Can you find a bus going there on the 1st of this month for three people?
I found 8 buses for you. The first departs at 8:40 am and has 0 transfers at a cost of $34 per ticket.
That sounds good, please reserve the tickets.
Please confirm the following details: Reserving 3 tickets on a bus from Portland to Seattle on March 1st, departing at 8:40 am.
Yes, that is correct. Which station am I leaving from?
Your tickets are confirmed. The origin station is Portland Bus Station.
Thank you for your help, that is all I need.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
I would like a one way flight starting next Monday with Southwest Airlines Economy Class.
Where and which city do you wish to depart from?
I'd like to look for flights from Seattle, WA to Vancouver, BC.
Do you wish to fly with Southwest Airlines taking off 5:25 am with 1 stop costing $250.
Ok, will you help me search for a bus there leaving on the 10th of this month for one people.
I have 9 buses for you leaving at 6:40 am and costing $27 with 0 transfers.
Will there be any other buses available. I would like to leave next Wednesday.
I have 8 buses for you with one leaving 7:40 am costing $28 with 0 transfers.
That sounds nice and I'd like to reserve the bus.
Please confirm these details for a bus leaving from Seattle to Vancouver on March 6th at 7:40 am for 1 person.
Yes, that will be fine. Which station will I be leaving from?
The ticket is confirmed starting at King Street Station.
Thanks so much for your help. That is all.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a one-way flight.
Where are you leaving from, what's your destination, and what day are you departing?
I want to fly from Portland, OR to Vancouver, BC on the 1st of March.
I found 3 flights. There's an American Airlines flight for $227 leaving at 10:45 am with 1 stop.
Is it economy or business class? Is it a redeye flight?
It's an Economy seat. No, it's not overnight.
Okay. Are there any buses going there?
Do you need a bus for March 1st?
No, I want to leave on the 7th of March.
I found 8 buses. There's a 6:50 am bus for $44 with 0 transfers.
That sounds good. I'll tae that bus.
How many tickets do you need?
Three tickets, please.
So, to confirm, you want 3 tickets for the 6:50 am bus from Portland to Vancouver on March 7th, is that correct?
No, I just need 1 ticket.
Okay, so you want 1 ticket for that same bus to Vancouver, is that correct?
Yes, that's right. What station does it leave from, and what station does it arrive at?
Your ticket is confirmed. It leaves from Portland Bus Station and arrives at Pacific Central Station.
Thanks.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I need a flight.
Where are you going?
Washington.
Where are you leaving from? On what day?
I am leaving from NYC on March 10th.
I found 4 options including American Airlines flight leaving at 6:05 am with 0 stops. The ticket price is $81.
We also need a bus going there. There are four of us leaving on the 6th of March.
I found 8 options for a bus beginning with a bus leaving at 6 am with 0 transfers. The ticket is $36.
Anything else?
Another bus leaves at 9:40 am with 0 transfers. The ticket price is $33.
That is better. Lets book it.
Please confirm reservation for 4 seats on the bus leaving from New York to Washington on March 6th at 9:40 am.
Perfect, What is the name of the station we are leaving from?
Tickets are confirmed. Port Authority Station.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I am in need of finding a one way flight.
Can you tell me from which city you will leave, and where do you want to arrive at?
I want the flight to leave from NY, and for it to arrive to Philadelphia.
Can you tell me the date when you want to take the flight?
I want to begin my trip on March 5th.
There are 4 flights which match what you requested. How would you like flying with a flight of American Airlines which has 0 stops and leaves at 7:55 am. The ticket for this flight will cost you $55.
Alright. I also need you to find me a bus to go there. I will be leaving on 13th of March.
There is a bus with 0 transfers which leaves at 7:40 am. The ticket of this bus will cost you $23.
Can you tell me the bus station where I will arrive, and the bus station from where I will leave?
The station from where the bus leaves is Port Authority Station, and the station where the bus will arrive is Intercity Terminal.
Can you check if there are other buses available?
There is also a bus with 0 transfers which leaves at 8 am. The ticket of this bus costs $22.
That seems right. I want to have the ticket for this bus.
Can you tell me how many tickets you want to buy?
I will need tickets just for 1 person.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy a ticket for 1 person for the bus which leaves from New York on March 13th at 8 am, and arrives in Philadelphia?
That suits me well. Can you tell me which is the bus station that I will leave from, and which bus station will I arrive at?
Your requested ticket has been booked. The station from where you will leave is Port Authority Station, and the destination you will arrive at is Intercity Terminal.
I appreciate your help very much. That would be all.
Have a good time!
Would you tell me about some one-way flights?
Which city are you going to be departing from?
I will depart in Philly.
Is there somewhere specific you would like to go?
I want to get to New York City.
What day would you be needing to travel on?
I have to depart from Philly on the 11th of March.
At 5:35 PM there is a $66 flight through American Airlines that only has 0 stops.
What other flights are there?
You could also try Delta Airlines which has a flight leaving at 4:40 pm that day and will only stop 0 times cost $58.
I would like to take that flight, could you purchase a one way ticket for me?
Would you confirm for me that you are leaving Philadelphia on Delta Airlines flight to New York on March 11th, and that you want 1 seat and you want to travel Economy?
Yes, please, I would like to take that flight.
Congratulations, your ticket has been purchased.
Thanks so much, could you find me a bus on the 13th of this month through Flexible?
Flexible offers a $42 ticket for a bus ride that leaves at 8:30 am.
Alright,t hank you, I do not need anything else.
Talk to you later!
I will be going on a trip soon, I need just an onward flight.
Where do you plan to fly to? From where and when are you leaving?
Look for something from San Fran to LA on the 14th.
There are 4 possible flights you might like. There is an Alaska Airlines flight that takes off at 7:10 pm and has 0 stops. It has a price of $103.
Is there any flight from Southwest Airlines? Any class of ticket is fine.
There is 1 flight you might like. There is an Southwest Airlines flight that takes off at 12:50 pm and has 0 stops. It has a price of $106.
That sounds perfect, can you book a ticket for me?
Please confirm: Booking 1 economy class ticket from southwest Airlines. Departing from San Francisco on March 14th with destination Los Angeles..
That is correct. From which airport does it leave?
The ticket has been booked. It departs from SFO International Airport.
That's great. Do you know if there are buses going there on the 11th?
There are 10 buses you might like. There is an Economy bus ticket that departs at 7 am. It has a price of $43.
From which station does it leaves and to which does it arrive?
It departs from Salesforce Transit Center and arrives to Union Station.
That sounds great.
Do you want to book a ticket?
No, I do not need any ticket right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I am interested in having tickets for a one-way flight which leaves on March 1st.
Can you tell me your destination?
I want to arrive to Los Angeles.
From where will you depart for your trip?
I need tickets for three people, and I will be departing from Las Vegas.
There are 4 flights which match what you want. How would you like having a flight with American Airlines which has 0 stops and leaves at 9:30 am? The ticket for this flight will cost you $88.
Is there some other flight you can suggest?
Another flight I can suggest is with Delta Airlines, it has 0 stops and leaves at 12:20 pm. The ticket for this flight will cost you $79.
This flight suits me well. Could you please book the one-way flight ticket for me?
Can you confirm that you want to have Economy class flight tickets for 3 people for the Delta Airlines flight which leaves from Las Vegas on March 1st, and arrives in Los Angeles?
That's what I want.
Your requested oneway flight ticket has been booked.
Can you tell me from which airport I will leave? Could you please also tell me at what time will the onward flight arrive?
Your requested flight leaves from McCarran International Airport, and it is expected to arrive at the destination at 1:30 pm.
I appreciate your help. Can you also get me a bus to go there?
Can you tell me when you want to leave? Will you be leaving on March 1st?
I will be departing this Sunday.
Would you like having Economy class ticket for the bus which leaves at 7:20 am? The ticket for this bus will cost you $41.
That seems nice. That would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
I'd like to find flights.
When would you like to fly? What is your destination and where would you like to depart from?
I'd like to travel from Portland to Seattle on March 13th.
I have found American Airlines Flight with 0 stops that departs at 9:15 pm. The ticket costs $59.
Thanks but I'd like to find alternative flights for the 12th of this month. There will be two people travelling.
There are 2 flights that meet your criteria. How about a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 9:35 am. The ticket price is $76.
When does the outbound flight arrive.
The flight arrives at 10:33 am.
That sounds perfect. Can you go ahead and purchase an economy ticket.
Okay so you'd like 2 economy tickets on a Delta Airlines flight from Portland to Seattle leaving in March 12th.
Yes that's correct. Which airport does the flight leave from?
Your ticket has been booked. The flight leaves from PDX International Airport.
What about options for travelling by bus?
Will you be leaving in March 12th?
No, I'd like to leave on March 1st.
There are 8 buses that meet your criteria. There is a bus leaving at 8:40 am and the price of an economy ticket is $34.
That's great thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Hello! Please can you help me to find a one-way flight?
Sure! When is your travel?
I'll be travelling on 2nd of March.
Where are you flying to? and from where?
I'm flying from LAX to Las Vegas.
The Alaska Airlines outbound flight that has 0 stops leaves at 8:20 pm and the price of the ticket is only $83.
Sounds great to me.
So, would you like to book in this flight?
Yup, please book 4 tickets in this flight.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 4 tickets in Economy class to fly to Las Vegas from Los Angeles in Alaska Airlines on March 2nd, right?
Nope, book only two tickets.
Please confirm me that you wish to fly from Los Angeles and you wish to book only 2 tickets, right?
Yup, sounds good.
Okay! I've confirmed your oneway ticket.
Which is the departure airport of the flight?
The flight will be departing from LAX International Airport.
Can I have the arrival time of the onward flight? To which airport does the flight will arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 9:30 pm to McCarran International Airport.
Thanks much for your help. Do you have any buses to this destnation for I would prefer Economy extra tickets for the travel.
Do you want to depart on March 2nd?
Nope, I'm planning to leave by Friday next week.
Okay! there are 4 buses for you and one of them is leaving at 7:40 am and it has Economy extra ticket and the ticket price is about $49. Do you wish to travel in this bus?
Sounds good.
Do you want me reserve ticket for you in this bus?
Nope, not right now. I just want to inquire about the details. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I need help booking a one way flight.
Where are you departing from?
From SD, thanks.
When are you leaving?
On the 7th.
Where are you going?
I'm going to SF and my preferences are for a premium economy ticket on Alaska Airlines if you can find it.
Sure, I found 1 flight. It's a $156 Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 11:10 am.
When does it get to my destination and can I return the ticket?
No, its non refundable. It arrives at your destination at 12:50 pm.
Sounds good, can you get me two tickets for that flight?
Sure, please confirm you'd like 2 premium economy tickets for the Alaska Airlines flight from San Diego to San Francisco departing on March 7th.
Yes, that's right.
I've reserved your tickets on the one way flight.
Is there a bus option to get there for the 5th?
Yes, I found 6. There's an economy ticket for $53 on the bus departing at 7:40 am.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want me to book that ticket?
No, just looking. That's all for now.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a one-way flight. Can you assist me?
I'd be happy to. Where are you leaving from and where are you going? When do you plan to start your travels?
I will traveling to SF from Las Vegas on the 12th of this month.
If you like American Airlines, there is a flight for $110. It leaves at 10:55 am and has 0 stops.
Can you tell which airport it will land in and whether or not the ticket is refundable? I'm not certain of my plans yet.
The flight will arrive at SFO International Airport and the ticket is refundable.
What else is available?
There is Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops. It leaves at 10:50 pm and the cost of a ticket is $104.
Are there any other options?
Southwest Airlines has a flight leaving at 9:55 am with 0 stops for $99.
Perfect. That works.
Would you like to purchase your tickets?
Yes, please get them.
You'd like 1 Economy ticket on Southwest Airlines leaving Las Vegas going to San Francisco on March 12th.
Yes, that's perfect. Where does it depart?
It leaves McCarran International Airport.
Great. How about a Flexible bus ticket?
Would that be for March 12th?
Yes, that's fine.
There are 6 options. One leaves at 10:50 am and is $70 for a Flexible ticket.
Great.
Have a good day.
I need a one-way flight.
When would you like to leave. What location will you like to depart from? Where will you be going?
I need to leave on the 1st from SF and going Los Angeles.
How about an Alaska Airlines flight that departs at 7:10 pm with 0 layovers for $85. If you would like something else I have 4 other options.
I dont like Alaska Airlines. Can You show me your other options.
WHat about an American Airlines flight that departs at 3:50 pm with 0 layovers for $98.
Nope that will not work. Is there anything else.
How about an Southwest Airlines flight that departs at 12:50 pm with 0 layovers for $108.
What airport doe it depart from and what airport does it arrive from?
It departs from SFO International Airport and arrives at LAX International Airport.
That will work for me. Can you help me buy tickets?
Just to confirm you would like 1 economy ticket on Southwest Airlines departing San Francisco and heading to Los Angeles on March 1st.
Yea your great.
Your ticket is booked.
Is there any buses going there?
Will you be departing on March 1st?
I would like to leave on the 6th.
How about the 7 am bus with an Economy ticket for $46. if that does not work i have 10 other options for you.
That's great. That will be all for now.
Have an awesome day.
I need to find a one way flight departing SFO.
What is departure date?
I leave on the 13th to San Diego.
I found 5. I have an Alaska Airlines leaving 6:10 am with 0 stops for $110.
Go ahead and buy the tickets.
Confirm economy ticket for 1 on Alaska Airlines from San Francisco to San Diego leaving March 13th.
I confirm all of that.
One way ticket confirmed.
What is departing and arriving airports?
Departs SFO International Airport and arrival SAN International Airport.
Thank, I need a bus too.
Do you want to depart March 13th?
I want to depart on 3rd of March.
I found 6. I have an economy leaving at 11 am for $56.
What is arrival station?
Arrival station is Santa Fe Depot.
That is all I need.
Have a good day.
I need a one way flight from Vancouver to Portland. I dont care on what airline.
Do you have a specific date in mind?
Yes I have to leave on the 3rd.
How about an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 10:10 am with 1 layover for $267.
I will take it. Can you purchase the tickets for me?
Just to confirm you need 1 Economy ticket on Alaska Airlines on March 3rd departing from Portland going to Vancouver.
Yep that is right.
Your one way ticket is booked.
Thanks I need to get a bus there on the 4th.
There is a 6:50 am bus for $45 with an Economy ticket.
Awesome. That will be all for right now
Have a great evening.
I need a one-way plane ticket.
Where and when are you departing and where are you travelling to?
I am departing Philadelphia on March 2nd and headed to NY.
American Airlines has a flight with 0 stops that departs at 4:45 pm and the plane ticket costs $64.
That works for me. Buy me a ticket in any class.
You want 1 Economy seat on American Airlines flying on March 2nd from Philadelphia to New York. Is that right?
That is right.
Your ticket is booked.
Find me Flexible bus tickets.
Are you departing March 2nd and where do you want to leave from?
Find me Economy tickets leaving on the 11th of March.
Search revealed 8 results. I found an Economy bus that leaves at 8:30 am and costs $25 a seat.
Can you find something that departs on the 13th of March?
I found an Economy bus that departs at 9:50 am and costs $23 a seat.
What is the destination bus station?
You will be arriving at Port Authority Station.
What is the departing bus station?
You are departing from Intercity Terminal.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets?
No, not right now. That is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Can you find me a one-way flight going to Vancouver BC?
Where will you be departing from and when do you plan to leave?
I will leave on 11th of March from Portland, OR.
I found a flight on Alaska Airlines leaving at 10:10 am with 1 stop. The ticket will cost $257.
Which airport will this flight leave from and what time will the flight arrive?
The flight will leave from PDX International Airport and get there at 7:49 pm.
That flight sounds fine to me. Can you help me to get a one-way flight ticket?
Please confirm these details for me: the flight is from Portland and will go to Vancouver on Alaska Airlines, departing on March 11th for 1 passenger and seating is economy.
Yes that sounds fine.
Your confirmation has been made for a oneway ticket.
What about the bus going there?
When do you wish to depart? What about March 11th?
I would like to leave on 5th of March.
What do you think of a bus leaving at 6:50 am and the price of the ticket will be $39? The ticket is an economy ticket.
That sounds fine. That was all I was needing.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find a one-way flight for me please?
Yes, where is your destination?
My destination is San Diego. It is my favorite place!
Do you know when you plan to leave and where you will be departing from?
I am leaving from SF on the 9th and I would like to travel in Economy.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight for $122 that has 0 stops and leaves at 10:45 am. How would that one work?
That one would work out great!
Do you want to buy the tickets now?
Yes, I would like to book it for 2 passengers, but I would like refundable tickets in case I have to change it.
Please confirm that you would like 2 tickets in Economy for an Alaska Airlines flight from San Francisco to San Diego on March 9th.
Yes, that is perfect!
I have confirmed your oneway ticket.
Is there any busses going there?
Do you want to depart on March 9th?
I am actually planning to leave Saturday this week.
There is an Economy ticket for a bus leaving at 11 am for $55.
Can you tell me the name of the bus station I will be departing from?
You will be departing from Salesforce Transit Center.
What is the name of the station I will arrive at?
The name of the station you will arrive at is Santa Fe Depot.
Are there any busses available for four people?
There is one with an Economy ticket for $56 that leaves at 1:40 pm.
Yes, that one sounds good!
Would you like to purchase the tickets now?
No, not at this time!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No thank you, that will be all for now!
Ok, have a nice day then!
Would you find me one way flights? I want to go to Los Angeles from Vancouver BC. I will be traveling in Premium Economy.
When will you leave?
I want to leave today.
I have 3 flights that you should like. I have an Air Canada flight. The outbound flight leaves at 4:45 pm and has 0 stops. This ticket costs $236.
Are any other flights available?
There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 11 pm and has 0 stops. This ticket costs $223.
Do you have anything else available? I will leave from Las Vegas.
I have 3 flights that should be good. How about a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 9 pm with 0 stops? This flight costs $120.
Sounds great. Would you help buying a one way flight ticket? I could have a change of plans so I need refundable tickets. There are two in my group.
Could you confirm that you are leaving from Las Vegas and going to Los Angeles on Delta Airlines? You will depart on March 1st and have 2 people in your group and will fly premium economy.
Sounds good to me.
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for helping. Could you tell me about the bus going there? I want to leave the 12th of this month.
What about a bus leaving at 7:20 am? This ticket costs $40 and it is an economy ticket.
Are there other things available? I would like economy tickets.
I have 3 buses for you. How about a bus that leaves at 10:20 am and costs $38? It is an economy ticket.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like tickets on this bus?
No, do not purchase tickets right now. That is all I wanted.
Have a good day.
Hi there, could you help me book a one-way flight please?
Sure, where will you be leaving from and travelling to and when and where do you plan to depart?
I intend to depart from LAX to SD on the 5th of March.
Sure, how about an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 layovers which departs at 7:30 am which costs $70?
Sure, could you help me purchase two economy refundable tickets as I am afraid I might have a change in plans.
No worries, please confirm your purchase of 2 economy class Alaska Airlines tickets from Los Angeles to San Diego on the March 5th.
Sure, may I know when does my departure flight arrive?
Your reservation has been made, and your departure flight arrives at 8:24 am.
I see, thank you! May I check for economy buses travelling there and departing on the 5th of March too?
Sure, there are 10 buses, one of which is an economy ticket which departs at 7:40 am which will cost you $28.
Which station does the bus depart from and arrive at?
You will be departing from Union Station and arriving at Santa Fe Depot.
I see, are there any alternative buses which depart on the 12th of this month? Would prefer economy extra tickets please.
Would you like an economy extra ticket departing at 7:50 am which will cost you $38?
That sounds great, but that is all I need for now. Thank you!
No worries, have a great day ahead!
I need help finding one-way flights on march 13th?
What is your departure and arrival destination?
I am traveling to San Francisco from Vegas
I have found 4 flights for you. How about the american airlines flight at 10:55 am. It has 0 stops and costs $108
No, is there something else?
There is also a delta airlines flight that leaves at 10:50 pm. It has 0 stops as well and costs $120
Is there something else?
There is a southwest airlines at 9:55 am that has 0 stops. The price is $104
this one sounds good.
Should I buy the tickets?
Yes, book the ticket for it.
Booking 1 ticket for a southwest airlines flight from Las vegas to san francisco in economy class on march 13th
Sounds perfect. What is arrival airport?
Booking confirmed. The arrival airport is SFO international airport
Thanks, Can you help me search for a bus to there
The date of travel is March 13th right?
No, I am planning to leave on 5th of march
there is a bus leaving at 10:50 am. Its economy ticket costs $42
Any other options? I prefer to have flexible tickets
There is a flexible ticket for a bus leaving at 12:50 pm which costs $73
That works for me
Should I reserve seats on the bus
No, will do that later. That would be all for now.
Have a great time.
I am going to sfo
where are you going from?
thursday next week economy san diego
alaska airlines for 4 flights at 11:10 am 0 stops $107
four people for me
american airlines leaves 9:20 pm 0 stops and is $100
any other flights?
delta airlines leaves 7:55 pm 0 stops $101
what airport does it arrive?
9:35 pm sfo international airport
that is good to me
san diego to san francisco delta airlines march 7th for 4 economy
what airport then?
san international airport
how about the bus?
march 7th then
on the 3rd
6 buses then 7:40 am for $60 economy
leaving 11th of march economy
5 buses leaving 10 am $52 economy
what bus station?
santa fe depot salesforce transit center
that is good
anything else then?
no thank you
have a good one
I'll be taking a trip soon. Assistant, find me tickets for one-way flights.
Please indicate your departure city.
I'll be leaving Philadelphia for this trip.
Where will you be traveling to?
There are 2 people in my group that will be traveling with me to New York.
Thank you. Next, please tell me the date on which you wish to leave.
I'll begin my travels on the 3rd of this month.
At 4:45 pm, an American Airlines flight will be departing. There are 0 stops along the way and the ticket will have a cost of $55.
That sounds like a great option.
I can buy these tickets for you now. Do you want me to make that purchase?
I think so. Please purchase Economy class tickets for me. I prefer traveling in that class.
Confirm the following details about your flight: You will depart from Philadelphia on American Airlines on March 3rd to head to New York. You want to purchase 2 Economy class tickets for this flight.
That's everything I can think of. Please go ahead and confirm this purchase.
Your one way flight ticket has been purchased and confirmed.
Thank you! Tell me what airport the flight departs from please.
The flight will be leaving on March 3rd from the PHL International Airport.
Thank you assistant! Before I let you go, can you tell me about Economy Bus Tickets as well?
Would the departure date be March 3rd as well?
I'm planning to leave next Monday actually.
There are 8 buses that fit your description. There is a bus leaving at 8:30 am. This Economy class ticket will cost you $25.
That sounds like a winner to me.
Do you require any other assistance?
That's all the help that I need. I appreciate your help.
Please enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find me a one way flight on economy with united airlines
where are you traveling to and when are you leaving
i am traveling to lax on wednesday next week
where are you traveling from
i am traveling from san fran
I found 1 flights for you with united airlines with 0 stop for $95 leave on 10:05 pm
what airport does it depart from
this is depart from sfo international airport
when does it arrive? is it refundable?
this is a refundable ticket arrive at 11:30 pm
ok perfect, can you purchase the ticket for me
please confirm your purchase for 1 economy ticket with united airlines from san francisco to los angeles on march 6th
yes please. what airport does it arrive
you will arrive at lax international airport
what about the bus? can you find me a flexible bus ticket to get there on march 1st
i found you 10 bus tickets. i recommend you flexible ticket for $70 leaving at 7 am
What else do you have? i prefer economy ticket leaving on 3rd of march
i found you 9 buses. This is a economy ticekt for $51 depart at 7:40 am
ok perfect
have a nice day
Can you find me any one-way flights? I will leave on 1st of March from SF.
Where are you planning to go?
I am going to Los Angeles and would prefer to have Southwest Airlines.
I have found 1 Southwest Airlines flight that looks good for you. This flight has 0 stops and leaves at 12:50 pm. The ticket costs $108.
What airport does this flight leave from? Is the ticket a refundable one?
This flight departs from SFO International Airport, but it is not refundable.
That flight sounds fine. Will you help me in buying a ticket on a one-way flight? I have 3 people in my group.
Confirm the following details if you would: the flight leaves from San Francisco and goes to Los Angeles on Southwest Airlines on March 1st. You will have 3 passengers in the economy seating class.
Yes that sounds fine.
Your oneway ticket has been successfully reserved.
What airport is the flight going to?
It will fly to LAX International Airport.
What time does the onward flight get there?
The flight will arrive at 2:15 pm.
Thank you for helping me. What about the bus going there? I want to leave on the 12th and prefer economy tickets for 3 people.
What about a bus departing at 7 am at a cost of $51 for an economy ticket?
That sounds fine, that was all I needed.
Have a fine day.
I need a one-way flight please.
When would you like to begin your travels? From where would you like to depart from?
I want to travel on the 8th of March to San Diego and from San Francisco.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight which matches your selection. It will depart at 6:10 AM and has 0 stops. The ticket price is $99.
Which airport will the flight arrive at?
The destination airport is SAN International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to purchase these tickets now?
Yes, I want those tickets.
Please confirm the following information: The flight will depart from San Francisco and arrive at San Diego on March 8th. The airlines is Alaska Airlines and the number of people in your party is 1. The seating class is Economy.
Yes, that sounds great. And which airport will this flight depart from? Is this ticket refundable?
Your oneway ticket is now confirmed. The flight will depart from SFO International Airport. The ticket is not refundable.
Thank you for that. How about the bus to there? I wanna leave on the 7th of this month. I prefer Economy tickets.
There is a bus set to depart at 11 AM and the ticket price is $59. It is an Economy ticket.
What is the name of the bus station that I leave from?
The origin station is designated as Salesforce Transit Center.
OK, that's perfect. Thank you.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
I need to find a one way flight.
What airport will you be flying out of? Where would you like to go?
I need to leave SD going to Los Angeles.
What date would you like to leave on?
I need to leave on the 4th.
What do you think about an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 3:20 pm and has 0 layovers for $62. I also have 3 other options if you dont like that one.
I need it for two people. I don"t like Alaskan.
how about an American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:50 am and has 0 layovers for $63.
What time does it arrive and where?
It arrives at 10:44 am at LAX International Airport.
That sounds great. I need to buy 2 refundable tickets for that flight.
Just to confirm you would to to purchase 2 economy tickets on the American Airlines flight departing on March 4th from San Diego going to Los Angeles.
Yes that is great. Where does that depart from?
Your tickets are booked and it departs from SAN International Airport.
IS there any buses going there on the 5th of March. Look for Economy tickets please.
How about the bus departing at 6:10 am and its only $32 for an Economy Ticket. I also have 10 other buses if you prefer a different one.
Showing another one.
How about the bus departing at 6:50 am and its only $27 for an Economy Ticket
I want to change and leave on the 4th with an Economy extra ticket.
what about the bus departing at 8:30 am and its only $37 for an Economy extra Ticket. I also have 8 other buses if you prefer a different one.
What station does it arrive into.
It arrives at Union Station.
That's great. Thanks for you help. That will be all for now.
Enjoy the rest of your evening.
I ma leaving 10th of march to san fran and leaving fro las vegas
4 flights for you american airlines. leaves at 10:55 am and has 0 stops and is $99
I will go to economy for 1 person
confirm las vegas san francisco american airlines leaving march 10th for 1 person in economy
yes when does the onward flight get here?
yes, the onward flight leaves at 12:30 pm
thanks, how about the bus?
will you depart march 10th?
I will leave next tuesday
bus laves at 10:50 am and the price is $42 and is an economy ticket
that is good
wanna get tickets on the bus?
thanks that is all
Have a good one
Would you look for one way flights?
Where are you leaving from and where are you going? When do you want to leave?
I will leave on the 6th from SFO to San Diego.
I have 5 flights that should work. There is an Alaska Airlines outbound flight that leaves at 11:10 am and has 0 stops. The ticket costs $100.
That flight sounds great. Could you help me to buy a one way flight ticket?
Could you confirm that you are leaving from San Diego to San Francisco on Alaska Airlines on March 6th, and that you need 1 economy ticket?
Sounds good to me. Is the ticket refundable?
Your one way ticket has been confired. No, the ticket cannot be refunded.
Thank you for helping. What about the bus going there? It's for four people on economy.
When will you depart? What about March 6th?
I would like to leave on March 13th.
I have 6 buses that should work. What about a bus leaving at 7:40 am that costs $50? It is an economy ticket.
Sounds good to me.
Shall I buy tickets on this bus?
No, not right now.
Could I assist with anything else?
No, but thank you for helping.
Have a good one.
Hi, are there any one-way flights I can travel on?
When do you plan to travel?
I will be leaving next Wednesday for my holiday.
And where are you planning to visit?
I will be travelling to NYC.
Where will you be departing from?
I will likely depart from Washington.
There are 2 available flights, one of which is an American Airlines flight with 0 layovers which departs at 6:05 am and costs $78.
Are there any alternative flights I can take?
Yes there is, would you like the Southwest Airlines flight with 0 layovers which will depart at 9:15 am and cost you $75?
Sure this is great! Could you purchase the tickets for me please?
Please confirm your purchase of 1 Economy class tickets for the Southwest Airlines flight from Washington to New York on March 6th.
That sounds great!
Your flight ticket has been purchased!
Thank you! May I know if this ticket is refundable?
Unfortunately, this is a non-refundable ticket.
What a pity, thanks for your help though. Could you help me search for buses travelling there too?
Will you be departing on March 6th?
No, I will be departing on March 8th instead.
Sure, would you like an Economy bus ride which departs at 8:10 am and costs $35.
Sure, which bus station will I be departing from?
You will be departing from Union Station.
Sure, and which station does the bus arrive at?
You will arrive at Port Authority Station.
Sure, that sounds great! That is all I need, thank you!
No worries, have a safe trip!
Can you find a one-way flight to NYC from Philly for three people?
When are you leaving?
I would leave on Friday next week.
There are 4 flights. There is American Airlines that leaves at 4:45 pm and has 0 stops for $57.
I would like to buy a ticket.
Booking 3 tickets for Philadelphia to New York with American Airlines on March 8th, economy seats.
Yes, that is correct. Which Airport does the flight depart from?
The flight leaves from PHL International Airport.
Is there a bus going there?
When would you like to depart on March 8th?
Yes, March 8th works for me.
There are 8 buses. There is one leaving at 8:30 am for the price of $23, economy ticket.
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Hello! I have a very short trip. Please can you find me to book a one-way flight?
Sure! I can do that for you. From where are you flying and which is your destination point?
I'll be travelling to NY from Philadelphia.
When are you planning to leave?
I'll be leaving on 13th of this month.
There are 4 suitable flights for you. The American Airlines outbound flight will be leaving at 4:45 pm and it has 0 stops. The price for your travel will be $64.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want me to book tickets for you in this flight?
Yup, I wish to book 3 tickets in this flight.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 3 Economy tickets in American Airlines that is departing from Philadelphia to New York on March 13th, right?
Yup, sounds good to me.
Okay! your one way ticket confirmation is successful.
Is it a refundable or a non-refundable ticket? Which is the departure airport?
Sorry that the ticket is non-refundable. The flight will depart from PHL International Airport.
Thanks for the information. Do you have any bus transportation to that place for I wish to have some Economy extra tickets and I will be travelling on 9th of this month.
Yup, a bus leaving at 8:30 am has Economy extra ticket and the ticket price is only $33.
Do you have any other buses available on the same day? I would prefer Economy tickets rather than extra ticket.
Yup, there are 7 buses are leaving on the same day and only one bus is leaving at 9:50 am and it has Economy ticket and the ticket fare is just $23.
Do you have any other buses available?
Yup, there is a bus leaving at 10:10 am which has Economy ticket and the ticket price will be only $24.
Sounds good to me.
So, do you wish to get tickets on this bus?
Nope, not right now, but might be later on.
Do you want me to help on anything else?
Nope, thanks much for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to find a one way flight please.
Departing from where?
I'll be going from Philadelphia.
When would you like to leave?
The 8th of March please.
What is your destination?
Going to Washington.
American Airlines has a flight at 9:45 AM with 1 stop and that is a $146 ticket.
That should work.
Would you like to make reservations?
Yes I would.
Confirming a flight on American Airlines on March 8th from Philadelphia to Washington for 1 economy ticket.
That sounds perfect.
The reservation is complete.
Thank you. I also need to find a bus please.
Is that for a March 8th departure?
That's correct, thank you.
I have one leaving at 7:30 AM which is a $30 economy ticket.
That would work.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Not this time.
Is there anything else today?
I don't think so.
Thank you very much.
I am planning to travel to Atlanta, GA for which I need your help to find some one-way flights. Can you search for the one for me?
Yes, let me know your planned date and place that you want to leave from.
I have planned my travel from San Francisco on the 9th.
What about an outbound flight with Alaska Airlines which leaves at 3:55 pm with 0 stops for which the ticket cost is $196? Hope you will choose this one I think.
Let me decide, before that I want to know about the date and place of arrival of that onward flight.
The onward flight will reach the destination Airport Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport at 0:21 am. Hope this information useful for your selection.
Yes, that was useful. But I prefer to go with something else to LAX under Economy class. Can you search for the available flights based on this?
Yes, found 3 results that suit to you. What about an outbound flight with American Airlines which leaves at 4:25 pm with 0 stops for which the ticket cost is $88? Hope you will like this one I think
Any other available flights in your search list?
What about a flight with Southwest Airlines which leaves at 12:50 pm with 0 stops for which the ticket cost is $93? Hope you will choose this one I think
Yes, I like this flight and want to proceed further.
How can I help? Shall I purchase tickets to this flight?
Yes, do it for me.
Please confirm to book 1 Economy class ticket in a flight with Southwest Airlines from San Francisco on March 9th to Los Angeles.
Yes, that is confirmed to proceed.
I have booked the tickets successfully.
Thanks and let me know the time and place of arrival of this onward flight.
This flight will arrive to the destination LAX International Airport at 2:15 pm.
That's great and thanks. Can you search for a bus to go there?
Yes, Shall I proceed with the departure date of March 9th?
Yes, check for that date and I want to book flexible tickets.
What about your opinion on a bus leaves at 7 am under ticket cost $64 which is flexible one.
That is okay for me and thanks. That's all for now.
Have a good day.
I need a one-way flight.
Where are you going? When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I want Alaska Airlines. I'm going to LA with two people on March 9th. I'm going from San Francisco.
I found 1 Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 7:10 pm and costs $98 with 0 stops.
That's a good one.
Would you like tickets?
Yes I would.
2 economy class Alaska Airlines tickets from San Francisco to Los Angeles on March 9th. Is this what you want?
Yes it is. When will the onward flight be there? What airport does it go from?
Your ticket has been booked. It leaves at SFO International Airport and arrives at 8:35 pm.
I want a bus to go there. I'm leaving today.
I found 10 buses. A bus is leaving at 7 am and costs $50. It's an economy ticket.
What station does it go to? What station would I leave from?
Salesforce Transit Center is the origin station. Union Station is the destination.
That's fine. That's all I wanted.
Have a nice day.
Find for me please some one-way flights.
Tell me where are you planning to visit and from where will you be leaving .You plan to leave when?
I will leave from LAX to SD on March 10th.
I have 3 flights for you.With Alaska Airlines the outbound flight will go at 7:30 am and have 0 stops.Cost wil be $60.
Tell me which is the airport from where I will depart.
From LAX International Airport
That's the one I like it.
You want to buy tickets for it?
Yes will be perfect.
You want 1 Economy ticket for flight with Alaska Airlines that goes from Los Angeles to San Diego on March 10th.I'm right?
Yes perfect.Tell me if the ticket is refundable and at which airport the flight will arrive.
Ticket was confirmed.Your ticket is refundable and your destination is SAN International Airport.
Thanks.Find me a bus that goes there.I want some Flexible tickets.
Tell me when you want to depart.Would you like to be in March 10th?
Yes that s good for me.
I have 10 results for you.A bus that leave at 7:40 am and a Flexible ticket cost is $49.
Sounds very good.That's all.
Have a good day!
I am going to washington
where are you going from?
I will go the 6th and leave NYC
southwest airlines is 1 flight and it leaves 2:35 pm with 0 stops and price is $88
I love the travelling economy and three people are in the group
flight from new york to washington on southwest airlines and leaves march 6th with 3 people economy class
yes that is good
one way ticket is done
what airport does the flight arrive from?
destination is dulles international airport
how about the bus?
how about march 6th there?
2nd of march I will go
6 am for $40 and is an economy ticket
what is the bus station?
port authority station
what station does the bus reach?
destination is union station
sounds very good
wanna get tickets on the bus
I do not wanna
Have a good one
I need to find one way flights please.
When are you planning to leave and from where? And what is your destination?
I'll be leaving the 2nd of this month and go into SF from NY.
I have 4 possibilities for you. American Airlines has a flight leaving at 4:45 PM with 0 stops for $198.
What is the arrival time of the onward flight?
That gets in at 8:11 PM.
What airport does it fly out of?
From JFK International Airport.
What else is available?
There's a flight on Delta Airlines leaving at 2:35 PM with 0 stops for $215.
Is there anything else? I'm going to Washington.
I have a flight on Southwest Airlines with 0 stops that leaves it 2:35 PM and that ticket costs $79.
I think that will work.
Would you like to buy tickets now?
Yes I would.
Confirming a flight on Southwest Airlines from New York to Washington on March 2nd for 1 economy passenger.
Sorry, it's for 2 passengers.
Confirming 2 economy tickets.
Correct, thank you.
The tickets have been purchased.
Where does it fly out of and what is the arrival time of the onward flight?
It flies from JFK International Airport and the onward flight gets in at 3:45 PM.
Thank you very much. I also need a bus please.
Is that for a March 2nd departure?
That's for next Thursday.
I have 8 possible buses for you. There is one leaving at 6 AM for a $32 economy ticket.
That's great, thanks.
Do you want to purchase tickets now?
Not right now, thank you very much.
My pleasure, you're welcome.
Would you look for one way flights for 4 people to SD?
When will you leave?
I want to leave on the 14th of March.
Where do you want to leave from?
I want to depart from Los Angeles.
I have 4 flights that should work. How about this Alaska Airlines flight? The outgoing flightleaves at 7:30 am and it has 0 stops. It costs $55.
That flight sounds great. Could you help me to buy a one way flight ticket? I need a refundable ticket in case my flight plan changes.
The flight leaves from Los Angeles to San Diego on Alaska Airlines. The flight leaves on March 14th for 4 kids on economy class.
Okay, sounds fine. What airport does the flight arrive at?
I have confirmed your oneo way ticket and the destination is SAN International Airport.
Thank you for helping. How is the bus to go there? I want to leave on on the 11th of this month.
What about a bus leaving in economy class at 7:40 am and it costs $26.
Sounds good. That is what I needed.
Have a good day.
I need a one way flight to LAX.
When and where is departure?
I leave from SF on the 14th.
I found 4. There is an Alaska Airlines leaving at 7:10 pm with 0 stops for $103.
That is good and I want it.
Confirm 1 economy Alaska Airlines from San Francisco to Los Angeles on March 14th.
Yes, is it refundable and what is arrival airport?
You are confirmed. The ticket is not refundable and arrives at LAX International Airport.
Thanks, I need a bus too.
I have a departure on March 14th?
I want to leave on the 6th.
I found 10. I have an economy ticket leaving at 7 am for $46.
What is departing station and arrival station?
Departure is Salesforce Transit Center and arrival is Union Station.
I want Economy extra for three.
I have an economy extra leaving 7:40 am for $62.
That is good and all I need.
Have a great day.
I need to get a one-way flight.
Where would you be departing from?
I am leaving Washington.
When do you want to leave and where would you be visiting?
I want to leave for NY on the 1st.
There is an outbound flight on American Airlines that leaves at 6:05 am. There are 0 stops and the price is $90.
That would be fine.
Would you like tickets?
Yes, I want a ticket for 1.
You would like 1 Economy ticket to fly from Washington to New York on American Airlines on March 1st?
There will be 2 persons traveling.
You want tickets for 2 on American Airlines?
Yes, that's right.
Your oneway ticket has been confirme.
Thanks a lot. I would need a bus to get there.
When would you like to leave? On March 1st?
I want to leave on the 10th.
There are 8 buses leaving that day. You can leave on the 8:10 am bus. There is an economy ticket for $35.
That would be great.
Would you like the bus tickets?
No, not now. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you help me find a one-way flight on United Airlines for Monday next week?
I'd be happy to assist you. Where are you planning to travel to and where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving San Francisco and headed to Los Angeles.
There is 1 United Airlines flight available for $98 per ticket. It departs at 9:15 am and has 0 stops.
That will be perfect.
Would you like to purchase your tickets?
Yes, please continue with the reservation.
You would like 1 Economy ticket on the United Airlines flight from San Francisco to Los Angeles on March 4th. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct. Can you tell whether or not the ticket is refundable and what time the onward flight arrives?
The onward flight is set to land at 10:40 am. Your ticket purchase has been confirmed. Unfortunately, it is non-refundable at this time.
That's okay. Can you help me find a bus there tomorrow?
There is an Economy ticket available on the 7 am bus at a cost of $48.
Perfect. That covers everything. Thank you.
You're very welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I need a one-way flight for next Tuesday on Alaska Airlines.
Where will you be departing from?
I would like to depart from San Diego.
Where will you be going?
I am going to Los Angeles.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 3:20 pm which has 0 stops and costs $60.
Sounds good, please reserve a ticket for one.
You want a one-way flight to Los Angeles from San Diego on Alaska Airlines on March 5th for 1 in Economy, correct?
Yes that is correct. Is it a refundable ticket?
Your ticket is confirmed however it is not refundable.
What about the bus going there.
Whendo you want to leave, perhaps March 5th.
I want to leave on the 13th of this month.
I found 10, the first is at 6:10 am and is an Economy which costs $28.
Are there any other busses?
How about one leaving at 6:50 am which costs $26 and is an Economy ticket?
That is perfect thank you.
Have a good day, goodbye.
I want you to find my one-way Economy flight tickets for three people.
Can you tell me which is your destination?
I want to arrive in Seattle.
Can you tell me from where you will leave for your trip?
I will be leaving for my trip from Vancouver, BC.
Can you please tell me at what date you plan to leave?
I want to leave on 1st of this month.
There are 3 flights which match what you asked for. One of the flights is the Air Canada flight which has 1 stop, and leaves at 8:05 am. The ticket of the flight is $245.
Can you tell me the airport where the flight will arrive at?
The destination of the flight you asked for is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
This flight seems nice to me. Can you help me to buy the ticket for the one-way flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class tickets for 3 people for the Air Canada flight which leaves from Vancouver on March 1st to go to Seattle?
Alright, that is correct.
Your requested one-way flight ticket has been booked.
Can you tell me if this ticket can be refunded?
I regret to say, but this ticket is not refundable.
I appreciate your help.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Can you find me a bus to go there?
Can you tell me when you plan to leave? How would you consider leaving on March 1st?
I actually want to leave for my trip on the 14th.
There are 10 buses which match what you want. How would you like having an Economy ticket for the bus which leaves at 6:40 am, and with the ticket costing $28?
Can you tell me the station where the bus will arrive, and also the name of the station from where the bus will leave?
The bus will depart from Pacific Central Station, and it will arrive at King Street Station.
Is there some other bus you can suggest, in case I need Economy extra tickets?
How would you like having Economy extra ticket for the bus which leaves 8:10 am, and has the ticket price as $40?
That seems nice. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I need one-way flights for four. I am not sure if I would be going, so I would prefer refundable tickets.
When would you like to go?
later today. I would be leaving NY. Doesn't matter which airline.
Where would you like to go?
I am heading washington.
There are 2 suitable flights. Southwest airlines has an outbound flight that departs at 2:35 pm. It has 0 stops and the price is $85
Are there any other flights?
United airlines has an outbound flight that leaves at 1:35 pm. There are 0 stops and it costs $71
What time does the onward flight land?
It lands at 2:45 pm.
That would be great.
You would like tickets?
Yes. Book me seats on economy class.
You would like 4 economy tickets on a flight leaving on March 1st from New York to Washington on United Airlines?
Yes, that would be cool. What airport would I land in?
Dulles International Airport.
I will need a bus to get there on the 4th.
There is a bus leaving at 6 am. There price is $39 and there are 0 transfers.
That would be awesome. I am done for now.
Enjoy your day.
I need a one way flight in economy. I prefer Southwest Airlines.
Where will you be traveling?
I need to go to Seattle.
Where and when would you like to leave?
I will ne leaving on Thursday next week from Portland.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 4:40 am with 0 stops with a price of $74.
That sounds good.
Do you want me to purchase the ticket?
Yes, for 1 person.
Please confirm the ticket for 1 passenger leaving Portland to Seattle on Southwest Airlines on March 7th in economy.
Good. When and where does the flight arrive?
The ticket is booked. The arrival location is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport arriving at 5:38 am.
Great. I need a bus for the 8th of March.
There is a bus departing at 8:40 am with 0 transfers for $30.
Are there any other options and leaving on Tuesday next week.
The bus leaves at 9:30 am with 0 transfers for $33.
OK, thank you.
Have a nice day.
Please help me find one-way flights.
Where are you planning to go? Do you know when you'd like to leave, and where you're leaving from?
I want to leave this Saturday. I'll be traveling from SFO to Vegas. I prefer economy tickets.
I have 4 possible flights. Alaska Airlines has a 0 stop flight leaving at 8:15 pm. The ticket would be $105.
That one is good. Would you help me buy a ticket?
Please confirm your purchase: You are reserving a ticket for 1 person on an Alaska Airlines flight from San Francisco to Las Vegas. You're getting an economy class ticket and the flight leaves on March 2nd.
Yes, that's correct. Which airport does the flight arrive at, and at what time?
Your one-way ticket has been purchased. You'll be arriving at McCarran International Airport at 9:50 pm.
Can you help me look for a bus going there? I want to take the bus on the 14th of March.
That bus departs at 7:20 am and will cost $47. There are 0 transfers needed.
What other buses are available?
There's another one leaving at 7:50 am for $51. That one also has 0 transfers.
That sounds good. That's all for now.
Thanks! Have a great day.
I'm trying to find one way flights for three people for a trip to NY.
Leaving when please?
That would be on the 9th of this month.
From where please?
We'll be going from Philly.
There are 4 good possibilities. I have an American Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 5:35 PM for $62.
Where does that land?
That's like goes to JFK International Airport.
Perfect, I'll take that.
Would you like to make reservations?
Yes please. I'm not sure of my plans so I have to have a refundable ticket and I'd like economy class.
Confirming an American Airlines flight on March 9th for 3 people in economy from Philadelphia to New York.
Great, thank you. Where does that leave from?
That's like takes off from PHL International Airport. The reservation is confirmed.
I also need to find a bus to take on the 13th of this month.
There's a bus leaving at 8:30 AM with 0 transfers for $22.
From where to where please?
It leaves from Intercity Terminal and goes to Port Authority Station.
Okay, that works.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Not right now.
What else may I help you with?
I'm all set, thanks.
You're welcome, thank you.
can you buy me a one way flight
where are you traveling to
i am visiting sd
when are you leaving and where are you leaving from
i am leaving from vegas on 2nd of this month
i found 4 flights. I recommend you american airlines with 0 stop for $91 depart at 8:20 am
what else can you find
what about delta airlines with 0 stop for $79 depart at 7:50 pm
perfect, can you book a one way flight for me
please confirm your booking for 1 passengers on economy with delta airlines traveling from las vegas to san diego on march 2nd
yes please, when does it arrive and is it refundable
this is not a refundable tickets and the flight will arrive at 9:04 pm
thank you, please find me a bus ticket for one people leaving on 10th of this month
i found 1 bus with 0 transfer for $41 departs at 3:50 pm
thank you
would you like to purchase the bus ticket
no, thats all i need
have a nice day
I need a one-way flight, please.
When would you like to depart? What is your desired destination? Where will you be departing from?
I wanna leave on the 1st of this month from Portland, OR and to Vancouver, BC.
I have found 3 flights which match your selection. There is an American Airlines flight, set to depart at 10:45 AM, with 1 stop. The ticket price is $227.
Can I return it if I need to? When does the flight reach?
Yes, this ticket is refundable. The flight is set to arrive at 3:32 PM.
Are there any other flight options? There is one person in my group.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight to leave at 3:15 PM, with 1 stop. The ticket price is $243.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to purchase these tickets?
Yeah, I need to book a ticket with any class.
Please confirm the following information: The flight is set to depart from Portland, with a flight to Vancouver. The airlines is Southwest Airlines. The departure date is March 1st. The number of passengers is 1 and the seating class is Economy.
Yeah, that sounds good. From which airport will the flight depart from?
Your oneway ticket is now confirmed. The flight is set to depart from PDX International Airport.
At which airport will the flight arrive at?
The destination airport is YVR International Airport.
Thank you for the help. Is there a bus that goes there? I wanna leave on the 3rd of this month.
The bus is set to depart at 6:50 AM and costs $45, with 0 transfers.
That sounds good.
Would you like to purchase these bus tickets?
No, I don't want these tickets now. That is all that I need.
Have a great day.
I'd like a one way flight tickets.
Sure, please provide the following. Where to, what day, and from where?
I'll be leaving from Vancouver, BC on the 12th of this month and want to go to Seattle.
There's a air canada flight that leaves at 4:45 pm with 1 stop for $255
Awesome.
Shall I book the tickets?
Yes, book four tickets.
Please confirm: 4 air canada economy tickets from Vancouver to Seattle on march 12th
Perfect, what airport will be arrive at?
Tickets are confirmed. You're destination is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Are they refundable tickets and where airport are we leaving from?
No, they are not refundable and you'll leave from YVR International Airport.
Thanks, can you help book at bus to get to the airport on march 13th.
The bus has 0 transfers and departs at 6:40 am for $31
What's the name of the station?
King Street Station
Awesome, thanks so much.
Enjoy your trip.
I need a one-way flight
What is the day of departure?
I would like to leave on the 9th
What's the destination?
I want to visit Vegas
What's the city of departure?
SF. I prefer to fly with United Airlines
I found a United Airlines flight at 7:15 pm, with 0 stops. The ticket costs $99
It's perfect for me!
Do you want to book the ticket now?
Yes, please. One ticket in Economy class.
1 ticket in Economy class, with United Airlines from San Francisco to Las Vegas on March 9th. Is it correct?
Yes, it's fine. What is the airport of departure?
SFO International Airport. Your oneway ticket is booked!
I need a bus to go there, on this Sunday
There are 7 buses. One of these departs at 7:20 am, has 0 transfers and costs $46
Are there other buses available for March 10th?
Yes, the bus departs at 7:50 am, has 0 transfers and costs $45
No, give me other solutions
A bus at 8 am, with 0 transfers, that costs $50
Yes, this is ok for me!
Do you want to buy the ticket?
Not now, thank you
Do you need anything else?
No, thanks, it's all!
Have a good day!
Can you find me a one way flight please?
Where are you leaving from? And when?
I am leaving on the 10th of this month from Philly
Where are you planning to visit?
I'm traveling to NYC
There's an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 4:45 pm at $63
Are there other flights available
Then how bout this Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 4:40 pm and has 0 stops and will cost you $62
What other flights are possible?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 7:45 am and has 0 stops and has a $58 price
Is that refundable?
No it's not, sorry about that
It's ok, that flight still sounds good
Can I help with something else?
Can you help me buy a one way ticket
Sure, so you want 1 one way economy ticket from Philadelphia to New York via Southwest Airlines on March 10th?
Yes that's right
OK, your ticket is confirmed
Thanks, not can you help me find a bus headed there too?
Sure, do you also plan to leave on March 10th.
No, I'm leaving Thursday next week
There's a 8:30 am 0 transfer bus for $24
That sounds great
OK, shall I get you seats?
No, not at the moment
OK, can I assist with something else?
No, for now that's all. I appreciate it.
You're welcome, have a good day
Find me one way flights departing on the 14th of March.
Where are you going and where are you departing?
I am departing out of Vancouver, BC and going to Seattle.
Air Canada has 1 transfer, departs at 4:45 pm and costs $256.
What else do you have?
Delta Airlines has 1 transfer, departs at 3:20 am and costs $284.
What else can you find?
United Airlines has 1 transfer, departs at 6:05 pm and costs $260.
What is the departing airport?
It flies out of YVR International Airport.
What is the arrival airport?
It arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets now?
Yes, get me plane tickets.
You want 1 Economy seat from Vancouver to Seattle on United Airlines that departs March 14th. Is that right?
That is right. What time does the flight land?
Your booking is complete and you will land at 10:56 pm.
I need a bus for two people that leaves on the 13th.
Search revealed 10 results. A bus has 0 stops, departs at 6:40 am and costs $31.
What else do you have?
Another bus has 0 stops, departs at 8:10 am and costs $29.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets?
No, not right now.
Do you need something more?
No, thanks a bunch.
Have a good day.
I need a flight one-way.
Where are your starting and ending points and when?
I'm traveling from LAX to San Francisco the 9th.
Alaska Airlines has a flight with 0 stops leaving at 5:50 pm for $97.
That's perfect Is it possible for you to purchase 2 one-way tickets Economy class?
A flight on Alaska Airlines from Los Angeles to San Francisco March 9th for 2 Economy travelers will be purchased with your permission.
Permission granted. What is the departing airport called. When will the onward flight land?
The ticket purchase is complete from LAX International Airport with the onward flight arriving at 7:15 pm.
You're awesome. I need a bus there also.
Are you going March 9th?
The 2 of us are leaving the 6th of March.
One of 10 found with 0 stops leaves at 6:20 am for $53.
Great. I'm going to take a rest.
See you later.
Do you mind helping me find a one-way flight?
When will you be leaving, and where are you departing from?
I'll be leaving on March 9th from Seattle.
And where would you like to visit?
I'm hoping to visit Vancouver.
I was able to find 5 flight for you. There is a flight with Alaska Airlines that has 1 stop and departs at 12 pm. Tickets start at $222.
Am I able to refund the ticket if I have any problems?
I'm sorry, but the ticket is not refundable.
Do you see any other flights that are available?
There is a flight with American Airlines that has 1 stop and departs at 8:15 am. Tickets start at $267.
Which airport will I be leaving from and when does the flight arrive?
The flight leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, and it arrives at 7:49 pm.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to buy tickets for this flight?
Yes. I'd like a ticket, please.
To confirm: You'd like 1 Economy ticket with American Airlines for the flight from Seattle to Vancouver on March 9th, correct?
Yes, that's correct.
Your ticket has been reserved.
Can you also help me find a bus going to Vancouver.
Will you be departing on March 9th?
I'd like to leave on the 14th, please.
There is a bus with 0 transfers that departs at 6:40 am. Tickets start at $28.
Excellent.
Would you like me to buy bus tickets for you?
No, maybe later. That'll be all for now.
Enjoy your day.
Hello! Can you help me find a one-way American Airlines flight?
I'd be happy to. Where are you departing from?
I will be traveling from Washington to Philly.
What is your expected travel date?
I will be departing on the 12th.
There is 1 American Airlines flight available for $131. It has 1 stop and departs at 8 am. Will that work with your schedule?
I'm not sure. Where does it land and what time does it get there?
It is scheduled to land at PHL International Airport at 11:36 am.
Ok, that works.
Can I help you with anything else today?
Yes, I'd like to purchase my ticket now.
You'd like 1 Economy ticket on the American Airlines flight leaving Washington bound for Philadelphia on March 12th. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Congratulations. Your ticket has been successfully purchased.
Next, can you help me find a bus there on the 4th of this month?
The bus leaves at 7:10 am and has 0 transfers. Tickets are $28.
Are there any other options available?
The next bus also has 0 transfers. It leaves at 7:50 am and tickets cost $32.
Is there anything else for the 14th of this month?
There are 6 other options. The 8:40 am bus has 0 transfers and the ticket price is $31.
That one is better. Thanks, that will be all.
You are very welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I need to find a oneway flight from Vegas to San Diego and I'd like something on American Airlines please.
Departing when please?
On the 11th of this month.
I have 1 flight on American Airlines with 0 stops which departs at 8:20 am and it's a $98 ticket.
Can the ticket be refunded if need be?
No, the ticket is non-refundable.
Okay, no problem.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, I would.
Confirming a flight from Las Vegas to San Diego on March 11th for 1 economy seat on American Airlines.
That's great, thank you.
The ticket has been booked.
What's the arrival time of the onward flight?
It's a 9:34 am arrival.
What airport does it fly into?
SAN International Airport.
Okay, thank you.
What else may I do for you?
I'd like to find a bus please.
For a March 11th departure?
No, on the 9th of this month.
There is a bus leaving at 3:50 pm with 0 transfers and the ticket price is $42.
What are the bus stations?
It leaves from Union Plaza and the destination is Santa Fe Depot.
Great, thanks for that.
You're very welcome.
I need a one-way flight.
Where would you like to go. Where would you be leaving from and when would you like to go?
I would be leaving SD from San Francisco for Thursday next week.
I have found 4 suitable options. There is an alaska airlines flights that would be leaving at 11:10 am. There are 0 stops and it costs $107
That would be great. I want to get a ticket.
Youw ant 1 economy ticket on an alaska airlines flight from san diego to san francisco for March 7th?
Yes, that's what I want. Is the ticket refundable?
I have bought the oneway ticket. It is non-refundable.
Ok. I would need a bus to get there.
You would like to leave on March 7th?
I want to leave on the 1st of March.
There are 6 buses available. One leaves at 7:40 am with 0 transfers and costs $54.
From which station would it be leaving and which one would it be heading to?
It leaves from Santa Fe Depot and would be heading to salesforce transit center.
Is there anything else for this sunday?
There is a bus leaving at 10 am. It has 0 transfers and the price is $45.
Is there anything else?
There is a bus leaving at 11:40 am. It has 0 transfers and the price is $49.
Ok, cool. I need nothing else.
Enjoy your day.
I need a one way flight that departs on the 7th of this month.
What city are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing San Fran and headed to Las Vegas.
Search revealed 4 results. Alaska Airlines has a flight with 0 stops, a departure time of 8:15 pm and a cost of $106.
What airport am I departing out of and what time does the flight land?
SFO International Airport is the original airport and the flight will land at 9:50 pm.
What else do you have?
American Airlines has a flight with 0 stops, a departure time of 5:30 pm and a ticket price of $112.
Can you find flights for three Economy class tickets?
Delta Airlines has a flight that departs at 10:50 am, 0 stops, and a ticket price of $114.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets now?
Yes, get me tickets.
You want 3 Economy seats on a Delta Airlines flight from San Francisco to Las Vegas on March 7th. Is that right?
That is right.
Your flight is booked.
I you to find me a bus.
Are you departing on March 7th.
No, I wan to depart on the 13th.
There is a bus that leaves at 7:20 am, has 0 transfers and costs $54.
That works for me. That is everything.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for one-way flights.
Alright, I just need some information. Where are you going to and from, and when you would like to leave?
I want to leave on the 13th from SD to Vegas.
I found 3 possible flights. One options is a $96 Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 6:30 am with 0 stops. Would that work?
What else is there?
There is a $91 American Airlines flight leaving at 4:40 pm that also has 0 stops. What about that one?
That one sounds good. Go ahead and book a one-way ticket.
Alright, please confirm the following: You want the 1 ticket for the American Airlines Economy flight leaving San Diego on March 13th, going to Las Vegas.
Yup that is perfect.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Which airport is it leaving from? Also, is this refundable?
Your flight leaves from SAN International Airport and it is refundable.
Cool. I also need a bus, planning on leaving the 14th of March.
Alright, there is a bus leaving at 6:50 pm with 0 transfers for $43.
Ok perfect, thanks.
Would you like me to purchase bus tickets for you?
No, not now. I'm good, thanks.
Have a great trip.
Could you find me a one-way flight?
Where are you wanting to go, and when do you want to leave?
I'd like to leave for Vegas on the 11th of this month.
Where are you wanting to leave from?
I'd like to leave from LAX.
I have found 4 flights that could work. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:25 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $81.
What time does the onward flight arrive? And where is it arriving at?
The onward flight will arrive at 9:35 pm at McCarran International Airport.
Are there any other options? I like to travel in Premium Economy.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 8:20 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $133.
That would work for me. Could you help me buy a one way flight ticket? There are 3 people coming with me.
Please confirm the following: You want to buy 3 tickets in Premium Economy on an Alaska Airlines flight that is leaving Los Angeles on March 11th for Las Vegas?
Yes, that would work.
Your ticket has been bought.
Thanks so much. Could you help me find a bus going there? I'd like to leave on March 5th.
The bus leaves at 7:40 am and costs $40. It has 0 transfers.
Are there other options available? I'd like to leave on the 8th of March.
I have found 3 buses that would work. It leaves at 12:30 pm and costs $39. It has 0 transfers.
What station is it going to? And what station is it leaving from?
The bus is going to Union Plaza and leaving from Union Station.
Are there other options?
There's a bus leaving at 1:40 pm that has 0 transfers and costs $35.
That's good. That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to find a one-way flight.
What is your departure date and city and what is your destination?
Leaving today from Portland and heading to Seattle, WA.
There are 4 options. One is on American Airlines departing at 9:15 pm with 0 stops for $64 per seat.
Is it refundable and what is the airport it departs from?
The departing airport is PDX International Airport. The flight is in fact refundable.
Do you have any options on a different airline?
There are 3 options. There is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 9:35 am with 0 stops for $62 per seat.
Can you book a one-way ticket on that one please?
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy seat on Delta Airlines flight departing from Portland and arriving at Seattle on March 1st.
Yes. From which airport will I depart?
The flight departs from PDX International Airport. Your flight has been confirmed.
At what time does the return flight arrive and is it a refundable ticket?
The ticket is non refundable and the return flight arrives at 10:33 am.
Help me find a bus headed there please.
Are you leaving on March 1st?
Leaving on the 8th of this month.
There are 8 options. There is a bus departing at 8:40 am with 0 stops for $30 per seat.
Sounds good. That's it.
Please enjoy your day.
Is it possible for you to find me a one-way flight? I want to fly off from SD.
Can you tell me where you want to arrive? When do you want to fly?
I want to fly Sunday this week, and I want to go to Vegas.
There is a flight with Alaska Airlines which has 0 stops and leaves at 6:30 am. The ticket for this flight will cost you $86.
This flight seems nice to me. Can you help me buy a one-way flight ticket?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy an Economy class flight ticket for 1 person for the flight of Alaska Airlines which departs from San Diego on March 3rd, and arrives to Las Vegas?
That suits me well.
Your requested oneway flight ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help. I am in need of finding a bus to go there for 1 person. I want to begin my trip on Sunday this week.
There is 1 bus which matches what you want. The bus has 0 stops, and leaves at 6:50 pm. The ticket for this bus will cost you $41.
That seems nice to me.
Are you willing to have tickets bought for this bus?
No, I do not want to have tickets bought for this bus trip now.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I appreciate your help very much.
Have a wonderful time.
Would you find me one way flights?
Where do you want to leave from and where will you go? When will you leave?
I want to leave on March 11th from LA to SD.
I have 4 flights that are good. How about this Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 7:30 am and has 0 stops? This costs $71.
What airport does the flight leave from and which airport does it arrive at?
The flight leaves from LAX International Airport and goes to SAN International Airport.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to buy tickets?
Yes, I want to buy tickets.
Could you confirm that you will leave from Los Angeles to San Diego on Alaska Airlines on March 11th? You need 1 ticket in economy.
Sounds good to me. Could I get a refund?
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed. This ticket is refundable.
Could you help me look for a bus going there?
Would you like to leave on March 11th?
I want to leave later today.
The buss leaves at 7:40 am and it costs $27. It has 0 transfers.
Are there other buses available?
The bus leaves at 7:50 am and it is $26. It has 0 transfers.
What bus station will I reach and what bus station am I leaving from?
You will leave from Union Station and arrive at Santa Fe Depot.
Do they have any other buses available? I will leave on the 8th.
I have 8 buses for you. The bus leaves at 9:20 am and it is $28. There are 0 transfers.
Sounds good to me. I don't need anything else.
Have a good day.
Can you help me book a one way flight?
Sure, I'll need more information. Where are you leaving from and going to and when are you leaving?
I'm going from Philadelphia to Washington on March 13th.
I found 3 flights that may work. How about an American Airlines flight with 1 stop for $136 that departs at 9:45 am?
What else did you find?
I found a $244 Delta Airlines flight with 1 stop that departs at 12:20 pm.
No, what else is there? I'd like a United Airlines flight for one.
I found a $141 United Airlines flight with 1 stop that departs at 4:45 am.
That one sounds like it'll work.
Should I buy you tickets?
Yes, get economy.
Just to confirm, you'd like 1 economy ticket on the United Airlines flight from Philadelphia to Washington that departs on March 13th.
Sounds good. When does the first flight arrive and in which airport?
I've booked your flight. You'll arrive at Dulles International Airport at 7:15 am.
Great, I want to check out buses too.
For March 13th?
No, for the 7th.
I found a bus with 0 transfers that costs $30 and departs at 7:30 am.
Great, sounds good.
Should I get tickets for you?
No, not yet.
Okay, anything else you need?
No, that's all for now,
Have a great rest of your day.
Search one-way flights please.
I would need more information first. Where are you going and when would you like to leave? Where would you like to depart from?
let's go to LA from San Fran on the 4th of March please.
Alaska Airlines has a departing flight at 7:10 pm with 0 layovers, this ticket is $93.
Any other options?
Yes of course. American Airlines has a departing flight at 3:50 pm with 0 layovers. This ticket is $76.
Pull up more Economy options please.
Sure thing, Southwest Airlines has a departing flight at 12:50 pm with 0 layovers. This ticket is $99.
Perfect, sounds great.
Would you like to keep searching?
Actually let's buy 3 tickets for my group. I need one-way flights please.
Alright, make sure I got that right. Departing from San Francisco to Los Angeles on Southwest Airlines. Departure date is March 4th, for 3 tickets in Economy seating. Is this correct?
Yes, please find out if the ticket is refundable please.
I was able to successfully book your tickets. Unfortunately these tickets are not refundable.
Well, let's check buses leaving on the 14th going there.
Sure, there is a bus departing at 7 am with 0 transfers for $49.
That sounds reasonable as well.
Would you like to continue and purchase this bus ticker?
No way. Just looking up information. That will be all.
Oh ok, I understand. Have a wonderful day.
Could you search me one-way flight ?
On what date you want to leave and where is your visit?
Next Thursday i am leaving from San Diego.
Where is your leaving location?
From SFO I am leaving
I search 5 flights of your choice. One of them is Alaska Airlines which leaves at 6:10 am and has 0 stops. The cost of ticket is $102.
To which airport does the flight arrive and when does the onward flight arrive?
The reaching station is SAN International Airport and flight arrives at 7:50 am.
This is perfect flight for me.
Are you like to buy tickets?
Yes. I want to buy the ticket.
Please give confirmation details: The flight Alaska Airlines departs from San Francisco and going to San Diego on march 7th. The number of passenger is 1 with economy class.
Yes. This is cool.
Your one way ticket is booked.
From which airport the flight departs?
It departs from SFO International Airport
Thanks for the help. Could you help me to find for buses going there?
Are you decided to leave on march 7th?
I decided to leave on march 11th.
I searched 6 buses for you. One bus departs at 11 am and has 0 transfers. The ticket cost is $49.
Can you tell me about other available buses? I like to leave on the 14th.
The bus starts at 1:40 pm and has 0 transfers. The ticket cost is $53.
That is cool.
Are you interested to buy ticket on this bus?
No, I am not like to buy tickets now.
Are you need any other help?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a nice day.
I need a one-way flight.
From where will you be departing from?
I am set to depart from Vancouver, BC. I would prefer to fly with Air Canada.
At which time would you plan to arrive? What is your desired destination?
I am to leave on the 9th from Seattle, WA.
There is 1 flight which matches your selection, it is an Air Canada flight. The outbound flight is set to depart at 4:45 PM, with 1 stop. The ticket price is $263.
Yeah, okay that flight's good then. Can you help me find a one-way flight ticket? I have four people in my group right now. I prefer Economy, too.
Please confirm the following information: The flight is to depart from Vancouver, and arrive at Seattle. The airlines is Air Canada. The designated date of departure is March 9th. The number of passengers is 4. The seating class is Economy.
Yeah, that sounds good. Is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket has now been confirmed. Unfortunately, this ticket is not refundable.
When is the flight gonna arrive?
The onward flight is set to arrive at 2:32 AM.
Thanks for all your help. I need a bus that goes there too.
Would you like to leave on March 9th?
I plan to leave on the 13th of this month.
There are 10 buses for you. The bus is set to depart at 6:40 AM and the ticket price is $31. There are 0 transfers.
Are there any bus options to there? I want to leave on March 10th.
There are 9 buses which match your selection. This bus is set to depart at 8:10 AM and the ticket price is $27. There are 0 transfers.
Okay, that sounds good then.
Would you like to purchase these tickets?
No, I don't want these now. That's all I want.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
Can you find a one way flight from Philadelphia?
Sure, when are you leaving?
On the 9th of this month.
Where are you leaving from?
From New York City. I need 1 refundable ticket, since my plans may change.
Sure, I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 7:55 am for $67.
Great, help me buy an economy seat on that flight.
Okay, can you confirm you'd like 1 economy ticket on the American Airlines from from New York to Philadelphia on March 9th?
Do Premium Economy instead, please.
Sure, please confirm you'd like a premium economy ticket for the flight on March 9th.
Perfect. What's the airport I'm leaving from?
I've confirmed your flight. It leaves from JFK International Airport.
Great, can you also search for a bus going there on the 6th of this month?
Sure, there's a bus with 0 transfers departing at 7:40 am that costs $20.
Perfect, thank you.
Should I buy you tickets?
No, not right now.
Okay, anything else I can help you with?
Nope, thanks again.
No problem, enjoy your day.
I need a one way flight.
Departure city and date? Destination?
Leaving Washington the 1st of March, going to Philly.
I found 3 flights. There's an American Airlines flight with 1 stop at 8 am for $138.
When does it get in?
11:36 am.
Ok. Book it.
Please confirm: 1 economy ticket on American Airlines March 1st from Washington to Philadelphia.
Good. Is it refundable?
Your ticket is reserved and is refundable.
What's the departure airport?
Dulles International Airport.
Thanks. Find a bus there on the 3rd of March.
I found 8 buses. There's a 7:10 am bus with 0 stops for $33.
What else? Leaving the 9th.
There's a bus with 0 transfers leaving 7:50 am for $24.
Leaving from what station? Getting in where?
Leaving Intercity Terminal and arriving Union Station.
Ok good. That's all for now.
Have a nice day.
I want to look for one way Economy flights.
Where will you be traveling from and going to? And when are you leaving?
I'll be going from San Francisco to SD. I want to leave on the 14th of March.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 6:10 am. It has 0 stops and costs $107 per ticket.
What other flights are there? Check for the 13th of March.
I've found 4 flights that match. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 12:15 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $153 per ticket.
What's the departure airport?
The departure airport is SFO International Airport.
Is it a ticket that can be refunded?
It is not a refundable ticket.
Okay, that's fine.
Do you want to purchase a ticket.
Yes, I do. And there are three people that need tickets.
I'll get you 3 Economy tickets for San Francisco to San Diego on March 13th with American Airlines? Is that what you'd like?
Wait, it's actually 4 people that need tickets.
So it's 4 tickets on American Airlines, is that right?
Yeah, that's right. What time does the flight arrive and what airport is it arriving at?
The one way tickets have been booked. The flight arrives at 4:19 pm at SAN International Airport.
Now I need a bus to go there.
You'll be leaving on March 13th?
I'm going to leave this Sunday.
I've found 6 buses. There's a departure at 11 am with 0 transfers. It is $56.
That'll work.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
No, that won't be necessary.
Do you need any other help?
No, thanks for assisting me.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you find me a one way flight that leave on the 6th of March? Any class would work.
Where are you wanting to leave from?
I'd like to leave from Las Vegas.
Where are you going?
I'd like to go to San Diego.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:20 am and has 0 stops. It costs $136.
That would work for me.
Would you like to buy tickets?
Yes, I want to buy 2 tickets.
Please confirm the following: You want 2 tickets in Economy seating on an American Airlines flight that is leaving for San Diego from Las Vegas on March 6th.
Yes, that would work for me.
Your ticket has been bought.
Awesome. Could you help me find a bus that's going there? I'd like to leave next Monday.
I have found 1 bus that would work for you. It leaves at 3:50 pm and costs $37. It has 0 transfers.
What bus station am I going to and leaving from?
The bus is leaving from Union Plaza and arriving at Santa Fe Depot.
That would be great.
Would you like to buy the bus tickets?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I could help with?
No, thanks so much for your help!
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me a one way flight that is refundable please?
Which cities will you depart from and arrive at? When do you want to leave?
I want to leave next Monday from San Fran to SD.
I found 3 flights, one is Alaska Airlines which lieaves at 10:45 am and has 0 stops. It is $111.
Which airport does it arrive to? Which does it depart from?
The flight will be departing from SFO International Airport and arriving at SAN International Airport.
That sounds good, can you buy me a one way ticket.
You need a ticket for 1 on Alaska Airlines on March 4th from San Francisco to San Diego, which will be an economy flight, is that correct?
Yes sounds good. When does the flight arrive in San Diego?
Your ticket is confirmed and arrival time is 12:25 pm.
Can you help me find a bus going there on the day after tomorrow?
I found 6 buses, one that departs at 11 am and costs $56 with 0 transfers.
Are there any available buses?
One that departs at 1:40 pm, has 0 transfers and costs $51.
Sounds good that is all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I want to search for the one-way flight from Las Vegas for which I need your help to find the suitable one.
To which place you are going to visit?
I want to search for the flights to LAX.
I need more details to short-list my search. Let me know the date when you want to leave from your place.
may be on 10th of this month. You can search for the flights for this date.
Found 4 flights that match your requirements. What about an outbound flight with American Airlines with 0 stops which leaves at 9:30 am for which the ticket cost is $80? Is that okay to you?
I want to know about the origin Airport from where the flight will leave.
This flight will leave from McCarran International Airport.
What is the arrival time of this onward flight and which is the destination Airport.
This onward flight will arrive at 10:40 am to the destination at LAX International Airport. How about your opinion on this flight.
Not interested. Please Search for something else.
What about an outbound flight from Delta Airlines with 0 stops which leaves at 9:40 pm for which the price of ticket is $87?
This is also not suitable to me. I need to search for more results.
Another outbound flight which is from Southwest Airlines with 0 stops and the same will leave at 2:35 pm under the ticket cost $84. Would you like to choose this flight?
Yes, I like it and I want to book the tickets to this flight now.
Please confirm to book 1 Economy class ticket in Southwest Airlines flight from Las Vegas to Los Angeles for the departure date on March 10th.
That is confirmed to proceed and let me know about the origin and destination Airports of this flight.
I have successfully booked the tickets to this flight and it will leave from McCarran International Airport and will reach finally to LAX International Airport.
That's nice. Thanks. I want to search for a bus to go there. Can you help me to find the suitable one?
Yes, what about the departure date on March 10th?
No, please search for the bus to leave on 6th of this month.
Found 4 results. A bus which departs at 7:20 am with 0 transfers under cost $37 is suitable to you I think. What about your's?
let me know about the origin and destination of this bus to decide further.
This bus will leave from Union Plaza and will reach finally to Union Station.
That is okay and thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
Could you find me a one-way flight?
Where are you wanting to leave from and where do you want to go? When are you leaving?
I'd like to leave for LAX from Las Vegas on the 13th of this month.
I have found 3 flights that would work for you. There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 12:20 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $87.
Are there any other options? There are three people with me.
I have found 2 flights that would work. There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 2:35 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $86.
Is it refundable?
No, it is not refundable.
Are there any other options?
There's a United Airlines flight that leaves at 12:05 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $79.
Is it refundable? And where does it depart from?
It is not refundable and it departs from McCarran International Airport.
That will work for me. Could you help me buy a one way flight ticket?
Please confirm the following: You want 3 Economy tickets for a United Airlines flight leaving Las Vegas for Los Angeles on March 13th.
Yes, that will work.
The ticket has been bought.
When will the onward flight be arriving?
It arrives at 1:15 pm.
Where is it arriving?
It arrives at LAX International Airport.
Thanks for everything. Could you help me find a bus?
Are you leaving on March 13th?
I am leaving on the 12th of March.
I have found 4 buses that would work. There's a bus that leaves at 7:20 am and has 0 transfers. It costs $40.
Are there any other options? I have 4 people with me and am planning on leaving on March 3rd.
I have found 3 buses that would work. One leaves at 10:20 am and has 0 transfer. It costs $48.
Where would I be arriving?
It's arriving at Union Station.
Where am I leaving from?
The bus leaves from Union Plaza.
That will work.
Would you like to buy tickets now?
No, I don't want to buy the tickets right now. That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Help me search for one-way flights, please.
Can you provide me with details of your itinerary?
I want to fly on 9th of this month, travelling from Portland, OR, to Vancouver, BC.
Well, you have 3 options. I recommend an American Airlines flight departing at 10:45 am, with 1 scheduled stop, at a cost of $226.
I'd prefer to look at something else.
In that case, there is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 3:15 pm, with 1 scheduled stop, at a cost of $217.
Keep searching please. I need just the one ticket.
The 1 remaining option is a United Airlines flight leaving at 10:35 am, with 1 scheduled stop, at a cost of $228.
When does it arrive in Vancouver? Is the ticket refundable?
The flight will arrive at 8:12 pm, but the ticket is not refundable.
Well, I like the sound of it.
Shall I buy the tickets now?
Yes, go ahead.
So to recap, you want me to book 1 economy ticket for a United Airlines flight from Portland to Vancouver, departing on March 9th?
That's all in order.
The ticket has been purchased.
Which airports are on this route?
The flight leaves from PDX International Airport, and arrives at YVR International Airport.
Thanks a lot. Can you help me search for a bus?
Are you leaving on March 9th?
I'll leave on Friday next week.
There is a bus leaving at 6:50 am, with 0 transfers, at a cost of $47.
Which bus station is it heading to?
It's going to Pacific Central Station.
Thanks a lot, that's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I need a one-way flight.
Where're you heading out of?
Out of New York.
Where're you going and when?
I'm headed to Washington the 1st of this month.
There's an $85 American Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 10:55 am.
Sounds good. Let's get it.
Just to make sure, you want 1 Economy American Airlines ticket from New York to Washington on March 1st.
Yup. What airport does it go to?
Your flight headed to Dulles International Airport is all set.
Thanks, but I also need a bus headed there for next Monday.
There's 8 buses that might work. One of them leaves at 6 am with no 0 stops and is only $39.
Awesome, that'll be it for now.
Have a good one!
I need a one way flight.
When and where are you going?
I.m leaving the 9th to Los Angeles.
What is the starting point?
San Fran.
One of 4 found is on Alaska Airlines with 0 stops for $98. The plane leaves at 7:10 pm
Great. Will you purchase a ticket?
With your permission 1 Economy ticket on Alaska Airlines leaving March 9th from San Francisco going to Los Angeles will be purchased.
Permission granted.
The ticket is yours.
What is the departing airport called?
SFO International Airport.
Perfect. I need a bus going there March 5th.
One of 10 found departs at 7 am with 0 stops for $45.
Perfect.
Can I get you a ticket?
Not right now.
Do you need further assistance?
I'm finished, thanks.
Enjoy the day.
I need help searching for a one way flight.
Sure, where do you want to depart from?
I'll be flying from Seattle, WA.
Ok, whay day do you want to leave and where will you be traveling to?
I would like a premium economy ticket to Portland, OR on the 8th.
I found an American Airlines flight with 0 layovers that leaves at 8:05 am and costs $120.
Can you find a United Airlines flight instead?
Yes, there is 1 United Airlines flight that leaves at 4:15 am. It costs $104 and has 0 stops.
What airport does it land at?
The flight arrives at PDX International Airport.
That flight would work.
Should I buy tickets for that flight?
Yes, please get two tickets.
Please confirm you would like to ourchase 2 premium economy tickets on United Airlines from Seattle to Portland on March 8th.
Sorry, I actually need 3 tickets.
You need 3 tickets to Seattle, correct?
Yes, buy 3 tickets please.
Your one way tickets have been successfully confirmed.
I also want to check for a bus going there on the 8th.
There are 10 buses available. The first leaves at 6:10 am, has 0 transfers, and costs $31.
Great.
Would you like to buy a ticket for this bus?
No, that's all I needed for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a one-way flight.
Where are you leaving from? Where are you going?
I am leaving Philadelphia for NYC. I like American Airlines.
When are you leaving?
I am leaving on Wednesday next week.
I found 1 option on American Airlines. The plane leaves at 4:45 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket is $62.
That is perfect, please help me get a ticket.
Please confirm, leaving Philadelphia for New York on American Airlines on March 6th. 1 seat in economy has been reserved.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks!
Anything else?
I need a bus to get there.
Are you leaving March 6th?
Yes.
I found a bus leaving at 8:30 am with 0 transfers. The ticket is $19.
That is perfect.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
No, not yet.
Anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I am searching for a one-way flight for which I need your help. Can you help me to find the one suitable to me. I want to travel in Economy class and we are three in our team.
From which date you want to book the flight and to which place you want to go for a visit?
I want the flight to be leave on next Monday and please search for the one to Seattle, WA.
What is your present location to search for the flights to leave from?
I want to leave from Vancouver on 12th of March and you can search the flights in any Airlines.
Got it. What about an outbound flight from Air Canada Airlines which will leave at 4:45 pm with 1 stop and the price of ticket for this is $255? Do you want me to book this flight or you want some more information?
Yes, I need more details to decide. Let me know about the origin station of this flight.
This flight will leave from YVR International Airport. Any more information you need?
Please also tell me about the destination airport of this flight. I am asking this for my reference.
That is okay and note down that this flight will reach its final destination at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thanks for all the information that you have given to me and finally I chose this flight for me.
That was nice to hear. How about the tickets to this flight, shall I book it now?
Yes, do it for me.
Please confirm to book 3 Economy class tickets to the flight with Air Canada from Vancouver to Seattle for the departure date on March 12th.
That is correct and you can proceed now. Can you search for the arrival time of this onward flight?
Your tickets are booked successfully and please note down the arrival time is 2:32 am.
Thanks for the same. I also want to search for a bus to go there on March 14th. Do you help me to find the one?
Of-course. I got 10 buses and the one leaves at 6:40 am with 0 transfers and it costs $28. What about this? Do you feel that this is the comfortable one?
I have to decide it and before making decision please get me the details about the origin and destination stations of this bus.
This bus will leave from Pacific Central Station and will reach King Street Station finally. What else you need to know about this bus?
No, this is not the suitable one I think and please search for something else.
What about a bus departs at 8:10 am with 0 transfers and the cost for the ticket is $30?
I want you to search for some other buses. Can you search it for the departure date on the 11th?.
Yes, how about a bus leaves at 8:30 am with 0 transfers under the ticket cost $30? Is that okay to you?
Of-course, finally I got the suitable one. Thanks.
Shall I book the tickets now?
No, I don't need it now. Thanks and that's all I want.
Have a nice day.
I want a one-way flight for the 13th.
Where are you leaving from?
SD.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Vegas.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 6:30 am and costs $96 with 0 stops.
That's good. I'd like to buy a one-way ticket for 1 person.
1 economy class Alaska Airlines ticket to go to Las Vegas from San Diego on March 13th. Is this what you want?
Yes, that's it. When would the onward flight be here?
Your ticket is reserved. The onward flight will arrive at 7:44 am.
Can I refund the ticket?
The ticket is not refundable.
I'd like to ride a bus there.
Are you leaving on March 13th?
Yes I am.
I found 1 bus that leaves at 6:50 pm and costs $37 with 0 transfers.
That's good then.
Would you like tickets?
Not right now. That's all.
Have a nice day.
I would like to find a one way flight.
Where are you traveling and where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving Washington and traveling to NYC.
When are you planning to leave?
I would like to leave on the 7th of March.
There are 2 flights. There is American Airlines that leaves at 6:05 am and has 0 stop for the price of $88.
I would like to travel in Premium Economy.
There is 1 flight with Southwest Airlines that leaves at 4:50 pm and has 0 stop for $111.
That flight sounds good.
Do you want to purchase a ticket?
Yes, I would like to purchase a ticket.
1 Premium Economy ticket with Southwest Airlines from Washington to New York on March 7th.
Yes, is the ticket refundable? Which airport does the flight arrive at?
The flight destination is JFK International Airport and the ticket is not refundable.
Can you search for a bus for 3 people to go there Monday next week?
There is a bus that leaves at 8:10 am and has 0 transfer for $38.
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I need 2 economy one-way flight tickets.
Where are you going, when do you plan on leaving and where are you leaving from?
Leaving from LA and going to SD on the 12th of this month.
How about an alaska airlines flight with 0 stops at 7:30 am for $65?
Can you tell me if this ticket is refundable? Also, what time does the onward flight arrive?
Yes, it's refundable and 8:24 am.
Awesome.
Shall I book this ticket?
No, later but I'm interested in buses to get there.
Sure, what is your departure location and does March 12th sound good?
I'm leaving march 11th.
There are 10 buses. How about an economy ticket for a 7:40 am bus that's $26?
Perfect, also please book the flight.
Confirm the details: 2 alaska airlines economy tickets from los angeles to san diego on march 12th
Perfect, now which airport is the flight departing from and where will it arrive to?
You booking is confirmed. SAN International Airport is the destination and the flight leaves from LAX International Airport.
Awesome thanks.
Is there anything else you'll need?
Nope, that's all.
Enjoy your day.
I need a one way flight.
What city are you departing?
I am departing out of Los Angeles.
Where are you going?
There are four people total and I am going to San Diego and don't care what airline it is on.
What is your departure date?
I am departing on the 2nd.
Search found 3 results. Alaska Airlines has 0 transfers, a departure time of 7:30 am and a cost of $59.
What time does the flight land?
The flight lands at 8:24 am.
What else can you find?
American Airlines has 0 transfers, a departure time of 7:40 am and costs $59.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets?
No, not right now. Find me a Flexible bus ticket that leaves on the 3rd in order to get there.
Search revealed 10 results. A bus with a Flexible ticket is departing at 7:40 am and costs $48.
Try to find a bus with Economy extra tickets that departs on March 4th.
A bus with an Economy extra ticket departs at 7:50 am and costs $39.
That is the name of the bus station this trip departs and arrives at?
The departing station is Union Station and the arrival station is Santa Fe Depot.
What else do you have?
A bus with an Economy extra ticket departs at 9:20 am and costs $33.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets now?
No, not right now. Book me those flight tickets.
You want 4 Economy tickets flying from Los Angeles to San Diego on American Airlines March 2nd. Is that right?
That is right. What time does the flight land and are refunds offered?
Your ticket is booked. The flight lands at 8:34 am and refunds are not offered for this flight.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything.
Have a good day.
I am departing from Philadelphia and can you help me finding one-way flight and we are just 1 in a group
Which place are you moving to and when?
i will be moving to New York on 8th of March
I have short listed 4 flights of your likings. One among them is American Airlines which leaves at 4:45 pm with 0 stops and ticket cost is $57
Are there any other flights available? anyone will do
There is a Delta Airlines leaving at 7:25 pm with 0 stops and costing at $60
When is the flight arriving?
The flight comes at 8:16 pm
Are there any other flights available and i need Economy ticket
I have short listed 2 flights of your likings. One among them is Southwest Airlines which leaves at 7:45 am with 0 stops and ticket cost is $58
When is the flight coming here and is there a ticket refund?
The flight will be arriving at 8:36 am and there is no ticket refund
That is fine
You buy tickets now?
Not now.What is your opinion on going by bus?
When do you plan to leave? is it on March 8th?
I will be moving on March 1st
I have selcted 8 buses for you. What is your opinion on a bus leaving at 8:30 am and ticket cost is $24 with Economy ticket
Are there any other available buses as i am moving on March 13th and any ticket types is okay with me
What is your opinion on a bus leaving at 9:50 am and ticket cost is $23 with Economy ticket
That is perfect. Can you reserve the flight you looked for me?
Please give confirmation details: The flight is Southwest Airlines with departure date on March 8th from Philadelphia to New York. The number tickets is 1 Economy class
That is fine
Your booking is done
Thank you very much
Have a nice day
I want to go for a short trip and for which I need to search for one-way flight. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
Yes, what is your present location to search for the flight and let me know about the starting date of your travel plan.
I want to search the flight from Seattle on Tuesday Next Week.
To which place you are planning to visit?
I have planned to visit Portland, search for the flights to this place.
Found an American Airlines flight which is an outbound flight which leaves at 8:05 am and it has 0 stops. The price for the ticket is $69. What about your opinion on this?
Any other available flights that you have in your search list?
What about a flight with Delta Airlines which is an outbound flight leaves at 7:55 am with 0 stops for which the price of the ticket is $68? Is that okay to you?
What is the names of origin and Destination Airports? I am asking this for my reference.
Origin Airport is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and the Destination will be at PDX International Airport.
Yes, this is the one I search for and it is okay to me.
Shall I book the tickets to this flight now?
No, I may be want it later. Now can you find me a bus to go there on 6th of this month.
Found one bus which leaves at 6:10 am for which the cost of Economy class ticket is $33. Is that convenient to you
I want to know the origin and end stations of this bus before confirming the same.
This bus will leave from King Street Station and the same will reach Portland Bus Station finally. Hope this information was useful to decide.
Yes, but I need something else.
What about a bus leaves at 6:30 am for this the price for Economy class ticket is $34? Hope you will choose this bus.
This is also not suitable one. Please search for some other buses to select the one for my convenience.
One more bus which leaves at 8:30 am for which the price of Economy class ticket is $34 and what about your opinion on this.
This looks perfect for me. Thanks.
That's great. Shall I book the tickets?
No, not for the bus now but I need to book the flight tickets that you have selected for me.
Please confirm to book 1 Economy class ticket in a Flight with Delta Airlines from Seattle on March 5th to Portland.
That is confirmed to proceed further.
Your tickets are successfully booked with the one-way flight.
Thanks for that work.
Anything else you need?
No, that's all I want now.
Have a nice day.
find one way flights
where and when are you planning to leave?
I am going to washington and leaving the 5th of march and in premium economy and 2 people in group
where are you leaving from?
I am going from Philadelphia
american airlines flight and outbound leaves 9:45 am and it has 1 stop and the price is $210
this sounds great
when will you leave and wanna on march 5th?
march 11th planning to leave
8 buses found and leaving at 7:30 am and price is $28 and economy ticket
any other buses?
how about 7:50 am and $27 and economy ticket
that is fine
wanna get tickets on the bus?
No I don't want them
anything else I can help with?
book the found flight
confirm philadelphia to washington on american airlines on march 5th and 2 passengers in premium economy
yes that works
one way ticket is done
thanks a lot
anything else for you?
no I am fine
have a good one
Can you help find me a one-way flight for today for 1.
Where are you departing from?
I want to travel from Washington to NY on economy.
There is a flight on American Airlines leaving 6:05 am with 0 stops for a total of $90.
What is the arrival airport?
The flight arrives at JFK International Airport.
That flight sounds great.
Will you buy tickets for it?
Can you help me find a bus going there?
Will you be departing on March 1st or a different date?
Leaving Monday next week.
There are 8 buses. There is an economy seat available on the bus leaving at 8:10 am for $38.
Are there any other options?
There is an economy seat on a bus leaving at 8:20 am for a total of $39.
Are there any other options?
There is an economy seat on a bus leaving at 11:10 am for $40.
At what station does it arrive?
The arrival station is Port Authority Station.
Great. Please book the flight for me.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy ticket on the flight on American Airlines leaving from Washington and arriving in New York on March 1st.
Yep. That's right.
Your flight reservation was a success.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. Thank you.
You're welcome. Enjoy your flight.
i need a one way ticket from seattle, wa this saturday
where are you traveling from
i will travel from vancouver, bc
i found 2 tickets for you. Air canada with 1 stop for $284 depart at 4:45 pm
ok perfect
would you like to purchase a ticket
not right now
what else can i do for you
find me a bus ticket
are you leaving on march 2nd
i am leaving on 13th of this month
what about economy ticket for $31 depart at 6:40 am
what bus station am i leaving from
you will leave from pacific central station
ok. can you book the flight for me
please confirm your booking for 1 economy ticket with air canada from vancouver to seattle on march 2nd
yes please
your ticket is booked
thank you
what else can i do for you
no that's it
have a nice day
Please help me to find one way flights.
Where will you be departing from?
I am flying out of Vegas.
Where are you flying to and when do you plan to leave?
I am going to San Francisco on 14th of March.
There are 4 flights that may work for you. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:30 am and has 0 stops. A ticket will cost you $97.
That flight sounds good to me.
Do you want me to book tickets for you?
Not now, maybe later.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you take for Economy extra bus tickets to San Francisco? It is for one person and I am planning to leave on 11th of this month.
There are 6 convenient buses. How about a bus that leaves at 10:50 am with an Economy extra ticket priced at $66?
Are any buses available on March 2nd?
There are 5 convenient buses. How about a bus that leaves at 12:50 pm with an Economy extra ticket priced at $67?
At which bus station does this bus arrive at?
It arrives at the Salesforce Transit Center.
And which bus station will I be departing from?
The bus starts from Union Plaza.
Thank you for the information.
Shall I get you tickets on this bus?
Hold on. I don't want the bus tickets. Can you book me a flight ticket on the flight that you found?
Please confirm that you want 1 Economy class ticket on American Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 14th.
Yes, that sounds perfect.
Your one-way ticket has been booked successfully.
When does the onward flight arrive?
It arrives at 7:05 am.
Which airport does the flight arrive at, and is the ticket refundable?
The flight arrives at SFO International Airport and I am sorry the ticket is not refundable.
Thank you for the assistance. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Hello! I'd like to look at my options for a one-way flight.
I'd be happy to assist you. Let's get some details first. Where will you be traveling to and from? When will you be leaving?
I plan to leave Vancouver on March 10th to visit Seattle.
For $252 per ticket, there is an Air Canada flight that leaves at 4:45 pm and has only 1 stop.
Okay, thank you. Can you tell me what 1 Flexible bus ticket would cost?
Will you still be leaving March 10th?
No, I'd leave later today.
There are 10 buses running trips today. The first option leaves at 6:40 am and the Flexible ticket costs $50.
That's a fair price.
Would you like me to assist you with anything else?
Yes, I'd like to purchase the flight tickets you found earlier.
You'd like 1 Economy ticket on the Air Canada flight from Vancouver to Seattle on March 10th. Is this correct?
Yes, that's correct.
Your ticket purchase was successful.
Great, thanks for the help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thank you again.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
I need to book a flighOne way.
When do you need to fly?
I need to fly out March 8th.
Where are you travelling to?
I need to get to SFO.
And where will you be flying from?
Flying out of Las Vegas.
American Airlines has a flight that leaves at 5:30 am with 0 connections. The fare for this flight is $98.
Ok. That works.
Do you require anything else?
How about a bus to there?
Travelling on March 8th?
Well, maybe Tuesday next week.
There are 6 buses available. There is a bus that departs at 10:50 am. The fare is $42 for an Economy class ticket.
Ok. Let's book the flight.
You want 1 Economy class seat on the American Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 8th departing at 5:30 AM. Is that correct?
Yes. Is that ticket refundable?
Your ticket is confirmed. Sorry, the ticlet is nonrefundable.
Ok. Thanks.
Do you require anything else?
Not right now, thanks.
Let me know if I can be of any further assistance.
two people in group
when will you leave?
going to sf and 7th of this month and leaving la
4 flights and one is alaska airlines and it goes at 5:50 pm and has 0 stops and is $92
what airport does flight arrive from?
sfo international airport
I will leave the 4th
bus leaves 6:20 am and is $44 and is an economy ticket
what is the bus station?
union station and destination is salesforce transit center
can you book the flight you have located?
flight is from los angeles and gors to san francisco and is alaska airlines and leaves march 7th and has 2 people in economy
yes when does onward flight get here?
flight leaves 7:15 pm
what airport does it depart from?
goes from LAX international airport
thanks a lot
have a good one
Hey, get me a 1 way ticket.
Where will you go, when will you go, and Where will you originate from?
I'm going to Seattle on the 12th of this month from Portland.
How about an American Airlines leaving at 9:15 pm. It has 0 stops and only costs $86.
Ugh.. how about another choice?
Try Delta Airlines leaving at 9:35 am with 0 stops. It only costs $76.
You're going in the right direction.
Do you need a ticket?
No, what would a bus trip be like going there?
Do you want to leave on March 12th?
No, I'm leaving on the 9th.
There's bus departing at 8:40 am. It's economy priced at $29.
I'll take it.
Shall I purchase the tickets now?
No. Not at this time.
What else can I do for you?
You could book the flight you found.
You are booking an Economy seat on Delta Airlines flight that departs Portland on March 12th and ends up in Seattle. There will be 1 passenger.
That's it. Which airport is it leaving from? Is there a refund policy?
Your ticket from PDX International Airport is confirmed and is not refundable.
I appreciate your help. That'll be all.
Take care now.
I need to get a one-way flight.
Where are you heading and when would you like to leave? Where would you be leaving from?
I will be heading fromm LA to SD next wednesday.
There is an outbound flight on alaska airlines that leaves at 7:30 am. There are 0 stops and it costs $70
Is there anything else? I do not really like that airline.
There is an outbound american airlines flight that leaves at 7:40 am. There are 0 stops and it costs $69
That time is too early for me. Is there anything else?
There is a southwest airlines flight that leaves at 3:25 pm. There are 0 stops and the tickets are $58.
Yes, definitely that one. I would need a bus to get there on the 4th of this month. I would need four economy tickets.
There are 10 buses scheduled for that day. You can leave at 7:40 am . The cost of that economy ticket is $30
Which bus station would I be taking off from? Which station would I be getting off at?
You would be leaving Union station and arriving at Santa Fe depot.
Ok, that could work.
You would like the bus tickets?
No, not right now. What about the flight? Go ahead and book it for me.
You would like 1 economy class ticket for a flight on southwest airlines that would be leaving from Los Angeles and heading to San Diego on March 6th?
Yes, that's about it.
I have bought the ticket for you.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can do for you.
No. You have been very helpful.
Take care
Hi there, could you help me make a reservation for one-way flight tickets please?
Where will you be travelling to?
I will be travelling to SD and I prefer taking Alaska Airlines flight please.
Sure, where and when do you plan to depart?
I plan to depart from San Fran on the 8th of March.
There are 1 suitable flights, how about an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 6:10 am with 0 layovers which will cost you $99?
Sure, this sounds great to me!
Would you like me to make a ticket reservation for you?
Perhaps at a later time, may I know what buses go there too?
Do you plan to depart on the March 8th?
I intend to depart next Monday if travelling by bus.
Sure, there are 6 buses, how about an economy bus ride which departs at 11 am and costs $44?
Sure, could you book the flight ticket previously instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 economy flight from San Francisco to San Diego on Alaska Airlines on March 8th.
Sure, this is fine with me.
Your one way ticket has been purchased!
May I know what time does my flight arrive and is this ticket refundable?
Unfortunately, this is a non-refundable ticket. Your flight will arrive at 7:50 am.
Sure, that is all the help I need.
No worries, have a great day ahead!
Can you help me find a one-way flight?
Where are you leaving from and traveling to?
Leaving from Las Vegas and traveling to SD.
Where do you plan on leaving?
Leaving on March 11th.
I found 4 flights. How about American Airlines with 0 stops leaving at 8:20 am for $98?
What is the departure airport?
McCarran International Airport.
Is the ticket refundable and when does the onward flight arrive?
The ticket is not refundable and the onward flight arrives at 9:34 am.
Are there any other Economy flights available?
There are 3. How about Delta Airlines with 0 stops leaving at 5:05 pm for $98?
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
What about going by bus and leaving on the 12th of this month?
I found 1 Economy bus ticket leaving at 3:50 pm for $46.
What is the name of that bus station?
It is Union Plaza.
What is the bus station destination?
The destination station is Santa Fe Depot.
Could you go ahead and book the flight that you found?
I have 1 Economy ticket for Delta Airlines on March 11th leaving from Las Vegas and traveling to San Diego. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct. Could you tell me the arrival and departure airports?
Your oneway ticket is confirmed. The destination airport is SAN International Airport and the departure airport is McCarran International Airport.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
Can you find me a one way flight?
Where are you leaving from?
From San Fran.
When did you want to leave and where did you want to go?
I'd like to leave on the 7th and go to Los Angeles.
Alaska Airlines has a flight at 7:10 pm with 0 stops for $97.
That works for me.
Did you want to reserve a ticket?
Not just yet.
Is there anything else you need?
Maybe check on a bus going there. Still on the 7th. Any kind of ticket is fine.
There's one leaving at 7 am with an economy ticket for $47
Which station does it leave from and where does it arrive?
From Salesforce Transit Center to Union Station.
Are there others. I need 4 tickets.
There's an economy ticket for $40 that leaves at 7:40 am.
Never mind, can you just book the flight you mentioned earlier?
To verify: You want 1 economy ticket on the Alaska Airlines flight going from San Francisco to Los Angeles on March 7th.
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Is the ticket refundable? What time will it arrive in LA?
It should arrive at 8:35 pm. Sorry, it isn't refundable.
Thanks! That'll do me for now.
Have a great day.
three people one way flights
where will you go?
los angeles leaving the 14th from sfo
alaska airlines leaves 7:10 pm 0 stops and is $103
it is united airlines
united airlines 9:15 am 0 stops $97
that is good and how about the bus?
wanna leave march 14th?
march 1st then
leaving 7 am found 10 buses $50 economy
what station then?
the union station
I will leave the 13th and am fine with any tickets
bus leaves 7:40 am and is $46 economy and 9 buses
I want economy
bus leaves 8:40 am and is $49 and economy and 8 buses
what is the station?
salesforce transit center union station
that works for me
do you wanna get any tickets?
no I do not
anything else then?
book the flight
san francisco to los angeles united airlines march 14th 3 people economy
what airport then?
lax international airport
when will onward flight arrive?
10:40 am then
thanks a lot
have a good one
can you search a one way flight for me
where are you traveling to
i am visiting seattle, wa
when are you leaving and where are you leaving from
I will travel from vancouver, bc on 4th of march
i found 2 flights that meets your need. what about air canada with 1 stop for $265 depart at 4:45 pm
what airport is this leaving from and when does it arrive ?
this will depart from yvr international airport and arrive at 2:32 am
perfect, can you find me a bus to get there on march 1st
i found you a bus leaving at 6:40 am on a economy for $30
what else do you have
what about 8:10 am economy bus for $30
perfect
would you like to purchase a ticket
no, not yet but can you book the flight ticket for me
please confirm your booking for 1 economy ticket with air canada traveling from vancouver to seattle on march 4th
perfect
your ticket is booked
thank you
have a nice a day
Can you help me with one-way flights from American Airlines for 4 people in my group.
Where are you visiting?
I am going to Vegas.
When are you planning to leave?
I am leaving the 14th of this month.
Where are you departing from?
I will be departing from SFO and any class is fine.
An American Airlines flight is leaving at 5:30 pm with 0 stops for $100.
Would the ticket be refundable?
No, sorry it unfortunately is not refundable.
Which airport does the flight come to, and when does the onward flight come?
The onward flight arrives 7:05 pm at the McCarran International Airport.
The flight sounds good. Will there be a bus going there? I need for 4 people economy extra tickets leaving the 11th of this month.
What about a bus leaving 7:20 am with a price of $65 Economy Extra class.
Which station will the bus reach? What is the name of the bus station I'm departing from?
The starting station is Salesforce Transit Center and the destination is Union Plaza.
That sounds nice. Are you able to book the flight you found?
Please confirm the following details for a flight leaving from San Francisco going to Las Vegas via American Airlines leaving March 14th for 4 people Economy.
Yes, that would be great. Which airport is the flight leaving from?
The oneway ticket is confirmed departing from SFO International Airport.
Thanks for all your help. That will be all.
Have a great day.
I have some last minute things to work out for my trip. Can you look up one-way flights for me?
Sure. When are you leaving? Also, where are you flying to and from?
I'm flying from Las Vegas to SD on the 2nd.
Ok, I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops for $91 that departs at 8:20 am. How's that?
Yeah, that sounds good.
Should I buy tickets?
No, not yet.
Ok, anything else I can do then?
Yeah, can you check bus options to get there? I usually get flexible tickets, and I need them for two people the day after tomorrow.
Ok, I found 1 option for flexible tickets that's $57 and leaves at 3:50 pm. How about that?
What station does it leave from and go to?
It goes from Union Plaza to Santa Fe Depot.
Ok, that's good.
Do you want to buy tickets?
No, not right now. Can you go back and book that flight actually?
No problem. To confirm, you want 1 ticket in Economy on American Airlines from Las Vegas to San Diego on March 2nd. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect. When does it arrive at the destination and to which airport?
I've booked your one way ticket. It arrives at SAN International Airport at 9:34 am.
Ok, great. Thanks!
Sure, anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks!
No problem. Have a good day.
Hi there! Do you know if there are any one way economy flights departing from Washington?
When do you plan to depart?
I will likely depart on the 11th of March.
And where do you plan to visit?
I will be travelling to a short trip to Philly for a holiday.
I see! Would you like an American Airlines flight with 1 layover, which departs at 8 am and costs $140?
Are there any alternative flights available?
Yes there is, how about a Southwest Airlines flight with 1 layover and departs at 4:50 pm? this will cost you $137.
Sure, this sounds great to me!
Would you like to purchase the flight tickets there?
Perhaps at a later time. Could you find buses which travel there too so that I can make a comparison?
Sure, will you be departing on March 11th?
No, I intend to depart on Sunday this week.
There are 8 buses which you might like, one of which is an Economy bus ride departing at 7:10 am costing $33.
Are there any alternatives? How about I depart next Tuesday instead?
There are 7 buses available, would you like an Economy ride which departs at 7:50 am which costs $31?
May I know which station does this bus arrive at?
You will be arriving at Intercity Terminal.
And which station will I be departing from?
You will be departing from Union Station.
I see, I've decided to go with the flight, could you make a reservation for the flight instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 economy class seat on the Southwest Airlines flight from Washington to Philadelphia on March 11th.
That is perfect. Do you know which airport does the flight arrive at and what time does it arrive there?
Your reservation has been made. Your flight will arrive at PHL International Airport at 7:46 pm.
Thanks a bunch! That is all I need.
No worries, have a safe flight!
Can you help me find one-way flights to Seattle any class.
When and where are you leaving from?
I am leaving on the 13th of this month from SFO.
I found 5 flights from Alaska Airlines leaving outbound 2:55 pm with 0 stops for $129.
Can you find any other flights from Portland?
An American Airlines flight leaves at 9:15 pm with 0 stops for $59.
Which airport will the flight leave form and when does the onward flight arrive?
The flight onward arrives 10:13 pm departing from PDX International Airport.
Will there be any other flights as I have one person in my group.
I'd like a Delta Airlines outbound flight leaving 9:35 am with 0 stops for $76.
The flight sounds very good to me. What about the bus going there?
When will you depart? What about March 13th?
Yes, that will work for me.
What about a bus departing 8:40 am for $31 Economy.
Tell me the name of the bus station I'm leaving from and which station the bus reaches.
The bus originates in Portland Bus Station going to King Street Station.
That sounds terrific. Are you able to book the flight you found?
Please confirm a flight from Portland to Seattle via Delta Airlines departing March 13th for 1 passenger Economy class.
That will be good.
The oneway ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks so much for your help.
Can I assist you with anything else?
No thanks so much.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a one-way flight ticket?
Where would you like to go and when will you be leaving? What city will you be departing from?
I'm leaving on the 8th of this month from LAX to Chi-town.
I have an Alaska Airlines flight available. Tickets cost $161 and it has 0 stops. It leaves at 4:20 pm.
What is available if I am traveling to Las Vegas?
American Airlines has a flight for $93 that leaves at 8:25 pm and has 0 stops.
That will work for me.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Yes, I'd like to find a bus going there.
Would you be departing on March 8th?
No, I will be departing on the 13th.
There are 4 options that may suit your needs. The first is a $33 Economy ticket for the 7:40 am bus.
I'd actually like one Economy extra ticket if you can find one.
There is an Economy Extra ticket for $46 for the 12:30 pm bus.
Are there any other options?
There is an Economy extra ticket on the 1:40 pm bus for $50.
Can you tell me the station of origin and where it will arrive?
It will depart from Union Station and arrive at Union Plaza.
That would work. Can you book the flight we previously found?
You'd like 1 Economy ticket on the American Airlines flight that leaves Los Angeles for Las Vegas on March 8th. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct. Can you tell me which airport I will land at and at what time?
Yes, your flight is set to land at McCarran International Airport at 9:35 pm. Your ticket purchase was successful.
Great! Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful flight.
I need to find one-way flights to Philly on American Airlines.
When and where will you be departing from?
I will be leaving from NYC on March 10th.
There is 1 option on American Airlines at 3:45 pm with 0 stops for $66.
From which airport does the flight leave and what time does the return flight land?
The return flight lands at 4:36 pm and departs from JFK International Airport.
Sounds perfect. Can you check a bus going there?
Will you be departing on March 10th or a different date?
I'm leaving next Tuesday.
There is an economy bus leaving at 7:40 am for $21.
I don't care about the ticket type but do you have other options?
There is a bus leaving at 8 am for a total of $23 for an economy seat.
What is the name of the departure bus station?
The departure bus station is Port Authority Station.
Okay. Can you book the flight please?
Please confirm you want me to book the flight on American Airlines departing from New York and arriving in Philadelphia on March 10th for 1 economy seat.
Yes. That's right.
Your flight reservation was a success.
Thanks. That's all for now.
You're welcome. Please enjoy your day.
Please find me a one-way flight?
Where are you going? When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Philly to New York City on the 14th of this month.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm with 0 stops. The ticket is $60.
Is the ticket refundable?
No, it is not.
What airport does the plane leave from?
It leaves from PHL International Airport.
Anything else? I need 2 tickets.
I found 3 options including a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 7:25 pm and has 0 stops. The price is $63.
Is there anything else?
Southwest Airlines has a flight leaving at 7:45 am and has 0 stops. The ticket price is $61.
That flight sounds good. I need a bus to get there.
When are you leaving? March 14th?
I am leaving on Sunday this week.
I found a bus leaving at 8:30 am. It is $21 for a economy ticket.
Anything else?
I found a bus leaving at 9:50 am. It is an economy seat for $22.
That is good. Please book the flight.
Please confirm, leaving Philadelphia for New York on Southwest Airlines on March 14th. 2 tickets in economy.
Yes, that is great.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me find a one way flight?
Sure. Please tell me the departure time and location as well as the destination.
I'm flying out of Washington towards NYC on the 12th of this month.
There are 2 flight meeting your criteria. I'd recommend a 0 stops American Airlines flight taking off at 6:05 am. Ticket price is $73.
Sounds great. Is there a bus going there?
Can you tell me if you plan on departing on March 12th?
No, 2nd of March please.
There's an Economy ticket costing $32 for a bus leaving at 8:10 am.
Can you please tell me the departure and arrival stations?
The bus departs from Union Station and arrives at Port Authority Station.
Anything else available? I'd like 1 Economy extra ticket.
There's a bus departing at 8:20 am with the Economy extra ticket priced at $44.
Sounds perfect for me.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Please book the flight you found earlier!
Can you please confirm that you want 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Washington to New York on March 12th?
Yes, that's correct.
Your ticket has been booked.
Thanks, that will be all for now.
Have a nice day!
I am searching for one-way flights for which I need your help. Can you search for the suitable one?
Let me know the start and end date of your travel plan so that I can search accordingly, and also I want to know the date of your visit?
I want the flight from Washington on 2nd of march and go to New York and same will be with American Airlines.
Found 1 result that suits you. What about an outbound flight with American Airlines leaves at 6:05 am which has 0 stops for which the ticket price is $88.
That seems to be okay for me. What about a bus to go there, can you find the one on the 4th for 3 persons
Found 8 results. A bus leaving at 8:10 am under the economy class ticket $38. Is this bus is Okay to you?
Yes that will work. Thanks.
Shall I purchase the tickets to this bus now.
No, not now.
How can I help you further?
I want to purchase tickets on the flight that you have found for me before.
Please confirm to book 1 ticket under Economy class in a flight with American Airlines from Washington on March 2nd to New York.
That is okay to proceed.
I have confirmed the tickets successfully.
What is the destination Airport?
The flight will arrive to JFK International Airport.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a good day.
Look on one way flights on March 10th.
Destination? Departure city?
From San Diego to LAX.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving 3:20 pm for $53.
When does it arrive?
4:14 pm.
Sounds good.
Do you want a seat?
Later.
Anything else I can assist with?
Find a bus to there.
For March 10th?
For the 3rd of this month.
I found 10. There's an economy seat on a bus leaving 6:10 am for $26.
Ok.
Do you want a ticket?
Not now. Book that flight though.
Please confirm: 1 economy seat on Alaska Airlines from San Diego to Los Angeles on March 10th.
Yep. Is that refundable? What's the departure airport?
Your seat is booked. It's not refundable. The departure airport is SAN International Airport.
Ok, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can you get me a one-way flight?
Okay. From where to where, and at what time?
I'm going to travel from LAX to SFO on the 5th of March.
Okay. Alaska Airlines has a flight you might like that leaves at 5:50 pm, has 0 stops, and costs $95.
Any other flights? Also, it's not an 100% guarantee that this trip will stay as planned, so make sure I can get a refund on this economy ticket.
American Airlines has a 0 stop flight that leaves at 3:15 pm and costs $95.
Any other flights for my 1 person group?
Yes. 2 flights. Delta Airlines has a 0 stop flight that leaves at 12:45 pm and costs $98.
Sounds good. Can you get me an economy bus ticket for March 1st? I don't have my own transport at the moment.
Would you like a $45 economy ticket for a bus leaving at 6:20 am?
I don't know. Can you find me a flexible ticket for a bus leaving on the 3rd of this month?
I found 9 buses, including a flexible $72 ticket for one that leaves at 8:20 am.
Sounds great. Can you book the flight now that I found a bus?
You want to book 1 economy ticket for the Delta Airlines flight going from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 5th?
Yes. At what airport will it arrive, and when will the outward flight arrive?
Your ticket's booked. It'll head towards SFO International Airport. It arrives at 2:10 pm.
Thanks. That'll be all.
Have a great day!
Hey you, can you get me a ticket to get out of Washington? I'm tired of this town. I need something refundable though. My plans might change. I need options.
When do you have plans to leave? Do you have a city in mind for travel?
Sure, I'm going to Philly for a game on the 7th of March.
Well, You can catch the American Airlines flight at 5:10 am. It DOES have 1 stop. Your price is $133.
I think that's a great option.
How about tickets for you?
Maybe later. It's for four people. Maybe Economy extra tickets. I'm taking off on teh 4th of this month.
Well, there's a bus with economy extra tickets that leaves at 7:10 am. It costs $38.
That's so early. Isn't there a better option. My hubby will be so grouchy so early.
Well, what about a 7:50 am ticket. It will cost $42. It IS economy extra.
What about trying Flexible tickets for three people? Can you accomodate me?
well, how about 8:40 am for $46. That's a Flexible type ticket.
Fine, Can you book the flight you found now?
Can do, to confirm: American Airlines flight from Washington to Philadelphia for 1 on March 7th. Seating is Economy.
Fine,that's perfect. Where does this thing land?
Your 1 way seat is confirmed. You're going to PHL International Airport.
Do you know what airport I depart from? When does it land?
It should arrive around 8:46 am. It's a short flight. It departs from Dulles International Airport.
That is stellar.
What shall I get now? Do you want a return ticket?
No not now, that's up in the air.
Fine, fly safe.
I'm going to need a one way flight.
Where are you traveling from and to? And what date will you be leaving?
I'll be traveling from San Francisco to LA. And I want to leave on Monday next week.
There are 4 flights that could work. Alaska Airlines has a flight that leaves at 7:10 pm with 0 stops. It's $93 per ticket.
What other flights are there? I like United Airlines and Premium Economy.
United Airlines has a flight that leaves at 10:05 pm with 0 stops. It's $154 per ticket.
That works for me.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Perhaps later.
Do you need any further help?
Look up buses going there.
When is the departure date? Is it March 4th?
Departure will be the 13th of this month.
There are 10 buses that could work. There's one that leaves at 7 am. An Economy ticket is $47.
I like the sound of that. Can you book me the flight we talked about?
I'll book you 1 Premium Economy ticket for the United Airlines flight from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 4th, is that correct?
Yeah, that's it. What time does the departing flight arrive? And what's the airport I'm departing from?
I've booked your ticket. The departing flight is from SFO International airport and it arrives at 11:30 pm.
Thanks for the help.
Do you need me to do anything else?
No, you've been a real help.
Have a terrific day.
I need one-way flight
What's the date of departure?
I want to travel on March 8th
What's the destination? What's the city of departure?
The city of departure is Los Angeles, and I want to visit Portland
There's a Alaska Airlines flight at 7:25 am, with 0 stops. It costs $146
Are there flights available to SD? Any class is ok
There's a American Airlines flight at 7:40 am, with 0 stops. It costs $65
What time is expected to arrive?
Arrival is at 8:34 am
From which airport? Can the ticket be refunded?
From LAX International Airport. No, the ticket cannot be refunded
Are there other flights available in Economy class?
There's a Southwest Airlines fligth at 3:25 pm, with 0 stops. It costs $70
Yes, that's fine for me!
Do you want to book a ticket?
Not now. I need a bus to go there
Do you want to leave on March 8th?
I want to leave on Wednesday next week
There's a bus at 7:40 am. The Economy ticket costs $26
It's good, thanks!
Do you want to book a ticket?
Not now, thanks
Do you need anything else?
Yes, I want to book the flight
1 ticket in Economy class with Southwest Airlines from Los Angeles to San Diego on March 8th. Is it correct?
Yes, it's correct. Thanks
Your reservation is confirmed
Thanks a lot!
Do you need anything else?
No, It's all for now
Have a good day
How about you and I set up a one-way flight for me to visit my sister and my newborn niece? I'm not yet sure about a return date. Are you ready?
I'm ready. When and where do you want a departing flight for your trip?
Let's find a plane flying out of NY later today, please, on any airline.
Okay, and where are you going?
To Washington, please.
All right. American Airlines is offering a flight with 0 stops, departing at 10:55 am for $85.
I see, and where does the plane land?
The flight will arrive at Dulles International Airport.
Cool. Now, please check on buses going there.
What's the bus station you want for your departure and is March 1st the date you want?
Yep, all well and good.
Would you like an Economy ticket for a bus ride, departing at 6 am for $34?
Do you show another bus option?
Does an Economy bus ride, departing at 9:40 am for $43 interest you?
What else is there for a bus ride for 1 passenger?
Would you prefer an Economy bus ride that departs at 11:10 am for $39?
What's the station for the bus arrival?
The bus is scheduled to arrive at Union Station?
Hmm, that could be an option.
Would you like more information?
Let's make a move on booking that flight you suggested for two passengers, please.
Got it. Are you ready to confirm an Economy flight for 2 passengers on American Airlines, leaving New York on March 1st and going to Washington?
Yes, let's do that. What airport is the plane flying out of and what's the arrival time, please?
Your one-way ticket is confirmed for your flight, departing from JFK International Airport and arriving at 12:05 pm.
A great help you are. I certainly appreciate that.
Delighted. Enjoy your trip.
please find me a one way flight
where are you traveling from and to? when are you leaving
i am traveling from vancouver to portland, or on 2nd of this month
what about air canada with 1 stop for $284 depart at 4:45 pm
yes, please book 2 economy tickets on the 8th
i found 8 buses for you. What about economy tickets for $39 leaving at 9:20 am
what else do you have
what about economy ticket leaving at 9:30 am for $37
what bus station does it depart from and arrive to
you will depart from pacific central station and arrive at portland bus station
what else do you have
what about economy ticket depart at 3:10 pm for $40
ok, perfect. can you book the flights for me
Please confirm your booking for 1 economy ticket with air canada from vancouver to portland on march 2nd
yes please
your ticket is booked
thanks
what else can i do for you
no that's it
have a nice day
Can you find me some one-way flights leaving San Diego on Tuesday next week.
Where are you visiting?
Las Vegas.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 6:30 am and is $133.
What time does the onward flight arrive?
7:44 am.
Are there any other flights? Its going to be for 4 people.
There is an American Airlines flight wiht 0 transfers that leaves at 4:40 pm for $88.
That flight sounds great. I need a bus to the airport.
When do you want to depart, March 5th?
I am planning to leave on the 10th of this month.
I found 1 economy bus ticket for $46 that leaves at 6:50 pm.
Sounds good, can you book the flight?
Please confirm the following: 4 Economy American Airlines tickets from San Diego to Las Vegas on March 5th.
Yes, that's right.
Your oneway tickets are confirmed.
Are they refundable? When does the onward flight arrive?
The tickets are refundable. The onward flight arrives at 5:54 pm.
Thank you that is all I need.
Have a nice day!
Could you please help in finding one-way flights?
From which place will you leave?
I am moving from Seattle.
Where do you want to go?
I am moving to Vancouver.
When will you leave?
I am moving on 13th of this month.
I searched and found 4 flights for me. A Alaska Airlines flight leaves at 3:45 pm with 1 stop. The cost of the ticket is $273.
It is good for me.
Shall I book the ticket?
It can be done later.
DO you need any other help?
How about the bus to that place? I like Flexible tickets.
When do you want to move? What about March 13th?
I wish to leave on later today.
I searched and found 9 buses for you. A bus with Flexible ticket moves at 6:40 am with the price $47.
Any other buses to that place?
A bus with Flexible ticket moves at 7:40 am with the price $47.
Any other buses to that place?
What about a bus with Flexible ticket moves at 8:40 am with the price $48.
What is the name of the reaching station?
The reaching station is Pacific Central Station.
It is good. Shall I book the flight?
Kindly ensure that, on March 13th, 1 ticket has been booked in a flight from Alaska Airlines with Economy class moves from Seattle to Vancouver
Yes. It is good.
Your oneway ticket has been booked.
What is the name of the airport where the flight arrive? When it will arrive?
The reaching station is YVR International Airport and the onward flight arrives at 11:44 pm.
Thank you so much. That is what I want.
Have a fantastic day.
On March 5th could you help me to find one-way flight from New York City to Washington.
It is an American Airlines which leaves at 6:05 am and it has 0 stops. The cost of the ticket is $82.
Is there any other flights available?
It is an Delta Airlines which leaves at 7:20 am and it has 0 stops. The cost of the ticket is $79.
From which airport the flight starts?
It starts from JFK International Airport.
When will be the onward flight arrive?
It will arrive at 8:30 am.
It is good for me.
Shall I book tickets for you?
It can be done later. What about a bus going there on the 6th?
I searched and found 8 buses for you. What is your opinion about a bus with Economy ticket which leaves at 6 am? The cost of the ticket is $36.
Whether any buses available?
What is your opinion about a bus with Economy ticket which leaves at 9:40 am? The cost of the ticket is $33.
What is the name of the station in which the bus reaches?
The name of the station is Union Station.
What is the name of the station from which the bus moves?
The name of the station is Port Authority Station.
It is good.
Shall I book tickets on this bus?
Nope. It can be done later. Could you book the flight for me?
Kindly ensure that, on March 5th, in Delta Airlines, Economy seat has been reserved for 1 person from New York to Washington.
Yes. It is good. What is the name of the reaching airport?
Your oneway ticket is booked. The reaching station is Dulles International Airport.
Whether the ticket is refundable?
Sorry, the ticket is not refundable.
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other help?
No. Thank you so much.
Have a fantastic day.
I'm looking for a Delta Airlines flight to Vegas.
When would you like to leave? Where would you like to fly from?
I'd like to travel from LAX on the 14th.
I have found a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 10:15 pm with 0 stops. The ticket price is $82.
Which airport does the outbound flight arrive at and at what time?
The outbound flight arrives at McCarran International Airport at 11:25 pm.
I like the sound of that flight. Are there any options to travel by bus instead?
Would you like to leave on March 14th?
I'd like to leave later today and there will be three people travelling.
There are 4 buses that meet your criteria. There is a bus leaving at 7:40 am and it costs $40 for an economy ticket.
What is the destination station?
The bus arrives at Union Plaza.
Ok, great. I'd like to book the flight now please.
Sure no problem. So to confirm: You'd like 1 Economy ticket on the Delta Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Las Vegas on March 14th.
Okay great. Which airport does the flight leave from and is the ticket refundable.
Your ticket has been booked successfully. The ticket is refundable and your flight will depart from LAX International Airport.
Thanks for your help. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
I am planning a trip. We are a group of 3 people leaving from Vancouver, and we need to look for a one-way flight.
Where would you like to travel to? When would like to depart?
We will be leaving for Seattle on the 6th.
Air Canada has a flight with 1 stop leaving at 4:45 pm for a ticket price of $278.
Yes, that flight sounds like it will work.
Would like to purchase tickets for the flight?
Not yet. Let's look at other options first. What about a bus?
Would you still like to depart on March 6th?
We would like to leave on Monday next week. We would prefer Flexible tickets.
I found 10 buses that would work for your trip. There is a bus with a Flexible ticket leaving at 6:40 am for a price of $50.
What are some of the other buses for this trip?
There is a bus leaving at 8:10 am with a Flexible ticket priced at $49.
What are some of the other buses?
There is a bus leaving at 8:30 am with a Flexible ticket price of $46.
What are the names of the bus stations that we would be departing from and arriving at?
The trip would depart from Pacific Central Station, and the destination is King Street Station.
OK, thank you. We would like to book the flight that you found, can you book it for us?
You would like to book 3 Economy seats on the Air Canada flight from Vancouver to Seattle departing March 6th, is this correct?
Yes, that's right. What airport will the flight be landing at? Is the ticket refundable if our plans change?
Your one-way ticket is booked. The flight will land at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. The ticket is non-refundable.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all we needed, thank you.
Have a great trip!
I need a one-way flight from Vancouver, Bc.
Where would you heading to and when would you like to leave?
I would be traveling from Seattle on March 8th.
There is an outbound flight on air canada that leaves at 2:05 pm. There is 1 stop and costs $239
That would work.
Would you like tickets?
Not right now.
Is there anything else you require?
I would need to get a bus to go there.
You would be leaving on March 8th?
I want to leave on the 10th.
There are 10 buses available. There is a bus leaving at 6:40 am. There are 0 stops and it costs $30.
What station would I be leaving from and which one would I be dropping off at?
You would be leaving King Street Station and end up at Pacific central station.
Is there anything else available for three individuals that would be leaving on March 1st?
There are 9 buses available. There is a bus leaving at 8:10 am. There are 0 stops and it costs $30.
Is there anything else that would be leaving at a later time?
There is a bus leaving at 8:30 am. There are 0 stops and it costs $28.
That would be fine. I want to book an economy seat.
You would like an economy ticket for 1 on a air canada flight from vancouver to seattle that leaves on march 1st?
The flight would just be for 1.
You would like 1 ticket on an air canada flight?
That is correct.
I have bought the oneway ticket for you.
Would I be able to get a refund if necessary?
I apologize, but it is non-refundable.
Thanks a lot. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
I am departing from Los Angeles and i prefer Delta Airlines. Can you help me finding me one-way flights?
When are you leaving?
I will be moving to Las Vegas on Saturday this week
I have selected 1 flight of your choice.there is Delta Airlines which departs at 10:15 pm with 0 stops and cost of ticket is $74
Is tit a refundable ticket?
It is a refundable ticket
This is perfect for me
You need to buy tickets?
Not now. Can you help me search for a bus to go there?
Are you moving on March 2nd?
Yes fine
The bus leaves at 7:40 am with 0 transfers and costs $39
Are there any other available buses for 2 people and i am moving on 5th of this month
I have selected 3 buses of your choice. The bus leaves at 12:30 pm with 0 transfers and it costs $40
What is the bus station i am starting and the station i am reaching?
The starting station is Union Station and reaching station is Union Plaza
Are there any other available buses for me?
The bus leaves at 1:40 pm with 0 transfers and it costs $39
That is fine
You need to buy tickets?
No, i don't want to buy tickets now
Is there any other help from me?
Could you reserve the flight that you found? I want to travel in Economy class.
Please give confirmation details: The flight is Delta Airlines starting from Los Angeles to Las Vegas on March 5th and the tickets reserved is 1 Economy class
This is perfect.
One way ticket of yours is confirmed.
Thank you so much. That's all i want.
Have a nice day.
I'm going on a trip soon, can you help me find tickets for one-way flights?
Sure, where do you want to fly to?
I'm visiting New York City.
Which city do you plan on leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Philadelphia.
When will you be leaving?
I plan on leaving on the 12th.
I found 4 flights that fit what you're looking for. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm, has 0 stops and tickets cost $59.
Cool, that sounds great. Can you help me find a bus that goes there?
Are you leaving on March 12th or another date?
No, I plan on leaving on March 11th.
Okay, the bus leaves at 8:30 am, has 0 transfers and costs $25 to ride.
Which station will I be leaving from and where does it go to?
The bus departs from Intercity Terminal and arrives at Port Authority Station.
Okay, sounds good. I'd like to book a ticket for the flight that you found.
Sure, just please confirm the details of your ticket: it is an American Airlines Economy class ticket for 1 person for the flight leaving from Philadelphia on March 11th to New York.
No, please change it to 3 people in my group.
Please confirm that the number of passengers is 3 and the seating class is Economy.
Yeah, that sounds right. Can you tell me which airport the flight lands at?
Sorry, but I wasn't able to book the ticket for you. Is there anything else you need help with?
No, thanks for your help. That's all I needed.
Okay, have a nice day!
I am in a plan to go for a trip on 5th of March and for which I need to search for one-way flights. Can you search for the one from Southwest Airlines? I need to book Economy class tickets.
Let me know the origin and destination places of your travel plan to search accordingly.
I have planned my trip from Vegas to SD. Search for the flights based on this detail.
Got 1 flight that suits your requirements. What about an outbound flight from Southwest Airlines with 0 stops which leaves at 3:10 pm. The price of ticket for the same is $80? Is that okay to you?
May I know the destination of this flight?
Yes, It will finally reach to SAN International Airport. What else information do you want from me?
What is the arrival time of this onward flight?
It will arrive at 4:24 pm.
That looks fine. Thanks.
Shall I proceed with tickets booking for this flight?
No, not now. Will decide later. Now, I want to search for a bus to go there. Can you help me to find one?
Yes, please confirm to search for the bus from the date March 5th.
No, please book it from 12th of this month.
Got 1 detail of bus which leaves at 3:50 pm with 0 transfers under ticket cost $46. How about your opinion on this?
What is the origin for this bus?
This will leave from Union Plaza.
And to which station this bus will reach finally?
It will reach the final destination at Santa Fe Depot.
That looks perfect.
Shall I book the tickets now for this bus?
No, not now. Will decide later.
How can I help you further?
I want you to proceed with the tickets booking of the flight that you have found for me. Make it for one person.
Please confirm to book 1 economy class ticket in the flight from Southwest Airlines from Las Vegas on March 12th to San Diego.
That is confirmed to proceed.
Your ticket was booked successfully with this one-way flight.
Thank you for your work.
Do you want any more help?
No, that's all for today.
Have a nice day.
Could you find me one-way flights of any class?
Where are you departing from?
I will be departing from Washington.
When and where do you plan to visit?
I will be leaving Thursday next week to NY.
There is an outbound American Airlines flight leaving at 6:05 am with 0 stops for $88.
The flight sounds nice, can you help me search for a bus there?
Will you plan to leave March 7th?
I will plan to leave on March 1st for 4 people.
I have 8 buses for you departing 8:10 am and costing $37 with 0 transfers.
That is good so can you book the flight you found?
Please confirm a flight from Washington to New York on American Airlines economy class on March 1st for 1 passenger.
Yes, that sounds very nice.
The oneway ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks so much for the help.
Can I assist you with anything else?
No, thanks so much.
Have a great day.
I am looking for flights.
From which location will you be travelling and to where? Also what date would you like to leave?
I am travelling from Seattle to Vancouver this Saturday.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight with 1 stop which leaves at 3:45 pm and cost $286 altogether.
What time will the flight arrive?
At 11:44 pm.
Which airport does it fly to?
It arrives at YVR International Airport.
Are there any other options?
There is an American Airlines flight with 1 stop leaving at 8:15 am costing $279 in total.
That flight suits me fine
Would you like to purchase tickets?
not now.
Can I assist you with anything else?
Can you check for a bus going there?
Will you be leaving on March 2nd?
I will leave on the 14th.
There is a bus with 0 transfers leaving at 6:40 am costing $28.
What bus station does it depart from and arrive at?
It leaves from King Street Station and arrives at Pacific Central Station.
Are there any other buses?
There is one leaving aat 7:40 am with 0 transfers costing $27.
anything else? It will be for two passengers.
There are 7 options for you. One departs at 8:40 am with 0 transfers costing $22.
That suits fine.
Would you like me to purchase tickets?
No not now.
Can I assist you with anything else?
Can you book the flight we discussed earlier?
To confirm then you want 1 economy ticket from Seattle to Vancouver, travelling on March 14th with American Airlines.
Yes that all suits fine. Can I refund the ticket if need be and which airport will I arrive at?
Unfortunately I was unable to make that booking. What else can I do for you?
No nothing thanks for your assistance.
Have a good day.
Can you get me a premium economy ticket on a one way flight to San Francisco?
Sure, where are you leaving from and when?
Las Vegas on the 14th.
I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that departs at 10:55 am and costs $151.
Look for 4 tickets on another flight.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight with 0 stops departing at 9:55 am for $159 per ticket.
What else did you find?
I found a United Airlines flight with 0 stops that departs at 3:05 pm for $162.
Great, can you look for buses there instead?
For March 14th?
No, the 2nd of March.
Yes, there's a bus with 0 transfers leaving at 10:50 am that costs $58.
Great, can you book that flight from earlier?
Sure, please confirm you'd like 4 premium economy tickets for the United Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco departing March 2nd.
Yes, can I get my money back on the ticket? And which airport does it leave from?
I've confirmed your ticket, but its not refundable. You're leaving from McCarran International Airport.
Great, thanks again.
Anything else I can do right now?
Nope, that's everything.
Have a great day.
Can you locate some one-way flights for me?
Where will you be departing from, what place are you planning to visit, and when do you want to leave?
I am departing from Las Vegas on the 14th and going to Los Angeles.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:30 am with 0 stops. The price of the ticket is $76.
That flight sounds fine to me. Can you help me in searching for a bus that goes there?
Are you planning to leave on March 14th?
I want to leave on 13th of March.
The bus will leave at 7:20 am, it has 0 transfers, and the cost is $38.
That sounds fine. Are you able to book the flight that you located?
Confirm these details please: this American Airlines flight goes from Las Vegas to Los Angeles on March 13th. There will be 1 passenger in economy.
Yes that sounds fine. Which airport is this flight going to?
Sorry, I was unable to book the ticket. Do you need help with anything else?
No, thanks very much for your help.
Have a great day.
Please help me find one-way flights for three people.
Where are you going and where you coming from?
I plan to go to NY from Washington.
When are you leaving?
On 5th of March.
How about American Airlines for only $84 with outbound flight leaves at 6:05 am and with 0 stops.
Any other available flights? I want to leave on 13th of this month.
I got 1 at Southwest Airlines for only $98 with an outbound flight leaves at 4:50 pm and it has 0 stops.
Which airport does it depart?
From Dulles International Airport.
Is the ticket refundable?
No.
Okay, flight is good to me.
Will I buy you tickets now?
Not now.
Anything else I can help you with?
Please help me find a bus going there for 1 people on March 7th.
I found 8 buses and pne departs at 8:10 am for only $38. It has 0 stops.
That's good.
Will I buy you tickets now?
No.
Anything else I can help you with?
Please book me a flight.
Okay, you want 3 economy seat at Southwest Airlines going to New York from Washington and the departure date is March 7th. Please confirm.
Yes.
Ticket confirmed!
When and which airport does the flight arrive?
At 6 pm, on JFK International Airport.
Thank you.
You are welcome.
Find me a one-way flight.
Where and when are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing San Fran on March 3rd and heading to SD.
Search revealed 5 results. There is an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops that departs at 6:10 am and costs $103.
That works for me. Can you find a bus that goes there on the 4th of March for 2 people?
There is a bus with 0 transfers that departs at 11 am and costs $44.
What else can you find?
There is a bus with 0 transfers that leaves at 1:40 pm and costs $56.
That works for me.
Shall I get you bus tickets?
No, not right now, but I do what to book 2 tickets for the flight you found earlier.
You want 2 Economy seats on Alaska Airlines from San Francisco to San Diego on March 4th. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your flight is booked.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Can you find one-way flights for me?
Sure. Do you have a departure date?
Yes, I want to leave on the 3rd.
What is your departure city and destination city?
I am leaving form Los Angeles and going to San Diego.
I found 4 flights for you. One on Alaska Airlines that leaves at 7:30 am. There are 0 stops and the ticket costs $65.
Can you find me something in Economy?
I found 3 suitable flights. Would you like to try the 7:40 am American Airlines flight? There are 0 stops and the ticket costs $63.
Anything else?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 3:25 pm. It has 0 stops and costs $70.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to book tickets?
Not now, maybe later. How about searching for a bus? I want to leave on the 1st and would need 1 ticket.
I found you 10 buses. One departs at 7:40 am, has 0 transfers and costs $27.
Sounds good.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No, I don't. Not now.
Is there anything else that I can help you with today?
Can you book that flight that you found? I need four tickets.
Confirming that you want 4 Economy tickets on the Southwest Airlines flight from Los Angeles to San Diego. The flight departs on March 1st. Is this correct?
Yes, sounds good. Can I get my money back for these tickets?
Sorry, the tickets are not refundable. I have confirmed your tickets.
Thank you for helping me.
Is there anything else?
No. Thank you.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
I want you to help me find a one-way flight which leaves from Washington.
Can you tell me where you want to arrive at?
I want tickets for three people, and my destination is Philly.
Can you tell me when are you planning to leave?
I want to leave for my trip on the 2nd.
There are 3 flights which suits what you want. One of the flights is with American Airlines with 1 stop, which leaves at 8 am. The ticket for this flight costs $133.
Is there some other flight you can suggest?
Another flight is with Southwest Airlines which has 1 stop and it leaves at 4:50 pm. The cost of this flight ticket is $140.
This flight seems nice to me.
Are you willing to buy tickets for this flight?
Some other time. I want to find a bus to go there. I will be leaving on March 1st.
There are 8 bus which you might like. One of the buses leaves at 7:10 am, it has 0 transfers, and the ticket costs $30.
Is there some other bus which you can recommend? I will leave for my trip on Sunday this week.
There are 7 buses which might suit your needs. One of the bus leaves at 7:50 am, and it has 0 transfers. The ticket for this bus costs $28.
Can you tell me the bus station where I will arrive at?
The bus station where you will arrive is Intercity Terminal.
Can you tell me the bus station from where I will be leaving?
The station from where the bus will depart is Union Station?
That seems nice to me.
Are you interested in buying tickets for this bus?
No, I don't want to have tickets booked for this bus.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Is it possible for you, to book me the flight you mentioned earlier?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy flight tickets for 3 people for the Southwest Airlines flight which leaves from Washington on March 3rd to go to Philadelphia?
That seems nice to me.
Your requested one-way ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help.
Is there something else I can do to help you?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a good time!
Find for me please a one way flight.
Tell me from where you plan to leave and where,
I prefer to leave on 4th of this month at Premium Economy to San Diego.
Where you want to visit?
I want to go to Vegas.
With Alaska Airlines with 0 stop at 10:45 pm and the cost $143.
Tell me when does the onward flight arrive?
Will arrive at 11:59 pm.
That sounds very good.
You want tickets for this one?
Thanks but not now.Maybe later.
With anything else I can help?
Serch for me a bus that is go there on 7th of this month.
1 bus is available that departs at 6:50 pm with 0 transfers.Cost is $40.
Tell me at witch bus station will arrive and what is the bus station from where I will leaving.
Origin station is Santa Fe Depot and destination station is Union Plaza.
That is very good.
With something else I can help you?
Yes buy for me tickets at the flight that you found.
From San Diego to Las Vegas with Alaska Airlines.Flight will depart in March 7th.You want 1 ticket at Premium Economy.
Great but I also need to know at which airport will arrive the flight.
Ticket was confirmed.McCarran International Airport is the destination.
Ticket is refundable?At which airport does the flight depart from?
Yes the ticket is refundable.Will departs from SAN International Airport.
Thank yo very much.
Can I don something for you?
No.Thank you very much.
Have a great day!
Find me a one way flight on Sunday this week
From where do you leave?
From Portland, OR
What is the destination?
The destination is Vancouver
There are 4 flights. How about Alaska Airlines that leaves at 10:10 am and has 1 stop. the cost is $267
Where does it depart from? The ticket is refundable or not?
The departure place is PDX International Airport. The ticket is not refundable
Is there any other flights?
How about American Airlines at 10:45 am and has 1 stop. the cst is $216
Is there any other? I like united airlines and there are 3 people
How about united airlines at 10:35 am and has 1 stops. the cost is $229
That's nice one. Look for a bus there for one people n the 14th
How about the bus at 6:50 am and has 0 transfers. the cost is $40
Is there any other bus?
How about the one at 8:10 am and has 0 transfers. the cost is $39
From where does the bus leave?
It leaves from Portland Bus Station
Where is the reaching station
It is Pacific Central Station
Do you have any other buses?
How about the one at 10:20 am and has 0 transfers. The cost is $37
That's good. Now book the flight.
Please confirm this: the flight is from portland. the flight goes to vancouver. the airlines is united airlines. the departure date is march 14th and the number of passengers is 3. the seating is economy
That's perfect
The ticket confirmed successsfully
Where does the flight arrive
It is YVR international airport
Thank you so much
Do you need anything else
No that's all for now
Have a nice day
I need to look for one way flights that depart out of San Diego.
Where will you be traveling to?
I will be going to Las Vegas?
What date will you leave on?
I'm going to leave on the 8th of March. Any airline is fine.
There are 4 flights that you. Alaska Airlines has a flight that leaves at 10:45 pm with 0 stops that costs $88 per ticket.
What time does the flight arrive at the destination?
The flight arrives at 11:59 pm at the destination.
Okay, that works for me. Can you help me look for a bus that goes there?
Will you leaving on March 8th?
I'm going to leave on the 13th.
There is 1 bus that matches. The bus leaves at 6:50 pm with 0 transfers and is $37.
And what's the destination station?
The destination of the bus is Union Plaza.
Okay, that works.
Do you want to purchase bus tickets?
No, I won't be buying bus tickets. I want to book the flight we were talking about.
Okay, please make sure these details are correct, You want 1 Economy ticket on Alaska Airlines for San Diego to Las Vegas on March 13th?
Yeah, that's it.
I'm sorry but the ticket could not be booked. Can I do anything else for you?
No, thanks anyway for the help.
Have a terrific day.
I want to go for a short trip and for which I need to search for one-way flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
Yes, what is your present location to search for the flight and let me know about the starting date of your travel plan.
I want to search the flight from LA on 3rd of this month.
To which place you are planning to visit?
I have planned to visit Vegas, search for the flights to this place.
What about an outbound flight with Alaska Airlines which leaves at 8:20 pm with 0 stops under ticket price $79?. How about your opinion?
Can you search whether the ticket to this flight is refundable or not?
I have searched and found that the tickets are not refundable. Shall I search with any other flight?
No, this flight will be a good one for me. Thanks.
Okay, that's great. Shall I book the tickets to this flight?
No, not now, will decide later. I need your help to search for a bus to go there.
Shall I search for the bus which leaves on March 3rd?
No, please search for it on 8th of this month.
What about a bus departs at 7:40 am with 0 transfers under the ticket cost $39?
I want to know the origin and destination stations of this bus to decide further.
This bus will leave from Union Station and will reach to Union PLaza. Hope that is okay to you.
Yes, it's okay for me.
Shall I book the tickets to this bus now?
No, we will continue with the tickets booking for the flight that you have found for me.
Please confirm to book 1 Economy class ticket in a Flight with Alaska Airlines from Los Angeles on March 8th to Las Vegas.
That's nice. What about the origin and destination Airports for this flight.
Sorry, unfortunately I could not book the tickets. How can I help you further?
No, that's enough. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can you imagine visiting Canada for the first time and meeting up with your pen pal? Some help from savvy you to set up an Economy trip would be a big relief, you know?
I get it. What date do you want to fly out?
I'm excited to leave on March 13th, please.
What airport do you want for that and what part of Canada are you visiting?
I need to fly out of Seattle and go to Vancouver.
The current schedule shows an Alaska Airlines flight with 1 stop, leaving at 3:45 pm for a ticket total of $273.
Okay, what about United Airlines? I can get some more mileage points with them.
I see that United Airlines is offering 1 flight that'll make 1 stop, leaving at 12:30 pm for a ticket total of $258.
That's a nice one.
Are you ready to purchase tickets now?
Not at the moment. Let's compare that with a bus ride to Vancouver?
Is your departure date still March 13th?
Well, I would have to catch the bus on next Thursday, please.
All right. Of the 9 current bus options, you can get a bus that'll make 0 transfers, leaving at 6:40 am for $27.
Hmm, that's another nice one.
Are you going to purchase bus tickets?
You know what? I think I'll sit on that information for a bit and let you know.
Would you like more information?
Oh, wait, let's go back to the flight information you have, please, and change the departure date to March 7th?
Sure. I can set up an Economy ticket for 1 passenger on United Airlines, leaving Seattle on March 7th, going to Vancouver. Do you want to confirm that?
Yes, I'll go with that one. What's the arrival time in Vancouver?
Oh, apologies. Tickets for that flight are not available at this time. Would you like to try something else?
Nope, that's all good information, though. We can try again later. That's all for now. Thanks a million.
Certainly. Enjoy you day.
I'm due to go on a business trip, can you help me search for one-way flights?
When and from where will you be flying?
I'll fly from Seattle, WA on the 5th.
Where are you visiting?
I'm going to Vancouver, BC.
There are 5 options. I would recommend an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 3:45 pm, with 1 scheduled stop, at a cost of $291.
Its the ticket refundable? Which airport will it arrive at?
It is refundable, and the flight will arrive at YVR International Airport.
I like the sound of that.
Shall I buy tickets for the flight?
Not yet. First can you see if there are any better option for travelling by bus, on 4th of March.
There are 9 options in total. There is a bus departing at 6:40 am, with 0 transfers, at a cost of $26.
What else is available, bearing in mind there will be 4 people traveling.
Of the 8 other options, I would recommend a bus leaving at 7:40 am, with 0 transfers, at a cost of $24.
Which bus station is it traveling to?
That would be Pacific Central Station.
I like the sound of that.
Shall I buy tickets for the bus?
No, not right now.
So what else can I help you with?
I think I'll go ahead and book the flight to get to Vancouver.
Okay, so to confirm, I'll book 1 economy ticket for an Alaska Airlines flight from Seattle to Vancouver, leaving on March 4th. Correct?
Yes, go ahead. Which Seattle airport will I need to go to? When will I arrive in Vancouver?
The ticket has been purchased. You'll need to go to Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, and you'll arrive in Vancouver at 11:44 pm.
Thanks a lot, that's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you please find me some one-way flights?
Sure, but first please tell me your departure as well as your destination.
I'm flying out of Vegas to San Francisco.
When do you want to fly?
I plan on flying on March 13th.
I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops, taking of 10:55 am with tickets priced at $108.
Can you please tell me the destination airport.
Sure, it lands at SFO International Airport.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to get you tickets for this flight?
Not at the moment.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Please look for bus tickets for 3 people going there, leaving Sunday this week.
Sure, there's a bus with 0 transfers departing at 10:50 am costing $51.
Please tell me the departure and destination stations.
You will be departing from Union Plaza, arriving at Salesforce Transit Center.
Any other buses available on that day?
There's also another bus with 0 transfers, departing at 12:50 pm. This one costs $50.
Any other buses available on that day?
There's also another bus with 0 transfers, departing at 2:40 pm. This one costs $55.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to purchase tickets for you?
No, not at the moment.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, please book the previously found flight.
Can you please confirm that you want 1 Economy class ticket for the American Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 3rd.
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me if the ticket is refundable and also from where does it depart?
I've successfully booked your ticket, which is refundable. The departure airport is McCarran International Airport.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, not at the moment. Thanks again.
Have a nice day!
I'd like to find a flight to SFO.
Where will you be departing from?
I'd like to fly from LAX
When are you planning to fly?
I'd like to leave on March 13th and would like to take a United Airlines flight if possible.
I have found a United Airlines flight with 1 stop leaving at 8:05 am. The total costs for a ticket is $176.
Perfect. I like the sound of that.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Not right now thanks. I'd like to look at other transport options for the same destination like a bus for 1 person.
Will you be leaving in March 13th?
I'm planning to leave on March 6th.
There is a bus that leaves at 6:20 am and it has 0 transfers. The total cost for a ticket is $53.
Which bust station does the bus leave from and arrive at?
The bus leaves from Union Station and arrives at Salesforce Transit Center.
Okay great. I'd like to book the flight now please.
Sure no problem. So you'd like 1 Economy ticket to the United Airlines flight from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 6th.
Yes that's correct
Would you like help with anything else?
No thanks that's everything for now.
Enjoy your day.
I need help finding 2 ticket for a one-way flight?
Sure, what is your departure and destination city?
I need a flight from NYC to Washington.
What day will you be departing?
March 8th is my departure date.
There are 4 flights that match your criteria. The first is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that departs at 10:55 am and costs $95 per ticket.
Okay. Can you find a bus that goes there on the 9th of March?
There are 8 buses available. This first leaves at 6 am, has 0 transfers, and costs $33.
Wonderful.
Would you like to purchase a bus ticket now?
No, not right now.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Yes, I want to book economy tickets for the flight you found.
OK, please confirm you would like to purchase 2 economy tickets on American Airlines from New York to Washington on March 9th.
Yes, book the flight.
Alright, your flight tickets have been confirmed.
Thanks, that's all for now.
Have a nice trip.
Can you search one-way flight for me?
Where do you want to go?
I am going to Philadelphia
From where you are leaving and on what date?
I am leaving on this Sunday from New York City.
There is a American Airlines flight leaving at 7:55 am with 0 stops and cost of ticket is $64
This is perfect for me.
Are you like to buy tickets for it?
No, may be later on. Could you help me search for a bus going there?
Are you leaving on March 3rd ?
I am moving on 4th of March
I have selected 7 buses of your choice and one bus leaves at 7:40 am with 0 stop and costing $23
What is my destination station?
Intercity Terminal is the destination station.
Can you find me some other available buses? For three people i want to book.
I have selected 6 buses of your choice and one bus leaves at 8 am with 0 transfers and costing $21
Can you find me some other available buses?
The bus starts at 11:30 am with 0 transfers and ticket cost is $22.
This is perfect
Are you like to buy tickets on this bus?
Sorry, i am not interested to book the tickets now. Could you reserve the flight that you found for me. I may change my decision. So, i want refundable tickets and three people are there in my group.
Please give confirmation details: The flight is American Airlines starting from New York and goes to Philadelphia on march 4th with economy class. The number of passenger is 3.
Yes. this is perfect.
One-way ticket of yous is confirmed.
Thanks a lot for the help.
Can i help you with anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
Have a great day.
I'm interested in getting a one-way flight.
What is the date you plan to leave?
I like Southwest Airlines best and will be heading out on the 2nd.
What are the locations that you will leave from and go to?
I will be heading out of Philadelphia and going to NYC.
I was able to find 1 flight that works for you. The flight is Southwest Airlines and the departing flight leaves at 7:45 am and has 0 stops. The ticket cost is $68.
That sounds like a flight that would work for me. Can you check out some buses that are heading there?
Is your leave date March 2nd?
I have intentions of leaving on the 9th of March.
I located 8 buses. There is a bus that leaves at 8:30 am, with 0 stops, and the price is $23.
That would be fine.
Would you like to purchase this bus ticket?
Naw, not right now. Will you go ahead and get me the flight you found?
Please verify the following information: There is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving from Philadelphia and heading to New York. It will leave on March 9th with 1 passenger in Economy class.
Sounds great. Can I get my money back on the ticket? When will the onward flight get there?
I have verified your one-way ticket. Sorry, the ticket isn't refundable. The onward flight will get there at 8:36 am.
Thanks so much for your assistance. That's it.
Enjoy the day.
Could you help me in searching one-way flights? Southwest Airlines is my preference. I am starting from Las Vegas.
When are you leaving? Where do you want to visit?
I am moving on 4th of March to LA.
It is a Southwest Airlines flight which starts at 2:35 pm and has 0 stops. The cost of the ticket is $85.
What about other flights? I prefer American Airlines.
I searched and find 1 flight for you. It is an American Airlines which leaves at 9:30 am with 0 stops. The cost of the ticket is $88.
It is good for me.
Shall I boo tickets?
It can be done later. Could you help me in searching a bus to go there on the 1st?
The bus starts at 7:20 am with 0 transfers and the its price is $42.
From which station I have to move?
The starting station is Union Plaza.
What is the name of the reaching station?
The reaching station is Union Station.
Is there other options available? I need it for three persons. I will leave on day after tomorrow.
I searched and found 3 buses for you. It starts at 10:20 am and has 0 transfers. It costs $48.
Is there other bus options available?
Bus starts at 11:50 am and has 0 transfers. It costs $33.
It is good. Could you please book the Economy ticket flight? I need it for 2 persons.
Kindly ensure that, on March 3rd, Economy class ticket has been booked for 2 persons in American Airlines from Las Vegas to Los Angeles.
Yes. It is good.
Your oneway ticket is booked.
Whether it is refundable?
Sorry. The ticket is not refundable.
From which airport the flight starts from?
The flight starts from McCarran International Airport.
Thank you for your help. That is what I want.
Have a nice day.
I have a plan on a short trip for which I am searching for one-way flights. Can you search for the one?
Yes, what is your planned City from which you want to leave?
Can you search for a flight with American Airlines from Seattle, WA?
I want more information to search quick. Let me know the date of departure and destination place of your visit.
I am planning to leave on March 4th to Portland, OR and I need to book 1 ticket for me. Can you search as per these details?
Found an outbound flight from American Airlines which leaves at 8:05 am with 0 stops and the ticket cost for the same is $72. Is that okay to you?
Yes, that flight suits to me. I need one more help that I need you to search for a bus for the date of 2nd of this month to go there.
Found a bus with departure time at 6:10 am with 0 transfers and the cost for which is $31.
Anything else in your list?
Yes, what about a bus with departure time at 6:30 am under cost $30 and it has 0 transfers.
That is the perfect one for me. I want to continue with the ticket reservation for the flight that you have searched and selected for me.
Need your confirmation to book 1 Economy class ticket in a flight from American Airlines from Seattle on March 2nd to Portland.
That is confirmed, go ahead. Was that ticket refundable?
No they are not refundable and your tickets for one-way flight was confirmed successfully.
To which Airport does the flight arrive and what is the origin Airport.
Origin Airport is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and the destination is PDX International Airport.
Thank you so much for your information.
How can I help you further?
No, nothing for now. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I need a one-way flight.
Where're you leaving from?
I'm heading out of SFO.
Where're you going?
I'm leaving for LA.
When're you leaving?
Just 1 person is going next Wednesday.
There's 4 flights that work out for you. Alaska Airlines has a 0 stop $96 trip leaving at 8:20 pm.
Can I get my money back?
It's not refundable.
What airports does it leave from and go to?
It heads out from SFO International Airport to go to LAX International Airport.
Sounds good. How about a bus there?
Plan on leaving March 6th?
I'm leaving Thursday next week.
There're 10 buses that work out. I've one with 0 transfers leaving at 7 am for $47.
Sounds good. I want to book that flight you were talking about.
Just to make sure, you want 1 Economy Alaska Airlines ticket from San Francisco to Los Angeles leaving March 7th.
Sounds good to me.
You're all set.
Thanks a lot.
Need any other help?
Not right now, thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
find one way flight
where and when will you go?
seattle, wa and going 4th of this month and going to portland
4 flights and one from american airlines and outbound leaves 8:05 am and 0 stops and the price is $72
flight sounds great
wanna get tickets?
maybe another time
anything else for you?
I will leave the 1st
6:10 am and it is $30 and has 0 transfers
that is all well
wanna get tickets?
No I do not
anything else for you?
book found flight
seattle to portland on american airlines on march 1st and 1 passenger and class is economy
is it a refundable ticket?
yes it is and it is not there yet
thanks, that is all
Have a good one
I will be traveling soon, I need to find a one way flight.
Where are you planning to go?
I will be going to SD.
When do you want to leave?
Look for something on March 6th.
From where do you want to leave?
From Las Vegas.
There are 4 possible flights you might like. There is an American Airlines flight that takes off at 7:15 pm with 0 stops. It has a price of $92.
That sounds great.
Do you want to book some tickets?
Before that I would like to also find a bus for SD.
Do you plan to leave also on March 6th?
Search for something on March 13th.
There is 1 bus you might like. There is a bus that departs at 3:50 pm and has a total cost of $33. It has 0 transfers.
Sounds great but I would like to book the flight.
Please confirm: Booking 1 economy class ticket from American Airlines. Departing from Las Vegas on March 13th and arriving to San Diego.
No, I will travel with some friends. Make it for four people and find some Premium Economy tickets.
Please confirm: Booking 4 premium economy class ticket from American Airlines. Departing from Las Vegas on March 13th and arriving to San Diego.
That is correct.
Your ticket has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great.
I want to search for one way flights?
Where will you be traveling from?
I'll be traveling from NY?
And where will you traveling to?
I'll be traveling to Washington.
When do you want to leave?
I want to leave today.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:55 am with 0 stops. It's $85 per ticket.
That just what I wanted.
Do you want me to get you a ticket?
Let's do that later.
What else can I help you with?
Let's search for buses. It's just 1 person, but I'm leaving today.
There are 8 buses that match. There's a bus that leaves at 6 am for $34 with 0 transfers.
What's the departure station?
The bus will depart from Port Authority Station.
And what's the arrival station?
The bus will arrive at Union Station?
What else is there?
There's a bus that leaves at 9:40 am for $43 with 0 transfers.
What about buses for the 5th of March. I want to leave then.
There's a bus that leaves at 11:10 am for $34 with 0 transfers.
That could work.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
No, that won't be necessary right now.
Do you need me to help with anything else?
Let's go back to that flight we were talking about. I want a ticket.
Please confirm this is what you want, 1 Economy ticket from New York to Washington on American Airlines leaving on March 5th.
Yes, that's what I want. What time does the flight leave, and what airport is it leaving from?
I'm sorry but the ticket is no longer available. Do you need me to do anything else?
No, thanks anyway.
Have a great rest of your day.
I would like to find a one way flight.
When would you like to travel?
I would like to leave on the 14th of March.
Where are you traveling?
I will be traveling to San Diego.
Where are you leaving from?
We are two people leaving from LA and would prefer to travel with Southwest Airlines.
There is 1 flight with Southwest Airlines that leaves at 3:25 pm ans has 0 stops for $63.
Can you get me a bus ticket to get there on March 11th?
The bus leaves at 7:40 am and the cost is $26 for 0 transfers.
That bus sounds good.
Do you want to purchase a ticket?
No, but can I book a flight?
Booking 2 economy tickets for Los Angeles to San Diego with Southwest Airlines on March 11th.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your tickets was purchased.
Thank you that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Can you look for one-way flights?
Which is the place you are leaving from?
I am moving from Las Vegas
Which place you are visiting and when are you departing?
I will be departing on 13th of this month and i am moving to Los Angeles and i need Economy class ticket
I have short listed 3 flights of your likings. One among them is Delta Airlines which leaves at 12:20 pm with 0 stops and ticket cost is $87
Are there any other flights available for me?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 2:35 pm with 0 stops and cost of ticket is $86
Are there any other flights available for me/
There is a United Airlines flight leaving at 12:05 pm with 0 stops and cost of ticket is $79
Which airport is the flight departing from and is there a ticket refund?
The flight is leaving from McCarran International Airport amd ticket is not refundable
That is fine
You need to buy tickets?
No, not now
Is there any other help?
Can you to look for a bus to go there?
Are you moving on March 13th?
I will be moving on 4th of this month
The bus leaves at 7:20 am and it has 0 transfers with cost at $36
Are there any other available buses?
The bus leaves at 10:20 am with 0 transfers and it costs $35
That is fine
You require to buy tickets?
No, but can you reserve flight you found for me?
Please give confirmation details: The flight is United Airlines departing on March 4th from Las Vegas to Los Angeles.I need 1 Economy class ticket
Fine.Which is the airport the flight arriving and when?
I am sorry as i failed to book the ticket.Can i help you in other thing?
No, thank you
Have a nice day
I am interested in having a ticket for a one-way flight.
Can you tell me from where will you leave, and where you want to arrive? When will you be leaving for the flight?
I will be departing from Vancouver on 3rd of March, and I want to arrive to Seattle, WA.
I have found an Air Canada flight which has 1 stop and leaves at 8:05 am. The ticket for this flight will cost you $243.
This flight suits me well.
Would you like to have tickets bought for this flight?
Some other time. I want to find a bus to go there though. I need the bus for four people, and I will be leaving on 9th of this month.
There is a bus with 0 transfers which leaves at 6:40 am, and it will cost you $27.
Can you tell me the bus station where I will arrive?
The station where you will arrive with the bus is King Street Station.
Can you tell me from which bus station will I leave?
The bus station from where you will leave is Pacific Central Station.
That seems nice. I would like to book a ticket for the flight you mentioned.
Can you please confirm that you want to have Economy class ticket for 1 person for the flight of Air Canada which leaves from Vancouver on March 9th, and arrives in Seattle?
That suits me well. Can you tell me the time when the flight will arrive in the destination? Can you check if the ticket is refundable?
Your requested one way flight ticket has been booked. Your flight is expected to arrive at the destination at 5:06 pm. I regret to say, but your ticket is not refundable.
I appreciate your help.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided.
Have a good time!
I am going from lax and going to san francisco and want delta airlines
when will you go>
the 10th of this month
delta airlines 1 flight at 9:15 am and has 0 stops for $90
where does it depart from?
flight arrives 10:40 am and departs LAX international airport
help me get a bus for four people leaving next wednesday
bus leaves at 6:20 am and is $53 and has 0 transfers
what is the bus station?
union station is the station
which bus station is it?
it is salesforce transit center
book flight you found
Los angeles to san francisco with delta airlines and is leaving march 6th with 1 passenger and it is the economy class
yes that is good
one way ticker is good
what airport does it arrive at?
it is sfo international airport
thanks a lot
have a good one
I need help looking for one way flights. I want Premium Economy, just 1 ticket.
Where will you be leaving from and going to? And what date is this for?
I want to leave on next Thursday. I'll be going to Atlanta from San Diego.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight. It departs at 3:20 pm and has 1 stop. The ticket cost is $406.
Where is it arriving to?
It will arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
What other flights are there. Try to look for flights going to San Francisco.
There's an American Airlines flight. It departs at 9:20 pm and has 0 stops. The ticket cost is $175.
Is it a refundable ticket. What time does the it arrive?
It arrives at 11 pm and you cannot refund the ticket.
Okay, that's good for me.
Do you need help with anything else?
Looks for buses that go there.
Would you like to depart on March 7th?
No, I'm going to leave on the 3rd.
There are 6 buses that match. There's a bus that leaves at 7:40 am with 0 transfers. It costs $60.
What else is there? Check for buses that leave on the 10th of this month.
There are 5 buses that match. There's a bus that leaves at 10 am with 0 transfers. It cost $61.
What the departure station.
The departure station is Santa Fe Depot.
Okay,t hat can work. Let's go back to flights, I want to book a ticket.
The 1 Premium Economy seat on the American Airlines flight from San Diego to San Francisco leaving on March 10th, is this the flight you want to book?
Yeah, that's the one. What are the departure and arrival airports?
I've booked the ticket. The departure airport is SAN International Airport and the arrival airport is SFO International Airport.
Thanks for all your help.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing else, thanks again.
Have a terrific day.
I need to find a one way flight to go with some friends.
Where are you leaving from and what is your destination? When do you want to depart?
Search for something from Vancouver, BC to Seattle on the 9th of March.
There are 3 flights you might like. There is a flight from Air Canada that takes off at 4:45 pm and has 1 stop. It has a total cost of $263.
That sounds great but is there any bus available for one person on March 10th for the same place?
There is a bus that departs at 6:40 am and has 0 transfers. It has a cost of $30.
What other buses are there?
There is also a bus that departs at 8:10 am with 0 transfers. It has a cost of $27.
Sounds great but I think I prefer the flight. Can you book it?
Please confirm: Booking 1 economy class ticket from Air Canada departing from Vancouver with destination to Seattle on March 10th.
That is correct.
The ticket has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I would like to find a one-way flight with Delta Airlines.
Where would you like to visit?
I am traveling to SFO. I want a flight with United Airlines.
When would you like to depart?
I am leaving on the 9th of March and like traveling to Premium Economy.
When will you be leaving?
I plan to leave from Las Vegas.
There is 1 suitable flight which matches your selection. This is an United Airlines flight, set to depart at 3:05 PM. It has 0 stops and the ticket price is $183.
Is this ticket refundable? From which airport will this flight to depart from?
Unfortunately this ticket is not refundable. The flight is set to depart from McCarran International Airport.
That flight's cool with me.
Would you like to purchase these tickets now?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else that I may help you with?
I need a bus that goes there. I want to leave on the 1st of March.
The bus will depart at 10:50 AM and will cost $55, with 0 transfers.
OK, that sounds good. Can you get me that flight?
Please confirm the following information: The flight is set to depart on March 1st from Las Vegas to San Francisco. The airlines is United Airlines. This is 1 ticket that is Premium Economy. Is this correct?
Yeah, that sounds good.
Your one-way ticket is now confirmed.
Thank you for that, that's all that I wanted.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
I'm going on a trip soon and still haven't booked my flight! Can you look up one-way tickets for me?
Sure, where are you flying out from?
I'm going from LA to SFO.
And when are you leaving?
I'm planning on leaving the 6th of this month. I usually fly Premium economy by the way.
Ok, I found an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops for $153 that leaves at 12:05 pm. How about that one?
What else is there? I forgot to mention there will be three people in my group, and we don't care which airline.
Ok, I found 3 possible options. There's an American Airlines flight with 0 stops for $136 that leaves at 4:50 pm. How about that?
Yeah, that sounds good. Can you book a bus for us to get to the airport?
Sure. Would this be for March 6th then?
Yep, March 6th.
Ok, I found a bus for $53 with 0 transfers that leaves at 6:20 am.
Great. What station does it leave from and go to?
It goes from Union Station to Salesforce Transit Center.
Perfect. Before I forget, can you go back and book that flight you just found?
Sure. To confirm, you want to book 3 tickets in Premium Economy on the American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 6th. Is that right?
Yes, perfect. Which airport does it fly to, and is the ticket refundable?
I've booked your tickets - they're not refundable unfortunately. The plane will land in SFO International Airport.
Ok, that's fine. Thanks for your help.
No problem. Anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Sure, have a good day.
Could you help me find one-way flights? I'd like to leave from Washington on the 4th of this month. I'm only looking for refundable tickets as my plans may change.
Where did you want to visit?
I'd like to travel to Philadelphia.
I found 1 flight for you. An American Airlines flight with 1 stop departs at 8 am and the price is $123.
What is the departing airport and when will the onward flight arrive?
The flight will leave from Dulles International Airport and the onward flight will arrive at 11:36 am.
That flight will work for me.
Did you wish to buy tickets for this flight?
Possibly later.
Did you need help with anything else?
Could you also help me find a bus going there? It will be for two people and I am planning to leave on March 9th.
I found a bus with 0 transfers leaving at 7:10 am for $27.
Were there any other buses?
There is another bus with 0 transfers leaving at 7:50 am for $24.
That should work. Could you help me book the flight you found earlier? There are four people in my group and any class will be OK.
Please confirm you're booking an American Airlines flight for 4 from Washington to Philadelphia on March 9th in Economy class.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you, that will be all I need.
Have a great day.
find one way flights
where are you headed?
to seattle and leaving 9th of this month to portland, or
american airlines 4 flights 8:05 am 0 stops and $74
when does the onward arrive?
it comes at 9:03 am
is it refundable?
no it's not
I want delta airlines
delta airlines 1 7:55 am 0 stops $69
get me a bus there
leave march 9th
I will leave 11th of march
bus leaves 6:10 am and is $33 and 0 transfers
what station then?
portland bus station origin king street station
4 people 10th of this month
6:30 am $30 0 transfers 9 buses
that is good
wanna get tickets?
no I do not
anything else then?
book a flight
seattle to portland with delta airlines departing march 10th with 1 person in economy
yes is it refindable?
sorry it is not. anything else?
no thank you
have a good one
I need a one-way plane ticket.
Where are you departing and going to?
I want to travel in Premium Economy and want to depart from Washington and arrive in NYC.
What day to you want to depart?
Three people wish to depart Saturday this week.
American Airlines has a flight with 0 stops, departs at 6:05 am and costs $144.
What else can you find?
Southwest Airlines has a flight with 0 stops, departs at 5:45 pm and the flight costs $133.
That works for me. I need to find a bus to get there.
Are you departing on March 2nd?
I am departing next Monday.
There is a bus leaving at 8:10 am, has 0 transfers, and costs $38.
What else can you find?
There is a bus leaving at 8:20 am, has 0 transfers, and the total cost is $39.
That works for me. I need you to book the previous flight.
You want 3 Premium Economy seats on Southwest Airlines departing Washington on March 4th and arriving in New York. Is that right?
That is right.
Your flight is booked.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I want to find a one-way flight.
Can you tell me where you want to go?
I want to arrive in London, and I want to fly with Alaska Airlines.
Can you tell me from where you will leave for your flight?
I will be departing from Seattle, WA.
Can you tell me when will you be leaving?
I will be leaving for my flight on March 11th.
There is 1 flight which matches what you want. There is a flight of the Alaska Airlines which has 1 stop and leaves at 8:25 am. This ticket will cost you $362.
This flight seems nice to me. Can you please help me to buy the one-way ticket for the flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy an Economy flight ticket for 1 person for the Alaska Airlines flight which leaves from Seattle on March 11th and arrives in London?
That suits me well.
Your requested one-way flight ticket has been booked.
Can you tell me the name of the airport where the flight arrives, and the time when the onward flight is expected to arrive?
The flight will be arriving at the Heathrow International Airport. The onward flight is expected to arrive at 10:14 am.
I appreciate your help. I also will need a place to sleep there, so I want to find 1 room in a hotel.
How would you like stayint at 45 Park Lane, which has a rating of 4.7?
That's a great choice.
Would you like to book the room in this hotel?
No, I do not want to book the room now.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a good time!
Can you find me a one way flight from Chi-town?
Where are you headed?
To London, UK.
When are you planning on leaving?
Leaving later today.
I found 3 flights. There's an American Airlines flight with 1 stop departing at 4:30 am for $444.
Great, get me a one way ticket.
Just to confirm, you'd like 1 economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Chicago to London on March 1st?
Yes, is it refundable and what's the departure airport?
Your ticket is confirmed, and is not refundable. You'll be leaving from O'Hare International Airport.
Great, can you get me one room there?
There's 10 hotels I found. 45 Park Lane has a 4.7 rating.
What else is there?
The Abc Hyde Park Hotel has a 3.2.
What's the phone number and do they allow pets?
They don't. They can be reached at +44 20 7706 4660.
Great, that's all for now.
Have a good trip.
I will go visit some friends. Are there any one-way flights available?
When do you want to leave?
Search for just one ticket on the 8th of March.
From where will you leave?
From San Diego.
Where do you want to go?
I will go to Seattle
There are 4 flights you might like. There is a flight from Alaska Airlines that takes off at 11:10 am and has 1 stop. It has a cost of $220.
Is it refundable, my plans might change. At what time does it arrive?
The ticket is not refundable and the flight arrives at 4:21 pm.
That sounds great anyways.
Do you want to book a ticket?
Yes, please book one.
Please confirm: Booking 1 Economy class ticket from San Diego to Seattle by Alaska Airlines on March 8th.
That is correct. From which airport does it depart? And to which one it arrives?
The ticket has been booked. It leaves from SAN International Airport and it arrives to Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
I also need to find somewhere to stay, search for a hotel room please.
There is the Ace Hotel Seattle with a 4.5 rating.
What other options are there? I am looking for just one room.
There are 9 possible hotels. There is the Belltown Inn with a 4.2 rating.
What other options are there?
There is also the Best Western Plus Pioneer Square Hotel Downtown with a 4.2 rating.
That sounds great
Do you want to book the room?
No, not right now. That would be all.
Have a great day.
Help me find one way flights? I also prefer being in Economy.
Where are you heading to? What date will you be leaving? And where you be traveling from?
I'm heading to San Francisco from LA, and I want to leave on the 14th.
I've found an Alaska Airlines flight with a departure at 5:50 pm with 0 stops and is $99 per ticket.
That could definitely work. Can you purchase me four of those tickets?
Okay, please make sure this is correct, you want 4 Economy tickets on Alaska Airlines going from Los Angeles to San Francisco with a departure on March 14th?
Yeah, that's right. When does the departing flight arrive? And where does it arrive to?
I've purchased your tickets. The departing flight arrives at 7:15 pm at SFO International Airport.
Thanks for getting me the tickets. I want to look for hotels there.
There's the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco with a rating of 3.5.
What's the address of the hotel, and are pets allowed there?
The address is 749 Taylor Street and pets are not allowed.
That sounds excellent. That's all for now.
Okay, take care.
Could you help me find one-way flights from London, UK to LAX leaving today?
I found 3 flights for you. One flight is an American Airlines outbound flight with 0 stops leaving at 3:05 pm for $229.
What is the destination airport of the flight and is the ticket refundable?
The destination will be LAX International Airport but unfortunately it is not refundable.
Did you have any other available flights? I have 3 people in my group and I like Delta Airlines.
I found 1 flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines outbound flight leaving at 8 am with 1 stop for $393.
Sure, that works for me.
Did you want to buy tickets for this flight?
Yes, I'd like to buy it. I like to travel in Economy.
Please confirm you're booking a Delta Airlines Economy flight for 3 passengers from London to Los Angeles departing on March 1st.
Yes, that is correct.
Your ticket has been booked.
Thank you for your help. I'd also like to find a hotel there and I'd like to book 1 room.
I found 10 hotels for you. One hotel is Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills with a 4.4 rating.
Sounds good. That's all I'll need for now.
Have a nice day.
Hey, can you get me one one-way flight?
Sure, where from? Where and when will you leave? Where are you going?
I'd like to go from NYC to Chi-town next Friday.
Okay, how about an American Airlines flight with 0 stops? It departs at 5:25 am and costs $135.
Sounds perfect, thanks. Can you book my ticket?
Of course. Please confirm that you'd like 1 economy seat on the American Airlines flight departing New York for Chicago on March 8th.
That's perfect, thanks.
Okay, your ticket is confirmed.
Thanks a lot. Can you get me one room at a hotel in Chicago too?
Of course. How about the 4.3 rated Ac Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown?
Is there anything else?
How about Ace Hotel Chicago? It has a 4.6 rating.
Is there anything else? I need a pet-friendly place.
Okay, I found 8 compatible hotels. How about the 4.5 rated Aloft Chicago Downtown River North?
Where is it?
It's at 515 North Clark Street.
How can I contact them?
You can call them on +1 312-661-1000.
Great, thanks a lot.
That's okay, should I reserve the room?
No, not right now.
Okay, is there anything else?
No that's all.
Okay, see you.
I want one-way flight on American Airlines on the 9th of March.
Where are you going?Where are you leaving from?
I am traveling to Philadelphia from London.
I found 1 flight with American Airlines that leaves at 2:05 pm and has 1 stop. The cost of the ticket is $330.
That is perfect. Please buy me a ticket.
Leaving for Philadelphia from London on American Airlines on March 9th. 1 seat in economy reserved.
That is good. What airport am I leaving from?
You are leaving from Heathrow International Airport.
Thanks, I also need one hotel room.
I found Aka University City with a rating of 4.6.
Does it allow pets?
No, it does not.
What is the address and phone number?
The address is Cira Centre South, 2929 Walnut Street and the phone number is +1 215-372-9000.
Anything else? I need 3 rooms.
I found 9 options including Aloft Philadelphia Airport. The rating is 4.0.
That hotel is perfect.
Have a nice day.
My friend and I are going on a spontaneous trip! Can you book two tickets from Vancouver, BC for us?
Sure, where are you going?
We're going to go to Las Vegas.
Ok, and when are you leaving?
We want to leave on the 2nd of March.
Ok, I found 2 options. There's an Air Canada flight with 1 stop for $224 that leaves at 4:45 pm. How about that?
What else is there? And just Economy seats please.
I also found a Delta Airlines flight with 1 stop for $202 that leaves at 12:20 pm.
When does that one arrive at the destination?
It would arrive t 9:35 pm.
And which airport does it fly to?
It goes to McCarran International Airport.
What else is there? We'd be ok with upgrading to Premium economy.
Ok, I found 1 option. There's a United Airlines flight with 1 stop for $348 that leaves at 6:05 pm. How about that one?
That one sounds good. Can you book the flight for me?
Sure. To confirm, you want 2 tickets in Premium Economy on United Airlines from Vancouver to Las Vegas on March 2nd. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Ok, I've booked your tickets.
Great, thanks! Can you also look up hotels for me?
Sure. How about Best Western Plus Las Vegas West? It has a 4.3 rating.
That sounds fine.
Do you want to make a reservation?
No, not yet. That's all for now.
Ok, have a good day.
I need a one-way flight.
When would you like to leave?
I want to leave later today.
Where are you right now and where are you heading?
I will be traveling from Seattle, WA to Vancouver.
There are 5 suitable flights. There is an outbound flight on alaska airlines that leaves at 3:45 pm. There is 1 stop and it costs $275
Is there an earlier flight. I am heading to LA.
There is an outbound flight on american airlines that leaves at 8:15 am. There are 0 stops and it costs $129
Can I get an economy ticket on another flight?
There is an outbound flight on delta airlines that leaves at 8:45 am. There are 0 stops and it costs $139
which airport would the flight be leaving from?
It leaves from Seattle-Tacoma international airport.
That would be good. I need a ticket for a one-way flight.
You would like an economy ticket for 1 on a delta airlines flight from seattle to los angeles that leaves on march 1st at 6:30 am?
That would be great.
I have purchased the oneway ticket.
Thanks a lot. I would need a hotel to stay in when I get there.
How about ac hotel by marriott beverly hills? It has a rating of 4.4.
What is the address?
It is on 6399 wilshire boulevard.
Are pets allowed?
No, they are not.
That would be ideal.
Would you like to reserve a room?
No, not right now.
Do you require anything else?
No. Thanks very much.
Enjoy your day.
Could you find me a one-way flight?
Where are you wanting to leave from? And where are you going? What day do you want to leave?
I'd like to travel to Philadelphia. I'm leaving from Mexico City on the 7th.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 12:05 pm and has 1 stop. It costs $191.
Where is it leaving from? And where will it arrive?
It's leaving from Benito Juarez International Airport and will arrive at PHL International Airport.
Are there any other options?
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3 pm and has 1 stop. It costs $206.
Are there other options? I need one Economy ticket.
I have found 1 flight that might work. There's a United Airlines flight that leaves at 8:25 am and has 1 stop. It costs $224.
That sounds good to me. Can you help me buy a one way ticket?
Please confirm the following: You want 1 Economy ticket on a United Airlines flight that leaves Mexico City for Philadelphia on March 7th.
Yes, that will work.
The ticket has been bought.
When will the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 7:46 pm.
Thanks so much for your help!
Is there anything else?
I'd like to find a hotel there.
How does Aka University City sound? It has a 4.6 rating.
What's their phone number?
The number is +1 215-372-9000.
Does it allow pets? Where is it located?
It does not allow pets and is located at Cira Centre South, 2929 Walnut Street.
Is there any other options?
How does Aloft Philadelphia Airport sound? It has a 4.0 rating.
Is there anything other option?
How about Aloft Philadelphia Downtown? It has a 4.4 rating.
That's great. That'll be all.
Have a great day!
Can you find me a one way flight with southwest airlines on 12th of this month
Where are you traveling from and to?
i am traveling from washington to san francisco
I located a southwest airlines with 1 stop for $308 depart at 2:35 pm
ok that's perfect
do you want me to purchase the ticket
yes please
please confirm your booking for 1 ticket on economy with southwest airlines from washington to san francisco on march 12th
ok perfect, where is it leaving from
this will depart from dulles international airport
thank you, please also look for two hotel rooms that are pets friendly
i have 10 result for you. What about argonaut hotel with 4.4 rating
great
would you like to book the room
no that's it
anything else i can do for you
no
have a nice day
Can you book me a one-way flight?
Sure, what day and where to?
The 8th of this month and to Delhi
Where are you departing from?
Las Vegas
There's 4 flights available. How about an American Airlines flight that has 1 stop and leaves at 6:40 am for $370?
Great, there's 4 people and we want to travel economy.
Please confirm the details: 4 american airlines economy tickets from las vegas to delhi on march 8th.
Correct, when does the flight arrive and which airport will we be leaving from?
Your booking is confirmed and you'll be leaving from McCarran International Airport. Your flight arrives at 4:07 pm.
Awesome, I'll need a hotel.
How about the 4.4 rated Aloft New Delhi Aerocity?
Perfect, thanks.
Have a safe trip.
Can you help me in searching for one way flights?
When are you leaving and where do you start from?
I will be moving from LAX on March 5th
Which place are you visiting?
I will be moving to Seattle and there are only one person in my group
There is Alaska Airlines departing at 7:10 pm with 0 stops and cost of ticket is $127
I wanted Economy ticket to travel, are there any flights available?
There is American Airlines departing at 5:20 am with 0 stops and cost of ticket is $151
That is fin
Do you need to buy tickets?
yes i want to book ticket
Please give confirmation details: the flight is American Airlines departing from Los Angeles to Seattle on March 5th with ticket required 1 Economy Class
That is fine.What time flight arrives and which is the arrival airport?
Your oneway ticket is booked.The Destination is seattle-Tacoma International Airport and flight arriving at 8:07 am
Thanks a lot. I like to search a hotel there.
I searched 10 hotels of your choice. What is opinion about Ace Hotel Seattle with star rating 4.5?
Do you know anything else?
What about Belltown Inn with star rating 4.2?
Can i know the street address?
2301 3rd Avenue is the address.
Can i know the contact number? Does they welcome pets?
+1 866-525-4704 is the contact number. They allow pets.
This is cool.
Are you like to continue the hotel reservation?
No, i am not interested to book now.
Any more help you need?
No, thank you so much.
Have a nice day.
I will be traveling soon with some friends, can you find a one way flight?
From where will you be leaving?
I will leave from Delhi, India.
When do you want to fly?
Search for something on the 2nd of March.
What is your destination?
Want to go to San Francisco.
There is an American Airlines flight that has 1 stop. It departs at 9:20 am and has a cost of $391.
Sounds great, Please book 4 economy class tickets.
Please confirm: Booking 4 economy class tickets from American Airlines. Departing from Delhi with destination San Francisco on March 2nd.
That is correct.
The tickets have been booked.
Thanks a lot, I will also need some rooms. Please find two hotel rooms.
There are 10 hotels you might like. There is the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco with a 3.5 rating.
Thanks, that would be all for now.
Have a great day.
I'm needing a one-way flight.
Where do you want to leave from, and when?
Leave from CDMX on the 12th.
And where is the destination?
Going to Seattle, WA.
There is a $286 American Airlines flight with 1 stop. It leaves at 8:05 am.
Where does it depart from and where does it arrive?
Departing from Benito Juarez International Airport and arriving at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Alright, that works. Can you help me buy a one-way ticket?
Yes, please confirm the following. You want 1 Economy American Airlines ticket leaving on March 12th from Mexico City to Seattle. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct. Is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket has been confirmed. No, it is not refundable.
I also am going to need a hotel.
There is a 4.5 rated hotel called Ace Hotel Seattle.
Ok, cool. That's all I needed, thank you.
Enjoy your trip!
I would like a one-way flight on alaska airlines for the 1st of March.
When would you be leaving from?
I would be leaving SD.
Where is your destination?
I will be going to Sydney and I would prefer a premium economy seat.
Alaska airlines has an outbound fight that leaves at 11:10 am. There is 1 stop and it costs $472
Is there any other flights available? I do not trust that airline.
No there is none. Would you like me to assist you with something esle?
Can you try and see if there is a flight on United airlines?
Yes, there is 1 flight on United airlines. It leaves at 7:20 am. There would be 1 stop and the cost of the ticket is $461
That is much better. Go ahead and get me the ticket.
You would like 1 premium economy ticket for united airlines flight from san diego to sydney on March 1st?
Yes, that would work. Which airport would the flight be landing in? Would I be able to get a refund on the ticket if I change my mind?
I have ordered the oneway ticket. You would be let off at kingsford smith international airport. I do apologize, but the tickets are non-refundable.
Book 3 rooms for me at a hotel.
Would you like to book the rooms at 28 hotel sydney? It has a rating of 4.2
That is an excellent choice.
Would you like to reserve the room?
No, I don't.
Is there anything else?
No. I am ok here.
Enjoy your day.
Can you find me one way flights to Seattle leaving on Sunday this week?
Where are you departing from?
From Mexico City.
There's an American Airlines flight departing at 8:05 am with 1 stop for $284.
That one sounds good.
Should I get you tickets?
Yes, get me one.
Just to confirm, you'd like 1 economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from Mexico City to Seattle on March 3rd?
Yes, can I get my money back if I change travel plans? When does it arrive?
I've confirmed your ticket. Sorry, but it isn't refundable. It arrives at 2:47 pm.
Great, can you find me one hotel room that allows pets at my destination?
There's the Ace Hotel Seattle with a 4.5 rating.
That one is great, thanks.
Should I book the room for you?
No, not yet.
Anything else you need/
Nope, thanks again.
Have a good one.
I need a one-way flight, can you help me out?
When will you board the plane, and where will you be leaving from?
I will leave from Phoenix on Friday next week, I will need 4 tickets for my group.
What is your destination?
Me and my group are planning on going to Las Vegas.
There are 2 suitable flights for you, are you interested in a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 3:05 pm, with 0 stops and a ticket price of $85?
I prefer flying American Airlines, is there any flights available next Monday?
There is 1 suitable flight, it is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:25 am, it has 0 stops and a ticket price of $90, would that be acceptable?
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase tickets now?
Sure, buy me 4 economy tickets.
You wish to purchase 4 economy tickets for an American Airlines flight to Las Vegas from Phoenix, that will depart on March 4th was that all correct?
That is all correct, can you tell me when the flight will arrive at its destination?
The onward flight arrives at 7:39 am, and the tickets have been confirmed.
Thanks for the help, can you also find me a hotel there that allows pets?
From 4 hotels, can I interest you in a 4.3 rated hotel, the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West?
Can you give me the contact number, and its street address?
The hotel is located at 8669 West Sahara Avenue, you can contact the hotel at +1 702-256-3766.
Great, that is all I needed, thank you.
Your welcome, have a good day.
I have a plan on short trip for which I want to search for an one-way flight. Can you help to search for the one?
Yes, I want to know the start and end place of your trip starting date so that I can short list the search as per your taste.
I am planning to visit New York City for which I need a flight from LAX on Sunday this week.
Found 5 results that suit your requirement. What about an outbound flight from Alaska Airlines which leaves at 9:30 am and it has 0 stops? For your information the cost of ticket is $236.
What is the name the Airport to which the flight will arrive and also check whether the ticket is refundable or not?
Sorry, it is not possible for the refund of ticket there and the destination Airport is JFK International Airport.
Do you have anything else in your list?
Yes another one outbound flight in American Airlines which leaves at 6:20 pm and it has 0 stops. The cost of ticket is $196. Is that convenient to you?
That is perfect. I want to book the tickets in that flight under Economy class. Can you help to book it for me?
Yes, I need your confirmation to book 1 Economy class ticket in the flight from American Airlines which leaves from Los Angeles on March 3rd and goes to New York.
That is okay to proceed further and also let me know the Airport to which the flight will arrive.
The destination Air port is JFK International Airport. I have confirmed your tickets successfully.
What is the name of origin Airport?
It is LAX International Airport from the the flight will leave.
Thank you for your help to find the flight and also help me to book 1 room in a hotel which will allow pets with me.
What about 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge with rating 4.5.
That is okay and that's all for now. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
I would like to find a one way flight in economy.
Where ar you traveling from and to, when do you plan to leave?
I am traveling from Toronto to SF on March 9th.
Air Canada has a flight with 1 stop that leaves at 1:25 pm for a ticket price of $283.
At which airport does the onward flight arrive and at what time?
You will arrive at SFO International Airport at 8:11 pm.
That flight works!
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, please book a ticket.
Please confirm 1 economy tickets on Air Canada traveling from Toronto to San Francisco on March 9th.
That is right. What is the departing airport and is my ticket refundable?
Your ticket has been confirmed and it is not refundable. Your flights departs from Toronto Pearson International Airport.
I would also like to search for a pet-friendly hotel.
The Argonaut Hotel has a 4.4 ratinig.
Please give the the address and phone number.
They are located at 495 Jefferson Street and may be reached at +1 415-563-0800.
What else is there?
The Bei Hotel San Francisco has a rating of 2.6.
Great. That is all I need right now.
Enjoy the day!
Can you book a one-way flight for me?
I sure can. Where and when will you leave?
I'll be leaving Atlanta on March 14th.
And where will you be headed?
To SD.
Okay. I found 3 flights that could work. This 1 stop $267 Delta Airlines flight leaves 6:50 am might do you well.
Not so sure. What other options are available?
There's also this 1 stop $252 Southwest Airlines flight, which leaves at 12:05 pm.
Can I get a refund on the ticket if my plans fall through? At what airport will it arrive at?
I'm sorry to say you can't get a refund. It'll arrive at SAN International Airport.
Alright. Sounds good. Can you get me a one-way ticket?
Sure. You want 1 economy ticket Southwest Airlines flight from Atlanta to San Diego on March 14th?
Yes, I do.
I confirmed your ticket.
At what airport will the airplane leave, and when will the onward flight arrive?
It exits from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, and the onward flight shall come at 3:45 pm.
Thanks for the help.
Can I help you any further?
Yeah, find a hotel for me to stay at. 3 rooms, please.
Okay. I found 10 hotels you could stay at. Want to try out Bahia Resort Hotel? It has a rating of 4.3.
Any other options?
You might like Best Western Mission Bay, which has a rating of 3.8.
Oh, that's great. That's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me find a one-way economy flight from Los Angeles to Sydney, NSW.
When do you plan on leaving?
I'd like to leave on the 13th of this month
Theres an American Airlines flight departing at 5:05 am with 0 stops. Ticket price is $182.
At which airport and what time will the onward flight be arriving?
The onward flight will be arriving at 4:32 am at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
That sounds great to me, I'd like to go ahead and purchase a ticket.
You'd like to purchase 1 economy ticket with American Airlines for a flight From Los Angeles to Sydney departing March 13th is this correct?
Yeah, is the ticket refundable by any chance?
Your one-way ticket has been purchased, sorry but it is not refundable.
Alright thanks. I'd also like to find a hotel there too.
There are 10 hotels nearby, What do you think about 28 Hotel Sydney it has a 4.2 rating.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to make a reservation at the hotel?
No, thats all I needed for now.
Have a great day.
Can you help me book a one way flight?
Sure, where are you leaving from and when and where are you going?
I'm going from Chicago to NY on March 3rd.
Great, I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops departing at 12:30 PM for $128.
Where does it fly into and is the ticket refundable?
No, its a nonrefundable ticket. You'll be landing in JFK International Airport.
What else is there, check something leaving from Kuala Lumpur.
There's a Delta Airlines flight with 1 stop departing at 0:15 am for $490.
Great, can you get 4 one way tickets on that flight on any class?
Just to confirm, you'd like to buy 4 economy tickets on the Delta Airlines flight from Kuala Lumpur to New York departing on March 3rd?
Yes, what airport does it fly into and when does it get there?
I've reserved your flight. You'll arive at 6:01 pm at JFK International Airport.
Thanks, can you also help me find 1 hotel room at my destination?
I found 10 you may like. How about 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge with a rating of 4.5?
Do they allow pets by any chance?
Yes, they do.
Where is it?
The address is 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn.
Great, that works.
Should I reserve your room?
No, not yet. That's all for now.
Have a good rest of your day.
I need a one-way flight.
Can you give me your departure point, departure date, and destination?
I'm going from Las Vegas to LA on March 8th.
There is a Delta Airlines flight for $78 leaving at 12:20 pm with 0 stops.
That one sounds good. I want to buy a one-way ticket.
So you want 1 Economy ticket for the Delta Airlines flight from Las Vegas to Los Angeles leaving on March 8th. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. Which airport does it leave from?
Your one-way ticket is confirmed. It leaves from McCarran International Airport.
Is the ticket refundable?
Sorry, no, it's not refundable.
Thanks. I also need a hotel there.
I found 10 hotels. The Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills has a 4.4 rating.
What's the address? Does it allow pets?
It's at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard. Pets are not allowed.
That's perfect. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I need to visit a friend on the 4th of March.
Where do you want to visit your friend?
He stays at Chicago.
When do you like to leave?
I will be coming from SFO. My flight should be after my meeting.
There's 5 flights that I found, one is from Alaska Airlines that will leave at 1:35 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $156.
Hoping it is from the nearest airport air, will it be?
Yes, you will depart from SFO International Airport.
That's good to know. Can you assist me in booking economy tickets for four persons?
Sure, please check the details here: you will be traveling from San Francisco to Chicago and you prefer economy ticket from Alaska Airlines for 4 persons that will leave on March 4th.
Yes, everything is good.
Booking ha sbeen confirmed.
Thanks! When will we arrive at Chicago? Is it refundable?
The ticket is not refundable and you will be at Chicago around 8:22 pm.
Thanks again. Can you please assist me in booking 1 hotel room for our stay there?
Sure, there's 10 nice hotels there/ One of it is AC Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown with 4.3 rating.
I heard that's a nice hotel. Do you have their phone number?
Here is their phone number; +1 312-981-6600.
How about other hotels?
Do you like Ace Hotel Chicago with 4.6 rating?
What's their phone number too and do they allow pets?
Here is their phone number; +1 312-764-1919 and yes they allow pets.
God to hear, I will be bringing Snow with me. Thanks! That's all I need.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I'm so glad you have the info I need to get a Premium Economy flight so I can meet up with my cousins with the least amount of stress. Are you ready to assist me with finding a one-way flight, please?
I'm ready. Where are you going?
A trip to Phoenix is what I want.
What's the date you want to go there?
I'd like to fly out on the 13th of this month.
And, what's the city you want for your departure?
I want to fly out of Atlanta, GA.
Okay. I'm showing 3 flight options for you, including a flight on Delta Airlines with 0 stops, departing at 6:50 am for $260.
What's the destination airport and arrival time, please?
The flight is scheduled to land at the Sky Harbor International Airport at 8:02 am.
I like that option.
Are you ready to book tickets for that flight?
Yes, I believe so.
Okay. Are you confirming a Premium Economy flight for 1 passenger on Delta Airlines, leaving Atlanta on March 13th, and going to Phoenix?
Almost, but the number of passengers needs to be three, please.
Got it. Are you ready to confirm your flight for 3 passengers, departing from Atlanta?
Indeed, I am.
Your one-way flight tickets are confirmed.
Wonderful. What's the airport I'll be flying out of, and can I get money refunded on the tickets?
Your flight is confirmed, departing from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and, sorry, there is no refund available for the tickets.
I see. It's okay. Now, please proceed, my friend, and locate 1 hotel room I can book that's pet friendly.
All right. Would you like to stay at the 4.2 rated Aloft Phoenix-Airport hotel?
How do I reach them?
You can call +1 602-275-6300.
Fantastic. Efficiency at its best. Thanks so much.
Sure thing. Enjoy your trip.
Can you help me find a one-way to Atlanta, GA in Economy class seating for four people.
When are you leaving, and where are you leaving to?
I'd like to leave on Friday next Week for Washington.
There is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that departs at 4:10 pm. Tickets start at $121.
When will the flight be departing, and when will we get to our destination?
The flight will depart from Dulles International Airport at 6:01 pm.
Do you see any other flights?
There is a flight with Southwest Airlines that has 0 stop, and it departs at 2:35 pm. Tickets start at $115.
And are there any other flights after that?
There is a flight with United Airlines with 0 stops that leaves at 4:40 pm. Tickets start at $113
This sound great.
Would you like me to buy tickets for this flight for you?
Yes. I'd like to reserve tickets, please.
To confirm: You'd like 4 Economy tickets for the United Airlines flight the departs from Washington on March 8th to Atlanta, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your plane tickets have been reserved.
I'd like to search for a hotel in the area, as well.
How about the Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza? It has a 4.5 star rating.
That'd be great.
Would you like me to reserve the hotel room for you?
No, not right now. That'll be all.
Enjoy your all.
Could you help me find one-way flights? I'd like to travel in Economy.
Where are you leaving from and where did you plan on visiting?
I'd like to leave from Phoenix, AZ and I will be traveling to SF.
When were you planning on leaving?
I'd like to leave on the 13th.
I found 4 flights for you. One flight is an American Airlines outbound flight leaving at 6:15 am with 0 stops for $121.
That will work for me. Could you help me book a one-way ticket?
Please confirm you're booking an American Airlines flight in Economy class for 1 passenger from Phoenix to San Francisco on March 13th.
No, there are actually 2 people in my group.
Please confirm the flight to San Francisco for 2 passengers.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Which airport will the flight be arriving at and will the ticket be refundable?
The destination will be SFO International Airport but unfortunately the ticket is non-refundable.
Thank you. I'd also like to find a hotel there.
I found Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco with a 3.5 rating.
That sounds perfect. That will be all I need.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me find one-way flights from New York to Philadelphia? I would like to travel in Premium Economy.
When were you planning on leaving?
I'd like to leave on the 9th.
There is an American Airlines outbound flight with 0 stops leaving at 7:55 am for $107.
What is the destination airport of the flight and when will the onward flight arrive??
The destination is PHL International Airport and the onward flight is scheduled to arrive at 8:46 am.
That flight works for me. Can you help me buy a one-way ticket?
Please confirm you're booking an American Airlines Premium Economy flight for 1 passenger from New York to Philadelphia on March 9th.
Yes, that is correct. Which airport will the flight leave from and will the ticket be refundable?
Your ticket has been confirmed. The ticket will be refundable and the flight will be leaving from JFK International Airport.
Thank you. I'd also like to find a hotel there.
I found the hotel AKA University City with a 4.6 rating.
Did you find anything else? I'd like to book one room.
I also found the hotel Aloft Philadelphia Airport with a rating of 4.0.
Did you find anything else? I'd like to book two rooms.
I also found Aloft Philadelphia Downtown with a 4.4 rating.
That sounds perfect.
Did you want to continue with your reservation?
Not right now. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Please find me one-way flights. I am going on March 1st from Chi-town Premium Economy.
Where do you want to visit?
I'd like to travel to Vancouver.
There are 2 good flights including American Airlines leaving at 11:55 am with 0 stops for $310.
That sounds great. Can you help me with a one-way flight ticket?
Please confirm a flight from Chicago to Vancouver with American Airlines on March 1st for 1 Premium Economy class.
Yes, that is great. When will the onward flight come?
A oneway ticket is confirmed and the flight arrives at 2:31 pm.
I would like to search a hotel there.
I have 10 hotels including Atrium Inn Vancouver rated at 3.7.
That will work.
Would you like to reserve the hotel?
I don't want to. That will be all.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one way flight.
Okay, where are you leaving from and arriving to and when are you leaving?
I'm going from New York City to Paris, France on the 5th of this month.
Okay, I found an American Airlines flight with 1 stop departing at 7:45 pm for $334.
What else did you find?
There's also a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops departing at 10:50 pm for $233.
Anything else that works?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight with 1 stop leaving at 8:40 am for $422.
That one works, can you get me a ticket?
Sure, please confirm you'd like 1 economy ticket on the Southwest Airlines flight from New York to Paris on March 5th.
Yup, sounds good. What airport am I leaving from and when do I arrive?
You'll leave from JFK International Airport and arrive in Paris at 11:18 am.
Great, can you help me get 3 rooms at a hotel there that allows pets?
Sure, I found 10 that will work. How about the Ac Hotel by Marriott Paris Porte Maillot with a 4.3 rating.
What's their address and phone number?
It's +33 1 84 82 49 09 and they are at 6 Rue Gustave Charpentier, 75017.
Great, that's all for now.
Have a good rest of your day.
Will you find one-way flights for 3 people?
When are you leaving and from where?
10th of March from LA.
What's the destination?
Atlanta, GA.
Alaska Airlines has a flight that leaves at 8:15 pm with 0 stops for $195.
Any Economy flights?
American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:05 am with 0 stops for $171.
Anything else?
Delta Airlines that leaves at 9:20 am with 0 stops for $175.
Great.
Anything else?
Will you buy a one-way flight ticket?
Please confirm 3 Economy tickets on Delta Airlines from Los Angeles to Atlanta on March 10th.
Fine.
Your purchase is successful.
Thanks. Will you reserve one hotel room that allows pets?
I found 10. Aloft Atlanta Downtown has a 4.0 star rating.
Anything else?
Country Inn & Suites By Radisson, Atlanta Downtown South At Turner Field, GA has a 3.3 star rating.
Great.
Want to reserve it?
No. That's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Would you look for one way flights?
When do you want to leave and from where?
I will leave on March 11th from Vancouver.
When do you want to visit?
I want to go to Chi-town. There is one person in my group. I would like to leave in economy.
There is an Air Canada flight where the outbound flight leaves at 9:45 pm. It has 0 stops and the ticket costs $158.
Do you have any other flights?
How about this Delta Airlines flight? It leaves at 3:20 am and has 1 stop. It costs $306.
Which airport does it leave from?
This flight leaves from YVR International Airport.
That flight sounds awesome. Would you help to buy a one way flight ticket?
Could you confirm that you want to take a Delta Airlines flight from Vancouver to Chicago on March 11th? You need 1 economy ticket. Is this right?
That sounds greta.
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed.
Could I get a refund? When does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 3:02 pm but the ticket cannot be refunded.
Thank you for helping. Find me a hotel there. I need 2 rooms in a hotel pets are allowed.
How about Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown? It has a 4.3 rating
That sounds good. That is what I needed.
Have a great day.
Please find me a one way ticket to SF
Where are you traveling from
I am traveling from Los angeles and i prefer delta airlines for 2 people
when are you leaving
i need to leave on 11th of march
I found you a delta airlines with 0 stop for $90 that depart at 9:15 am
Is this refundable
this is not refundable
perfect, can you find me a one way economy flight
please confirm your booking of 2 economy tickets with delta airlines from los angeles to san francisco on march 11th
perfect
your ticket is confirmed
what airport is this departing from
you will travel from lax international airport
when does the flight arrive and what airport
you will arrive at sfo international airport at 10:40 am
thank you, i also need 2 hotel room
what do you think about amsterdam hostel san francisco with 3.5 rating
what is the address and phone number
their address is 749 taylor street and number is +1 415-673-3277
what else do you have
what about argonaut hotel with 4.4 rating
perfect
have a nice day
I'm looking for a one way flight.
When would you like to depart and from where? And where are you going to?
I'll be leaving from Los Angeles on the 10th of March and I'm going to Chi-town.
I have 4 flights that might work for you. There is a 4:20 PM flight on Alaska Airlines with 0 stops for $177.
That should work. I'd like a one way ticket.
Confirming a flight on Alaska Airlines on March 10th for 1 passenger in economy class going from Los Angeles to Chicago.
Great. Can that ticket be refunded?
Yes, it is a refundable ticket and the reservation is complete.
What airport does it fly into and what's the arrival time?
It comes in at 10:52 PM to O'Hare International Airport.
Perfect, thank you. I also need a hotel.
I have 10 possible hotels. The Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown is rated 4.3.
Excellent, thank you.
You are very welcome.
Can you please find me a one way flight for the 11th in Premium Economy with Delta Airlines.
Sure, but first please tell me from where are you departing as well as your desired destination.
I'm flying out of Los Angeles to ATL.
I've found 1 Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops priced at $253 taking of at 9:20 am.
Do you know where does it land as well as if the ticket is refundable?
The ticket is not refundable and the flight lands at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to book tickets for you?
Yes, please do. I need three tickets.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book 3 Premium Economy tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Atlanta on March 11th?
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your ticket.
Can you please tell me when does it land?
The flight lands at 5:19 pm.
Thanks. Now please look for 1 hotel room at destination.
There are 10 hotels meeting your criteria out of which I recommend Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza rated at 4.5.
This one is perfect for me.
Do you want me to book a room for you?
No, not at the moment. That will be all for now.
Have a nice day!
I need help finding an economy flight to Vancouver for two people.
When and where will you be leaving from?
I plan on leaving from Portland, OR on the 6th.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 10:10 am with 1 stop, ticket price is $241.
Are there any other flights that match?
Theres an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:45 am with 1 stop, ticket price is $235.
That one sounds good.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the flight?
Yes I'd like to purchase tickets but my plans may change so they need to be refundable.
Please confirm that you would like to purchase 2 economy class tickets for American Airlines from Portland to Vancouver on march 6th.
That is correct.
Your one-way tickets have been confirmed.
Great, can you tell me when the onward flight arrives and at which airport it departs from?
The onward Flight will be departing from PDX International Airport and arriving at 3:32 pm.
Thanks, Can you also find me a hotel nearby?
I've found 10 Hotels. What do you think of Atrium Inn Vancouver it has a 3.7 rating.
Sounds great, Thats all I needed thanks.
You're welcome, have a nice day.
I need a one-way flight.
Where and when are you departing and where are you going?
I am going from Portland, OR to Vegas on the 8th.
Search revealed 5 results. An Alaska Airlines flight has 1 stop that departs at 10:10 am with a ticket price of $225.
What time does the flight arrive and at what airport?
The flight arrives at McCarran International Airport at 2:35 pm.
That works for me. Find me a one-way flight ticket in Economy for 1 person.
You want 1 Economy seat on Alaska Airlines from Portland to Las Vegas on March 8th. Is that right?
That is right and can you tell me if the flight offers refunds?
Your booking is complete and the ticket cannot be refunded.
Thanks a lot. Find he a hotel to stay at there where they allow pets.
Search revealed 4 results. Best Western Plus Las Vegas West has a 4.3 rating.
What else do you have for 1 room?
Budget Suites of America has a 3.4 rating.
That works for me. That is everything I need.
Have a great day.
Would you help me find a one-way flight? I am departing from Portland, OR.
When is it that you're planning to leave and where are you going?
I am leaving from Las Vegas on the 8th.
I have located 5 suitable flights, one of them is on Alaska Airlines. The departure flight leaves at 10:10 am and has 1 stop. This costs $225.
Is this ticket refundable and what is the airport it arrives at?
The flight designation is McCarran International Airport. Sorry, but the ticket is not refundable.
That flight sounds fine with me.
Can I help you with anything else?
Can you help me in buying a one-way flight ticket?
Please confirm these details: the flight leaves from Portland and goes to Las Vegas on Alaska Airlines on March 8th. There will be 1 passenger in economy.
Yes that sounds fine. What airport will the flight leave from and what time does the flight get there?
The oneway ticket is confirmed. The flight will arrive at 2:35 pm and it is leaving from PDX International Airport.
Thank you for your help. I also would like to search for a hotel there to book 2 rooms.
How about the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West. It has a rating of 4.3.
That's great.
Would you like to go on and reserve the hotel?
No, I don't wish to reserve the hotel now. That was all I wanted.
Have a great day.
Can you please help me finding a one way flight to Seattle. I would prefer a United Airlines and an economy class.
On which date do you plan to leave?
I am planning to leave on 12th of March.
From which place will you be leaving?
I will be leaving from Vancouver.
United Airlines leaves at 6:05 pm and it has 1 stop. The ticket will cost you $217.
When does the onward flight arrive and from which airport does the flight departs?
The onward flight arrives at airport on 10:56 pm and it depart from YVR International Airport.
That sounds good. Can you please help me in buying a one way ticket?
Please confirm the details: United Airlines from Vancouver to Seattle for March 12th for 1 passenger and economy class.
Yes. That's perfect. Is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is now confirmed. Unfortunately, the ticket is non-refundable.
At which airport does flight arrive?
The destination will be Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thanks for assistance. I would like to book 1 room.
There are 10 hotels found. What about Ace hotel Seattle with a rating of 4.5?
That's perfect. That's all I needed
Have a nice day.
I need to book a one-way flight, ticket must be economy
where are you headed to? When are you leaving?
The destination is chi-town and the departure is from new york, I'm planning to leave the day after tomorrow
I have 4 possibilities for you, one is to fly with american airlines leaving at 5:25 am. The flight has 0 stops and the price is $131
go to the next option.
you can fly with delta airlines then, you'll leave at 6 am and you'll make 0 stops. You'll pay $135 for this trip
skip to the next deal. look for refundable tickets only, departure day is march 5th
you can fly with southwest airlines. You''l leave at 4:55 am and the ticket will cost you $143. Stops are 0
This one is fine
May I proceed and buy you tickets?
Yes, buy tickets for 2
greenlight this. The southwest airlines flight leaves from new york to chicago, the departure day is march 5th. You need 2 economy tickets.
wrong, I need 3 tickets
confirm again then. You need 3 economy tickets
yes. Where will we leave from?
The tickets have been booked. You'll leave from jfk international airport
now help me find a hotel, I need 1 room
I can book a room at ac hotel by marriott chicago downtown, the hotel has been rated 4.3
read me my next option
We have ace hotel chicago, rating is 4.6
okay, now tell me the phone number and the street address
the number to call is +1 312-764-1919, the hotel is located in 311 north morgan street
tell me my other options
there's acme hotel company chicago, it's rated 4.5
cool, thank you and goodbye
have a wonderful day
Can you search one-way flights for me?
From which place you are leaving?
I decided to leave from Atlanta, GA
On which date you decided to leave and where are you going?
I am starting my travel from Philly to San Francisco on march 5th.
I have short listed 3 flights of your likings. One among them is American Airlines which leaves at 1:15 pm with 1 stop and the ticket cost is $299
Which is the airport the flight starting from?
The flight taking off from PHL International Airport
What time the flight arriving?
The flight arriving time is 5:32 pm
Are there any other flights available? i need Premium Economy
I have short listed 2 flights of your likings. One among them is Delta Airlines which leaves at 2:20 pm with 1 stop and the ticket cost is $508
Are there any other flights available?
There is United Airlines which departs at 12:55 pm and having 1 stop. It ticket cost is $377
That is perfect
You need to buy tickets?
Yes, i want to reserve ticket
Please give confirmation details: The airlines is United Airlines departing from Philadelphia to San Francisco on March 5th and number of ticket required is 1 Premium Economy
Fine.Which is the airport flight departing from and is there a ticket refund?
Ticket booking is done and the flight departs from PHL International Airport. Te ticket is not refundable
I need to look for a hotel there
I have selected 10 hotels and what is your opinion on Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco with rating 3.5?
Can i know its address and do they allow pets?
Their address is 749 Taylor Street and they don't allow pets
This is fine. That's all i want.
Have A Good day.
Hi, could you help me find some one way flights please?
Any preference on your departure date and your visiting location?
Yes, I intend to depart on March 4th to Vegas.
May I know where will you be departing from?
I will be departing from Los Angeles.
There are 4 suitable flights, one of which is an Alaska Airlines flight which departs at 8:20 pm an has 0 intermediary stops which will set you back $78.
I see, may I know which airport and when does the flight depart from?
You will be departing from LAX International Airport at 9:30 pm.
I see, are there any alternatives? Would prefer to depart on the 13th.
Sure, there are 4 suitable flights, one of which is an American Airlines flight departing at 8:25 pm with 0 intermediary stops, which will cost you $93.
Are there any alternative economy flights?
Yes there is, how about a Delta Airlines flight which departs at 10:15 pm with 0 intermediary stops? This will cost you $87.
That sounds great!
Would you like to make a ticket reservation?
Sure! Do help me, thanks.
Please confirm your reservation for 1 Economy seat on the Delta Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Las Vegas on March 13th.
Yes, I am fine with that.
Your departure flight has been reserved.
Thank you so much! Could you also help me search for a hotel room in that area?
Sure, there are 6 hotels, and one of them is Best Western Plus Las Vegas West with a 4.3 rating.
May I know if pets are allowed?
Yes, they do allow pets in the hotel.
Sure, that is all I need.
No worries, have a great day ahead!
Would you help me find one way flights?
When do you want to leave and from where?
I want to leave on the 9th from Chi-town.
Where will you visit?
I want to go to Atlanta.
I have 3 flights that should work. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm and has 0 stops. This costs $123.
Do you have something else? I need a United Airlines flight for three people.
I have 1 flight that is good. How about a United Airlines flight that leaves at 9:50 pm and has 0 stops. It costs $114.
What airport does it go to and which airport does it leave from?
The flight leaves from O'Hare International Airport and goes to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Sounds great. Could you help buy a one way ticket?
Could you confirm that the flight is from Chicago going to Atlanta, on United Airlines? The flight will leave on March 9th, and your 3 tickets are in economy class.
Sounds good to me. When does the outbound flight arrive? Can I get a refund if I need one?
Your one way ticket was confirmed. The otubound flight arrives at 0:51 am. This ticket cannot be refunded.
Thank you for helping. I would like to find a hotel there.
How about Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza? It has a 4.5 rating.
Sounds perfect. That is all I wanted.
Have a great day.
I need to find a one-way economy ticket from LAX.
Alright, where will you be flying to?
I want a ticket to Philly.
What day do you want to depart?
I want to fly on the 14th of March.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight with 1 stop that leaves at 9:30 am and costs $287.
What other flights are there?
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 1:40 pm. It has 1 stop and costs $273.
Di you find anything else?
Yes, Southwest Airlines has a flight with 1 stop that departs at 1:40 pm. The ticket cost is $266.
What airport does that flight leave from?
It will leave from LAX International Airport.
That is the flight I want. Can you book me 4 tickets please?
Please confirm you would like to book 4 economy tickets from Los Angeles to Philadelphia on Southwest Airlines on March 14th?
Yes, make the reservation please.
Alright, your one-way tickets have been booked.
Wonderful! I also want to find 2 hotel rooms for my stay.
I recommend Aka University City which is rated 4.6
Great! That's all I wanted.
Enjoy your day!
I need one-way flights.
Where is the departure from?
I am departing from Washington.
When and where are you planning to leave and visit?
I would be traveling to Philadelphia on the 8th of this month.
I found 3 flights for you including American Airlines leaving at 5:10 pm with 1 stops for $136.
Will there be any other available flights traveling to Chicago in Premium Economy.
I have 2 flights for you including Southwest Airlines leaving 3:35 pm with 0 stops for $216.
That flight works for me. Can you help me buy a one-way flight ticket?
Please confirm a flight from Washington to Chicago with Southwest Airlines leaving March 8th for 1 passenger Premium Economy class.
Yes, that will be great.
I have the oneway ticket confirmed.
When will the flight arrive and is the ticket refundable?
The flight onward arrives at 4:33 pm but the ticket isn't refundable.
Thanks for the help. I'd like to search a hotel there.
What do you think about Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown rated 4.3?
That works and will be all I need.
Have a great day.
I need a one-way flight.
When are you leaving? Where are you coming from?
On the 2nd from KL.
Where are you visiting?
I'm going to SD.
An American Airlines flight leaves at 1:45 pm with 1 stop. It costs $406.
What else? I'm going on the 6th of this month. I want an economy ticket.
A Delta Airlines flight leaves at 0:15 am and has 1 stop. It costs $373.
That's good. I'd like a ticket.
1 Delta Airlines ticket to San Diego from Kuala Lumpur on March 6th. It's an economy class seat. Is this what you want?
Yes. What airport does the plane arrive at?
Your ticket is booked. SAN International Airport is the destination.
I need a hotel there. I want 3 rooms.
Bahia Resort Hotel has a 4.3 rating.
What's their number? Where are they located?
Their number is +1 858-539-8666. The address is 998 West Mission Bay Drive.
That's fine.
Would you like a reservation?
Not right now.
What else do you need help with?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I want you to find me a one-way flight.
Can you please tell me where you want to go?
I want to arrive in Sydney, Australia since I have some free time from work.
Can you tell me from where will you leave for your trip, and when are you planning to leave?
I want to leave on 12th of March from Seattle, and I need tickets for 3 people.
There are 4 flights which match what you want. One of the flights with American Airlines has 1 stop, and leaves at 8:15 am. The ticket of this flight will cost you $314.
Is there some other flight which you can suggest?
There is also a Delta Airlines flight which has 1 stop and leaves at 7:40 am. This ticket will cost you $333.
Can you tell me when the onward flight is expected to arrive?
The onward flight should arrive at the destination at 1:32 pm.
Can you tell me from which airport will the flight leave, and at which airport will the flight arrive?
The flight will arrive at Kingsford Smith International Airport, and it will fly off from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
This flight seems good. Can you help me buy the one-way flight ticket?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class flight tickets for 3 people for a flight of Delta Airlines which flies from Seattle on March 12th and arrives in Sydney?
That suits me well.
Your requested one-way flight tickets have been booked.
I would like also a place to sleep there, so find me a hotel.
How would you like staying at 28 Hotel Sydney, which has a rating of 4.2?
That's a great hotel.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I appreciate it.
Have a good time!
Get me a one way flight.
Destination?
Chi-town.
Departure city?
San Francisco.
Departure date?
The 14th of this month.
I found 5 options. There's an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving 1:35 pm for $180.
Sounds good, buy it.
Please confirm: 1 economy seat on Alaska Airlines from San Francisco to Chicago on March 14th.
Good. What are the airports for that flight?
Your seat is reserved. It leaves SFO International Airport and arrives O'Hare International Airport.
Find a hotel there that permits pets.
AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown is 4.3 stars.
Perfect. Ok that's everything.
Have a nice day.
Can you please help me in finding some one-way flights?
Which place are you planning to leave and when do you plan to leave? Also from which place will you be leaving?
I am leaving from LAX to Las Vegas on March 14th.
There is a Alaska Airlines which departs at 8:20 pm and it has 0 stops. It will cost you $88.
That sounds good to me.
Do you want to book the tickets for the same?
Yes. Please book the ticket for three people.
Can you please confirm the following details: Alaska Airlines from Los Angeles to Las Vegas on March 14th for 3 passengers. It is an economy class.
Is the ticket refundable? Also from which airport does the flights departs?
The one way ticket is now confirmed. The ticket is non-refundable and it leaves from LAX International Airport.
Thanks for assistance. Could you please help me in finding a hotel and booking of three rooms?
There are 6 hotels available. What are your opinion about Best Western Plus Las vegas West having rating of 4.3?
What is the street address?
It is 8669 West Sahara Avenue.
That's perfect.
Would you like to reserve the hotel?
No. I don't want to reserve as of now. Thanks for your help.
Have a nice day.
Find a one way flight for me.
Departure date and city? Destination?
Look up two tickets from SFO to Phoenix, AZ on March 14th.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving 11:45 am for $111.
Sounds good. Get a one way ticket.
Please confirm: 2 economy tickets on Alaska Airlines from San Francisco to Phoenix on March 14th.
Good. Is that refundable?
Your tickets are reserved, and are refundable.
When and where does that get in?
Sky Harbor International Airport at 1:52 pm.
Ok. Find a hotel there.
I found 10. There's Aloft Phoenix-Airport, 4.2 stars.
What's the address and phone number?
4450 East Washington Street and +1 602-275-6300.
Good. Ok that's all.
Have a nice day.
Please help me find flights, I want to be somewhere else.
Not a problem. Where will you be leaving from and where do you plan to go?
I filed a vacation leave effective on 9th of March, I will be leaving from Washington and would like to go to London, UK.
I have a flight for you from American Airlines, it departs at 2:50 pm with 1 stop. It costs $333.
I think it's good, but is it refundable in case that I cannot leave on that day? And where will it arrive?
You will be arriving at Heathrow International Airport but the ticket is not refundable.
Okay, I guess I really need to leave on that day.
Would you like to purchase the ticket now?
Yes, please.
Okay, please check the details; you will be leaving from Washington to London. You prefer the flight from American Airlines that leaves on March 9th for 1 person. And it is an economy ticket.
I would like to bring my girlfriend, make it two please.
Not a problem, booking flight from Washington for 2 persons.
Yes, that's right. Thanks!
Booking has been confirmed.
Alright! Now I need to find a hotel where we could stay there.
Would you like 45 Park Lane with 4.7 rating?
Yes, I saw the pictures of their facilities at the internet.
Would you like me to book a room for you?
Not yet, Let me tell this to my girlfriend first.
Sure. Do you need help with anything else?
No,that would be all. Thank you!
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I have a plan of short trip on 11th of this month. Can you search for an one-way flight?. I need to book tickets under Economy class.
From which place do you want me to search for the flights? that is I want to know about your starting place.
I am planning to leave from Paris.
What is your desired place to visit, that is destination place. I want this information to search further.
please search for the one with Delta Airlines to NYC.
Found 1 flight with Delta Airlines which is an outbound flight which leaves at 10 am and it has 0 stops. The price for the ticket is $218. Hope this will suits you.
Yes, that is okay to me. I want to buy the tickets to this flight and I want them for four persons.
Please confirm to buy 4 Economy class tickets in a flight with Delta Airlines from Paris on March 11th to New York.
That is perfect for me. Proceed.
I have confirmed your tickets with that one-way flight.
Thanks. Can you search for hotel there to book 1 room.
Yes, what about 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge with rating 4.5?
Search for something else and I need to book 2 rooms.
Found 9 hotels and how about your opinion on 1 Hotel Central Park with rating 4.5 which is the best I think.
That is good.
Shall I make reservation on that hotel.
No, not now.
Anything else you need?
No, That's enough. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I am in a plan to go for a trip and for which I need to search for one-way flights on March 12th. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
From which place you want to book the flight and to which place you like to go for a visit?
I have planned to travel in Economy class from Las Vegas to SF and so search for the flight accordingly.
What about an outbound flight from American Airlines with 0 stops which leaves at 10:55 am. The price of ticket for the same is $110? Is that okay to you?
Do you have any other flights available on that day and I need to book it for 1 person.
How about an outbound flight from Delta Airlines with 0 stops which leaves at 10:50 pm. The price of ticket for the same is $104? Is that okay to you?
That was also not suitable to me. Search for something else to suit my requirements.
What about an another outbound flight from Southwest Airlines with 0 stops which leaves at 9:55 am. The price of ticket for the same is $99? Is that okay to you?
What is the destination of that flight?
This flight will arrive finally at SFO International Airport.
And let me know the time of arrival of onward flight. I am asking this for my reference.
It arrives at 11:30 am.
This looks fine and thank you.
Do you want me to purchase the tickets to this flight now?
Yes, I need to buy it now. I need your help to do the same.
Okay, please confirm to book 1 economy class ticket in the Southwest Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco for the departure date on March 12th.
That is okay to proceed. I want to know about the origin Airport of this flight and also check about the ticket whether it is refundable one?
I have successfully booked the tickets to this flight and it will leave from McCarran International Airport and the tickets are not refundable. This for your information.
Thanks for your information. Do me one more help that I want to search for some nice hotels there. Search for the one which will allow pets as I have the one with me. I need only 1 room.
Got 10 results after searching and what about Argonaut Hotel with rating 4.4?
That is nice. Thanks.
Shall I book the tickets to you now?
No, not now. Thanks.
How can I help you further?
No, thanks. That's all I want for now.
Have a great day.
Hi! Can you assist me in finding a one-way flight?
I'd be happy to. Where are you traveling to?
I'd like to go to Paris, France.
Where are you departing from and when will you be starting your trip?
I'd like to leave Washington on the 12th of March.
I see an American Airlines flight with 1 stop. It leaves at 2:50 pm and a tickets costs $340.
That will work for me.
Would you like to purchase your tickets now?
Yes, I'll need 2.
Can you confirm the following details please? You'd like 2 Economy tickets for the American Airlines flight from Washington to Paris on March 12th. Is this correct?
Yes, that's correct. Can you tell me when the flight will be arriving and from which airport I will be departing from?
Yes, you are scheduled to leave Dulles International Airport at 1:41 pm.
Perfect, thank you. Can you help me find a hotel in the area/
May I suggest Ac Hotel By Marriott Paris Porte Maillot? It is a beautiful property with a 4.3 rating.
Sounds good. That will be everything for today. Thank you.
You're very welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Hey, get me a good deal on one-way flights.
Sure, where will you leave from? When are you going and where are you going?
I'm travelling from Atlanta GA and going to Phoenix AZ on the 6th.
What about American Airlines that leaves at 11:40 am with 1 layover. It costs just $290.
Fine, it sounds reasonable.
Can I get you the tickets now?
Please do that.
Sure to make clear: 1 economy ticket on American Airlines, departing from Phoenix going to Atlanta on march 6th.
Fine, when will I arrive in Phoenix?
Your ticket is set, you'll hit phoenix around 4:22 pm.
Is there a refund possible on this? Which airport do I take off from?
No refunds on this, sorry. You'll leave from Hartsfield-jackson International Airport.
Fine how about getting 1 room for me and my pet snake.
Well, they're tolerant at Aloft Phoenix-Airport. They also have 4.2 stars. The snake will be most welcome as long as you keep it out of the pool.
Great, you really know your detail right?
How about reserving it now?
Nope, I'm going to see if a snake handler can sit instead.
What else do you want?
I'm good thanks.
save travels to you and your menagerie.
I need to book a one-way flight.
That's no problem, just let me know where you want to go, where you are leaving from, and when you want the trip to be.
I need to leave for London, UK later today. Leaving from Chicago.
I found 3 possible flights. There is a $444 American Airlines flight leaving at 4:30 am with 1 stop. Would that work?
Yes, can you go ahead and purchase that one-way flight?
Alright, please confirm the following: You want to purchase a 1 one-way American Airlines Economy ticket to London from Chicago on March 1st. Please say yes to confirm.
Yes, that is good. Is it refundable? Also when does the flight arrive?
Your purchase is confirmed. Unforunately it is not refundable. Onward flight plans to arrive at 6:04 am.
I also need to find a hotel.
I found 10 possible hotels. What about a 4.7 rated hotel called 45 Park Lane?
What else is there?
Another option is the Abc Hyde Park Hotel which has a 3.2 rating.
What's the address of that?
Address is 121 Sussex Gardens.
What else is there? I need one room that allows pets.
Alright, what about the 4.3 rated Ace Hotel London?
Perfect.
Do you want me to go ahead and reserve?
No, not now, that's all I was looking for.
Enjoy your trip!
Can you get a one-way flight for me?
Sure. Where and when will you leave?
From Mexico City on Tuesday next week.
Where are you headed to?
To SF.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:35 am, has 1 stop, and a ticket for which costs $224.
What else can I get in terms of flights?
A Delta Airlines flight, which leaves at 3:45 am, has 0 stops, and a ticket of which costs $161, might suit your fancy.
When and at what airport will the onward flight arrive?
At SFO International Airport at 5:28 am.
Can you make sure I get a refundable ticket for a different flight? It's no guarantee my plans will stay the same.
You could get a refundable $141 ticket for United Airlines. It leaves at 8:25 am and had 0 stops.
Sounds good. Can you buy two economy tickets for me?
Yes. You want 2 economy tickets for a United Airlines flight from Mexico City to San Francisco on March 5th?
That's good with me. When will the onward flight arrive? At what airport does it leave?
I confirmed your ticket. It'll arrive at 10:08 am and leave from Benito Juarez International Airport.
I also need a place to stay at. What hotels are there?
10 hotels, including the 3.5 star rated Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco. Want to try that one out?
No thanks. Can you book me one room for a different hotel?
Do you want Argonaut Hotel, which has a 4.4 rating?
Let's see. What's the address.
At 495 Jefferson Street.
I'm taking my guinea pig with me. Does the hotel allow pets?
It does allow pets.
Great! That's all I need to know for now.
Have a great day!
I'd like to find a one-way flight. Can you help?
I'd be happy to. Where are you traveling to?
I will be going to ATL.
Where are you traveling from and when do you plan to leave?
I will be taking off from Portland, OR on the 11th of March.
Alaska Airlines has a flight departing at 7:55 am with 1 stop. Tickets cost $288.
Can you tell me which airport it will arrive at?
Certainly. It is set to land at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Can you see if there are two tickets available for a March 5th departure?
American Airlines has a departing flight at 7:20 am with 1 stop for $278 per ticket.
Can you tell me which airports it will depart from and arrive at?
It will leave PDX International Airport and land at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
What are my other options?
Delta Airlines has a flight that costs $230. The flight takes off at 9:35 am and has 1 stop.
I like Delta. That sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase your tickets now?
Yes, I'd like to get my tickets now.
You'd like 2 Economy class tickets from Portland to Atlanta on March 5th with Delta Airlines. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct. Can you tell me if my ticket will be refundable and at which airport we will be landing?
Your ticket purchase has been successful. You will arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. The tickets are final and nonrefundable.
Great. Can you help me find a nearby hotel?
May I suggest the 4.5 rated Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza?
Can you tell me the contact number and where it is located?
The hotel is located at 3600 Wieuca Road Northeast and you may reach them at +1 470-231-3030.
That sounds good.
Would you like to reserve your room?
Not at the moment. I think that will be everything. Thank you.
You are most welcome. Have a lovely flight!
I need a one-way flight from Vancouver, BC to Seattle.
What date will you be departing on a flight?
I want to leave on the 7th of March.
There is an Air Canada flight leaving at 4:45 pm with 1 stop, ticket prices are $280, is that okay for your trip?
Can you find me another flight, that offers economy class?
How about a Delta Airlines flight, it leaves at 2:50 am with only 1 stop in route, ticket prices are $348?
Are those all the flights available?
There is also a United Airlines flight with 1 stop, ticket prices are $255 and it departs at 6:05 pm.
Sounds good to me, can you buy 2 tickets to the flight?
You wish to buy 2 economy tickets to a United Airlines flight departing from Vancouver on March 7th, and arriving at Seattle, was that correct?
That is all correct, where will the plane be departing?
The plane will depart from YVR International Airport, and your tickets have been confirmed.
Thanks for the help, can you also reserve me 2 rooms to a hotel that allows pets?
Can I interest you in the Ace Hotel Seattle, it has a 4.5 rating>
Sounds perfect, thanks.
Shall I make a reservation to the hotel?
Actually, I don't want to make a hotel reservation at the moment.
Understood, can I assist you with anything else.
That was all I needed, thanks for all your help.
No problem, have a good day.
I want to you to find me a one-way flight to go somewhere.
Can you tell me the location where you want to go? Also could you please tell me from where you will depart, and at what time?
My arrival destination should be Seattle, WA. I plan to leave on 11th of this month, and I want to depart from Paris.
There are 2 flights which match what you want. One of the flights is with the Air France flight which has 1 stop and it leaves at 3:55 am. The ticket for this flight costs $375.
This flight seems as what I want.
Would you like to have tickets bought for this flight?
Yes I want to book tickets for this flight.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy 1 Economy class ticket for the flight of Air France, which flies from Paris to Seattle on March 11th?
That suits me well. Can you tell me from which airport will I fly from?
Your requested one way ticket has been bought. The flight you bought ticket for leaves from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
I appreciate your help. I need also to find a place to sleep there, so find me a hotel.
There are 10 hotels which you might like. How would you consider staying at Ace Hotel Seattle, which has a rating of 4.5?
Is there some other hotel you can suggest?
How would you like staying at Belltown Inn which has a rating of 4.2?
This hotel seems great. That would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
Can you help me find a one-way British Airways flight?
Of course. When are you leaving?
On the 6th of this month.
Where are you traveling to?
I am heading to SFO
Where will you depart from?
I am leaving from London England on the 6th.
I found 1 flight. There is a British Airways flight departing at 9:15 am that has 1 stop. Tickets are $411
That sounds good
Do you want me to purchase a ticket for you?
Yes please do
To confirm: You wish to purchase 1 economy ticket on British Airways leaving London on March 6th for San Francisco. Is this correct?
Yes it is. Which airport does it depart from? Is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket is confirmed. The flight departs from Heathrow International Airport. Sorry, no the ticket is not refundable.
Thanks. Can you find me a hotel there?
There are 10. What about Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco it is rated 3.5?
That sounds great
Shall i reserve a room?
No that is all I need for now.
Have a good day
Find options for one-way flights departing the 14th of March out of SD.
Sure, where will you be traveling to?
I'm going to Seattle, WA.
Great, there is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 11:10 am with 1 stop for $203.
Give me other options please.
Sure thing, American Airlines departing at 4:10 am with 1 stop for $195.
What time does the onward flight arrive?
that flight will arrive at 8:13 am.
Great, this will work.
Should I proceed and reserve this ticket?
Yes please buy the ticket.
Alright, but first please confirm the following details: Departing San Diego headed to Seattle on American Airlines on March 14th. This is for 1 Economy seat. Is this correct?
Yes, find out which airport I will arrive at. Also, is this ticket refundable?
I was able to successfully confirm your reservation, Seattle-Tacoma International Airport is where you will arrive. Unfortunately this ticket is unrefundable.
Alright, thank you.
your welcome. Will there be anything else I can help with?
yes, actually I need to search a hotel in the area. Just need one room please.
Sure thing, May I suggest Ace Hotel Seattle with a 4.5 star rating.
Alright, thanks. Good bye.
Your welcome, have a great day.
I'd like your help finding one-way flights. There'll be 2 people total, and we're traveling to Seattle.
Where are you traveling to? And when do you plan on departing?
I'm leaving from LAX next Monday.
There's a flight with Alaska Airlines with 0 stops that departs at 7:10 pm. Tickets are $144.
Awesome. Can you buy tickets for the flight for me?
To confirm: You'd like 2 Economy tickets for the Alaska Airlines flight departing Los Angeles on March 4th to Seattle, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your plane tickets have been reserved.
Which airport will the flight be leaving from.
The flight will be leaving from LAX International Airport.
When will we reach our destination?
The flight will arrive at 9:57 pm.
Thank you so much for all of your help.
Is there anything else you'd like me to help you with?
I'd like to look for a pet friendly hotel in the area. I'm going to need 1 room.
I was able to locate 10 hotels. How about the Ace Hotel Seattle? It has a 4.5 rating.
What is there phone number?
The phone number for the hotel is +1 206-448-4721.
Great. Thank you. That'll be all.
Enjoy your day.
can you search a one way flights for me
when are you leaving and where are you visiting
I am traveling from vegas to new york on 4th of march
i found 2 flights for you. What about american airlines with 1 stop for $290 depart at 5:30 am
when does it arrive
this will arrive at 6:01 pm
perfect
would you like to buy a ticket
yes, please book three tickets for me
please confirm your booking for 3 economy tickets with american airlines traveling from las vegas to new york on march 4th
no i just need 1 ticket
please confirm your changes to 1 economy ticket
yes please
your ticket is booked
please also find me a hotel
what do you think about 1 hotel brooklyn bridge with 4.5 rating
is it pet friendly
yes it is pet friendly
perfect
have a nice day
I'll be traveling quite soon. Can you get a one-way flight for me?
A flight to where?
I want to go to Chi-town.
You'll be leaving what city at what time?
Nairobi, on March 13th.
I found 1 flight that meets your needs. It's a $407 American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:35 am and has 1 stop.
Sounds good to me.
Want to get tickets right now?
Sure thing. I'd like one economy ticket. please.
You want to purchase 1 economy ticket for an American Airlines that departs from Nairobi to Chicago on March 13th?
Right. What airport is it headed to? Can I get a refund on the ticket, just in case?
I confirmed your ticket. It'll arrive at O'Hare International Airport. Sadly, you can't get a refund on it.
Okay, cool. I want to book 2 room at a hotel there. My dog's coming with me, so make sure it's a pet-friendly one.
You might like AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown, which has a rating of 4.3.
Not so sure about that. Other options?
There's Ace Hotel Chicago, which has a slightly higher rating of 4.6.
Oh, that one's great.
Want to book the rooms right now?
Not now. That's all I need from you for now.
Have a great day.
Can you look in for one-way flights?
When are you intending to move?
I will be moving on the 12th
Where are you moving to?
I will be going to Vancouver, BC
Which place you are starting from?
I like to go in United Airlines from ATL and we are 2 people in my group
I have selected 1 flights of your choice. There is United Airlines which leaves at 6:15 am with 1 stop and the ticket cost is $301
That is perfect. Can you proceed with buying a one-way flight ticket for me?
Please give confirmation details: The flight is United Airlines departing from Atlanta to Vancouver on March 12th with Economy ticket for 2 passengers
That is fine
Your one way ticket is booked
Is there a ticket refund?
No, there is no ticket refund
Which airport flight departs from and what time the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 11:11 am and it leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport
Thank you very much
I have selected 10 hotels. What is your opinion on Atrium Inn Vancouver. with rating 3.7?
Anything else ? I need to book 2 rooms?
I have selected 9 hotels. What is your opinion on Auberge Vancouver Hotel? . with rating 4.1?
Anything else needed?
What is your opinion on Best Western Plus Chateau Granville Hotel & Suites & Conference Ctr. with rating 4.1?
Can i know their address and do they allow pets?
Their address is 1100 Granville Street and they do allow pets
That is fine
You need to make booking in this hotel?
No not now
Have a nice day
I need three in my group looking for 1 way tickets.
When will you want to go?
I'm leaving San Diego on March 14th.
Where are you going to visit?
I'm headed to Portland OR.
Alaska airlines is one of 4 you can choose. They have a great cheap flight. It leaves at 1:20 pm with 0 stops. It cost's $128.
That flight sounds fine. Get me some tickets ok?
Ok, to be clear: You'll need 3 tickets for Alaska airlines leaving San Diego, going to Portland on March 14th. You'll have economy seating?
Correct, that's fine. Which airport will I land at?
Your tickets are set. You'll land in PDX International Airport.
Fine, how about getting me set up with 1 room there in a hotel or motel?
Why not just stay at Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station? It's close and has 4.3 stars.
Ugh, don't you have a better option?
Will you try Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites. It has a better 4.4 rating.
That's about as good as I can hope for thanks that's it for now.
Have a good, safe, trip.
Can you help me find a one way economy ticket flying out of New York?
Where would you like to go? When do you plan to leave?
I want to leave on March 4th and go to ATL.
I found an American Airlines flight for $135 that departs at 11:45 am and has 0 stops.
Sure, that works.
Would you like to purchase tickets for that flight?
Yeah, I'd like to book one ticket please.
Okay, just to confirm, you would like to book 1 economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from New York to Atlanta that departs on March 4th. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. When does that flight arrive?
Your reservation is confirmed. Your outbound flight should arrive at 2:07 pm.
What airport am I leaving from?
Your flight leaves from JFK International Airport.
Okay, thanks. Can you help me find a hotel there? I just need one room.
What do you think about the Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza? It has a 4.5 rating.
Okay, great. That's everything I need.
Alright, have a great day.
Can you help me find a one-way Premium Economy ticket on March 9th? My plans aren't set so I only want to find refundable tickets.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm planning a trip to San Fran.
Where are you departing from?
I'd like an Economy ticket out of LAX.
There are 4 flights that meet your criteria. The first is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 1:25 pm. The tickets cost $102 and there are 0 stops.
I'd prefer a Southwest Airlines flight if there are any available.
There is 1 Southwest Airlines flight available The tickets cost $92 and it leaves at 6:45 pm with 0 stops.
When will it land?
It arrives at 8:10 pm.
That will work for me.
Would you like to book your tickets now?
Yes, please go ahead with the reservation.
You'd like 1 Economy ticket on the Southwest Airlines flight leaving Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 9th. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct. Which airport does that flight originate at and where does it land?
It takes off from LAX International Airport and lands at SFO International Airport. Your ticket has been successfully purchased.
Thank you for the assistance.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
Yes, can you help me find a pet-friendly hotel nearby?
The Argonaut Hotel has an average rating of 4.4 and is pet-friendly.
That will be perfect.
Would you like to reserve your room now?
No, my plans still may change. That will be everything for today.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to get a one-way flight.
You will be leaving from where?
From atlanta, GA.
When would you be departing?
I want heading LA. I want to travel on southwest airlines on the 4th of this month.
I have found 1 suitable flight. You can travel on Southwest airlines on an outbound flight at 1:30 pm. It has 0 stops and costs $164.
That would work. I want to buy economy one-way tickets for three people.
You would like to travel from Atlanta to Los Angeles on Southwest airlines on March 4th and you want economy seats for 3?
Yes, that's about it. Would I be able to get a refund on the ticket if I change my mind?
I have confirmed the flight. The ticket is non-refundable.
I would need two rooms in a hotel.
I have found 10 options. There is the Ac hotel by marriott beverly hills. It has a 4.4 rating.
Is there a number I can reach them at? What is their address?
The number is +1 323-852-7000 and the address i 6399 wilshire boulevard.
That would be great. That's all.
Enjoy your day.
I want to find one-way flights to LA.
When are you leaving and where from?
I'm leaving from Washington on March 3rd.
There is an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 9:45 am. The ticket is $198.
Sounds great. I want to buy a one way ticket. There are 2 people but plans may change. I want refundable tickets only.
Please confirm: 2 economy seats on American Airlines from Washington to Los Angeles on March 3rd.
Yes, sounds great.
Your tickets have been booked.
What airport does the flight leave from?
The flight leaves from Dulles International Airport.
Thanks. I want to find a hotel, also.
What about the Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills? It is rated 4.4
Is there anything else?
What about the Airtel Plaza Hotel with a 3.9 rating?
Are pets allowed? What's the phone number?
Pets are welcome. The phone number is +1 800-224-7835.
That sounds good.
Do you want to make the reservation?
No, not right now.
Anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a great day!
I need a one way flight.
When are you leaving? Where are you going? Where are you leaving from?
I am going to Delhi, India from Chi-town on the 7th of March.
American Airlines has a flight leaving at 7:05 am and has 1 stop. The cost of the ticket is $385.
That is perfect. Can you help me by a ticket?
Please confirm, flying American Airlines to Delhi from Chicago on March 7th. 1 economy ticket.
That is perfect.
Your ticket is confirmed.
I need a hotel room while I'm there.
I found Aloft New Delhi Aerocity. The rating is 4.4.
Does it permit pets? What is the address?
It doesn't allow pets. The address is 5B Igi T3 Road, Delhi - Ajmer Expressway, Aerocity, New Delhi.
That is all I need.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to find an American Airlines flight.
Where would you like to go and where will you be departing from?
I'd like to travel from New Delhi to Seattle WA.
When are you planning to leave?
I'll be leaving on March 11th.
There is 1 American Airlines flight leaving at 1:45 pm and it has 1 stop. The ticket price is $415.
What airport does this flight leave from?
The flight departs from Indira Gandhi International Airport.
I like the sound of that flight. Can you help me buy 1 ticket in any class?
Sue no problem. So you'd like 1 economy ticket on an American Airlines flight from Delhi to Seattle leaving on March 11th.
That's great. Which airport does the flight arrive at and is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket has been booked. Your flight arrives at Seattle-Tacoma International airport.
I'd like to find a hotel to stay in while I'm there. I need to book 2 rooms.
There are 10 hotels that meet your criteria. How about the Ace Hotel Seattle? It has a rating of 4.5.
Can you find me some other alternatives?
How about the Belltown Inn with a rating of 4.2?
Perfect. I don't need anything else right now.
Enjoy your day.
Can you get me a one-way flight?
Where and when are you leaving?
I'm leaving from KL on the 6th. Also, I'd like a business flight.
Where do you intend to visit?
Portland.
I found 1 flight for you at Delta Airlines, which leaves at 1:55 pm, has 1 stop, and costs $724.
When will the onward flight appear?
At 5:33 pm.
Can I get a refund for the ticket, just in case? What airport will it leave from?
You can't get a refund. Sorry. It'll depart from KLIA International Airport.
Good to know. Can you get me one one-way flight ticket?
I will get you 1 business ticket through Delta Airlines for a trip from Kuala Lumpur to Portland on March 6th. Do you want that?
I do. What airport will the plane arrive at?
I booked the ticket for your plane ride to PDX International Airport.
Thanks. I also want to find a hotel to stay at in the area.
I found 10 hotels, including Aloft Portland Airport at Cascade Station, which has a rating of 4.3.
I plan on taking my cat with me, so is this a pet friendly hotel? Also, what's the number?
You can bring your cat, no worries. You can call +1 503-200-5678.
Great. I need nothing else.
Have a great day.
Please search for one-way flights.
Where are you visiting?
I am going to Vancouver.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Chi-town.
When will you leaving?
On the 4th of March.
For $301 you can travel on an American Airlines flight with 1 stop leaving at 4:30 am.
I will be traveing economy. What are some other flights?
For $287 Delta Airlines has a flight with 1 stop leaving at 8:30 am.
That flight sounds good. Please purchase one ticket for a one-way flight.
Please confirm 1 economy ticket on Delta Airlines flight departing from chicago March 4th and traveling to Vancouver.
No, there will be 2 people in my group.
Please confirm 2 tickets for departure on March 4th.
Yes, that is right.
Your one way ticket is booked.
Thank you. I would also like to book 2 rooms at a hotel.
The Atrium Inn Vancouver has a 3.7 rating.
That is perfect. I do not need any further assistance.
Enjoy the day!
I need a premium economy one-way flight leaving from SD.
Sure, where are you going and what day?
I'm going to Phoenix and leaving march 9th
There's 3 flights you may like. How about a 0 stop american airlines flight for $146 that leaves at 3:15 pm?
Name the airport it leaves from, please.
SAN international airport
Perfect, thanks.
Shall I purchase tickets?
Yes, please do.
Confirm the booking: 1 american airlines premium economy ticket from san diego to phoenix on march 9th.
Correct
Your ticket is confirmed.
Please tell me the time the flight arrives and which airport.
Sky Harbor International airport and the onward flight arrives at 4:35 pm
Awesome, thanks.
Is there anything else?
I need a hotel where pets are allowed.
There's 10 hotels in this area you might like. How about a 4.2 rated Aloft Phoenix-Airport?
Great, thanks for everything.
Enjoy your day.
I am in need of finding tickets for an one-way flight.
Can you tell me when you will leave?
I am planning to leave on 9th of March.
Can you tell me from where you will leave?
I will be leaving for my trip from Philadelphia.
Can you tell me where you want to arrive at?
I want to travel to Nairobi, Kenya.
I have found an American Airlines flight for you which has 1 stop and leaves at 5:35 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $360.
This flight seems as what I want.
Would you like to have tickets booked for this flight?
Yes, I want to buy tickets for four people for this flight. I am not very sure about my plans, so I want the ticket to be refundable only.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy 4 Economy class tickets for the American Airlines flight which leaves from Philadelphia on March 9th and arrives in Nairobi.
That suits me well.
Your requested one way flight ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help. I would like to find a hotel there.
How would you like staying at the Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands, which has a rating of 4.2?
Can you check if pets are allowed at this hotel?
Unfortunately, the hotel doesn't allow pets.
Is there some other hotel you can suggest?
I can suggest also the Crowne Plaza Nairobi which has a rating of 4.4.
I would like for you to give me other suggestions.
There is also Crowne Plaza Nairobi Airport with a rating of 4.4.
That's good. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I'll be traveling to Chicago. Pull up one-way Economy tickets please.
I can do that for you. When and where would you plan to be leaving from?
I'll be heading out of Las Vegas on the 8th of March.
I found a Delta Airlines flight departing at 12:20 pm and has 1 layover. This ticket would be $231.
I would prefer to fly United Airlines, give more options please.
United Airlines has a flight departing at 12:05 pm with 1 layover stop. This ticket is $224.
Find out if the ticket is refundable please.
Unfortunately, no it isn't.
That will be fine. Can you help me buy two tickets please.
I would love to. please confirm 2 Economy United Airlines tickets leaving Las Vegas headed to Chicago departing on March 8th. Is this correct?
no, my friend changed their mind. I just need one ticket.
Ok, please confirm 1 ticket for United Airlines, is this correct?
Yeah, that will do.
Great, I was able to reserve your ticket.
Alright, now i'm going to need to search for a hotel that takes pets.
I've located a 4.3 rating. Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown.
More options, I will need two rooms.
I've found 9 options. Ace Hotel Chicago has a 4.6 rating.
Phone number and address for them please.
Sure, number is +1 312-764-1919 and the address is 311 North Morgan Street.
No, more options. Change of plans, just need one room please.
ok, what about Aloft Chicago Downtown River North, with a 4.5 rating.
That is the one.
Should I reserve the room now?
No, I just wanted the information. That will be all.
Ok, Enjoy your day.
I'm looking for a flight that's one way.
On what day to you want to leave?
I am going on the 13th.
What are the places that you are leaving from and going to?
I will be taking off from New York and going to Seattle, WA.
I was able to find an American Airlines flight that will take off at 6 am and has 1 stop. Your ticket cost is $315.
Can you check for some more flights?
I was able to find a Delta Airlines flight with an outbound flight that has 1 stop and departs at 2 pm. You can purchase a ticket for $297.
Okay, that will be fine with me.
Would you like to purchase a ticket for it?
Yes, I want to go on a get a ticket.
Can you approve the following details? There is a Delta Airlines flight that will leave from New York and land in Seattle. It will depart on March 13th with a passenger of 1 in the Economy section.
Right, that's great.
I have verified your one way ticket.
Can you tell me the airport of the departing flight? Also, see if I the ticket would be refundable if necessary?
The flight will leave from JFK International Airport and the ticket does allow for refunds.
Thanks, you've been a great help. I want to find a hotel and book one room there.
I was able to find 10 hotels. Ace Hotel Seattle has a 4.5 rating, does that sound good?
Can you give me their phone number?
You can reach them at +1 206-448-4721.
Great. That takes care of what I need.
Enjoy the day.
I need to find flights please.
Where are you leaving from and going to and on what date?
I am going from Vegas to Delhi, India on March 14th.
There is an American Airlines flight with 1 step going from 10:55 am costing $354.
That flight sounds just right to me.
Would you like me to purchase tickets for you?
Yes I would like a ticket.
To confirm then that is an Economy tlicket for 1 from Las Vegas to Delhi with American Airlines on March 14th.
Yes that sounds correct.
Your ticket there is booked.
Is it a refundable ticket?
no sadly it is not.
Thanks for that now could you help me get a hotel with 2 rooms.
There are 10 hotels, there is one that has a 4.4 rating called Aloft New Delhi Aerocity.
What is the address?
It is 5B Igi T3 Road, Delhi - Ajmer Expressway, Aerocity, New Delhi.
That is great, that is all for now thanks.
Have a lovely day.
I need to find one-way flights.
Where and when are you planning to visit? Where would you be visiting from?
I would be leaving on the 11th of this month leaving San Diego going to Sydney.
I have found 3 flights that fit your criteria. One being a flight from Alaska Airlines with 1 stop leaving at 6:45 am. The cost of the ticket is $246.
What time will I arrive at my onward destination? Are the tickets refundable?
You will arrive at your destination at 12:22 pm, and your tickets will not be refundable.
What other flights do you have?
I have a flight that leaves at 7 am and 1 stop with Southwest Airlines. The cost of this flight is $278.
Do you have any others?
Yes, there is a United Airlines flight that leaves at 7:20 am with 1 stop and costs $294.
That is the flight I want to take, Can you make a reservation for a one flight?
So you want me to make a reservation for 1 Economy ticket with United Airlines leaving San Diego on March 11th going to Sydney?
Yes. Can you tell me when it arrives?
It arrives at 8:51 am . Your ticket is reserved.
What airport will I be arriving in and is my ticket refundable?
No, the ticket is not refundable and you will arrive at the Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Thanks I want to search for a hotel there, I will need to reserve 2 rooms.
I have found a total of 10 hotels. There is a hotel called 28 Hotel Sydney with a rating of 4.2.
That's great. I am all set.
Have an Amazing day.
I will be doing some travelling soon, so can you help me find some one-way flights?
Sure, where do you plan on leaving from and when?
I'm planning on leaving from Atlanta on Monday next week.
Where are you travelling to?
I'm visiting Nairobi, Kenya.
Okay, I found 4 flights that fit what you're looking for. There's a $417 ticket for an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:25 pm and has 1 stop.
Can you tell me which airport the plane leaves from and at what time the onward flight arrives?
The flight leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and arrives at 5:57 pm.
That flight sounds perfect, I'd like to book a one-way ticket for it, please.
Please confirm that you're booking a ticket for an American Airlines flight with Economy seating for 1 person and the flight leaves from Atlanta on March 4th and arrives in Nairobi.
Yeah that's right.
Okay, your oneway ticket has been booked.
Where does the plane land?
It arrives at Jomo Kenyatta International Airport.
Awesome, thanks. Can you help me find a hotel to stay at around there?
How about staying at a nice 4.2 star hotel called Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands?
Okay, that sounds like a great place.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
Nope, thanks for all your help!
I'm happy to have helped, have a nice day!
Can you find me some one-way flights?
When do you plan to leave? Where will you be leaving from? Where do you plan to visit?
I am traveling from London to Chicago. I will be leaving on the 14th of this month.
There is an American Airlines flight available that has an outbound flight which leaves at 2:05 pm and has 0 stops. The price of this ticket is $211.
When will the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 6:34 pm.
Which airport will the flight arrive to?
It will arrive at O'Hare International Airport.
That flight sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy tickets for it?
Yes, please book Economy tickets for two.
Please confirm these details: Book Economy tickets for 2 for an American Airlines flight from London to Chicago. Departure date is on March 14th.
Yes, sounds good.
Your one-way ticket is all set.
Thank you for the help. I would also like to find a hotel room there. I'm looking for 1 room at a three star hotel that has wifi.
Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown is a nice 3 star hotel.
Yes, sounds lovely.
May I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I would like to find a one-way flight traveling economy.
Where are you planning to leave and where are you traveling?
I will be traveling to Phoenix, AZ on March 2nd.
Where are you leaving from?
I will be leaving from New York.
There is Delta Airlines that leaves at 7:30 am and has 1 stop for $268.
Can you buy 1 ticket.
Booking 1 economy ticket with Delta Airlines for New York to Phoenix on March 2nd.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your ticket has been purchased.
I would like to find a hotel.
There are 10 hotels. There is Aloft Phoenix-Airport that is a 3 star hotel.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to book a room?
No, I just wanted the information for now.
Have a good day.
Would you look for one way flights for me?
When will you leave?
I will leave on the 9th of this month.
Where do you want to leave from?
I will travel from Vegas and want to leave from New Delhi.
I have 1 flight you should like. How about this American Airlines flight that leaves at 7 pm? It has 1 stop and costs $342.
What airport does the flight arrive at?
It arrives at McCarran International Airport.
This flight sounds good. Would you help me find a one way flight? I would like to travel in economy and there are 3 in my group.
Could you confirm that you want to leave from Delhi and go to Las Vegas on American Airlines on March 9th and that you need 3 economy class tickets?
No, I want to travel in premium economy.
Okay, so you want to go from Delhi on premium economy?
Yes, sounds good. Could I get a refund? When does the outbound flight arrive?
The oneway ticket has been confirmed. Sorry, but the ticket is not refundable. The onward flight will arrive at 9:30 pm.
I would like to find a hotel room there. I need wifi at a 3 star hotel.
Best Western Plus Las Vegas West is a good 3 star hotel.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to reserve a hotel room?
No, not right now.
Could you help with something else?
No, that's it.
Have a great day.
I need a Premium Economy flight to London.
Where is the flight leaving from?
Phoenix, AZ.
When are you traveling?
Departing on the 12th of this month.
One of 2 found is American Airlines with 1 stop, leaving at 7:35 am for $523.
That works.
May I purchase the ticket?
Make a purchase for 4.
With your permission 4 tickets on American Airlines from Phoenix to London leaving March 12th in Premium Economy will be bought.
Permission granted.
The oneway ticket is set.
I also need a hotel in the area.
A 5 star hotel in the area is 45 Park Lane.
Perfect choice.
May I make a reservation?
Not right now.
Do you need further assistance?
I'm set for now.
Enjoy.
Hi, could you help me search for some one-way flight to Philly please on any type of flight will do.
Sure, where will you be departing from?
I intend to depart from Nairobi, Kenya.
Sure, when do you plan to depart then?
I will be departing Wednesday next week, and would prefer an American Airlines flight.
Sure, there is an American Airlines flight with 1 layover which departs at 5:35 am and will cost you $341.
I see, which airport does the flight arrive at and is the ticket refundable?
Sorry, the ticket is not refundable, and you will be arriving at PHL international Airport.
I see, this is great for me!
Would you like to make a reservation?
Sure, do help me please.
Please confirm your reservation for 1 economy ticket from Nairobi to Philadelphia on American Airlines at March 6th.
Sure, this is great.
Your reservation has been made!
Could you also help me search for a hotel room in that area?
There are 10 hotel rooms in that area, would you like to try Aka University City, a 3 star hotel?
That sounds great, but maybe another time. Thank you!
Sure, have a safe flight!
I'm due to visit Atlanta, so can you help me find some one-way flights?
Where are you flying from?
From Portland.
And when are you flying?
On March 10th.
There are 5 flight options for you. I recommend an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 7:55 am, with 1 scheduled stop, at a cost of $286.
I'm not fussy about the airline, but what else could you recommend?
Of the other 4 options, I would recommend an American Airlines flight leaving at 7:20 am, with 1 scheduled stop, at a cost of $292.
What would be the best choice for economy travel?
From the 3 other choices, I would suggest a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 9:35 am, with 1 scheduled stop, at a cost of $246.
Which airports are on that journey?
The flight goes from PDX International Airport to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That's all sounding good.
Shall I buy tickets?
Yes, go ahead.
So to recap, you want me to buy 1 economy ticket for a Delta Airlines flight from Portland to Atlanta, departing on March 10th?
Yes, that's all in order.
The ticket has been purchased.
Is it refundable? What time does the onward flight arrive?
No, the ticket is not refundable. The flight will arrive at 8:47 pm.
Thanks a lot, now I want to find a hotel to stay at when I get there.
Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza is a nice 4 star hotel.
Okay, that sounds fine.
Shall I reserve a room there?
No, not now.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a good day!
Hi there, could you help me search for some one-way flights please?
When and where do you plan to travel?
I will be visiting Paris on the 12th of this month for a short trip.
That's nice, where will you be departing from?
I will be departing from Seattle, WA.
Would you like an American Airlines flight with 1 layover which will depart at 8:15 am and cost you $354?
No thanks, are there any alternatives?
Yes, there is a Delta Airlines flight with 1 layover which will depart at 7:40 am and cost you $372.
How about other flights? I have no preference on the type of flight.
Sure, there are 3 flights available. Would you like the Alaska Airlines flight with 1 layover which departs at 8:25 am and costs $603?
Do you know which airport does the flight land at?
You will be arriving at Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
And when does the departure flight arrive?
The departure flight touches down at 11:36 am.
I see, this flight is great for me.
Would you like me to make a reservation for this flight for you?
Sure, that is fine with me!
Please confirm your reservation for 1 Economy flight for the Alaska Airlines flight from Seattle to Paris on March 12th.
That sounds great! May I know if this ticket is refundable?
Your reservation has been made! Unfortunately, this is a non-refundable ticket.
That is fine, could you help me find a hotel to stay in that area too?
Sure, there are 10 hotels in that area, one of which is a 4 star hotel called Ac Hotel by Marriott Paris Porte Maillot.
This is fine for me.
Would you like me to make a hotel reservation for you?
No, that is not required. Thanks though!
Sure, would you require any further assistance?
No, that is all I need, thank you!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
Hi there, could you help me search for some one-way flight tickets please?
Sure, where do you intend to depart from?
I will be departing from Seattle on the 13th of this month, thanks!
And where do you plan to travel to?
I will be visiting SF for a short holiday.
I see, there are 5 suitable flights you may like, one of which is an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 layovers which will depart at 12 pm. This will cost you $130.
Are there any alternatives?
How about an American Airlines flight with 0 layovers which will depart at 9:45 pm and cost you $117?
Sure, do you know if this ticket is refundable and which airport will I be arriving at?
You will be arriving at SFO International Airport, and unfortunately, this is a non-refundable ticket.
I see, are there any alternatives then?
Yes, how about a Delta Airlines flight with 0 layovers which departs at 6:10 am which will cost you $122?
This sounds great! Could you purchase a one-way flight ticket for me please?
Sure, please confirm your purchase of 1 economy class ticket for the Delta Airlines flight from Seattle to San Francisco on March 13th.
Sure, do you know when does the departure flight arrive?
Your reservation has been made. Your onward flight will arrive at 8:21 am.
Thanks for your kind assistance!
Do you require any further assistance?
Sure, could you help me find a hotel room too?
How about a 1 star hotel called Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco?
Do you know if the hotel provides a wifi service?
Yes, they do provide a wifi service.
I see, can I have their contact number and address please?
Sure, you can contact them at +1 415-673-3277 and find them at 749 Taylor Street.
That sounds perfect!
Would you like me to make the hotel reservation?
No, that is not necessary. Thank you for your kind assistance though.
No worries, have a safe flight!
I need a one way flight.
Where are you going and when are you departing?
I am departing next Monday and am going to New Delhi.
Where are you departing from?
I am departing out of Vegas.
American Airlines has a 1 stop flight that departs at 10:55 am and costs $321.
What else do you have?
Southwest Airlines has a 1 stop flight that departs at 2:35 pm and costs $329.
Find me something departing San Diego.
Search revealed 3 flights. Alaska Airlines has 1 stop flight that departs at 3:20 pm and costs $307.
What time does the flight land?
The flight lands at 8:39 pm.
What airport does it land at?
The flight lands at Indira Gandhi International Airport.
That works for me. Get me that plane ticket.
You want 1 Economy class Alaska Airlines flight from San Diego to Delhi on March 4th. Is that right?
That is right. What is the departure airport?
Your ticket is booked. You will be departing SAN International Airport.
I need a hotel near there.
Search found 10 results. Aloft New Delhi Aerocity is a 4 star hotel.
That works for me.
Shall I book you a room?
No, not right now.
Do you need something more?
No, not right now. That is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you find me one-way flights?
Where are you planning to visit? Where will you be leaving from? When do you plan to leave?
I will be leaving from San Fran and going to LA this Saturday.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight available. The outbound flight leaves at 8:20 pm with 0 stops. This tickets costs $100.
Are there any other flight options?
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:50 pm with 0 stops. The ticket will cost $104.
That flight seems pretty good to me. Can you help buy me a one-way flight ticket?
Please confirm these details: 1 Economy ticket for the flight from San Francisco to Los Angeles. It will be with American Airlines and the departure date is on March 2nd.
Yes, that sounds good to me.
Your one-way ticket is now reserved.
Is the ticket refundable? Also, which airport will the flight arrive at?
Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable. The flight will arrive at LAX International Airport.
Thank you for the help. I would also like to find a hotel room there. I want one room at a one star hotel with wifi.
Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills is a nice 1 star hotel.
Yes, sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a room at this hotel?
No, I do not want a room reserved. Thank you, that is all.
Have a great day.
Will you find one-way flights for two departing from CDMX?
Where to? When?
San Francisco on 10th of March.
American Airlines offers outbound flight at 2:55 pm with 0 stops for $162.
Destination airport? Onward flight arrival time/
SFO International Airport at 4:38 pm.
Great.
Purchase tickets?
Yes.
Please confirm 2 Economy tickets for American Airlines from Mexico City to San Francisco on March 10th.
Fine.
Reservation is complete.
Thanks. Will you find a hotel there?
Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco is a 1 star hotel.
Address and phone number?
749 Taylor Street. Reach them at +1 415-673-3277.
Any 3 star hotels?
I found 10. Argonaut Hotel is a 3 star hotel.
Will you find one room with wifi?
I found 9 hotels. Bei Hotel San Francisco is a 3 star hotel.
Fine.
Reserve tickets?
No.
Anything else?
That's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you get me a one-way flight for 2?
Where are you visiting and leaving?
My trip spans New York to Vancouver.
On what date shall you head out?
On March 4th, preferably via Delta Airlines.
I found 1 suitable Delta Airlines flight for your trip, which leaves at 6 am, has 1 stop, and a ticket for which costs $299.
Which airport will it depart from, and when will it arrive?
The flight, which leaves JFK International Airport, arrives at 11:11 am.
Sounds great to me!
Can I help you out further?
Yes you can. Can you buy the ticket?
Sure. You want 2 economy Delta Airlines tickets for a flight from New York to Vancouver on March 4th?
No, make it premium economy.
You want your flight to Vancouver to instead be premium economy?
Indeed. What airport does it head to? Can I get a refund if something changes?
I got the tickets. It goes to YVR International Airport. I'm sorry to say you can't get a refund.
I want to book a hotel room in the area.
There's a solid 3 star hotel around there called Atrium Inn Vancouver.
Is there Wi-Fi? What's the nightly cost?
There's no Wi-Fi, and the cost is $204 per night.
Sounds good to me.
Want to reserve a room there?
Not now. Thank you for helping arrange my flight. I need nothing else for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I would like to find a flight from Atlanta to Sydney for four people.
When are you planning to leave?
I would like to leave on the 12th of March.
There are 2 flights. There is Southwest Airlines that leaves at 6:30 am and has 1 stop for $367.
That flight sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, I would like to purchase economy tickets.
Booking 4 economy tickets with Southwest Airlines for Atlanta to Sydney on March 12th.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your tickets are confirmed.
I would like to find an hotel room.
There are 10 hotels. There is 28 Hotel Sydney that is a 4 star hotel.
Yes, that hotel would work.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Not at the moment thank you.
Have a good day.
Hi, could you help me search for a one-way flight please?
Sure, where do you plan to visit?
I will be visiting San Fran.
And where will you be departing from?
I will likely depart from London, England. Could I travel on an American Airlines flight please?
Sure, when do you plan to leave?
I will be leaving on the 4th of March.
There is 1 available American Airlines flight, which departs at 3:05 pm with 1 layover. This will cost you $337.
This sounds great!
Would you like to make a reservation for this?
Sure, could you make a reservation for 1 for an economy class seat?
Please confirm your reservation for 1 economy class ticket for the American Airlines flight from London to San Francisco on March 4th.
That sounds great!
Your one-way flight ticket has been purchased.
Sure, could you also help me search for a hotel in that area, preferably one with wifi service?
Sure, there are 10 hotels in that area, one of which is the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco, which is a 1 star hotel.
Are there any alternative hotels which I may like?
Yes there is, how about a 4 star hotel called Argonaut Hotel?
No thanks, are there any alternatives? Would prefer 1 room at a 2 star hotel.
Yes there is, how about a 2 star hotel called Beck's Motor Lodge.
That sounds fantastic!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
No, that is not required.
Do you require any other help?
No thanks, that is all I need. Thank you!
Sure, have a safe flight!
Would you find one way flights for me?
When do you want to visit and leave?
I want to leave on the 2nd of this month and I will go to LA.
Where do you want to leave from?
I will leave from Atlanta.
How about this American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:35 am and has 0 stops? This ticket costs $177.
Sounds fine to me.
Would you like to buy tickets for it?
Yes, please.
Could you confirm that you need 1 ticket to go to Los Angeles from Atlanta on American Airlines on March 2nd in economy class?
Sounds great to me.
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed.
When will the outgoing flight arrive?
The outgoing flight gets there at 11:34 am.
Thank you for helping. I would like to find a 2 star hotel room therewith wifi.
I have 10 hotels that match. Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills is a nice 2 star hotel.
Could you tell me its address?
The address is 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
Sounds good to me. That is all I needed for now.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a flight from Southwest Airlines, economy.
Where are you leaving from? Do you have a goal city?
Sure, I'm leaving from Portland, OR and going to Seattle, WA.
When will you leave?
On the 7th of this month.
Well, there's a 4:40 am Southwest Airlines wit 0 stops for only $74. hard to beat.
Are you sure? That sounds great.
I know,cheap right? What else might you need?
I want to hone in on that bargain ticket. Get it now.
Sure, Here's what I hear: 1 for Southwest Airlines economy ticket Departing Portland March 7th going to Seattle WA.
yes, that's perfect. Is it a done deal?
Absolutely, it's confirmed.
Great, You're a bargain hunter.
Will you need a room or anything?
Sure, get me a room.
There are 10 options. What about the 2 star Ace Hotel Seattle?
Hmm. what about something else? I heard they have bedbugs.
well, Try Belltown Inn, It's a 2 star hotel also.
Fine, I think they have a clean bill of health there.
Do you want a room?
Not yet, I'm looking at local bedbug blogs to see if they have complaints first.
What else will you like?
Nothing else, thanks.
Have a good day. enjoy.
I need to find one way flights from Philadelphia to Atlanta, GA.
What is your departure date?
Leaving on March 9th.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 10:10 am with 1 stop for a total of $205.
That flight sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
I need to buy 4 one-way flight tickets on any class.
Please confirm you want me to reserve 4 tickets on the American Airlines flight from Philadelphia to Atlanta on March 9th on economy.
That sounds good.
Your flight reservation has been booked.
I need a hotel room.
AC Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza is a 4 star hotel in the area.
Okay. Thanks. That's all for now.
Please enjoy your day.
Fine me some one-way plane tickets.
Where and when are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing from Toronto, Canada on the 7th of March and headed to Philadelphia. The airline does not matter to me.
I found an Air Canada flight with 1 stop and it departs at 4:40 pm. The total cost is $212.
What airport does the flight land at and can I get a refund on the ticket?
The flight lands at PHL International Airport and the ticket cannot be refunded.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets?
Yes, buy me flight tickets.
You want 1 Economy ticket on Air Canada to fly from Toronto on March 7th to Philadelphia. Is that right?
That is correct. What airport am I departing from and when what time does the flight land?
Your ticket is booked. You are flying out of Toronto Pearson International Airport and you will land at 0:16 am.
Thanks a bunch. Now I need to find a hotel.
Aka University City is a 3 star hotel.
What else can you find?
Aloft Philadelphia Airport is a 3 star hotel.
What is their contact number and price per night?
You can contact them at +1 267-298-1700 and the cost is $270 a night.
What else can you find for one room?
Aloft Philadelphia Downtown is a 3 star hotel.
That works for me. That is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you help me reserve a one-way flight ticket please?
Where do you intend to depart from?
I intend to depart from SFO.
Sure, and when do you plan to depart and where do you plan to travel to?
I plan to depart on the March 13th to Sydney, NSW.
There are 4 available flights, one of which is an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 layovers which departs at 9:10 am and will set you back $197.
I see, could you help me make a ticket reservation please?
Sure, please confirm your purchase for 1 economy Alaska airlines ticket from San Francisco to Sydney on March 13th.
Sure, this sounds great!
Your one way ticket has been purchased.
May I know which airport am I departing from?
You will be departing from SFO International Airport.
I see, could you assist me in finding a hotel room in that area please>
How about a nice 4 star hotel called 28 Hotel Sydney?
I see, that is great.
Would you like to make a room reservation?
No thanks, that is all I need for now. Thank you!
No worries, have a safe flight!
I need a one-way flight.
Where are you traveling?
I am going to London. I'd prefer an economy ticket.
When do you want to leave? What city will you be leaving from?
I am leaving today from Chicago.
I have 3 possible flights. American Airlines has a 1 stop flight for $444 which leaves at 4:30 am.
Is that ticket refundable?
No, it is not refundable.
What other flights are available? I'd prefer Southwest Airlines. I don't care what class.
Southwest Airlines has a flight at 10:20 am with 0 stops. That one will be $233.
When does it arrive?
The flight arrives at your destination at 0:49 am.
That one is good. Please buy me a ticket.
Please confirm your request: You're purchasing 1 economy ticket on Southwest Airlines. The flight is from Chicago to London and it leaves on March 1st.
Yes, that's right. Which airport does it leave from? What airport do I arrive at?
Your one-way ticket is confirmed. That flight departs from O'Hare International Airport and arrives at Heathrow International Airport.
I also need a hotel room there.
45 Park Lane is a 5 star hotel.
What's the phone number of that hotel? Do they have wifi?
The phone number is +44 20 7493 4545. They do not have wifi.
Okay. Thanks, that was all I needed.
Have a great day.
Will you find one-way flights?
What's the destination?
From Chicago to New York City.
When?
Today.
I found 3 flights. American Airlines has outbound flight that leaves at 12:30 pm with 0 stops for $123.
Onward flight arrives when? Refundable ticket?
Nonrefundable ticket. Flight arrives at 3:49 pm.
Anything else?
Delta Airlines has onbound flight that leaves at 9:15 am with 0 stops for $132.
Anything else?
Southwest Airlines has outbound flight that leaves at 6:50 am with 0 stops for $135.
Perfect. Will you buy a one-way ticket?
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket for Southwest Airlines from Chicago to New York on March 1st.
Change it to Premium Economy.
Please confirm a Premium Economy flight from Chicago.
Great. What's the destination airport? Refundable ticket?
Reservation is complete. JFK International Airport. Nonrefundable ticket.
Will you find a hotel there?
1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge, a 4 star hotel.
Nice. That's all.
Have a great day.
I need help finding a one way flight.
When is departure date?
Departure is March 6th and leaving San Francisco.
What is destination city?
I want a refundable ticket to San Diego.
I found 3. I have an Alaska Airlines leaving at 10:45 am with 0 stops for $97.
Yes, can you buy the one way ticket?
Confirm Alaska Airlines leaving at 10:45 am from San Francisco to San Diego on March 6th economy for 1.
I need 3 seats.
Confirm change to 3 seats from San Francisco.
Yes, I accept that.
You are confirmed for your one way ticket.
I also need a room in a 2 star hotel.
I have a 2 star called Bahia Resort Hotel.
That is what I want.
Do you want to reserve?
No, hold off for now.
Is there anything else?
No that is all I need.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight and I was wondering if you could help me with that.
Sure, where are you leaving from?
I'll be in Chi-town
Where do you wish to go?
I need to be in Phoenix, AZ
When are you leaving?
Departure day is on the 6th of this month
If you don't mind traveling with american airlines, you can leave at 4:30 am and pay $245. The flight has 1 stops.
Where am I leaving from?
O'hare international airport
I need to reach Paris, France, show me more flights
I've found 2 flights, one is with delta airlines, it leaves at 6:40 pm and it has 0 stops. It will cost you $231
This one will work out, help me in the buying procedure please
Okay, before I do that, confirm me what I am about to do. You want to fly from chicago to paris with delta airlines on march 6th. you'll fly economy and you need to buy 1 ticket
No, we're traveling in three people
Okay then, I'll buy 3 tickets and you'll leave on march 6th
Where will we leave from and where will we arrive?
Tickets are bought. the origin airport is o'hare international airport and the final is charles de gaulle international airport
thank you so much, now go find me a hotel room there
there are 10 hotels that suits you. What about a 4 star hotel called ac hotel by marriott paris porte maillot?
I need wifi so please check if it's included. Tell me the price for 1 night
Wifi is not available and the room is $80 per night
show me more hotels that better suit my needs, one star is fine with me
I've found 1 star hotel and it's called amastan paris
It's okay.
I can reserve a room for you there.
No, don't do it please.
May I assist you further more?
No you can't, it was all I needed from you
Goodbye sir.
I have a plan on a short trip for which I need your help to search for one-way flight. Can you help me to find the suitable one?
Yes, let me know the starting date of your travel plan so that I can search for the flight accordingly.
I want the flight for the starting date on the 12th.
What is the destination as per your travel plan?
Search for the flight to Vancouver, BC.
From which City do you want me to search for the flight?
Search it from Portland which is the City I plan to leave from.
What about an outbound flight from Alaska Airlines which leaves at 10:10 am with 1 stop and the price of ticket is $221.
When and where does the onward flight arrive?
The arrival of onward flight is at 7:49 pm to YVR International Airport.
This is one I search for and please help me to book tickets in that flight.
Need your confirmation to book 1 ticket under Economy class in the flight from Alaska Airlines which leaves from Portland on March 12th to Vancouver.
That is perfect to proceed. Also let me know the origin Airport name check whether the ticket is refundable or not?
I have successfully booked the tickets to the flight which departs from PDX International Airport and the tickets are not refundable.
Can you search for a hotel there to book the rooms.
Yes, what about a hotel name Atrium Inn Vancouver which is a 3 star hotel.
That is nice. Thanks.
Anything else you need.
No, thanks. That's all.
Have a great day.
Would you look for some one-way flights for me?
What is the location you plan to go to?
I will be going to London, UK.
What is the area you are leaving from and on what date?
I will be coming from Atlanta and it will be next Tuesday.
I have found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that is leaving at 8:40 pm. You can get a ticket for $231.
Would I be able to get the ticket refunded?
Sorry, you wouldn't be able to get a refund.
That sounds like a pretty good flight to me. Would you be able to help me purchase a one way ticket?
Can you approve the following details? An American Airlines economy flight for 1 passenger will depart on March 5th from Atlanta and land in London.
Yep, that's correct.
I have verified your one-way ticket.
What is the airport that it departs from?
Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport is the flights departure location.
When would the onward flight get in? What is the airline that the flight will arrive at?
The onward flight location is Heathrow International Airport and it will get there at 10:44 am.
Thanks. I'm searching for a two star hotel there.
There is a 2 star hotel named 45 Park Lane, it's a nice one.
Okay, I like how that sounds.
Would you like for me to book a room for you at that hotel?
No, I will pass on reserving a room.
Would you like my assistance with anything else?
Nope, thanks for your help.
Enjoy your day.
Can you help me search for a one way flight?
Sure, where are you leaving from?
Leaving from NYC.
Where are you going and when?
It'll be March 13th to LAX.
Okay, there's 4 that may work. How about an American Airlines flight with 0 stops departing at 4:05 am. It costs $229.
What's the arrival airport for that one?
LAX International Airport.
Sounds good, that's what I need.
Should I get you tickets?
Yes, please get the ticket.
Please confirm you'd like 1 ticket on the American Airlines economy flight from New York to Los Angeles on March 13th.
Yes, that's right.
I've booked your flight.
Great, thank you.
Anything else I can do for you?
Yeah, find me a 1 star hotel there.
Sure, I found 10 that may work. There's a 1 star hotel called Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills.
Great, that's perfect.
Shall I get you a room?
Not yet, that's all I need.
Have a great rest of your day.
Could you find me a one-way flight leaving London, England?
Sure! Where would you like to fly to? When would you like the tickets?
I'd be leaving Thursday next week, traveling to Atlanta, GA.
Okay, I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:35 pm with 0 stops. It'll cost $228.
Okay, any other flights?
There's a British Airways flight that leaves at 8 am with 0 stops. It costs $260.
Any other flights?
I found a Delta airlines flight that leaves at 3:35 pm with 1 stop. It costs $351.
Okay, yeah, that flight sounds good.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets for you?
Yes, please. I'd like to reserve the tickets for 4 people in Economy.
Okay, you would like 4 tickets for a flight from London to Atlanta with Delta airlines. You will depart March 7th with Economy seating. Is this correct?
Yes.
Okay, your tickets have been reserved.
Thanks so much for your help. I'd like to find a hotel with wifi, a one star hotel is fine.
I found a 1 star hotel, Ac Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza.
What's their contact number? How much would it cost each day?
Their phone number is +1 470-231-3030 and it costs $108 per night.
Are there any other hotels I'd like around?
Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Downtown is a 1 star hotel.
Okay, thanks for your help. That's all for now.
You're welcome, have a lovely day!
Please help me find one-way flights.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm in Toronto, Ontario.
When will you leave? What's the destination?
I want to leave next Friday and fly to San Fran. I prefer economy.
I have 4 possible flights for you. How about an Air Canada flight? It leaves at 1:25 pm and has 1 stop. The cost is $305.
Sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets now?
Yes, please get me a ticket.
Please confirm your purchase: You are reserving 1 seat on an Air Canada flight from Toronto to San Francisco. The flight leaves March 8th. The ticket is in economy class.
Yes, that's correct. What airport do I arrive at?
Your one-way ticket has been confirmed. The destination for that flight is SFO International Airport.
What airport does it leave from? What time does the flight arrive?
The flight leaves from Toronto Pearson International Airport. It arrives at 8:11 pm.
Thanks. I also need a hotel room there.
I have 10 hotels you may like. First is the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco. That's a 1 star hotel.
What else might I like?
The Argonaut Hotel is a 4 star hotel.
What else do you have? I want a 1 star hotel.
Beck's Motor Lodge is a nice 1 star hotel.
That one is good.
Do you want to reserve a room now?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I need help finding 3 tickets for a one-way flight to New York.
I'd be happy to help. Where are you leaving from and on what date?
We will be flying from Portland on March 10th.
Alaska Airlines has a flight for $320 that leaves at 10:10 am and has 1 stop.
That works. I want to buy economy tickets for that flight.
Please confirm you would like to purchase 3 economy tickets for the Alaska Airlines flight from Portland to New York on March 10th.
Yes, please book it. Also, what time will we reach our destination?
Your one-way tickets have been confirmed. The onward flight will land at 11:20 pm.
Thanks! I also want to reserve a 4 star hotel for my trip.
There are 10 hotels you may like. 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge is a nice 4 star hotel.
Great. That's all the info I needed.
Have a wonderful day.
I need one-way flights.
Where and when are you leaving from?
I plan to leave March 13th from Toronto.
Where are you visiting?
I prefer to use Delta Airlines traveling to Phoenix.
I have 1 flight from Delta Airlines leaving 2:10 am with 1 stop at the cost of $292.
Will the ticket be refundable?
No, the ticket isn't refundable.
The flight sounds nice to me.
Would you like to buy tickets for it?
Yes, I'd like to book a ticket.
Please confirm a flight from Toronto to Phoenix with Delta Airlines leaving March 13th Economy class 1 passenger.
Yes, that will be good.
I have a oneway ticket confirmed.
Thanks for the help. I'd like to find a hotel room there.
I have 10 hotels including Aloft Phoenix-Airport which is 3 stars.
Would there be any other hotels with one room?
The Arizona Grand Resort & Spa is a nice 4 star hotel.
What is the address and cost per night?
The address is 8000 Arizona Grand Parkway for $264 a night.
Are there any other one star hotels with wifi?
I have 8 hotels including Cambria Hotel North Scottsdale Desert Ridge which is 1 star.
That sounds good.
Do you wish to reserve a room?
No thanks no room.
Can I assist you with anything else?
No thanks so much.
Have a great day.
find one way flights
where and when will you leave?
the 6th from seattle, wa leaving ny
american airlines leaves 4:05 am and has 1 stop for $328
is it refundable?
it leaves 11:42 am
any other flights?
delta airlines flight leaves 2 pm and 1 stop and price is $274
that is good
wanna get tickets?
yes I do
flight new york to seattle delta airlines march 6th economy 1 person
yes that works
it is confirmed
is it refundable?
the ticket is
which airport then?
jfk international airport to seattle-tacoma international airport
one room 3 star hotel
best western plus pioneer square hotel downtown is a 3 star one
yes that works
wanna get a room?
no I do not
anything else then?
no that is all
have a good one
Find for me a one-way flight for a group of three people.
Tell me where you want to go and from where are you leaving from?In what date you will leave?
I am leaving from London, England to LAX on later today.
I found one with American Airlines.Outbound flight leaves at 3:05 pm and have 0 stops.Ticket cost $229.
Other options you have?
With Delta Airlines at 8 am.Have 1 stops and cost $393.
Sounds very good.
You want to take thickets?
Yes will be perfect at Economy class.
You want to book 3 tickets at Economy with Delta Airlines from London to Los Angeles.Departure date is March 1st.Is that correct?
Yes is very good.
Book was made for you.
I also want to find a hotel there.
A nice 2 star hotel is Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills.
Tell me the cost per night.
$156 is the cost.
Tell me the address.
6399 Wilshire Boulevard is the address.
Other recommendations you have?I want 1 room at a 4 star hotel.
I have 10 options that you may like.A nice hotel with 4 star is Beverly Hills Marriott.
Sounds very good.
You want to make a reservation here?
No.Now I don't want.Thank you.That's all.
Have a great day!
Can you please help me in finding one way flights?
Which place are you planning to visit? Also from where do you leave and which day ?
I am leaving on March 13th from Portland, OR to Atlanta, GA.
There is a flight named as Alaska Airlines which leaves at 7:55 am and has 1 stop. It will cost you $280.
From which airport does the flight departs and also is the ticket refundable?
The flight is scheduled to depart from PDX International Airport and unfortunately, the ticket is non refundable.
Are there other options available?
There is American Airlines which leaves at 7:20 am and has 1 stop. It will cost you $296.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy the tickets for the same?
Yes please book tickets for three people. Any class would be fine.
Please confirm the details: American Airlines from Portland to Atlanta with departure date as March 13th for 3 passengers. The seating class is economy.
That's perfect. At which airport does the flight arrive and from where does it departs?
The ticket has now been confirmed. The flight will depart from PDX International Airport and will arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks for the help. Also can you find a hotel there?
Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza is a nice hotel with 4 star.
Yes. That sounds good to me. I am good for now.
Have a nice day.
I would like to find some one-way flights and I prefer traveling in Economy.
Where would you like to go and when?
I would like to travel to Chicago on March 14th.
Where will you be traveling from?
I will be traveling from CDMX.
I have an American Airlines flight with 1 stop that leaves at 8:05 am. The ticket price is $305.
That sounds like a good flight. Can you buy me a one-way ticket for 1 person.
Can you confirm the following travel arrangements. 1 Economy class seat for an American Airlines flight from Mexico City to Chicago on March 14th.
That is correct. When does the flight arrive?
Your ticket has been confirmed. The flight arrives at 8:12 pm.
I need to find a hotel room with wifi.
I found 10 hotels matching your request. AC Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown is a good 3 star hotel.
What is the address and phone number?
The address is 630 North Rush Street and the phone number is +1 312-981-6600.
Thanks that sounds good. That is all I needed.
Enjoy your day.
Could you find me a one way flight leaving from Vancouver? I need four Economy tickets.
When are you wanting to leave?
I'd like to leave on the 9th.
Where are you leaving from?
I'd like to leave from Seattle.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 12 pm and has 1 stop. It costs $222.
When will the onward flight be arriving? Where is it leaving from?
The flight will be leaving from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. The onward flight will arrive at 8:12 pm.
Are there any other options? I prefer Southwest Airlines.
I have found 1 flight that might work. There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 am and has 1 stop. It costs $260.
That will work for me. Could you help me buy a one-way flight ticket?
Please confirm the following: You want to buy 4 Economy tickets for a Southwest Airlines flight that is leaving from Seattle for Vancouver on March 9th.
Yes, that will work. Is it refundable.
The ticket has been bought. However, it's not refundable.
Where is it leaving from? And where will it be arriving?
It's leaving from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and will be arriving at YVR International Airport.
Thanks so much for everything! I'd like to book a hotel room at a two star hotel.
Atrium Inn Vancouver is a nice 2 star hotel.
Are there other options? I need 1 room.
Auberge Vancouver Hotel is a nice 2 star hotel.
Does it have wifi?
The hotel unfortunately does not have wifi.
What's their phone number and address?
Their number is +1 604-678-8899 and they are located at 837 West Hastings Street.
Are there any other options?
Best Western Plus Chateau Granville Hotel & Suites & Conference Ctr. is a nice 2 star hotel.
Yes, that'll work.
Would you like to book a room?
No, I don't want a room. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
I would like economy flights for 9th of this month.
Where are you going and where are you leaving from?
I am going from Washington to Toronto, Ontario.
There are 2 possible flights. There is an American Airlines flighs leaving at 5:40 pm with 0 stops. the ticket costs $107.
Which airport will the flight arrive at?
The flight arrives at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
Can I refund the flight if need be and which airport does the flight leave from?
Sorry but the ticket is non refundable and the departure airport is Dulles International Airport.
That suits me well. Can you help me to buy flights for four people?
To confirm then you need 4 Economy tickets on March 9th from Washington to Toronto with American Airlines.
Yes that is perfect At what time will the flight arrive?
You ticket is now booked and your flight will arrive at 7:05 pm.
Thank you for that now can you assist me in finding a hotel.
There is a 3 star hotel called Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites.
Yes that would work for me. That is all I want for now thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a one way flight?
Sure, where do you want to visit, and where are you leaving from? What date would you like to leave?
I'm traveling from SFO to Portland, OR. I want to leave today.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight for $108 that leaves at 12:20 pm. It has 0 stops.
Is that a refundable ticket? Where is it departing from?
It is not refundable. The flight departs from SFO International Airport.
Okay, that's fine. Can you help me purchase the ticket?
Sure. Just to confirm, you want to purchase 1 economy ticket on the Alaska Airlines flight from San Francisco to Portland departing March 1st. Is that right?
Yeah that's perfect.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Can you also find me a hotel with wifi there? I want 1 room at a 1 star hotel.
I found 10 hotels you might like. How about Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station? It is a 1 star hotel.
That's fine with me.
Would you like to book a room there?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that's all for now, thanks.
Alright, have a great day.
Can you look for one-way flights for me?
When you are starting and where are you moving to? which is the place of your departure?
I am leaving from New York City on the 2nd from Chi-town
There is an American Airlines which leaves at 5:25 am with 0 stops and the ticket cost is $128
Which is the airport flight starting from?
The flight leaving from JFK International Airport
Is there a ticket refund?
No, sorry there is no ticket refund
Are there any other flights available for me?
There is an Delta Airlines which leaves at 6 am am with 0 stops and the ticket cost is $129
That is perfect
You need to buy tickets?
yes, i require to book a ticket
Please give confirmation details: The flight is Delta Airlines departing on March 2nd from New York to Chicago and tickets is 1 Economy ticket
No, i need Premium Economy
Please give confirmation details: The flight will be from New York with Premium Economy class ticket
That is okay
Your oneway ticket is booked
thanks.I need to search for a hotel room with wifi
There is a nice 3 star hotel called Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown
Can i know their address and what is the cost per night there?
Their location is 630 North Rush Street with room cost at $192 per night
That is fine
Do you need to book a hotel room?
No i do not want now
Is there any other help?
No, thank you
Have a pleasant day
It's likely I'll be going on a trip soon. Can you get a one-way flight for me?
Where are you going to depart from?
From Portland, OR. I'd like to have a refundable economy ticket, as the current plans might fall through.
On what day will you leave?
My group of one heads to Vancouver, BC on the 2nd.
Okay. This $209 American Airlines flight leaves at 10:45 am and has 1 stop. How's that sound?
Sounds good. Can you get the ticket for me?
Sure. 1 economy American Airlines ticket from Portland to Vancouver on March 2nd?
Yes, that's right.
I confirmed your ticket.
I'll probably be there for a few days, so can you also book a hotel room for me?
Want to book Atrium Inn Vancouver? It's a 3 star hotel.
Depends. Is there Wi-Fi there? Also, what's the address?
This hotel, which can be found at 2889 East Hastings Street, does not have Wi-Fi, unfortunately.
I see. What other hotels might be a good fit?
There's the 4 star hotel Auberge Vancouver Hotel.
Oh, that sounds good.
Want to book a room there?
Not now. Thanks, I need nothing further for now.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for a one way flight from Los Angeles to Vancouver on the 10th of March.
There are 4 flights that match. There's Air Canada that leaves at 4:45 pm with 0 stops and costs $156 per ticket.
What else is there?
There's American Airlines that leaves at 11 pm with 0 stops and costs $159.
Okay, I like that. Can you buy me a 1 ticket?
I'll buy you 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Vancouver to Los Angeles on March 10th, is that right?
Yes, that is right.
I've purchased the ticket for you.
I also need to book a hotel, specifically three rooms. I want it to be 1 star. It has to have wifi.
There are 10 matches. Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills is a nice 1 star hotel.
How much is it per night and where is it located?
It is $234 for a room per night. It's located at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
Okay, I can do that.
Do you want me to book you rooms?
No, don't reserve any rooms.
Do you need any further assistance?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a fine day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight.
Okay, what city are you departing from and traveling to and what date are you departing?
I'm traveling from Vancouver to New York on the 4th of March. I prefer traveling in economy.
There are 3 flights that may work. What about an Air Canada flight departing at 2 pm with 1 stop for $314.
That flight sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help with?
Yes, I'd like to purchase 2 tickets for the flight. Our plans may change, so we need refundable tickets.
Okay, I have 2 economy tickets for an Air Canada flight departing Vancouver on March 4th and arriving in New York, correct?
Yes, that is correct. What time does the flight land?
I have purchased the tickets and the flight should arrive around 1:09 am.
Thanks. What airports does the flight depart to and arrive from?
The flight departs from YVR International Airport and arrives at JFK International Airport.
Thanks, I also need to find a hotel room there. I only need one room and I need the hotel to have wifi and a one star rating.
The 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge is a 1 star hotel.
What is the phone number and nightly cost?
The phone number is +1 833-625-6111 and it is $240 per night.
Great, thank you. That is all I needed.
Have a great day.
Would you find me one way flights?
When will you leave?
I will leave on 6th of March.
Where will you visit and where are you leaving from?
I want to leave from SFO and go to Vegas.
How about this American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:55 am and has 0 stops? This ticket costs $99.
That flight sounds awesome. Would you buy me a one way ticket?
Could you confirm that you want to purchase 1 economy class ticket from Las Vegas to San Francisco on American Airlines on March 6th?
Sounds good to me. Is that ticket refundable? Which airport does the flight leave from?
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed. This ticket can be refunded. This flight leaves from McCarran International Airport.
Thanks for helping.
Would I be able to assist with something else?
I need to find a hotel room there. A 3 star hotel is good.
Argonaut Hotel is a nice 3 star.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to make a reservation at this hotel?
No, I do not want to make a reservation. Thanks, that is all the assistance I needed for now.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a one way flight on American Airlines?
Yes. When are you leaving?
On the 10th of March
What is your departure and arrival city?
I will be departing Washington for ATL
There is 1 flight. American Airlines has a flight departing at 11:20 pm with 0 stops. Tickets cost is $113
That will work fine
Shall I purchase your ticket?
Yes please do
To confirm: You wish to purchase 1 economy ticket on American Airlines flight March 10th from Washington to Atlanta. Is this correct?
Yes it is. What airport does my flight arrive at?
Your flight arrives at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. Your one way ticket is confirmed.
Which airport do I depart from?
The flight departs from Dulles International Airport.
Thanks. Can you find me a hotel there?
There are 10 hotels. Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza is a 4 star hotel. How does that sound?
That sounds great. Thank you that is all I need.
Have a great day.
I need help searching for a one-way flight?
Sure! Where and when do you want to travel?
I need a flight to San Francisco on the 2nd of this month.
What is your departure city?
I'm in Phoenix and would like an economy ticket for my flight.
I found an American Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 6:15 am and costs $132.
Please book me a ticket for that flight.
You would like to book 1 economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from Phoenix to San Francisco on March 2nd, is that correct?
Yes, please book it.
Your onw-way ticket has been successfully booked.
Great. I also want to find a one hotel room at a one star hotel for my trip.
There are 10 hotels I recommend. You might like Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco which is a 1 star hotel.
Can you give me their contact number?
Yes, it is +1 415-673-3277
What is the nightly price for a room?
The hotel charges $24 per night.
Perfect. Thanks all I wanted.
Enjoy your trip!
Find a one way flight for me.
Departure date and city?
Paris, France on the 5th of this month.
Destination?
Vegas.
There's an Air France flight with 1 stop leaving 1:25 pm for $337.
Leaving from where? Is that refundable?
Leaving Charles de Gaulle International Airport, it's non refundable.
Sounds good.
Do you want tickets?
Yes.
Please confirm: 1 economy ticket on Air France from Paris to Las Vegas on March 5th.
Sounds good.
Your seat is booked.
Where's it get in and at what time?
It arrives McCarran International Airport at 8:50 pm.
Thanks, find a hotel out there.
I found 6. Best Western Plus Las Vegas West is 3 stars.
Sounds good.
Anything else I can assist with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
Hey, can you help me find some one-way flights?
Of course, I need a few details first: Where are you departing from and where are you going? What day would you like to leave?
I'm leaving from NY on the 11th and going to London, UK.
I've got an American Airlines flight here, outbound at 6:15 pm with 0 stops for $219.
That's great, yeah, can you get me a ticket?
So you'd like 1 economy ticket on March 11th from New York to London through American Airlines?
Yeah, that's it.
That's been purchased.
Great, which airport does it go to? What time will it arrive?
This flight lands at Heathrow International Airport at 6:37 am.
Great - can you get me a hotel, too? I just need one room, maybe a 2 star hotel?
Yes, I've got 10 options here - 45 Park Lane has 2 stars.
How much is it? What's the address?
The address is 45 Park lane, it's $230 a night.
Can you find some others? Maybe try a four star hotel, I've never stayed in one like that before.
Alright - Ace Hotel London has 4 stars.
Great, yeah.
Would you like to get that room?
Not yet, thanks.
Can I do anything else for you?
Not right now.
Have a great trip.
Could you help me look for one-wa flights?
Where are you leaving from and where were you planning to go?
I'd like to travel from LA to Portland, OR.
When were you planning on leaving?
I'd like to leave on the 12th of this month.
I found 4 flights for you. There is an Alaska Airlines outbound flight with 0 stops leaving at 7:25 am with a price of $129.
That flight will work for me. Could you help me buy a one-way ticket?
Please confirm you're booking an Alaska Airlines flight for 1 leaving from Los Angeles to Portland on March 12th in Economy class.
Yes, that is correct. Which airport will the flight leave from and will the ticket be refundable?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The flight will leave from LAX International airport and yes, the ticket will be refundable.
Thank you.
Did you need help with anything else?
I'd also like to find a room in a hotel there.
I found 10 hotels for you. One nice 3 star hotel is Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station.
That will work.
Did you want to book a room at this hotel?
No, I did not want to book a room, but thank you, that's all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
Can you get me a one way flight?
Sure, when are you leaving?
Heading out on the 6th of this month.
What are your departure and arrival cities?
Leaving from London, UK and going to New York.
Great, I found 4 flights that are a match. There's an American Airlines flight for $367 with 1 stop that leaves at 2:05 pm.
That's not quite right, what else did you find?
I found a British Airways flight with 0 stops for $211 that departs at 9:15 am.
What else is there? Check for economy flights that leave on the 2nd of March.
I found a Delta Airlines flight for $220 with 0 stops. It departs at 3:35 pm.
That may work, is it refundable? What's the departure airport?
It's a non-refundable ticket and you'd be leaving from Heathrow International Airport.
I think that should work.
Should I get tickets for you?
Yes, just 1.
Just to confirm, you need 1 economy ticket for the Delta Airlines flight from London to New York on March 2nd?
Yes, that's right. When does the first flight arrive?
I've confirmed your reservation. You'll arrive in New York at 7:57 pm.
Great, can you get me a hotel room too?
There's 10 hotels that may work. There's a 4 star option called 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge.
That should work just fine.
Should I reserve a room for you?
No, not yet. I'll keep looking. That's all I need at the moment, thanks.
Have a great rest of your day.
I need a one way economy seat to Kuala Lumpur.
When are you going?
I am going to Portland, OR.
When are you leaving?
On the 7th of this month.
I found 2 options including American Airlines flight leaving at 1:45 pm with 1 stop. The ticket price is $412.
That sounds good to me.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
Yes, please reserve 3 tickets.
Please confirm, flying to Portland, OR from Kuala Lumpur on American Airlines. The flight is leaving on March 7th. 3 economy seats.
Yes, good. What airport am I leaving from?
Your ticket is confirmed. The flight leaves from KLIA International Airport.
I need a hotel room there too.
I found 10 options including Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station. It is a 3 star hotel.
What is the cost per night?
$114.
That will be perfect.
Are you ready to reserve a hotel room?
No, not now.
Anything else?
No, that is it.
Have a nice day.
can you get me a one way flight?
where and when will you visit?
12th of march and going to chicago and going to portland
alaska airlines leaves 10:10 am and 1 stop and it is $254
that sounds great
wanna get tickets?
I want the ticket
portland to chicago alaska airlines on march 12th in economy for 1 person
yes that works. what airport?
O'hare international airport
is it a refundable ticket?
ticket is not refundable
thanks a lot
anything else for you?
a hotel please
ac hotel by Marriott chicago downtown is a 3 star hotel
yes that works
have a great one
I am interested in having Economy tickets for three people for a one-way flight.
Can you tell me where you want to go, and when are you planning to leave? Which is the location from where you will leave?
I will be departing from Seattle, WA on the 12th to go to Vegas.
There is a Delta Airlines flight which has 1 stop and leaves at 7:45 am. The ticket for this flight costs $225.
This flight seems as what I want. Can you help me book the flight tickets for the one-way flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to have Economy class tickets for 3 people for the flight with Delta Airlines which leaves from Seattle on March 12th to go to Las Vegas?
That suits me well.
Your requested ticket for a one-way flight ticket has been booked.
Can you tell me the airport from where the flight will leave from?
The flight will be leaving from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Can you tell me if the ticket is refundable? Which is the airport where the flight will arrive at?
The ticket you requested is refundable. The airport where the flight arrives is McCarran International Airport.
I appreciate your help.
Is there something else I can do for you?
I also need to find a room in a hotel there, so I have a place to stay.
There are 6 hotels which you might like staying in. One of the hotels is Best Western Plus Las Vegas West, which is a good 3 star hotel.
Can you give me the address of this hotel, and their phone number I can use to call them?
If you want to call them you can at +1 702-256-3766. The address of the hotel is 8669 West Sahara Avenue.
Alright, that seems nice.
Do you want to book a room at this hotel?
No I do not need to book a room at this hotel now.
Is there something else I can do for you?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a good time!
Would you help me find a one-way flight so I can get to my sister's wedding on time? Your savvy help would be a big relief.
I'm happy to assist you. What's the city for your departure, and where are you going?
I need to fly out of Paris, France, going to Vegas, please.
What's your departure date?
I need to board a plane today, please, and so sorry, but my destination is ATL for one person.
I show 3 flights available. Would the Air France flight, taking off at 3:55 am with 1 stop for $342 interest you?
What's the airport I'd have to fly out of?
This flight is scheduled to take off from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
All right. Please set up a one-way flight in Economy seating.
I'm on it. Are you ready to confirm an Air France Economy flight for 1 passenger, taking off from Paris on March 1st, traveling to Atlanta?
Whew, you got all the details correct. Yes, let's verify that please.
Your ticket for a one-way flight is verified.
Is a refund available if something goes wrong?
Apologies, no ticket refund is available for this flight?
Okay. What's the arrival airport and and when do I land?
Your flight is scheduled to arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport at 2:56 pm.
That willl work out just fine.
Do you need more information?
You take the stress out of this juggling of plans. I'd appreciate your help finding 2 rooms in a one start hotel for this trip, please.
Sure thing. The Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza is a 1 star hotel that you might light.
That does sound appealing. Let me think about that.
Would like like more assistance?
Nope, that's all folks, and you've done plenty. much appreciated.
Delighted. Enjoy your day.
I would like to find a flight to SF.
Which city are you departing from?
I will leave from Seattle.
What date are you leaving?
On the 9th.
There are 5 options for you. There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving from 12 pm with 0 stops costing $109.
Which airport does this flight leave from and is it a refundable ticket?
It leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and sadly it is non-refundable.
Ok that flight would suit me.
would you like to purchase flight tickets?
Yes i would like to.
To confirm then that is 1 Economy ticket flying on March 9th from Seattle to San Francisco with Alaska Airlines.
Yes that is all correct.
Your ticket is booked.
I would like to find a hotel there also.
There are 10 options for you, one is Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco and is 1 star.
Yes that suits me.
Would you like me to book you in there?
No not at the minute.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a lovely day.
Hi there, could you help me book some one-way flight tickets please?
Where and when do you plan to depart?
I plan to leave from Paris on the 10th of this month.
I see, where do you plan to visit then?
I will be travelling to NY.
There are 4 flights you may like, one of which is an Air France flight with 0 layovers which departs and 8:35 pm and will cost you $250.
Sure, could you also purchase a one-way economy flight for two people?
Sure, please confirm your ticket purchase for 2 economy flight tickets from Paris to New York with Air France on the March 10th.
That sounds great!
Your reservation has been made.
Could you assist me in booking a hotel room in that area?
Sure, there are 10 hotel rooms in that area, one of which is 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge which is a 4 star hotel.
Are there any alternatives?
Yes, there is a 5 star hotel called 1 Hotel Central Park too.
Sure, that sounds great. That is all I need for now, thank you!
No worries, have a safe flight!
find one way flights
where to then?
this sunday to toronto
where will you be going from?
just san francisco
alaska airlines 4 flights 4:30 am 1 stop $258
is it refundable?
no it is not
what airport then?
sfo international airport toronto pearson international airport
three people economy
american airlines 7:05 am 1 stop $285
that is good
wanna get tickets?
yes I do
san francisco to toronto american airlines march 3rd economy for 3
yes that works
it is good
I want four stars on hotel
10 hotels bisha hotel toronto 4 stars
does it have wifi?
does not have it
yes that works
wanna get a hotel?
no I do not
anything else then?
no thank you
have a good one
Would you look for one way flights?
Where will you leave from and where are you going? When will you leave?
I want to leave Friday next week. I'll leave from Portland, OR to Chicago.
I have 4 flights that should work. There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am and has 1 stop. This ticket costs $292.
That flight sounds great.
Would you like tickets?
Yes, buy tickets.
Coudl you confirm that you are leaving from Portland, and going to Chicago on Alaska Airlines on March 8th? You need 1 economy ticket.
Sounds good to me.
Your oneway ticket has been confirmed.
What airport does the flight leave from?
The flight leaves from PDX International Airport.
Thank you for helping. I would like to look for a hotel room there.
AC Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown is a nice 3 star hotel.
Sounds good to me. Thank you. That is all I needed for now.
Have a great day.
I'd like three one-way flights via Southwest Airlines.
Sure, where are you going and what day?
The 1st and leaving from vegas.
Where are you going?
Portland
There's 1 southwest airlines flight with 1 stop that leaves at 2:35 pm for $202
Awesome, can you buy an economy one-way flight?
Please confirm: 3 economy Southwest Airlines tickets from Las Vegas to Portland leaving march 1st.
Perfect.
Ticket is confirmed.
Can I refund the ticket if need be? Also, when does the flight arrive?
No, the tickets are non refundable and it arrives at 7 pm.
Thanks. I'll need a three star hotel with wifi.
There's 10 matches. How about a 3 star rated Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station.
Where is it located and how much?
9920 Northeast Cascades Parkway and $114
Perfect, thanks so much
Enjoy and have a wonderful day.
I need a United Airlines one way flight for 3.
When for?
The 4th of this month.
What will your starting and ending points be?
Starting in Atlanta going to London.
United Airlines has 1 nice flight with 0 stops leaving at 10:30 am for $241.
That's perfect.
Shall I make a purchase?
Yes, please.
Permission needed to purchase 3 Economy tickets from Atlanta to London this March 4th with United Airlines.
Make the purchase.
You now own a oneway ticket.
What is the arriving airport called. Can I get my money back?
The ticket is non-refundable. The arriving destination is Heathrow International Airport.
Great. I also need a hotel in the area.
I found a 5 star hotel called 45 Park Lane.
Great. I'll be taking a break now.
Enjoy.
I would like to find a one-way flight.
Where are you traveling and leaving from? When are planning to leave?
I'm leaving from New York going to Vancouver on Thursday next week.
There are 4 flights available. There is American Airlines that leaves at 5:25 am and has 1 stop for the cost of $284.
That flight sounds good I would like a one-way ticket.
Booking 1 economy ticket on American Airlines New York to Vancouver for March 7th.
Thank you. When does the onward flight arrive and what is the origin Airport?
Your ticket has been purchased. The flight departs from JFK International Airport and the onward flight arrives at 1:41 pm.
I would like to find an hotel room.
There are 10 hotels. There is Atrium Inn Vancouver that is a 3 star hotel.
Thank you, I just needed the information for now.
Have a good day.
Hi, are there any one-way flights on United Airlines which I can travel with?
Where do you plan to depart from?
I plan to depart from Las Vegas, please.
And when do you plan to depart?
I will be departing on March 9th.
Where will you be travelling to?
I intend to travel to SF!
Sure, there are 1 suitable United Airlines flight with 0 layovers which departs and 3:05 pm and will cost you $114.
May I know which airport does this flight depart from?
You will be departing from McCarran International Airport.
This sounds great to me!
Would you like me to make a ticket reservation for you?
Sure, please do so, thanks!
Please confirm your reservation for 1 Economy ticket on the United Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 9th.
Sure, that sounds good! May I know which airport will I arrive at and is the ticket refundable?
Your one-way ticket has been purchased. You will be travelling to SFO International Airport and unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable.
I see, could you also help me search for a hotel room there?
There are 10 hotels which might suit your requirements, how about a 1 star hotel called Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco?
Sure, this sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation at the hotel?
No, that is not necessary. That is all I need for now, thanks!
Sure, have a safe flight!
I would like to find a one-way flight.
When are you leaving and where are you traveling?
I'm leaving on the 14th of March and going to Seattle, Wa.
Where are you leaving from?
I will be leaving from LA.
There are 5 options. There is Alaska Airlines that leaves at 7:10 pm and has 0 stops for the cost of $134.
What are the other flights available?
There is American Airlines that leaves at 11:45 pm and has 0 stop for the cost of $116.
When does the onward flight arrive and depart from?
It departs from LAX International Airport and the onward flight is at 2:32 am.
Are they other flights available?
There is Delta Airlines that leaves at 6:50 am and it has 0 stop for the price of $119.
That is a good flight. Can I purchase an economy ticket?
Booking 1 economy ticket with Delta Airlines for Los Angeles to Seattle on March 14th.
Yes that sounds good.
Your one-way ticket has been purchased.
Which airport does the flight arrive at and is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is not refundable. The destination is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thank you. Can I find a hotel room.
There are 10 hotels. There is Ace Hotel Seattle that is a 2 star hotel?
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to book a room?
No, I just wanted the information.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for one way flights leaving on the 11th.
Where would you like to fly from and what is your destination.
I'd like to travel from Philadelphia to London, England.
I have found an American Airlines flight leaving at 10:10 am. It has 1 stop and a ticket costs $359.
I like the sound of this flight.
Would you like help with anything else?
Yes I'd like to go ahead and book the ticket please.
Okay so you'd like to book 1 economy ticket on an American Airlines flight from Philadelphia to London on March 11th.
Yes that's correct. When does the outbound flight arrive.
Your ticket has been confirmed. Your flight arrives at the destination at 3:14 am.
I'd also like to find a hotel room while I'm there.
There are 10 hotels that meet your criteria. How about 45 Park Lane. It has a 5 star rating.
Are there any other hotels available?
How about the ABC Hyde Park Hotel? It has a 3 star rating.
How much does it cost per night?
It is $186 per night.
Yes that's fine by me thanks. That is everything for now.
Enjoy your day.
Can you find me a one way flight to SFO.
Where will you be leaving from?
From LA. I'd like to fly American Airlines.
When did you want to leave?
The 3rd of March. On second thought, check Delta Airlines.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines. It leaves at 9:15 am with 0 stops for $113.
Which airport will it arrive at?
SFO International Airport.
Which airport does it leave from? Is the ticket refundable?
It leaves from LAX International Airport. Sorry, it is not refundable.
Okay, that flight works. Can you help me get an economy ticket?
To verify: You want 1 economy ticket for the Delta Airlines flight from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 3rd.
Yes that's right.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you. I also need to find a hotel there.
There's the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco that's nice, it's a 1 star hotel.
Are there others? I'd like to get 2 rooms.
There's Argonaut Hotel which has 4 stars.
That will work.
Would you like to reserve the rooms now?
Not just yet, thanks. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I'd like to find a one-way Economy flight.
Where do you plan on going?
I'm planning a trip to New York City, any airline will do.
What date do you plan on leaving, and where will you be leaving from.
I'd like to leave Sunday this week, I may need to change that though so I'd like the ticket to be refundable. I plan on leaving from Nairobi, Kenya.
There is 1 flight matching your needs. Its a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 5 pm with 0 stops, the ticket price is $280.
That sounds great to me, can you help me buy the one-way ticket.
Okay, so you are purchasing a one-way economy ticket for 1 passenger from Nairobi to New York via Delta Airlines. The departure date is march 3rd.
Yes that is correct.
Your one-way ticket has been confirmed.
I'd also like to find a hotel room there.
There are 10 matching hotels. How about 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge its a 4 star hotel.
Can you tell me about any other hotels I might like?
There is also 1 Hotel Central Park which is a 5 star hotel.
Yeah that sounds like it will work for me.
Would you like to reserve a room there?
No, not at the moment.Thats all I need thank you though.
You're welcome have a nice day.
Will you find me one-way flights?
What city are you leaving from and planning to visit?
I would like to go to Vancouver from Las Vegas.
When are you leaving?
I am going on the 7th of this month.
I have 4 flights suitable for you including an American Airlines flight at 9:30 am 1 stop for $220.
Would there be any other flights premium economy for four people.
Delta Airlines leaves outbound at 12:20 pm with 1 stop for $360.
Will there be any available flights leaving on March 10th.
I found 1 flight from United Airlines leaving 8:15 am with 1 stop for $332.
The flight sounds great to me.
Would you like to buy tickets for it?
Yes, I'd like to book the ticket.
Please confirm the details for the flight from Las Vegas to Vancouver via United Airlines leaving March 10th Premium Economy for 4.
Yes, that is great. When is the onward flight arriving?
The oneway ticket is confirmed arriving 1:59 pm.
Thanks for the help. I'd like a room in a hotel there.
The Atrium Inn Vancouver is a nice hotel that is 3 stars.
Would there be any other hotels I like.
It is a 4 star hotel called Auberge Vancouver Hotel.
Tell me the address and phone number.
The phone is +1 604-678-8899 and is located at 837 West Hastings Street.
Yes, that will be great. That is all I need.
Have a great day.
I'd like a one way flight on the 4th of this month to Portland, OR. I need a premium economy ticket.
Departing from where?
From Vegas please.
I have 4 possibilities for you. American Airlines has a 7:15 pm flight with a 1 stop for $331.
Where does that take off from?
It leaves from McCarran International Airport.
Is there something else?
There's a Delta Airlines flight with a 4:45 PM departure and 1 stop for $339.
I like that one.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, I need four tickets please.
Confirming a flight on Delta Airlines from Las Vegas to Portland on March 4th, for 4 premium economy tickets.
Perfect. What's the arrival time of the onward flight?
That arrives at 9:05 PM. Your tickets have been booked.
Where does it leave from and is the ticket a refundable one?
The flight takes off from McCarran International Airport but it is not a refundable ticket.
Thank you. I also need to find 1 hotel room there.
I have 10 possible hotels for you. How about Aloft Portland Airport at Cascade Station hotel, which has 3 stars.
How much does that cost and do they have Wi-Fi?
Yes, they do have Wi-Fi and the hotel is $114 nightly.
I think that will work.
Shall I book a room for you?
No thank you, I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
I am in need of finding a one-way flight, and I want the ticket for the flight to be an Economy one. I will be flying off from London.
Can you tell me your destination? When are you going to leave with the flight?
I am planning on leaving on Friday next week. I want to arrive in Chicago.
There are 4 flights which match what you want. How would you like flying with the American Airlines flight which has 0 stops and leaves at 2:05 pm? The ticket for this flight costs $245.
This flight seems good for me.
Would you like to have tickets bought for this flight?
Yes I want to buy tickets for this flight, and I need tickets for three people.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class tickets for 3 people for the flight of American Airlines which leaves from London and arrives in Chicago on March 8th?
That would suit me well.
Your requested one way ticket has been booked.
I also need a place to stay there, so find me a room in a hotel. More specifically I am looking for three rooms.
A nice hotel which I can suggest and has 3 stars, is called Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown.
That seems nice to me. I appreciate it, that would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
Look up one way flights.
Departing from?
CDMX.
Departure date? Destination?
Going to LA on the 14th of this month.
I found 3 flights. There's an American Airlines one with 0 stops leaving 8:05 am for $160.
Good, get a ticket.
Please confirm: 1 economy ticket on American Airlines from Mexico City to Los Angeles on March 14th.
Yep.
Your seat is reserved.
What's the departing airport?
Benito Juarez International Airport.
Where does it get in?
LAX International Airport.
Thanks, find a hotel too.
I found 10 places. Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills is 2 stars.
Do they have wifi? Where are they?
They have wifi and are at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
Thanks, that's all for now.
Have a nice day.
I am flying with some friends on a trip, please find a one way flight from no particular airline for 3 people.
Where do you want to go?
We are going to Washington.
When do you want to leave from and when do you want to leave?
Search for flights on San Fran and change the destination to LAX. I want it for the 4th of March and look for refundable tickets, our plans might change.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that takes off at 5:10 pm and has 1 stop. It has a price of $179.
From which airport does it depart?
It departs from SFO International Airport.
Are there other available flights? I will be in ATL, search for the flights leaving from there. I do not care about the ticket class.
There is an American Airlines flight that takes off at 9:35 am and has 0 stops. It has a price of $184.
Is there any flight from Delta Airlines?
There is 1 flight you might like. Delta Airlines has a flight that takes off at 10:20 pm and has 0 stops. It has a price of $150.
From which airport does it leave? And to which one it arrives?
It departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and arrives to LAX International Airport.
It sounds great. Get me some tickets please.
Please confirm: Booking 3 economy class tickets for a Delta Airlines flight. Departing from Atlanta with destination to Los Angeles on March 4th.
That is correct.
The tickets have been booked.
I think I will also need a hotel room in there.
There is the Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills, it has a 2 star rating.
That sounds good.
Do you want to book a room?
Not right now, that would be all for now.
Have a great day.
Are you able to find me a one-way flight?
Can you tell me when will you leave, and from where will you leave from? Can you also please tell me where you want to go?
I will be leaving on 4th of March to go to Las Vegas, and I will depart from Paris, France.
There is an Air France flight with 1 stop which leaves at 1:25 pm. The ticket for this flight will cost you $369.
Can you check if the ticket is refundable? Which is the airport where the flight will arrive at?
I regret to say, but the ticket for this flight can not be refunded. The arrival destination of your flight is McCarran International Airport.
Are there other flight which you can suggest, that leave on the 13th?
There are 2 flight which match what you asked for. One of the flights is with American Airlines, which has 1 stop and leaves at 4:05 am. The ticket for this flight will cost you $363.
This flight would suit me well. Can you help me buy the tickets for this one-way flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class ticket for 1 person for the flight of American Airlines which leaves from Paris on March 13th and arrives in Las Vegas?
That is correct. Can you tell me from which airport my flight leaves, and when is it expected to arrive at the destination?
Your request for a one way flight ticket has been made. Your flight will be leaving from Charles de Gaulle International Airport, and is expected to arrive at the destination at 12:25 pm.
I appreciate your help.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I would like to find two rooms in a hotel, so I have a place to stay there. I want the hotel to provide wifi.
There are 6 hotels which match what you requested. A good 3 star hotel is the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West.
Can you give me their phone number?
If you want to call them you can at +1 702-256-3766.
That is good. I appreciate it, that would be all.
Have a good time!
I need a one way economy flight with American Airlines.
When is departure and where?
I leave on the 13th of this month to New York.
Where do you depart?
I leave from Delhi, India.
I have an American Airlines leaving at 7 pm with 1 stop for $472.
This is good for me.
Do you want tickets?
Yes, buy the tickets.
Confirm American Airlines economy from Delhi to New York for 1 on March 13th.
Yes, that is fine and is it refundable?
You are confirmed to depart from Indira Gandhi International Airport and it is not refundable.
I need a hotel room too.
I found 10. I have a 4 star at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge.
That is all I need.
Have a great day.
I need three tickets on a flight to Seattle, WA.
When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Phoenix, AZ on the 9th of this month.
I found 4 options including an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:40 am with 1 stop. The ticket price is $226.
What airports does the flight arrive and depart from?
I flight leaves from Sky Harbor International Airport and the destination is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Any flight? I am leaving on the 10th of March for Paris.
I found 2 options including a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 7:05 am and has 1 stop. The ticket cost is $359.
That is perfect. I need a one-way ticket in economy.
Please confirm, leaving Phoenix on March 10th on Southwest Airlines for Paris. You have reserved 3 tickets in economy.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Are the tickets refundable?
No, they are not.
Thanks, I also need a hotel while I'm there.
I found the Ac Hotel By Marriott Paris Porte Maillot with 4 stars.
I want a 1 star hotel.
I found 9 1 star hotels including Amastan Paris.
Thats good and all I need for now.
Have a nice.
I'm going on a short trip home. Not sure when I'll be back. Can you find me a one-way flight that leaves the 2nd of this month?
Sure, where will you be leaving from and going to?
I'm flying from Las Vegas to Sydney.
Ok, I found 4 options. There's an American Airlines flight with 1 stop for $273 that leaves at 9:30 am. How about that?
What else did you find?
There's also a Delta Airlines flight with 1 stop for $263 that leaves at 12:20 pm.
When does it arrive at the destination?
It would arrive at 1:32 pm.
And where does it fly out from?
It flies out from McCarran International Airport.
Ah, that's not great for me. Is there anything else you found?
I also found a Southwest Airlines flight with 1 stop for $258 that leaves at 9:55 am.
Ok, that one should work. Can you book a one-way ticket for one on that flight?
Sure. To confirm, you want to buy 1 ticket in Economy on Southwest Airlines from Las Vegas to Sydney on March 2nd. Is that right?
Yes, that's right. When does that one land?
I've booked your ticket. It would land at 4:01 pm.
Ok, cool. Can you also find me a hotel?
Sure, what do you think of 28 Hotel Sydney? It has a 4 star rating.
What else can you find?
57 Hotel also has 4 stars and looks pretty popular.
Ok, that one sounds good. Thanks for your help! That's all.
Ok, have a good day.
I want to search for an one-way flight with United Airlines and I need to book it from March 3rd.
To which city do you want to plan to visit?
search for the flight to Seattle, WA.
Let me know from which City do you want the flight to leave? so that I can search for the suitable one.
I am planning to leave from ATL, search for the flight from here.
Got 1 result. How about an outbound flight with United Airlines with leaves at 5:20 pm with 0 stops for which the ticket cost is $223.
Can you check whether the ticket is refundable or not and also let me know about the origin Airport from which the flight will leave.
Yes, the ticket is refundable and the origin Airport names is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
I can select this flight as it is the convenient one. Can you help me to purchase two tickets in that flight?
Need your confirmation to book 2 Economy tickets in the Flight with United Airlines from Atlanta on March 3rd to Seattle.
That is okay to proceed. What is the date of arrival of onward flight.
The onward flight will arrive at 7:52 pm and your tickets are confirmed successfully.
Thank you. I need one more help and I want to book rooms in a Hotel with two stars and wifi connection. Please search for the good one.
How about a hotel like Ace Hotel Seattle with 2 stars?
What is the cost per night in that hotel?
It costs $44 per night. Any more information you need?
No, this hotel seems to be okay to me. Thanks and that's all.
Have a good day.
Get a ticket for 1 on a plane to Chi-town.
Departure date and city?
Paris on the 9th of this month.
There's an Air France flight with 0 stops leaving 3:55 am for $234.
Where's it get in? Is it refundable?
It's not refundable and arrives in O'Hare International Airport.
Sounds good, get a one way ticket.
Please confirm: 1 economy ticket from Paris to Chicago on Air France on March 9th.
Yep.
Your seat is reserved.
Find a 3 star hotel there.
Ac Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown is 3 stars.
Sounds good.
Anything else?
Nope, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for one-way flights?
Where are you going?
I am flying to Phoenix, AZ.
When do you want to leave? Where are you leaving from?
I want to leave from Chicago on the 6th.
I have 3 flights for your review. American Airlines leaves at 4:30 am and has 1 stop. That ticket is $245.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Would you buy that one-way ticket for me?
Please confirm your details: You are buying 1 economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from Chicago to Phoenix. The flight leaves on March 6th.
Sorry, I need tickets for 4 people.
Please confirm: You are reserving 4 economy tickets.
Please make that premium economy instead.
Please confirm: You are reserving 4 seats in Premium Economy.
Yes, that's good. Is that ticket refundable?
Your one-way tickets are confirmed. Unfortunately, those tickets are not refundable.
What airport does it arrive at? What time do we get in?
The destination is Sky Harbor International Airport. You'll arrive at 9:18 am.
Thanks. I would like to find a hotel room there.
I have 10 hotels you may like. How about Aloft Phoenix-Airport? That's a 3 star hotel.
What else might I like?
Arizona Grand Resort & Spa is a 4 star hotel.
Yes, that's good.
Would you like to reserve a room now?
No, not now.
Is there anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Look up one way flights.
Destination? Departure date and city?
Leaving from Delhi, India the 1st to San Fran.
There's an American Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving 3 pm for $281.
Sounds good.
Do you want tickets?
Yes, refundable only.
Please confirm: economy ticket for 1 on American Airlines from Delhi to San Francisco on March 1st.
Yes.
Your seat is reserved.
Find a hotel there.
Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco is 1 star.
Sounds good.
Do you want to book it?
No.
Anything else I can help with?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I need a one-way flight for next Monday, with American Airlines if possible.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Los Angeles
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from New York City.
I found 1 flight with American Airlines for $174. It leaves at 4:05 am and has 0 stops.
Is it refundable?
Yes, it is refundable.
Which airport does it land at?
It lands at LAX International Airport
That sounds good. Can you help me buy three one-way tickets in Economy class?
So just to confirm: You want 3 Economy class tickets for the American Airlines flight from New York to Los Angeles leaving on March 4th?
Yes, that's correct. What airport does it leave from? When does it arrive?
Your one-way ticket is confirmed. The flight leaves from JFK International Airport and is scheduled to arrive at 7:15 am.
I'd also like to book a hotel room there.
The Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills has a 2 star rating.
That sounds fine.
Would you like to reserve a room there?
No, thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
I need some one way flights.
When will you be departing?
I will be departing the 12th of this month.
What city will you be departing from.
Chi-town is where I will be leaving from.
Where are you going.
I will be visiting Vegas.
I have found 3 flights that match your criteara. There is a flight with Delta Airlines that has only 1 stop. The cost is $267 and leaves at 5:25 pm.
What others do you have?
There is one with Southwest Airlines that has only 1 stop that costs $296 and leaves at 4:35 am.
That will work.
Would you like to make reservations?
Yes I would.
So you would like me to make reservations for 1 Economy ticket with Southwest Airlines from Chicago to Las Vegas on March 12th?
Yes I would.
Your reservation for a one-way flight is confirmed.
Thanks, now I need to find a hotel that has wifi. I want a two rooms with a one star rating.
There are 6 hotels that match your criteria. there is the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West that has a 1 star rating.
Is there any others that meet my criteria?
Yes. The Budget Suites of America has a 1 star rating.
What is the cost per night?
The rate is $105 per night.
Is there any other hotels?
Yes. The Hampton Inn Las Vegas/Summerlin has a 1 star rating.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make reservations?
No I don't.
Is there anything else I can do for you.
No. I am all set. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I would like a one way flight.
What date will you be leaving? What airport would you like to leave from.
I need to leave London, England on the 4th of March.
Where will you be going?
I need to go to Chi-Town.
How about American Airlines departing at 3:05 pm with 1 layover for $427. If you would prefer something else I have 3 more options for you.
That flight will be great.
Would you like to book the flight now?
Yes please do it.
Just to confirm you need 1 economy ticket on American Airlines departing from London on March 4th going to Chicago.
yep that is perfect.
Your flight is booked.
I need two rooms at a hotel around there.
How about the 3 star AC Hotel By MArriott Chicago Downtown. if your prefer something else I have 10 other hotels you might like.
Yes that is okay. Thanks that will be all for now.
Have a great day!
I want one way flights and am leaving the 2nd of March and I want premium economy
where will you be going from?
I am going from new york
where are you going to?
am going to London, UK
there are 2 suitable flights and there is an american airlines flight and it leaves at 6:15 pm and 0 stops and the price is $374
what airport does it arrive to?
It arrives at heathrow international airport
where does it leave from and is the ticket refundable?
it leaves from jfk international airport
flight sounds good
wanna get tickets for it?
There are 2 in my group
confirm New York that goes to london for american airlines and it leaves march 2nd and is the premium economy and there are 2 passengers
yes that is great
the ticket is good
I want a 2 star hotel
10 hotels match and 45 park lane is a good 2 star hotel
any other ones?
abc hyde park hotel is a good 2 star hotel.
yes that works and that is all I need
Have a good one
I need a one-way flight to San Diego.
Where are you leaving from? When are you leaving?
I am leaving March 10th from LAX.
I found 3 options for you starting with Alaska Airlines leaving at 7:30 am with 0 stops. The price is $60.
That is perfect. Please buy me a ticket.
Please confirm, 1 seat in economy on Alaska Airlines leaving Los Angeles for San Diego on March 10th.
That is great.
Your ticket is reserved.
I'll also need two rooms in a 3 star hotel with wifi.
I found Bahia Resort Hotel. It was 3 stars.
That sounds good.
Are you ready to make a reservation?
No, not yet. That is all for now.
Have a nice day.
I am planning for a business tour, will you help me find one-way tickets?
Where will you depart from?
I plan to embark from Sydney.
What is the date of your departure?
It would be on 8th of this month.
To which place are you planning to go to?
I want to fly to Chicago.
There are found 2 flights. One is Delta Airlines leaving at 5:50 pm with 1 stops and flight charge is $344.
From where the flight departs? Can I refund the ticket?
Sorry, you cannot refund it. It departs from Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Ok, that's fine.
If you wish you tickets can be booked now?
Yes, go on and book one in Economy.
Please confirm, You want fly to Chicago from Sydney by Delta Airlines on Economy class on March 8th. There will be 1 passenger.
Right, go ahead.
Successfully processed your request.
Where is the arriving airport? What about arrival of onward flight?
Flight lands at O'Hare International Airport. 1:52 pm is the arrival time of onward flight.
Thank you. Now find two rooms in a four star hotel there with wifi facility.
You can stay at Ace Hotel Chicago which is 4 star hotel.
What is the cost for one night? Where is it located?
It is located at 311 North Morgan Street and you have to spend $216 per night.
Thanks a lot.
Have a great day.
Find me round trip flights out of LAX.
What day are you departing?
I am departing on the 5th.
Where are you going and when are you returning?
I will be visiting ATL and returning on the 11th of this month.
I found an American Airlines flight that costs $179. The first flight departs at 5:25 pm and the second flight departs at 2:30 pm.
That works for me.
Shall I get tickets for you?
Yes, book me plane tickets.
You want 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines flying from Los Angeles to Atlanta. The departure flight leaves at 5:25 pm on March 5th and the return flight leaves at 2:30 pm on March 11th. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your flight has been booked.
Thanks a lot. Can you some child-friendly attractions I can do while there?
Atlanta Botanical Garden is a Park.
How can I get in contact with them?
You can reach them at 404-876-5859.
That is great.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks for the help.
Have a great time.
I need a round trip flight leaving New York.
When is departure and return?
I leave on Saturday this week and return the 6th.
Where is your destination?
I want to go to Chicago with three people.
I found 3. I have an American Airlines that leaves at 5:25 am and has return flight at 12:30 pm for $132.
When is return arrival and onward arrival?
Returns flight arrives at 3:49 pm and destination arrival is 6:44 am.
Are they any others?
I have a Delta Airlines leaving at 6 am returning 10 pm for $138.
I want to find one with Premium Economy.
I have a Southwest Airlines leaving at 4:55 am and returning flight leaving at 9:50 pm for $216.
Good, go ahead and buy.
Confirm 3 premium economy tickets on Southwest Airlines leaving at 4:55 am March 2nd from New York to Chicago and March 6th returning flight leaving at 9:50 pm.
Yes I confirm all.
You are now confirmed.
I need some events too
I have a tourist attraction at 360 CHICAGO.
That is all I need
Thanks and enjoy your trip.
I need to travel soon with some friends, can you find some round trip flights from United Airlines for 4 people. We want to leave on the 11th of this month.
Where do you want to go to?
We want to go to Chicago.
Where will you depart from? And when will you fly?
Look for something in San Francisco for the 9th of this month.
There is 1 flight you might like.. There is a flight from United Airlines, the outbound flight takes off at 5:35 am and the return flight takes off at 4 am. It has a total cost of $175.
Does it have one stop?
No, it has 0 stops.
That flight sounds Great.
Do you want to book some tickets?
Yes, book them please.
Please confirm: Booking 4 economy class ticket from United Airlines. Departing from San Francisco on March 9th at 5:35 am and arriving to Chicago. Returning flight on March 11th at 4 am.
That is correct. From which airport does it depart and to which one it arrives?
The tickets have been booked. The flight departs from SFO International Airport and arrives to O'Hare International Airport.
Thanks a lot. I also want to know if there is anything child-friendly to visit in Chicago.
There is a Tourist Attraction you might like. The 360 CHICAGO.
That sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I need a round trip flight. I'll get back March 5th.
Where are you going? Where are you leaving from? When would you like to leave?
I'm leaving this Sunday from Portland. I'm going to LAX.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am. The return flight is at 5:15 am. It costs $141.
That's a good one. I'd like to buy tickets.
You want 1 Alaska Airlines ticket to go from Portland to Los Angeles. The flight leaves at 10:10 am on March 3rd and returns March 5th at 5:15 am. It's an economy class seat.
Yes, that's it.
Your ticket has been booked.
I'd also like some attractions to see. I want a museum.
I found 10 attractions for you. Autry Museum of the American West is a museum.
Okay. That's all for now.
Have a nice day.
Please find me a round trip flight.
Where are you going?
Atlanta, Ga on the 11th.
When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Delhi on the 1st of this month.
I found an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:20 am. The return flight leaves at 2:30 pm and the ticket price is $425.
Is the ticket refundable?
No, it is not.
That flight will be good.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
Yes, I am ready to book the tickets.
Please confirm, leaving Delhi on American Airlines on March 1st at 9:20 am for Atlanta. The return flight leaves at 2:30 pm on March 11th. You reserved 1 seat in economy.
That sounds good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
I want to find some child-friendly activities like a free museum.
The Children's Museum of Atlanta is a museum your kids would like.
What is the phone number?
It is 404-659-5437.
Cool, anything else?
There is the High Museum of Art. It is another museum.
Cool.
Anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Will you find round trip flights?
What's the destination? Leaving from?
I'm leaving from Los Angeles to Atlanta and returning on March 13th.
Leaving when?
the 11th in Economy.
American Airlines offers an outbound flight that leaves at 2:30 pm and return flight leaves at 5:25 pm for $178.
Sounds good. Will you buy tickets?
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket from Atlanta to Los Angeles for American Airlines on March 11th at 2:30 pm and returns on March 13th at 5:25 pm.
Great.
I've reserved your ticket.
Return flight and onward flight arrive when?
Return flight arrives at 1:24 am. Onward flight at 4:29 pm.
Thanks. Will you find child-friendly attractions?
Autry Museum of the American West, a Museum.
Cool.
Anything else?
NO, that's all.
Have a great day.
I need to plan a trip. I would like to search round trip flights, please.
Sure, when would you like to depart?
I will need to leave this Sunday for my business trip.
Where are you planning to depart from, and where would you like to go? When would you like your return flight?
I am traveling from SFO to Chi-town, and I want to come back on the 6th of this month.
I found 4 flight options for you. American Airlines has an outbound flight leaving at 3:20 pm, with a return flight at 12:30 pm, and the ticket price is $265.
That flight will work for me. I would like to buy any class of tickets for four people traveling as a group.
You would like to book 4 Economy tickets on American Airlines from San Francisco to Chicago departing March 3rd at 3:20 pm and returning March 6th at 12:30 pm. Are these details correct.
Yes, that all sounds correct.
Great, your ticket is confirmed. Thank you.
When does the return flight land?
The return flight arrives at 8:11 pm.
How many stops will the flight have? Is the ticket refundable if I have to adjust my travel plans?
No, I am sorry, the ticket is not refundable. The flight has 1 stop.
Thank you. What are some child-friendly attractions or activities in the city? I especially need to know about a playground.
There is a Sports Venue in the city called Maggie Daley Park ice skating ribbon.
That sounds fun, what are some other options for activities?
Wrigley Field is another Sports Venue in the city.
OK, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, you have been helpful. I am all set, thanks.
Have a great trip!
I will be traveling soon, what round flights are available?
Do you know when are you leaving and coming back? Where will you leave from?
Look for flights in Seattle. I will be leaving from Wednesday next week until March 11th
What is your destination?
Look for flights to NY.
There is an American Airlines flight. The departure takes off at 4 pm and the return flight takes off at 3:40 pm. It has a cost of $298.
That sounds great. I want to get a ticket.
Please confirm: Booking 1 Economy class ticket for a flight from American Airlines. Departing on March 6th at 4 pm from Seattle and arriving to New York. The return flight takes off at 3:40 pm on March 11th.
That is correct.
The ticket has been booked.
At what times does the flight arrives to NY? And from which airport does it takes off?
It arrives at 2:14 am and departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I also want to find something to do in there.
There is a Performing Arts Venue, the 92nd Street Y.
What other things are there? Is there any Historical Landmark?
There are 10 things you might like. The Bayonne Bridge is a Historical Landmark.
What other things are there?
The Bow Bridge is a Historical Landmark.
Sounds great, thanks a lot. That would be all.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find round trip flights?
Sure. Where will you be leaving from and when would you like to go?
I'm leaving from San Fran on March 5th.
Where would you like to go?
I'm going to Seattle and I prefer United Airlines.
When will you return?
I'd like to return on March 12th.
I found 1 convenient flight for this trip. On United Airlines, departing at 3:05 pm, returning at 8:30 pm. The cost is $128.
That sounds good. Can you buy the tickets?
Please confirm the following details: 1 passenger in Economy seating on United Airlines flight from San Francisco to Seattle on March 5th at 3:05 pm. Returning on March 12th at 8:30 pm.
Yes. Which airport does it depart from?
It departs from SFO International Airport. Your ticket is confirmed.
How many stops does the flight have?
The number of stops is 0.
Thanks. Can you help me find a free Museum which is child friendly?
There's a Museum called Chihuly Garden and Glass.
Great. Are there any other attractions?
There's a Museum called Museum of History & Industry (MOHAI).
Great, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
You're welcome. Enjoy your trip!
Search round trip flights available on the 3rd of March.
Alright, do you know the date you wish to return? Also, where would you like to depart from?
Let's leave from Vancouver, BC on the 13th. Just 1 ticket will be needed.
Alright, thank you. I also need to know your destination please.
I'll be going to New York City.
May I suggest Delta Airlines flight departing at 2:50 am and the return flight will depart at 6 am. Ticket is $315.
That will do just fine. Buy this now.
Alright, please confirm you would like to buy 1 Economy ticket for Delta Airlines departing from Vancouver headed to New York. Departure date is March 3rd with a return date of March 13th. Please be advised the onward flight will be departing at 2:50 am. your return flight will leave at 6 am. Does this sound right?
yes, please proceed.
Great, your reservation is complete.
Find local attractions there please.
One moment, I would suggest 92nd Street Y, this is a Performing arts venue.
okay, thanks. Good bye.
your welcome. Good bye.
Would you help me get set up with a round trip flight?
Where do you want to take off from and return back?
I have to be back in town by March 7th and I will depart from NY.
When do you need to depart and where are you going?
I want to get to Chi-Town, leaving here on the 1st of March.
American Airlines actually has an early 5:25 am flight that cost $139, but you would need to leave at 12:30 pm for the return trip.
This flight works well for what I need.
Should we begin to purchase the tickets now?
Please book economy class tickets, thank you.
Would you confirm that you are leaving New York and want to go to Chicago on March 1st, 5:25 am through American Airlines and you will return on March 7th at 12:30 pm? You are also needing 1 economy seat, is this correct?
That all works for me, what time would I expect the onward flight arrival to be?
Your tickets have been purchased successfully. Your onward flight will be arriving at 6:44 am.
What attractions are available in Chicago that are free to attend?
There are 10 events you may be interested in, including 360 Chicago and the tourist attraction.
Thanks so much.
Do you want help with another task?
Thank you, but that is all I needed.
Okay, have fun and stay safe!
Can you help me find some round trip flights?
When would you like to leave?
I will be leaving on March 7th.
When are you coming back? Where will you leave from? Where are you going to visit?
I would like to travel to ATL and leave from Paris, France. I want to get back on March 9th.
There is 1 flight that may work. It is a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight will leave at 11:20 am and its return flight leaves at 3:40 pm. This ticket is $433.
That flight sounds pretty good. Can you help me purchase the flight tickets, preferably Economy tickets?
Please confirm these details: 1 Economy ticket traveling from Paris to Atlanta on Delta Airlines. Departure date is on March 7th and return date is March 9th. The onward flight will leave at 11:20 am and the return flight will leave at 3:40 pm.
Yes, sounds good.
Your ticket is booked and ready.
Thank you for the help. Can you find me any attractions there, preferably a Museum and child-friendly?
There are 8 attractions that you may like. There is a Museum called the Atlanta History Center that you could check out.
Okay, that's great.
May I help with anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
Have fun!
I need to find round trip flights please.
Where are you leaving from, and where will you travel to? When do you plan to return?
I am leaving from San Fran and going to Toronto, Ontario. I want to get back on the 5th of this month.
When would you like to leave?
I want to leave later today if possible.
I have 2 flights for you. American Airlines has one flight leaving at 7:05 am for $290. The return flight departs at 10:05 am.
What else is available?
United Airlines has a flight for $281 that leaves at 9:15 am. The return flight takes off at 5:35 pm.
That one sounds good. Please buy tickets for me. I need economy tickets for 3 people.
Please confirm your details: You are purchasing 3 economy tickets from San Francisco to Toronto. You're flying on United Airlines, leaving March 1st at 9:15 am. Your return flight is on March 5th at 5:35 pm.
Yes, that's right. When does the onward flight get in?
Your tickets are confirmed. The outbound flight arrives at 7:19 pm.
Thanks, that's perfect. Can you find me some attractions there?
I suggest 3D Toronto sign. That's a popular tourist attraction.
Sounds good.
Is there anything else I can do for you now?
No, you have been very helpful.
Have a great trip!
Please find me a round trip flight.
Where are you going?
I am going to Phoenix.
When are you coming back? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving on March 5th and returning on the 7th of this month. I am leaving from Seattle.
I only found 1 flight from United Airlines leaving at 8:30 pm. The return flight leaves at 6:10 pm. The ticket is $215.
That is perfect.
Anything else?
I need three tickets in economy.
Please confirm, flight leaving Seattle for Phoenix on United Airlines. Leaving March 5th at 8:30 pm and returning March 7th at 6:10 pm. Reserved 3 economy tickets.
Yes, what airport are we leaving from?
Your tickets are booked. You will be arriving at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
I'd like to find some child-friendly things to do there, like a historical spot.
I found 1 option called Hole in the Rock. It is a historical landmark.
Cool, that is all for now.
Have a nice day.
I am searching for a round trip flight for four people
Which place are you planning to visit?
I am planning to visit to San Fran.
On which date will you be coming back and when do you plan to leave?
I am leaving on the 4th and will be getting back on 6th of March.
Which place will you be leaving?
I am planning to leave from Seattle.
Alaska airlines is available. Outbound flight leaves at 12 pm and return flight leaves at 2:55 pm. It will cost you $127.
Are there other flights available? There are 3 people and I an planning to travel to SD.
American Airlines is available.The outbound flight leaves at 8:15 am and retuen flight leaves at 4:10 am. The ticket will cost you $206.
That sound good to me. Can you please help me in buying the tickets?
Please confirm the details: American Airlines from Seattle to San Diego on March 4th with return date as March 6th. The onward flight will leave at 8:15 am and and return flight will leaves at 4:10 am. It is an economy class with 3 number of passengers.
Yes.That's sound. Is the ticket refundable and does the flight has one stop?
The ticket is now confirmed. Unfortunately, the ticket is not refundable. It has 1 stop.
Can you please show me some attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that you can find interesting. One is Balboa Park and it is a Park.
Okay. That is Great
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. That was helpful. Thanks for assistance.
Enjoy!
Can you please help me in booking a round flight for me?
Where are you planning to visit? Also from where will you be planning and on which date?
I am planning to leave on March 3rd and travelling to SF from LA.
On which day will you be coming back?
I am leaving today and will be coming back on March 12th.
Alaska Airlines ia available which departs at 5:50 pm. The return flight leaves at 7:10 pm and it will cost you $98.
That flight is good for me.
Shoud I book tickets for the same?
Yes. Please book economy class.
Please confirm the details: Alaska Airlines from Los Angeles to San Francisco with departure date as March 1st and return date as March 12th. The onward flight will leave at 5:50 pm and return flight will leave at 7:10 pm. It is an economy class for 1 passenger.
Yes. When does return flight arrive?
The ticket is now confirmed. The return flight will arriva at 8:35 pm.
When does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 7:15 pm.
Thanks a lot for help. Can you please help me in finding some attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that you can find interesting. One is Alcatraz which is a historical landmark.
Okay great. That's all I needed for now.
Enjoy!
I need a round-trip flight.
Where are you leaving from, and what is your return date?
I'm leaving from Phoenix, AZ and want to return on the 14th.
When do you plan to leave?
On the 7th of this month.
Where do you want to go?
I want to fly to New York City.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight for $295 that leaves at 7:05 am. The return flight leaves at 5:55 pm.
What airport does it depart from, and where does it land?
The flight departs from Sky Harbor International Airport and arrives at JFK International Airport.
That sounds good. I'd like to buy an Economy ticket.
So, to confirm: You want 1 Economy ticket for the Southwest Airlines flight from Phoenix to New York departing on March 7th at 7:05 am, and a return flight leaving on March 14th at 5:55 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that's good. When does the onward flight arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. The onward flight arrives at 6:40 pm.
Can you show me some attractions there?
I've found 10 attractions you might like. Check out the 92nd Street Y. It's a performing arts venue.
Okay, great. That's all for now.
Have a nice day.
Can you get a round trip airline ticket for 4 for me in any class?
Sure, what is your departure cit and arrival city, and when are you returning?
I'm going from SFO to NYC on want to come back on March 14th.
When are you leaving?
On the 4th.
I found an American Airlines flight the departs at 8:30 pm with a return departure time of 4:45 pm for $237.
Great, can you get me tickets?
Sure, just to confirm, you'd like 4 economy tickets on the American Airlines flight from San Francisco to New York departing March 4th at 8:30 pm and returning March 14th at 4:45 pm?
Yup, sounds good to me.
I've confirmed your reservation.
Is it refundable by the way?
No, it isn't.
What airport am I leaving from and what time am I getting back?
You'll be departing from SFO International Airport and returning back at 8:11 pm.
Thanks, can you find a historical spot for me to visit at my destination that doesn't have an entrance fee?
Yes, I found 5 places you may enjoy. There's Bayonne Bridge which is a historical landmark.
Is it child friendly and what's their number?
Yes, it's considered child friendly. They can be reached at 212-435-7000.
Great, that's all I need right now.
Have a good day!
Can you search for round trip flights traveling to SFO?
From where will you be leaving from?
I will be leaving from Vancouver.
When do you plan to leave? When are you going to be back?
I am leaving on the 9th and coming back on the 11th.
There is a Delta Airlines outbound flight leaving at 5:05 pm. The return flight leaves at 5:45 pm. This ticket costs $121.
That flight sounds good.
May I help with anything else?
Can you help buy the flight tickets? I would like 3 tickets and for us to travel Economy.
Please confirm these details: 3 Economy class tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from Vancouver to San Francisco. The departure date is March 9th and the return date is March 11th. The onward flight will eave at 5:05 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:45 pm.
Yes, sounds pretty good.
Your ticket is now confirmed.
Which airport will the flight arrive at?
It will arrive at SFO International Airport.
Thank you for the help. Could you show me any attractions there, possibly something with a stadium and no entry fee?
There is 1 attraction that fits your preferences. You should check out Oracle Park. It is a Sports Venue.
Is this place child-friendly? Also, what is their phone number?
Yes, the place is nice to take your kids to. The phone number is 415-972-2000.
Okay, nice. That is all, goodbye.
Have fun!
Can you find me round trip flights?
When are you coming back?
I'll be back on the 9th of this month
Where are you going?
I'm headed to Los Angeles
Where are you leaving from?
I'll be departing from Paris
When do you want to leave?
I'm leaving on the 1st of March
I found 2 flights that might work. How about this American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:05 am and has a 9:40 am return flight for $349
How many stops is the flight, and what airport does it leave from?
It has 1 flight and departs from Charles de Gaulle International Airport
That sounds good
Should I book it then?
YEs please.
Confirming your flight from Paris to Los Angeles via American Airlines that departs on March 1st and returns on March 9th. The departing flight leaves at 4:05 am and has a 9:40 am return on economy class, for 1 ticket
Yes that's good. Is the flight refundable? And what time does the departing flight arrive?
Yes it is confirmed but it is not refundable, the flight arrives at 2:15 pm
Can you show me some things to do there?
How about a nice Historical Landmark like the Angels Flight Railway?
Is it child friendly and free entry?
No you have to pay and isn't very good for kids
Then what other attractions do you think would be better?
How about a museum like the Autry Museum of the American West
Okay, that's good
Anything else I can do?
No that's all thanks
Have a great one
I need to find a round trip flight.
What are you departure and arrival cities?
Leaving from LA and going to Chicago.
What is your departure and return date?
Leaving on the 7th and returning on March 14th.
There is an American Airlines flight departing at 4:30 am with a return flight departing at 8:30 am for a total of $192.
Sounds good. Please book.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy seat on the American Airlines flight departing from Chicago on March 7th at 4:30 am and going to Los Angeles then returning on March 14th at 8:30 am.
Yes. That's right.
Your ticket reservation was a success.
Thanks. Can you help me find some nearby attractions for my visit?
Angels Flight Railway is a Historical Landmark in the area.
That one sounds perfect.
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
Nope. That's all.
Okay. Please enjoy your flight.
Can you find round trip flights for me? I'd like to travel Economy leaving from San Fran.
When will you be coming back?
I would like to get back on the 12th.
When and where are you leaving from and visiting?
I would like to travel to Delhi leaving Friday next week.
I see 2 convenient flights including American Airlines outbound leaving 1:15 pm and returning 9:20 am for $362.
Do you see other available flights for three people?
I see 1 convenient flight with United Airlines leaving 11:55 am and returning 1:10 am for $401.
The flight sounds nice. Can you assist me for buying flight tickets?
Please confirm a flight from San Francisco to Delhi with United Airlines departing March 8th and returning March 12th. The flight leaves at 11:55 am returning 1:10 am Economy class for 3 passengers.
Yes, that is great. Will the ticket be refundable?
The ticket is confirmed but unfortunately isn't refundable.
Please show me some attractions there.
Please check out Adventure Island a Theme Park.
Okay that is great. See you later.
Have a nice time!
Could you look up some round trip flights?
Where are you planning to visit and leave from? What are the dates you would like?
I'd like to travel to Ciudad de Mexico from SFO on the 11th of March.
When would you like to leave?
There'd be 3 people leaving on next Tuesday. I'd like a flight with United Airlines.
I found a United Airlines flight for 1 ticket. It leaves at 9:15 am and returns at 8:45 pm. It will cost $239.
Where does the flight arrive?
It arrives at Benito Juarez International Airport.
When does the onward flight arrive?
It will arrives at 8:05 pm.
Okay, could you purchase the tickets for me?
Okay, please confirm the following: you'll be leaving from San Francisco and arrive to Mexico City. The flight is with United Airlines leaving on March 5th and returns March 11th. The onward flights leaves at 9:15 am and your return flight will leave at 8:45 pm. 3 tickets with these details for Economy seating.
Yes. I'd like that.
Okay, your ticket has been purchased.
Thanks, could you find me some things to do there?
There's a Nature Preserve, Acuario Inbursa.
Okay, cool. Thanks, that's it for now.
You're welcome. Have a good day!
I'm looking for round trip flights departing on this Sunday. I prefer Delta Airlines.
Okay, what date are you returning and where are you traveling to?
I'm traveling from Atlanta to New York City and I want to return on the 11th.
I found 1 flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 3:40 pm with the arriving flight departing at 11:25 am for $132.
That flight works, thanks. I need to purchase tickets for the flight.
Okay, I have 1 ticket in economy for the flight departing from Atlanta on March 3rd at 3:40 pm on Delta Airlines to New York. The return flight departs at 11:25 am on March 11th, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully purchased the ticket.
Okay, can you show me some attractions there?
What about the performing arts venue 92nd Street Y.
Thanks, that is all I needed.
Have a great day.
I want premium economy on 13th of march.
where are you headed?
I am going to atl
when will you leave and where from?
I will go the 2nd of this month and going from Philadelphia
american airlines has flights and there are 2 of them and leaves at 10:10 am and return leaves 3:25 pm and is $354
when does the return come back?
arrives at 8:31 pm
any other flights?
united airlines leaves 4:45 am and returns 12:50 pm and is $319
flight sounds great
confirm Philadelphia and goes to atlanta and is united airlines and departs march 2nd and returns march 13th and oneard leaves 4:45 am and return leaves 12:50 pm and seating is premium economy and 1 passenger
yes that is fine
ticket is confirmed for 9:42 am
is it refundable?
ticket is not refundable
thanks a lot
10 attractions there and check Atlanta Botanical Garden park
okay then thanks
anything else for you?
no thank you
enjoy it please
Can you find me a round trip flight to San Francisco?
When did you want to return?
On the 10th of March.
When and where are you leaving from?
The 5th of this month from ATL. I'd like an economy ticket.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:40 am with the return flight leaving at 2:15 pm for $270.
Is it refundable?
Sorry, it is not refundable.
Are there other flights?
Delta Airlines has one leaving at 12:50 pm with the returning flight leaving at 10:05 am for $210.
When do these flights arrive?
You'll arrive in San Francisco at 3:16 pm. and arrive back home at 6:31 pm.
That sounds good. Can you get me one ticket?
Please confirm: You would like 1 economy ticket on the Delta Airlines Flight from Atlanta to San Francisco leaving March 5th at 12:50 pm with the return flight on March 10th at 10:05 am.
That sounds perfect.
I have confirmed your ticket.
Thanks. Can you look up some attractions there?
I'd recommend Alcatraz, it is a historical landmark.
That sounds great.
Was there anything else you needed?
No, thank you. I appreciate your help.
Have a great trip.
I need your help making a flight reservation to attend a convention. Can you help me check on some round-trip flights now, please?
I'm ready. What's the departure date and airport?
Heading out on Saturday this week from Seattle is my plan.
Okay. Now, tell me where you are going and the time you want to return, please.
I'll be on my way to Chicago and I expect to return on the 7th of this month.
All right. I'm showing 4 flight options for you, including one that American Airlines is offering, with a departure time of 4 pm and a return time of 2:50 pm for $257.
Is this a straight flight or are there stops?
The flight will make 1 stop.
What's the airport for the arriving flight?
The flight will arrive at O'Hare International Airport.
I think that flight is a good choice, for a purchase of three tickets, please.
Im on it. Are you ready to confirm an Economy flight for 3 passengers on American Airlines, departing from Seattle on March 2nd at 4 pm, going to Chicago, with a return flight scheduled for March 7th at 2:50 pm?
That's totally on point. Let's confirm it. What's the airport for the departure?
The tickets for your flight are confirmed for a departure from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Great. Now, the return flight will arrive when, and can I get money refunded on the tickets if I want?
The flight for your return is scheduled to arrive at 10:03 pm, but no refund is available for the tickets.
Okay, that's fine. You're much appreciated.
Would you like more information?
Hey, look up some fun attractions there for me, please.
The Tourist Attraction called 360 CHICAGO is one of 10 attractions available. Does that sound appealing?
Nice, but what else can you suggest?
Well, a Museum attraction that's popular is at the American Writers Museum.
Is it considered a friendly place for kids?
Yes, it is a place that welcomes kids.
Wonderful. I'll remember that.
Do you need any more assistance at this time?
Nope, that's all folks. Thanks mucho.
Sure thing. Have a great time.
I need a round trip flight.
Where are you going? When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving Atlanta, GA for New York City on the 8th.
When are you coming back?
I am returning on the 14th of March.
I found 4 flights starting with American Airlines flight leaving at 3:25 pm. The return flight leaves at 9:05 pm. The ticket price is $141.
Is the ticket refundable? When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 11:27 pm. The ticket is not refundable.
That sounds good.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
Yes, make me a reservation.
Please confirm, leaving Atlanta, GA for New York City on March 8th on American Airlines flight leaving at 3:25 pm. The return flight leaves at 9:05 pm on March 14th. The ticket is for 1 passenger in economy.
That is perfect.
Your ticket is reserved.
Could you find me some things to do there?
The Performing Arts Venue on 92nd Street Y is really cool.
Sounds great.
Anything else?
No, thanks!
Have a nice day.
Search for round trip flights place.
Where and when are you planning on leaving?
I'm departing New York City on March 9th.
When will you be back?
I'll be back on the 11th of this month.
Where are you visiting?
I'm going to Vancouver.
There is a $339 Delta Airlines roundtrip. The outbound flight leaves at 7:30 am, and the return flight leaves at 3:20 am.
When will I land at my destination?
1:59 pm.
Which airport does the flight arrive at, and when will my return flight arrive?
The onward flight's destination is YVR International Airport, and the return flight will land at 6:40 pm.
Sounds good, can you buy tickets?
Confirm the following please: You're flying from New York to Vancouver with Delta Airlines. You're departing on March 9th at 7:30 am and flying back at 3:20 am on March 11th. Both flights will be in economy class for 1 passenger.
That's perfect.
Your ticket is booked.
I'm looking for attractions like a park.
There are 5 attractions. One park is called Bloedel Conservatory.
Any others?
Another nice park is Dr. Sun Yat-Sen Classical Chinese Garden
Any other child-friendly attractions?
There are 2 attractions like that. One park is called Stanley park.
What's the phone number of the park, and is the entrance free?
Their number is 604-681-6728, but the entry isn't free.
Thanks, that's all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
I need help finding a round trip flight.
What is your departure and return dates?
Departure is the 1st of this month to Mexico City and return is the 12th of March.
What is departure city?
Departure city is LA.
I found 3. I have an American Airlines that departs 2:45 pm and return departs at 8:05 am for $165.
That is good. I want economy for 4.
Confirm economy American Airlines for 4 that departs March 1st at 8:05 am from Los Angeles to Mexico City and return departure at 2:45 pm on March 12th.
Yes that is perfect.
You are now confirmed.
When does it arrive and what airport?
It arrives at 8:05 pm at LAX International Airport.
Thanks, I also need to find a child friendly Museum.
I found 10. I have a museum called Arte Carrillo Gil Museum.
That is all I need.
Thank and enjoy your trip.
I'd like a round trip flight and want to be back by the 13th of march.
Sure, where are you visiting, where are you leaving from, and what day?
Please make sure the ticket is refundable and I'm leaving on the 6th of this month from Atlanta to Seattle, WA.
How about a southwest airlines flight that leaves at 7:20 pm and returns at 5:40 am for $214?
What else is there?
There's a united airlines flight that leaves at 5:35 pm and returns at 4:55 pm for $276.
Anything else? I'll be leaving from New York.
There's 1 delta airlines flight that leaves at 2 pm and returns at 3:15 pm for $310
Tell me the onward flight arrive time.
7:35 pm
Great, book these tickets please.
Confirm the following: 1 economy delta airlines ticket from New York to Seattle on March 6th at 2 pm and returning march 13th at 3:15 pm.
Correct, where is the departure airport and how many stops?
You ticket is confirmed. You'll be leaving from JFK International Airport and there's 1 stop
What are the local attractions?
There's brandon lee and bruce lee's grave site as a interesting tourist attraction.
Awesome, that's all.
Have a wonderful time.
I need to find round trip flights. My return date is the 10th of March.
What is your destination?
I'm going to Chi-town.
Can you give me your departure date and city?
I am leaving on the 8th from CDMX.
I found 3 flights. How about American Airlines? They have a flight that departs at 8:05 am. The returning flight departs at 12:30 pm. The price is $325.
I don't really care for American Airlines. Can you find me something else?
I found 2 other flights. How about Delta Airlines? The outbound flight leaves at 3 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:25 pm. The ticket costs $304.
Sounds good. I want to buy an Economy ticket.
Please confirm the following: Departing from Mexico City to Chicago on Delta Airlines on March 8th at 3 pm. Returning on March 10th at 5:25 pm. 1 Economy ticket. Is this correct?
Sounds good. When will the returning flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 2:05 am. Your ticket is confirmed.
Is the ticket refundable? How many stops?
The ticket is not refundable. There is 1 stop.
Thanks. Can you show me a place of interest with no entry fee?
I found 3 attractions. How about the Tourist Attraction 360 CHICAGO?
Great. That's all. Bye.
Enjoy!
I'm looking for round trip flights.
Where are you traveling from? Also, when will you be leaving and when will you be returning?
I'm going to travel from Chicago. I want to leave today and return next Wednesday. And it's just for 1 person.
Where will you be traveling to?
I'll be going to Mexico City. And I prefer the ticket to be Economy.
There's an American Airlines flight with a departure take off time at 12:30 pm and return take off time at 8:05 am. It costs $311 per ticket.
I like the sound of that. Can you get me the ticket?
I'll get you 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Chicago on March 1st at 12:30 pm to Mexico City with a return on March 6th at 8:05 am, is that correct?
Yes. That's what I want.
I've purchased the tickets.
What are some attractions over there?
You might like Acuario Inbursa, it's a Nature Preserve.
Nice, what else can you recommend?
You might like Arte Carrillo Gil Museum, it's a Museum.
Alright, anything else I can do? How about things for kids?
There are 8 attractions you might enjoy. How about Bosque de Chapultepec, it's a park.
Alright, sounds interesting.
Do you need any further help>
No, you've been really great, thanks for the help.
Have fun!
I'm headed to Portland, OR pretty soon. Can you find me an economy round trip flight there?
What dates will you leave and return?
My one person group will leave on March 3rd and return on March 13th, preferably via United Airlines.
And where will you depart from?
From LA.
I did find you an United Airlines flight. It leaves at 11:40 am, returns at 11:50 pm, and a ticket costs $169.
Sounds good. Can you get me a ticket?
Okay, sure. You want to get 1 economy ticket for an United Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Portland, starting March 3rd at 11:40 am, and returning March 13th at 11:50 pm?
Yes, that's right. What's the departing airport.
The ticket is booked. It'll depart from LAX International Airport.
Also, my daughter's coming with me, so can you find me a child-friendly amusement park?
Sure. I found a theme park called Oaks Amusement Park.
Great. That's all, see you later.
Enjoy your time at Portland!
find a round trip flights for four people in group? flight should be United Airlines.
From where you will be leaving and when are you coming back?
I am leaving from san fran and i want to return back on the 7th.
When do you plan to leave and where are you planning to visit?
i wish to go to sydney and i am leaving on 3rd of this month.
i found 1 flights according to your interest. There is a United airlines flight and the outbound flight leaves at 1:25 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:25 am . the price of the ticket is $230.
When does my return flight arrive and the onward flight arrive?
the return flight arrives at 5:06 am and the onward flight arrives at 1:06 pm.
ok flight sounds good to me. will you help me to buy the flight tickets?
please confirm the following details. the flight is from san francisco, the flight goes to sydney and it is an United Airlines. the departure date is march 3rd and the return date is march 7th and the onward flight leaves at 1:25 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:25 am. the seating class is economy and the number of passengers is 4.
ok that sounds good to me. Is the ticket refundable?
Reservation is confirmed. THe ticket is not refundable.
does the flight have zero stops? which airport does the flight depart from?
the flight departs from SFO international airport and number of stops is 0
thanks a lot. will you find me some attractions over there? i prefer museum .
how about art gallery of new south wales. this is a museum.
whether this place is child-friendly?
yes, the place is pretty nice for the kids to enjoy.
ok whether entrance is free to this place?
yes, entry is free.
okay, that's nice, thanks for now
take care, enjoy!
I'm looking for round-trip flights with available Economy class seats.
What's your departure city?
I intend to leave from Los Angeles.
When and where are you going?
I'll be leaving next Thursday for SF.
When would you like to return?
I'd like to return on 13th of this month.
Among the 3 suitable flights I found is an outbound Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 5:50 pm, with a return flight that leaves at 7:10 pm, at a cost of $106 per ticket.
What's the estimated arrival time for my return flight?
The return flight lands at 8:35 pm.
Please search for other available flights.
Sure, no problem. How about an outbound American Airlines flight leaving at 6:30 am, with a 3:50 pm return flight at $100 per ticket?
I'd like to hear more options. Please search for other available flights.
Okay, no problem. How does an outbound Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 10:20 pm, with a 7:10 am return flight, at $99 per ticket sound?
What's the estimated arrival time for my return flight?
The return flight lands at 8:35 am.
That flight works for me. Please go ahead and buy the flight tickets.
Please confirm that you'd like 1 Economy class ticket on the March 7th Southwest Airlines Los Angeles to San Francisco flight departing at 10:20 pm, with a return flight leaving March 13th at 7:10 am.
That is correct. Please find out the destination airport, and whether the flight has zero stops.
I have successfully confirmed your ticket. The destination is SFO International Airport and the flight has 0 stops.
Thanks. Please find me some attractions there.
May I recommend Alcatraz, a Historical Landmark?
Please let me know whether they are child-friendly, and give me their phone number.
No, it's not child-friendly. Their contact number is 415-561-4900.
Nice. Do you have any other attractions in mind?
May I recommend Alcatraz Island, a Historical Landmark?
Okay, cool.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Have a great time!
I need help searching for round-trip flights.
What's your return date?
I'd like to return on the 13th of this month.
What's your departure date and destination?
I'd like to go to New York on the 7th of this month.
Your origin city, please?
I'll be leaving from Nairobi, Kenya.
You may be interested flying on Delta Airlines, which has a 9:50 pm outbound flight and a 5:50 pm inbound flight, at a price of $309 per ticket.
That flight works for me.
Should I go ahead and purchase tickets for it?
Yes, please help me book the ticket.
Please confirm that you'd like 1 Delta Airlines Economy class ticket from Nairobi to New York. The outbound flight leaves on March 7th at 9:50 pm and the inbound flight on March 13th at 5:50 pm
That is correct.
I have confirmed your ticket.
Please find out whether the flight has one stop.
There are 0 stops.
Do you know whether the ticket is refundable.
I'm sorry, but it's a nonrefundable ticket.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. Could you suggest place of interest attractions without an entry fee?
Among the 7 suitable attractions I found, I'd recommend going to see the Balto Statue which is a Tourist Attraction.
I'd like to take my little niece out while there. Is this place good for kids, and do you have their contact number?
No, this place is not child-friendly. You can contact them on 212-310-6600.
Sweet! Any other attractions come to mind?
Another Tourist Attraction you should check out is Bethesda Terrace.
Okay, cool. That will be all. Bye bye for now.
Have a great time!
I'm looking for a round trip flight.
What date are you departing on?
I'm leaving today.
What city are you departing from?
I'm leaving from SFO.
What date are you returning and where are you traveling to?
I'm traveling to Delhi, India and returning on the 12th of March.
I found 2 flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight departing at 1:15 pm for $340. The return flight departs at 9:20 am.
What time do I arrive in Delhi? Does the flight have one stop?
The flight arrives in Delhi at 4:07 pm and has 1 stop.
What other flights are there?
There is a United Airlines flight departing at 11:55 am for $370. The return flight departs at 1:10 am.
That flight works for me.
Do you want to purchase tickets now?
Yes.
Okay, I have 1 economy ticket for the United Airlines flight departing from San Francisco to Delhi on March 1st at 11:55 am and returning on March 12th at 1:10 am, correct?
Yes, that sounds good.
I have successfully purchased the ticket.
Thanks! I'd also like to find a garden attraction there.
There are 2 attractions you may like. What about Lodhi Garden? It is a Park.
That sounds good, but what else is there?
There is The Garden of Five Senses Park.
Is it free to enter?
No, entry is not free.
Okay, thanks!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I need to look for round trip flights.
When will you be leaving and when will you be returning? ALso, where will you be leaving from?
I'm going to leave from NY on March 8th and return on the 11th of March.
Where will you be traveling to?
I'm planning to go to SFO.
There's an American Airlines flight with a departure that leaves at 4:45 pm and a return that leaves at 8:30 pm. It is $233 per ticket.
What are the departure and arrival airports?
The departure airport is JFK International Airport and the arrival airport is SFO International Airport.
That can work for me. Can you get me a ticket?
You'd like the 1 Economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from New York to San Francisco with a departure on March 8th at 4:45 pm and a return on March 11th at 8:30 pm. Is everything correct?
Everything is correct. What's the arrival time for the departure flight? And is it a zero stops flight?
I've purchased you the ticket. The departure flight arrives at 8:11 pm. And there are 0 stops.
What are some things to do over there? Anything is fine by me.
You might enjoy Alcatraz, it's a Historical Landmark.
Can you give me their phone number? And is it okay for kids?
You can call them at 415-561-4900. And I wouldn't recommend it for kids.
Alright, what else is there out there?
You can try to go to Alcatraz Island. It's a Historical Landmark.
Alright, nice. That's all for now, talk to you later.
Take Care!
Hello! Can you review round trip flights for me?
Hello! I'd be happy to assist. Where are you departing from and where are you going? When will you be returning?
I'm leaving Atlanta, GA on the 9th to visit London, UK.
When will you be leaving?
I will be departing on the 7th of this month.
American Airlines has a flight leaving at 8:40 pm and returning at 2:05 pm with a round trip ticket priced at $312.
What other options are available?
Delta AIrlines is offering a flight that departs at 4:50 pm and returns at 8 am for a cost of $344.
What time is the onward flight expected?
It should arrive at 6:54 am.
I'd like to purchase 3 Economy tickets on that flight.
You'd like 3 Economy tickets on Delta Airlines for a March 7th departure from Atlanta headed to London. The return flight leaves at 8 am on March 9th. The onward flight is scheduled for 4:50 pm. Is this correct?
That is correct. Can you tell me which airport I will arrive in London at?
You will be arriving at Heathrow International Airport. Your tickets have been successfully purchased.
Thank you. Can you advise me on a Historical Landmark to visit while I am there?
I see 10 options that you may like. One such Historical Landmark is 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin).
That sounds interesting. Thank you for your help.
You're welcome. Have a lovely day.
Can you find a round trip economy flight for me? I plan to leave on March 1st and will return March 10th.
What city are you departing from?
I will be departing from Chi-town.
Where are you going?
I am heading to NY. I prefer American Airlines and I just need one ticket .
There is 1 flight. American Airlines has a flight departing at 12:30 pm. Return flight departs at 5:25 am. Tickets are $135 each
That sounds prefect. Please purchase a ticket for me.
To confirm: You wish to purchase 1 economy ticket on American Airlines that leaves Chicago at 12:30 pm March 1st. Return flight leaves New York at 5:25 am March 10th. Is htis correct?
Yes it is
Your ticket is reserved
Thank you. Can you find some attrctions or events there?
There are 10 listed. What do you think about 92nd Street Y, the Performing Arts Venue?
Ok that will work
Is there anything else I can do?
No thanks that is all
Have a nice day
I will be back march 14th and am leaving san fran
when and where are you headed?
I am going march 7th and going to seattle, wa
alaska airlines leaves at 2:55 pm and night one leaves 12 pm and it is $133
flight sounds good
wanna get tickets?
I love economy
confirm san Francisco to seattle on alaska airlines for march 7th to march 14th and flight leaves 2:55 pm and returns 12 pm and is economy and 1 passenger
1 person in group
return flight 12 pm and passenger is 1
what airport does it leave from?
flight leaves sfo international airport
show attractions there
check out brandon lee and bruce lee's grave site which is a tourist attraction
okay then now
anything else for you?
no thank you
have a good one
Would you look for round trip flights for me?
Where do you want to leave from and where do you want to visit? When will you come back?
I would like to travel to NY and get back on the 13th. I will leave from Seattle.
When will you leave?
I will leave on the 9th.
I have 4 flights that should work. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4 pm and the return flight leaves at 6:05 am. This ticket costs $287.
That flight sounds great. Would you help purchase the tickets? I have four in my group.
COuld you confirm that you want to leve from Seattle to New York on American Airlines? You will depart on March 9th and return on March 13th. This outbound flight leaves at 4 pm and the return leaves at 6:05 am. You need 4 economy class tickets. Is this right?
That sounds good to me.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Would you show me some attractions?
There are 10 attractions that should be good. How about 92nd Street Y? It's a Performing Arts Venue.
Tell me their phone number.
The contact number is (212) 415-5788.
That sounds good. Bye for now.
Please enjoy.
Can you find me some round trip flights?
When would you like to leave? Where are you planning to visit? Where are you leaving from?
I will be leaving on the 5th of this month. I am going to ATL and leaving from SF. I would prefer Delta Airlines.
When will you be coming back?
I would like to get back on the 11th of March.
There is 1 flight that fits your preferences. It is a Delta Airlines flight. Its outbound flight will leave at 10:05 am and the return flight leaves at 12:50 pm. The price of this ticket is $191.
That flight sounds pretty good. Can you help me buy the tickets for the flight?
Please confirm these details: You want 1 Economy ticket for the Delta Airlines flight going from San Francisco to Atlanta. The departure date is on March 5th and the flight will leave at 10:05 am. The return date is March 11th and that return flight will leave at 12:50 pm.
Yes, sounds good. Which airport will the flight arrive?
Your ticket is all set. The destination will be Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
When will my return flight arrive?
The return flight will arrive at 3:16 pm.
Thank you for the help. Can you show me any attractions there?
There is a Park called Atlanta Botanical Garden that you should check out.
Cool, any other attractions?
You can check out the Atlanta History Center which is a Museum.
Okay, that's great.
May I help you with anything else?
No. That was helpful, thank you.
Have fun!
Can you help me find a round trip flight?
Yes, what are your travel dates and where do you want to go?
I want to travel to Atlanta, GA on March 1st and return on the 5th.
What city will you be flying out of?
I'll be leaving from London.
I found an American Airlines flight fro $364 that leaves at 8:35 pm with a return flight that leaves at 3:30 pm.
That works.
Would you like to buy tickets now?
Yes, I want to book the tickets.
Please confirm you would like to buy 1 economy ticket on American Airlines from London to Atlanta, leaving March 1st at 8:35 pm and returning on March 5th at 3:30 pm.
That's right.
I have successfully purchased your ticket.
Wonderful. Now can you suggest something to do there?
Yes, I found 10 attractions for you. The Atlanta Botanical Garden is a popular park in the area you might enjoy.
Sounds good.
Are there more things you need help with?
No, you helped me with everything I needed.
Hope you have a nice trip.
I need to look for some round trip flights.
Where will you be departing from?
I'm going to depart from SFO.
What are your departure and return dates?
I'll be departing on March 1st and returning on March 10th.
Where will you be traveling to?
I'm going to Chi-town.
There are 4 flights that can work. There's an American Airlines flight with an outbound flight leaving at 3:20 pm and return flight leaving at 7:05 am. The ticket price is $198.
What's the departure and arrival airports?
The departure airports is SFO International Airport. The arrival airport is O'Hare International Airport.
What other flights are there?
There's a Delta Airlines flight with an outbound flight leaving at 10:05 pm and return flight leaving at 10:40 am. The ticket price is $178.
I like that one. Can you book me tickets?
I'll get you 1 Economy ticket for San Francisco to Chicago on Delta Airlines. The onward flight is March 1st at 10:05 pm and the return flight is March 10th at 10:40 am. Is that okay?
Yes, that's what I want.
I've booked the tickets.
What time does that onward flight arrive? And what airport am I leaving from?
The onward flight departs from SFO International Airport and it will arrive at 4:52 am.
Thanks for that. Are there any attractions there I can go to?
There are 10 attractions you might like. There's 360 CHICAGO which is a tourist attraction you might enjoy.
Okay, nice.
Do you need any further assistance?
No, you've been very helpful, thank you.
Have a great time!
Please look for some flights that are round trip. I am going to Los Angeles and leaving on the 4th of March.
When is your return date?
I would like to come back on the 8th.
What is the place you are leaving from?
I would like Delta Airlines and I'll be leaving from Portland, OR.
I was able to find 1 suitable flight for the trip. Delta Airlines has an outbound flight that is departing at 4:40 pm and will return at 6:50 am. The ticket cost is $216.
When will my flight arrive on the return one?
The flight will land at 12:08 pm for the return trip.
That sounds like a nice flight for me. Would you mind getting me some tickets? I would like to go in Economy class and need 3 tickets.
Can you approve the following details? There is a Delta Airlines flight that will leave from Portland and land in Los Angeles. The departing date is March 4th and the flight leaves at 4:40 pm. The return date will be on March 8th and will the flight will take off at 6:50 am. There will be 3 passengers in the economy class.
Yep, that's correct.
I have verified your tickets.
Can you give me some information about the attractions there?
I was able to find 10 attractions that you may enjoy. Perhaps you can visit the historical landmark of the Angels Flight Railway.
Sure, sounds awesome. That's all I need right now.
Have a great trip!
I need round trip plane tickets.
Where are you departing and where are you going?
I am going from Ciudad de Mexico to New York.
What date are you departing and returning?
I am departing on March 2nd and will return on the 11th of this month.
American Airlines departs at 12:05 pm and then at 11:20 am respectively and the cost is $224.
What time will I be back and what airport does that fly into?
You will be back at 4:14 pm at JFK International Airport.
What else can you find?
United Airlines departs at 8:25 am and then at 5 pm respectively and the cost is $172.
What else can you find?
I can't find anything else. Do you need something more?
I want to travel in Premium Economy on Delta Airlines out of Nairobi, Kenya.
Search found 1 Delta Airlines flight that departs at 9:50 pm and then at 5:50 pm respectively and the cost is $492.
That works for me.
Shall I get you a ticket?
Yes, I want to order a ticket.
You want 1 Premium Economy seat on Delta Airlines from Nairobi to New York. The first flight departs at 9:50 pm on March 2nd and the second flight departs at 5:50 pm on March 11th. Is that right?
That is right.
Your flight is booked.
What is there to do there?
92nd Street Y is a Performing Arts Venue.
That sounds good.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good time.
Can you find me round trip flights from Portland, OR on the 11th of March on Delta Airlines?
What is your destination?
Going to CDMX.
What is your date of departure?
There will be 2 leaving Sunday this week.
There is 1 option. There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8:45 am and returning at 1:45 pm for $270.
From which airport is the return flight and what's its arrival time?
The return flight arrives at 6:53 pm from Benito Juarez International Airport.
I need to book it.
Please confirm you want me to book 2 economy seats on Delta Airlines flight departing from Portland on March 3rd at 1:45 pm and returning from Mexico City on March 11th at 8:45 am.
Yep. That's right.
Your flight reservation was a success.
What attractions can I visit while there?
Acuario Inbursa is a Nature Preserve in the area.
Is the place free and child-friendly?
It is not free but kid friendly.
Are there any other attractions?
Arte Carrillo Gil Museum is an area museum.
That sounds perfect.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. Thanks for your help.
Please enjoy the rest of your day.
I need a round trip flight?
Where would you be leaving from and where would you like to go? When would you like to make the trip?
I would like to travel premium economy class on a flight from Vegas to Phoenix, AZ on the 6th of this month.
When would you like to head out?
On the 1st of this month.
There is an outbound flight on american airlines for 4:40 pm. It returns at 6:25 am and costs $156
What airport does the flight leave from and at what time does the onward flight land?
It leaves Mccarran international airport and the onward flight arrives at 5:54 pm.
That would be suitable. Go ahead and order tickets for 4.
You want 4 premium economy seats on an american airlines flight from las vegas to Phoenix. The departing on March 1st at 4:40 pm and returning on March 6th at 6:25 am?
There are three people traveling in my group
You would like tickets for 3 for March 1st?
Yes, that would be great. Would I be able to get a refund on the ticket if necessary? When does the return flight arrive?
I have bought the tickets. You would return at 7:39 am. I am sorry, but the tickets are non-refundable.
Ok, thanks then. What fun places can I visit when I get there.
There are 10 suitable attractions. There is an interesting museum called the arizona capitol museum. You will enjoy it.
Ok, if you say so.
Is there anything else you need help with?
No. You have been quite helpful. I am good for now.
Take care.
I need to find a roundtrip flight please.
When would you like to leave and when would you like to return and from where?
I'd like to go the day after tomorrow and come back the 13th of this month from Los Angeles.
What is your destination?
I'm going to Paris.
I have 2 flights for you. There's an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:40 AM which comes back at 4:05 AM and that is a $330 ticket.
What time is the return?
The return is at 10:40 AM.
What's the arrival time of the onward flight?
That has a 7:58 AM arrival.
I think that's perfect.
How else may I help you?
I'd like to purchase an economy ticket.
Confirming 1 economy ticket on American Airlines from Los Angeles to Paris on March 3rd leaving at 9:40 AM and returning March 13th at 4:05 AM. The flight is for 1 ticket in economy class.
Sounds good. Can that ticket be refunded if necessary and what airport does it fly into?
The flight goes to Charles de Gaulle International Airport, but I'm sorry to say it's not a refundable ticket. The booking is complete.
I also want to find some attractions to go to, something with no entry fee.
There are 10 attractions you might like. The American Church in Paris is a interesting place of worship.
Sounds good to me.
Do you need anything else?
No, I don't think so.
Thank you very much.
I'd like to fond round trip flights.
Where would you like to leave from? When would you like to depart and return?
I'd like to leave from SD on the 2nd of this month and am looking to return on March 11th.
Where would you like to go to?
I want to go to SF.
There are 5 flights that match your criteria. There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 11:10 am and returning at 6:10 am. The total cost for a ticket is $116.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to buy tickets?
Yes please go ahead and make the booking.
Okay so to confirm: You'd like to book 1 Economy ticket on an Alaska Airlines flight from San Diego to San Francisco leaving at 11:10 am on March 2nd. You will be returning on March 11th at 6:10 am.
That's great. When does the flight arrive at the destination and which airport does it fly to?
Your ticket has been confirmed. For your onward flight you will arrive at 12:50 pm at SFO International Airport.
I'd like to find attractions at the destination.
There are 10 attractions I have found at that location. How about a Historical Landmark like Alcatraz?
That sounds interesting. How about any other attractions?
I really think you should go to Alcatraz Island. It is a great Historical Landmark.
Okay thanks. I don't need help with anything else.
I hope you enjoy your trip.
I'm looking for a round trip flight on Delta Airlines.
Where are you going?
LAX.
When would you like to leave and return? Where will your trip begin?
I'm leaving from NY from the 3rd of this month until March 13th.
Delta Airlines has 1 nice flight leaving at 6 am and returning at 12:45 pm for $301.
I would like to purchase tickets for that flight.
With your permission 1 Economy ticket on Delta Airlines from New York on March 3rd to Los Angeles and a return flight March 13th at 12:45 pm with an onward flight leaving at 6 am will be purchased.
Permission Granted.
The ticket is yours.
Can I get my money back?
Yes.
Great. What are some attractions in the area?
One of 10 found is a Historical Landmark called Angels Flight Railway.
What else did you find?
I found a Museum called Autry Museum of the American West.
Nice.
Do you need further assistance?
Thanks to you no.
Have a good one.
I want to search round trip flights.
Where from will you be taking flight from?
I would like to the flight from ATL.
What is your destination, date of departure and the return date?
I will be leaving to Toronto, Canada on the 1st. I will return on March 7th.
There are 2 flights. One is an American Airlines flight leaving at 3:25 pm and the return flight departs at 5:55 am. The ticket costs $217.
Which airport will you be taking the flight from?
I want to take the flight from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
When will the onward flight reach the destination?
The onward flight reaches the destination at 8:28 pm.
Can you look for any other available flight?
I found a Delta Airlines flight which takes off at 7:50 am and the return flight departs at 7:15 am. The ticket costs $205.
Okay. That sounds great.
Would you like me to buy tickets for the flight?
Yes, Please book two economy tickets for the flight.
Please confirm: You want me to book 2 Economy class tickets in Delta Airlines traveling from Atlanta at 7:50 am on March 1st to Toronto. And the return flight departs at 7:15 am on March 7th.
Yes, That is correct.
Your ticket have been booked successfully.
Can you tell me departure time for the onward flight?
The departure time for the onward flight is 5:08 pm.
Thank you! Can you find me some child friendly museum without any entry fee?
There is a museum called Black Creek Pioneer Village.
Okay, That sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Get me a prime ticket for one to Las Vegas. I feel lucky.
When will you go? Where are you leaving from and when do you want to come back?
I'll leave on the 1st from Portland and have to get back to Work next Wednesday, unless I win the big jackpot.
You have 4 choices. What about the 5 am American Airlines the return on that leaves at 5:30 am. You damage on that would be $237.
Fine, just do that.
Here's what I have: 1 leaving Portland on March 1st on American Airlines, economy at 5 am. You're going to Las Vegas and you'll stay until you board the return trip on March 6th at 5:30 am.
Right o. When do I land in Vegas?
Your tickets are set. You'll land at 9:45 am in Vegas.
Fine, is there an Amusement Park I can dump my kids in while I gamble?
Sure, try SkyJump. It's a theme park there that will keep the kids enthralled.
There is a fee to get in right? How can I reach them for detail?
No, definately not free. You should give them a call at 702-380-7777.
Great, what else is there to do in vegas?
Sorry, not too very much for kids in Vegas, when they're alone. Anything else though?
Nope, you goter.
Fine, what happens in Vegas..well you know the rest.
I'd like a round trip flight and I'm leaving march 3rd.
Sure, when will you be back?
the 9th of this month.
Where are you going?
Phoenix, AZ
Great, please tell me where you'll be leaving from?
Ciudad de Mexico
How about a 8:05 am American airlines flight that returns at 7:35 am for $261?
Great, please purchase the ticket for one person.
Please confirm the flight: 1 american airlines economy ticket from mexico city to phoenix on march 3rd until march 9th at 8:05 am and returning at 7:35 am.
Perfect.
Confirmed
Are there an attractions in that location?
Yes, a fun museum called Arizona Capitol Museum.
Awesome.
Would you like anything else?
Nope, that's all. Thanks.
Have a safe trip.
I'm looking to get a round trip flight coming up.
Sure thing. What city would you like to fly to? When are you planning on leaving and coming back? I can see what is available for your schedule.
I would like to depart on the 2nd of March and fly out to Seattle, WA. I would like to get back home on the 10th of March.
What city did you want to fly out of?
I'm going to fly out of Toronto.
I was able to find a flight with American Airlines. The one flying from Toronto leaves early, at 5:55 am. The returning flight from Seattle is in the morning at 8:15 Am. It comes out to a total of $306 per ticket.
That should work out fine for me. Can we go ahead and grab a ticket?
No problem. Just to confirm everything before the purchase, you will be flying out of Toronto to Seattle on March 2nd at 5:55 am. You will be flying back on March 10th at 8:15 am. The flight is through American Airlines, and you only need 1 Economy ticket. Does this all sound correct?
Yep, that sounds perfect for me.
Great. I was able to successfully purchase your ticket!
What airport am I arriving at in Seattle?
It is the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
What times are my flights going to arrive? Both leaving and returning.
You will arrive in Seattle at 12:15 pm. Coming back to Toronto, you will get here at 9:54 pm.
Great. Thanks for your assistance. I want to do something fun while I'm there. Is there anything you'd recommend?
I was able to find 10 attractions that you may be into checking out. One of which is Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's grave site. It's a popular tourist attraction that may be of interest.
Alright, that sounds cool. What kind of other historical spot could I check out while I'm in town?
I found 2 more attractions you might be interested in. One of which is the Fremont Troll statue under the Fremont bridge. This is a popular Historical Landmark.
Is that somewhere that would be good to bring kids to?
It doesn't appear to be the most kid friendly attraction in the area.
Alright, that's fine. I'm all set for now. Thanks again!
Have a great trip!
I'm looking for round trip flights.
What date are you departing on? What cities are you traveling between?
I'm departing on next Tuesday from Seattle, WA and returning on the 9th of this month.
Where are to traveling to?
I'm traveling to Toronto, Ontario.
I found 2 flights for the trip. There is an American Airlines flight departing at 8:15 am. The return flight departs at 10:05 am and it is $324.
That flight works for me.
Do you want to purchase tickets now?
Yes, I'd like to purchase an economy ticket.
Okay, I have 1 economy ticket for an American Airlines flight departing on March 5th at 8:15 am from Seattle traveling to Toronto. The return flight departs at 10:05 am on March 9th, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully purchased the ticket.
Thank you. I'm also looking for a wildlife spot attraction there, can you help?
I found 2 attractions that might work. How about the Nature Preserve Ripley's Aquarium of Canada?
Is it free to enter?
No, entry is not free.
Is this place child-friendly?
Yes, it is child-friendly.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a great day!
Can you help me find round trip flights?
When are you planning to leave and return? Where will you be leaving from.
I'm leaving from CDMX this Saturday and want to return on the 14th of this month.
Where would you like to go?
I'm going to Portland.
How about an American Airlines flight leaving at 7:25 pm and returning at 7:20 am? Tickets for this flight cost $290?
That would work for me. Please go ahead and buy an economy class ticket.
Sure no problem. So to confirm: You would like 1 economy ticket on An American Airlines flight leaving from Mexico City to Portland on March 2nd at 7:25 pm. The return flight leaves at 7:20 am on March 14th.
that's great. Is the ticket refundable and where will the flight be leaving from?
Your ticket has been booked. The ticket is not refundable and your flight leaves from Benito Juarez International Airport.
Are there any attractions at the destination location?
Yes I have found 10 attractions for you. How about a park visit to Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden?
That would be perfect.
Do you need help with anything else?
No thanks that's it for now.
Okay great, Enjoy your trip.
Could you find round trip flights for me?
Where do you want to leave from? When will you leave and come back?
I will leave from ATL. I want to leave on 5th of March and return on the 12th.
Where will you go?
I want to go to NY.
This is an American Airlines flight which has an outbound flight of 6:25 am. The return flight leaves at 11:20 am. This ticket costs $140.
That sounds good. Would you purchase the tickets? I need one economy ticket.
Okay, could you confirm that you want 1 ticket in Economy class leaving from Atlanta and are going to New York, on American Airlines? You will depart on March 5th at 6:25 am and return on March 12th. The return flight departs at 11:20 am.
Sounds great.
Your ticket was confirmed.
What airport does the flight arrive at?
The flight arrives at JFK International Airport.
Thank you for helping. Would you show me some attractions in New York?
There are 10 attractions that could interest you. How about 92nd Street Y? It's a Performing Arts Venue.
Sounds cool.
Could I help with something else?
No, that is it but it was very helpful.
Have a good trip!
I need to search round trip flights on the 7th.
When will you be returning?
I will be returning on the 9th of this month.
Where will you be coming from and where do want to go?
I will leaving from NY going to Seattle, WA.
I have found a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 4 pm for $301.
Will I be able to refund the ticket if necessary?
No the ticket is not refundable.
Is there any others? I would like to return on March 12th.
There is 3 other flights I have found. there is one with Delta Airlines that leaves at 6 am. The return flight leaves at 3:15 pm. The cost of the ticket is $322.
That sounds great.
Would you like to make reservations?
Yes I would, but want only tickets that are refundable as my plans may change. I need 2 tickets.
So you would like me to book 2 Economy round trip tickets with Delta Airlines departing on March 7th from New York going to Seattle that leaves at 6 am and returning on March 12th at 3:15 pm?
Yes I would.
Your reservations are confirmed.
When does the flight arrive at my onward destination.
You will arrive at your onward destination at 11:45 am.
Thanks. What attractions are there?
Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave site is Tourist Attraction.
Great, Is there any others?
Yes, You can visit a Museum that is called Burke Museum of Natural History and Culture.
Thanks, I am all set.
Have a great time.
Can you help me find round trip flights?
Sure, Whats your destination and where and when will you be departing from?
I'm leaving from NYC on March 4th going to Portland, OR.
When do you plan on returning?
I'd like to come back on the 7th.
I've found 3 flights for you. The first one is an American Airlines flight leaving at 4:45 pm and the return flight departs at 5 am. Ticket price is $304 per ticket.
What time will the onward flight be arriving?
The onward flight will be arriving at 11:53 pm.
That flight sounds like a match to me.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the flight?
Yes, I'd love to.
Please confirm that you'd like to purchase 1 economy ticket for American Airlines departing at 4:45 pm March 4th from New York to Portland with a return flight on March 7th at 5 am.
That is correct. Is the ticket refundable, What time will the return flight be arriving?
Your ticket has been purchased, it is not refundable. The return flight will be arriving at 6:01 pm.
Can you tell me about some attractions there?
There is a park you may enjoy visiting called Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden.
Awesome, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No that all the help I needed thank you.
You're welcome, Have a great day.
Will you find round trip flights?
Departure and return dates? Leaving from where?
I'm leaving Sunday this week from Philadelphia and returning 9th of this month.
What's the destination?
Paris, France.
I found 2 flights. American Airlines outbound flight leaves at 4:45 pm and returns at 4:05 am for $305.
Anything else?
Delta Airlines leaves at 12:20 pm and return flight leaves at 5:35 pm for $377.
Great. Will you buy tickets?
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket from Philadelphia to Paris on Delta Airlines with departure on March 3rd and return on March 9th. Onward flight leaves at 12:20 pm and return flight at 5:35 pm.
That's fine.
I've completed your reservation.
How many stops? What's the arrival time of return flight?
Return flight arrives at 0:16 am with 1 stop.
Thanks. Will you find attractions?
I found 10. American Church in Paris, a Place of Worship, is one of them.
Cool. That's all.
Have a great day.
I will be traveling soon, are there some round trips available?
When are you planing to travel? What is your destination and from where are you departing?
I want something in Seattle on the 4th of this month and returning the 11th of March.
What is your destination?
I want to go to Vancouver, BC.
There is a flight from Delta Airlines. The departure takes off at 8:45 am and the return flight takes off at 3:20 am. It has a cost of $273.
Sounds great, can you book a ticket for me?
Please confirm: Booking 1 economy class ticket from Delta Airlines. Departing from Seattle on March 4th at 8:45 am with destination to Vancouver. Returning on March 11th at 3:20 am.
That is correct. From which airport does the flight leaves and at what hour does it arrive?
The ticket has been booked. It arrives at 7:49 pm to Vancouver and arrives to YVR International Airport.
Thanks a lot. I would also like to go visit something in there. I'm trying to save money so look for something free, maybe a park.
There are 2 things you might like. There is the Park Bloedel Conservatory.
What other things are there? Look for something chield-friendly.
There is 1 other park you might like. There is the Dr. Sun Yat-Sen classical Chinese garden.
What is the contact number?
Their phone number is 604-662-3207.
That's great, that is all for now.
Have a great day.
Will you fine round trip flights?
Departure and return dates? What's the destination?
Will you find flights for three to CDMX that leaves tomorrow and return on March 12th.
Where are you departing from ?
Los Angeles.
I found 3 flights. American Airlines offers an outbound flight that leaves at 2:45 pm and returns flight leaves at 8:05 am for $163.
Will you find flights for 4?
Delta Airlines has outbound flight that leaves at 9:15 am and return flight that leaves at 1:45 pm for $242.
What's the return flight's arrival time? Does it have zero stops?
Return flight arrives at 5:15 pm with 1 stop.
That's great.
Want to buy tickets?
Yes in Economy.
Please confirm 4 Economy tickets on Delta Airlines from Los Angeles to Mexico City with departure on March 2nd and return on March 12th. Onward flight departs at 9:15 am whereas return flight departs at 1:45 pm.
Great.
Transaction is complete.
Thanks. Will you find attractions?
Acuario Inbursa, a Nature Preserve.
That's fine. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you find a round trip flight for 2 people?
When are you planning to return?
I will return on the 14th of this month.
When is your departure date?
I am leaving on March 7th.
Where are you leaving from and what is your destination?
I'm leaving from Seattle, WA and traveling to San Francisco.
There is a flight with Alaska Airlines that leaves at 12 pm and returns at 2:55 pm for $128.
Can you purchase economy tickets?
Booking 2 economy tickets for flight with Alaska Airlines, Seattle going to San Francisco on March 7th departing at 12 pm and returns March 14th at 2:55 pm.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your tickets are purchased.
Can you find some attractions in that area?
There is Alcatraz it's a Historical Landmark.
What is the cost and what is their phone number?
The entry is not free and their phone number is 415-561-4900
Any attractions that are more child-friendly?
There is Alcatraz Island it's a Historical Landmark.
Any other attractions available?
There is Aquarium of the Bay it's a Nature Preserve.
Thank you for the information.
Have a good day.
Please help me find a round trip flights on the 4th.
Where you coming from?
From LAX.
Where are going to and when do you plan to go back?
I want to go to Sydney until March 13th.
I found Delta Airlines for only $256 and the outbound flight leaves at 9:15 am and return flights leaves at 5:50 pm.
Any other available flights?
How about United Airlines for only $210 and the outbound flight leaves at 12:55 pm and return flights leaves at 8:05 am.
How many stops does it have?
0 stops.
That's good.
Will I buy you tickets now?
Yes, please.
Okay, you want 1 economy seat at United Airlines from Los Angeles to Sydney on March 4th until March 13th. Onward flight leaves at 12:55 pm and return flights leaves at 8:05 am. Please confirm.
Yes. When does my return flight arrive?
Ticket confirmed! It arrives at 3:32 am.
Which airport?
At Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
Please find me some attractions there.
Please check ANZ Stadium and it's a Sports Venue.
What;s their phone number?
It's 2 8765 2000.
Is that free entrance?
No,
Okay. Any other attractions there?
How about Art Gallery of New South Wales, it's a Museum.
Okay, thanks.
You are welcome.
Can you help me get 3 round trip tickets to travel to Vegas on the 1st?
Of course - where are you leaving from, and when do you plan to return?
I'm leaving from New York and need to get back next Tuesday for work.
Do you like American Airlines? It leaves 4:45 pm and returns 5:30 am for $293.
Yeah, can you get me economy tickets?
So you'd like 3 economy tickets with American Airlines leaving from New York on March 1st at 4:45 pm, going to Las Vegas, and returning March 5th at 5:30 am?
Yeah, that's all right - is it refundable?
This is not refundable - I've gotten those tickets for you.
Great. Can you find me a museum? Something kids would like.
I've got 3 options: The Discovery Children's Museum could be an option, it's a Museum specialized for kids.
Yeah, perfect.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that's it, thanks.
Have fun!
I want you to find me a round trip flight. I want to depart on the 4th, and I will leave from LAX to arrive to ATL.
Can you tell me when will you return?
I want to return on 14th of this month.
There are 4 flights which match what you want. One of the flights is an American Airlines flight which departs at 5:25 pm, and when it returns it flies at 2:30 pm. The ticket of this flight costs $181.
Is there some other flight you can suggest? I need tickets for three people.
Another flight is a Delta Airlines flight which departs at 8:40 pm, and when it returns it flies at 5:40 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $201.
This flight seems as a good choice to me. Can you book me tickets for this flight? I want the tickets to be Economy ones.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy flight tickets for 3 people for the Delta Airlines flight which departs from Los Angeles on March 4th at 8:40 pm to go to Atlanta, and when it returns it flies on March 14th at 5:40 pm.
That would suit me well.
Your requested tickets have been booked.
Is there some attraction I can visit there? More specifically I am looking for some kind of Museum.
There are 9 attractions which match what you might be interested in. You can consider visiting Atlanta History Center, which is a Museum.
Can you tell me if the entrance at this attraction is free of charge?
Unfortunately the entrance at this attraction is not free.
Alright, is there some other attraction which you can recommend?
You might consider visiting Bodies The Exhibition, which is a Museum.
Can you tell me if the entrance at this attraction is free? Also can you check if the kids are welcomed at this attraction?
I am glad to say that your kids are kindly welcomed at this attraction, but the entrance to this attraction is not free.
Alright that's okay.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a good time!
Can you help me find a round trip flight?
Sure, when do you plan on leaving?
On the 6th of March.
What is your origin city, destination, and when are you coming back?
I'm going from Phoenix to LAX on the 14th of March.
I found an American Airlines flight with a departure time of 7:35 am and a return time of 7:50 am. The total cost is $107.
What else did you find?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 7:05 am and returns at 11:50 pm for a total price of $106.
Can I get my money back if I change my mind? And what airport does it leave from?
No, its non refundable. It departs from Sky Harbor International Airport.
That one sounds good to me.
Should I get you tickets?
Yes, please get me tickets.
Sure, please confirm you'd like 1 economy ticket for the round trip Southwest Airlines flight from Phoenix to Los Angeles departing on march 6th at 7:05 am and returning on March 14th at 11:50 pm.
Yup, sounds good to me. When do the flights arrive?
I've purchased your ticket. You'll arrive at your destination at 1:18 am and the return flight arrives at 8:33 am.
Thanks, what is there to do at my destination?
I found 10 things you may enjoy. There's the historical landmark called Angels Flight Railway.
Okay, that sounds good.
Anything else you need?
Nope, that's everything for now.
Have a good rest of your day!
Can you find me a round trip flight leaving from los angeles
where are you traveling to and when are you coming back
I am traveling to portland, or and return on march 14th
when are you leaving
i will leave on 9th of march
what about alaska airlines for $141 depart at 5:15 am with return flight depart at 10:10 am
what airport does it arrive and when does it arrive
You will arrive at pdx international airport at 12:40 pm
what else do you have
what about american airlines for $184 depart at 11:15 pm and return at 6 am
perfect, please purchase 3 tickets for me
please confirm your purchase of 3 economy tickets with american airlines from los angeles to portland depart on march 9th at 11:15 pm and return on march 14th at 6 am
perfect, when does the flight arrive and as well as my return flight
your return flight will arrive at 11:02 am and onward flight arrive at 1:45 am
thank you, can you also find me some attractions
there are 10 attractions in that area. There is a park called crystal springs rhododendron garden
perfect
have fun
I want to search round trip flights for my short trip and I need your help to find the good one.
what is your return date of travel?
I want to find a flight from ATL on the 1st and the returning date is 4th of March.
What is your final destination City? I want to know it to search according to your requirement.
Please search for the flight to London, UK.
What about an outbound flight from American Airlines which leaves at 8:40 pm and the leaving time of return flight is 0:10 am for which the ticket will be $352.
Any other flights in your list?
Another one outbound flight from United Airlines which leaves at 10:30 am and the return flight leaves at 10:25 pm for which the ticket cost is $275.
This looks comfortable to me.
Shall I book the ticket in this flight for you?
Yes. I want to book 4 tickets under Economy class.
Please confirm to book 4 Economy class tickets in a flight from United Airlines which leaves at Atlanta on March 1st at 10:30 am to London and the return flight leaves at 10:25 pm on March 4th.
That is okay to proceed.
I have successfully confirmed the tickets in that flight.
I want to visit some attractive places there for which I need your help to search the best one.
Found 10 results. What about the one at 30 st Mary Axe (The Gherkin) which is a Historical Landmark. What is your opinion?
That is nice. Thanks.
Anything else you want me to do?
Nothing for now. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
Would you look for round trip flights for me?
Where do you want to visit and when will you leave?
I want to leave on March 4th. There are four people in my group and I'm going to Sydney, NSW.
When do you want to come back? Where will you leave from?
I would like to get back on the 9th and will leave from SF.
I have 1 good flight for you. How about this United Airlines flight? This outbound flight is at 1:25 pm and the return leaves at 5:25 am. This ticket costs $201.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes,I would like to book the tickets.
Could you confirm that you want to leave from San Francisco to Sydney on United Airlines in economy class for 4 people? You will depart on March 4th at 1:25 pm and return on March 9th. This flight leaves at 1:2 pm and the return leaves at 5:25 am.
That sounds fine.
I have confirmed your ticket.
Would you show me some attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that should be of interest. How about ANZ Stadium? This is a sports venue.
That sounds good.
Could I help with something else?
That helped out, thank you.
Have a good day!
Find me round trip flights from San Fran. I want the return flight to be the 13th of this month.
Can I have your departure date and destination city?
I am going to Chi-town on the 1st of this month.
How about American Airlines? They have an available flight that leaves at 3:20 pm. The return flight leaves at 7:05 am. The ticket costs $198.
That flight will be good. Can you book 4 tickets for me?
Confirming that you want to book 4 Economy tickets to Chicago on American Airlines. You will be departing from San Francisco on March 1st at 3:20 pm and returning on March 13th at 7:05 am. Is this information correct?
No, it isn't. There are two people in my group.
Confirming that you want 2 tickets to Chicago.
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets are confirmed.
How about showing me some attractions in Chicago. I'd like something free and child-friendly.
I found 10 attractions that might interest you. How about 360 CHICAGO? It is a Tourist Attraction.
Anything else you find?
How about a Park? Burnham Park?
Sounds great. That's all I need. Bye for now.
Enjoy!
Could you help me find a round-trip flight for one leaving from SF? I'd like to return on 10th of March.
When were you planning to leave and where are you visiting?
I'm going to Sydney, Australia and I'd like to leave the day after tomorrow.
I found a United Airlines flight with an outbound flight leaving at 1:25 pm and a return flight leaving at 5:25 am with a price of $209. i
That should work for me.
Did you need help with anything else?
Could you help me book the ticket?
Please confirm you're booking a United Airlines Economy flight for 1 passenger from San Francisco to Sydney leaving on March 3rd at 1:25 pm and returning on March 10th at 5:25 am.
Yes, that works.
Your ticket with 0 stops has been confirmed.
Thank you for your help. Could you also find me some attractions there?
I found ANZ Stadium which is a Sports Venue.
Do they have a phone number and will admission be free?
Their number is 2 8765 2000 but no, admission is not free.
Ok, sounds great. That will be all for now, goodbye.
Have fun!
I will be traveling with a friend. Please find a round trip flight for 2 people.
Where will you be leaving from and when will you fly?
Look for flights from Portland to LAX. And look only for refundable tickets for Friday next week.
When will your return date be?
I want to return on the 11th of this month.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight. The departure takes of at 1:55 pm and the return flight takes off at 7:25 am. It has a cost of $176.
Does it have any stop?
It has 1 stop.
What other flights are there? Search for something departing on March 4th.
There is 1 flight you might like. There is an Delta Airlines flight. The departure takes of at 3:20 pm and the return flight takes off at 9:50 pm. It has a cost of $163.
Does it have any stops?
It has 1 stop.
That flight sounds great.
Do you want to book tickets?
Yes, please book them.
Please confirm: Booking 2 Economy class tickets for a Delta Airlines flight. Departing from Portland on March 4th at 3:20 pm with destination Los Angeles. The return flight takes off at 9:50 pm on March 11th.
That is correct.
The tickets has been booked.
Thanks a lot. I would also like something to do in there. Is there anything child-friendly, preferably a museum that has no entry fee.
There is a Museum, the Autry Museum of the American West.
Ok, sounds great. Thank you, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I need to find flights for the 6th of this month.
What's your date of departure?
Leaving on the 2nd of this month.
What is your departure location?
Leaving from LAX.
What is your destination?
I'm going to San Fran.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 5:50 pm and returning at 8:20 pm for $100.
What is the return flight arrival time?
The return flights arrives at 7:15 pm.
Are there any other flights leaving from ATL?
There are 4 flights. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:30 pm and returning at 3:50 pm for $285.
When does the return flight arrive and does it make stops?
The return flight returns at 7:15 pm and has 1 stop.
I would like to book 4 economy tickets on that flight.
Please confirm you want me to book 4 economy tickets on the American Airlines flight departing from Atlanta on March 2nd at 2:30 pm and returning for San Francisco on March 6th at 3:50 pm.
Yes. That's right.
Your flight reservation was a success.
I would like to find some nearby kid-friendly attractions.
There are 10 options. Alcatraz Island is a nearby Historical Landmark.
Sounds good. Thanks for now.
You're welcome. Please enjoy the rest of your day.
Please help me find round-trip flights.
Where are you leaving from, and when? Where will you be visiting?
I am leaving today. I'm going to leave from Vegas and travel to Chi-town.
When will you return?
I want to get back here on the 12th.
Delta Airlines has a flight at 12:20 pm. That flight will be $279 and the return leaves at 5:25 pm.
That one sounds good. Please buy tickets for me.
Please confirm: You are purchasing 1 economy ticket on Delta Airlines. You are leaving Las Vegas on March 1st at 12:20 pm. You will return to Chicago on March 12th at 5:25 pm.
Good. How many stops does the flight make? What time does the outbound flight arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. The outbound flight arrives at 8:12 pm. There's 1 stop on that trip.
What attractions are there?
I have 10 attractions for your review. Why not try 360 CHICAGO? That's a popular tourist attraction.
What's the phone number for that one?
Their phone number is 888-875-8439.
Okay, thanks. That's all I need.
Have a great trip.
Hi there, could you help me search for some Premium Economy flight tickets?
Sure, when do you intend to depart?
I will be travelling from next Wednesday.
I see, where do you plan to depart and arrive at, and when do you plan to return?
I will be travelling from Seattle, WA and returning from SFO on the 13th of this month.
Sure, there are 4 flights you may like, one of which is an Alaska Airlines flight which departs and 12 pm and returns at 4:10 pm which will cost you $203.
I see, could you help me make a reservation please?
Sure, please confirm your premium economy flight for 1 with Alaska Airlines from Seattle to San Francisco from March 6th at 12 pm to March 13th at 4:10 pm.
Sure, this sounds great to me!
Your reservation has been made.
May I know which airport am I departing from?
You will be departing from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport
Also, do you know which airport will I arrive at and are there zero layovers?
There are 0 layovers for the flight, and you will be reaching SFO International Airport.
Sure, thank you!
Do you require further assistance?
Yes please, could you help me search for some historical landmark which I can visit?
Sure, woul you like to visit a Historical Landmark called Alcatraz?
May I know their contact number and if this place is child friendly?
This place is not child friendly but you can contact them at 415-561-4900.
Sure, that is all the help I need for now. Thank you!
No worries, have a safe flight!
Can you do a search for round trip flights for me?
What is your point of departure?
I am departing out of Seattle.
Where are you wanting to go and when do you want to leave?
I want to leave on 4th of March and go to ATL.
When are you returning?
I would like to get back on Wednesday next week.
I have found an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:45 pm and the return flight comes back at 9:35 pm. The ticket price is $215.
That flight sounds fine with me.
Is there anything else you would like help with?
Can you help me to purchase the tickets for the flight?
Okay, confirm these details for me: The flight departs from Seattle, goes to Atlanta on American Airlines. The flight leaves on March 4th at 9:45 pm and the return is on March 6th at 9:35 pm. The seating class is economy and the ticket is for 1 person.
Yes that sounds fine with me. What airport does the flight arrive at?
The ticket has been confirmed for you and the flight arrives at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
What time does the onward flight get there and which airport does it fly out of?
The flight leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and will arrive at 6:17 am.
Thanks for helping me. Are there some attractions there that you can show me?
There are 10 attractions that may interest you. You might check out a park, Atlanta Botanical Garden.
Okay, that sounds great.
Is there anything else you would like help with?
No, that was very helpful, thanks.
Have a great trip!
I would like a round trip flight from NY. I would be leaving on the 6th of March and returning on March 9th.
Where are you heading?
I am going to Atlanta, GA.
There are 4 suitable flights. There is an outbound flight on american airlines that leaves at 11:20 am. It would be returning at 6:25 am and the price is $127
That would suit me just fine.
You would like to order the tickets?
Yes. Go ahead and book an economy seat for me.
You would like an economy seat for 1 on an american airlines flight from New York to Atlanta that would be leaving on march 6th at 11:20 am and returning on March 9th at 6:25 am?
That would be fine.
I have ordered your ticket.
Is it refundable?
Yes, it is.
What time would the onward flight be arriving?
It would arrive at 1:42 pm.
Thanks a lot. What fun thing is there to do when I get there? Maybe something at the performing arts venue.
There is 1 event that might interest you. There is the fox theatre at the performing arts venue.
What number can I use to contact them?
You can call 800-651-2316.
That would be fine.
Is there anything else you would like?
No, that would be all. Thanks.
Take care!
Can you help me find a flight from Vancouver, BC on March 4th.
What is your departure date and where are you going?
I'm going to San Diego on the 1st of March.
There is 1 flight on Delta Airlines departing at 3:20 am and returning at 11:05 am for a total of $235.
Does it make any stops?
There is 1 stop.
What is the return flight arrival time?
The return flight arrives at 12:34 pm.
That flights sounds good to me.
Is there anything I can help you with?
Please reserve two tickets.
Please confirm you want me to buy 2 economy tickets on the Delta Airlines flight leaving from Vancouver at 3:20 am on March 1st and returning from San Diego on March 4th at 11:05 am.
Yes. That's right.
Your reservation flight is confirmed.
Is the ticket refundable. What is the arrival time of the return flight?
The ticket is non refundable. The return flight arrives at 8:12 pm.
Thanks. What are attractions are near there?
There are 10 options. Balboa Park is a park nearby.
Okay. Bye. Thanks.
You're welcome. Goodbye.
can you find me a round trip flight leaving from chi-town
when are you leaving and going to
i am going to ciudad de mexico on later today
when are you returning back home
i will return on the 8th and prefer to ride american airlines
i found you an american airlines flight for $309 depart at 12:30 pm with return flight depart at 8:05 am
ok perfect
should i buy a ticket for you
yes please
please confirm your booking for 1 economy tickets with american airlines from chicago on march 1st at 12:30 pm to mexico city returning on march 8th at 8:05 am
yes please
your ticket is booked
what airport am i arriving to
you will arrive at benito juarez international airport
does this flight have 1 stop? is it refundable
yes, there will be 1 stop and it is non refundable
ok thank you. can you find me a child-friendly attraction
i found 10 attraction. Nature preserve called acuario inbursa is child friendly
ok thanks
what else can i do for you
no that's it
have fun
I need a round trip flight.
Where would you like to go and when?
I will be heading to Ciudad de mexico from los angeles.
When would you like to leave and when would you be returning?
There are four of us and we would be traveling on March 4th and returning on the 13th of March.
There is an outbound flight on American airlines that leaves at 2:45 pm. It would be returning at 8:05 am and costs $156
That would be just fine.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
Yes, please do.
You would like economy seats for 4 on an american airlines flight from los angeles to mexico city that leaves on March 4th at 2:45 pm and return on march 13th at 8:05 am?
That would be great.
I have bought the tickets.
Is there one stop on the flight?
There are 0 stops
Thanks a lot. What can I do when I get there. What is a good shopping area.
Central de abastos iztapalapa is a good shopping area.
Great. What else is there? How about a museum?
There are 10 suitable options. You can visit a museum called arte carrillo gil museum.
Ok. That would be all for now.
Take care!
I wan to search for some round trip flights from 11th of March. Can you search for the one with United Airlines.
Yes, Let me know the starting place, final destination and returning date of your travel plan so that I can search for flights on convenient dates.
I want to book the flight from New York City on March 13th to Atlanta, GA.
How about you opinion on an outbound flight from United Airlines which leaves at 7:05 pm under ticket cost $139 and the leaving time of return flight is at 12:50 pm.
Can you check about the ticket whether it is refundable or not and also let me know about the destination Airport to decide further.
Sorry, the tickets are not refundable and the name of destination Airport is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That is okay to you. Now, I want you to book tickets for me. I want three Economy class tickets.
Please confirm to book 3 Economy class tickets in a flight with United Airlines from New York on March 11th at 7:05 pm to Atlanta and the return flight leaves on March 13th at 12:50 pm.
That is okay to proceed and I need to know that this flight will have zero stops.
Yes, this flight has 0 stops and your tickets are successfully booked.
Search for some attractive places there to visit and I need the one like Museum and the same is also a safest place for children. If you find the one with free entrance then It will be great.
How about a Museum at Children's Museum of Atlanta among the 3 I found?
Get me their phone number to decide.
Their contact number is 404-659-5437.
Anything else you have?
Yes, what about a Museum at High Museum of Art.
Let me know the contact number of them.
It is 404-733-4200.
Anything else you have in your list?
What about your opinion on the Museum at Jimmy Carter Presidential Library and Museum.
That is perfect.
Any more help do you want from me?
No, that's all, Thanks.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a roundtrip flight that comes back on the 10th.
Where are you departing from and on what date?
Leaving from NYC on March 4th.
What is your destination?
That's Phoenix, AZ.
I have 2 flights for you. Southwest Airlines has a flight at 6:50 AM which comes back at 7:05 AM for $305.
What is the arrival time?
That is 12:33 PM.
Where does it leave from?
From JFK International Airport.
Do you have anything else in economy?
Sure, I have a slight on United Airlines with an 8:20 AM departure and a 7:15 AM return for $292.
I like that one.
Would you like to make reservations?
Yes I would.
Confirming a United Airlines flight from New York to Phoenix on March 4th and returning on March 10th. The flight departs at 8:20 AM and returns at 7:15 AM. It is an economy ticket for 1.
Perfect, thank you.
The reservation is complete.
Thanks again. I'd also like to find some attractions to see.
I have 10 possibilities for you. If you'd like to go to a museum, I would suggest the Arizona Capitol Museum.
Terrific, thank you.
Thank you very much.
Can you search round trip flights for me?
When do you plan to leave and when do you plan on returning?
I am leaving on the 7th of this month and returning on the 14th of this month.
Where are you planning to visit?
I'm traveling to NYC.
Where do you want to depart from?
I'm leaving from SF.
I found 4 flights for you. The first is on American Airlines, departing at 8:30 pm and the returning flight departs at 4:45 pm. The cost is $218 per ticket.
That sounds good to me.
Should I purchase tickets for you?
Yes please.
Please confirm the following details: Purchasing 1 ticket from San Francisco to New York on American Airlines. The flight departs on March 7th at 8:30 pm, and returns March 14th departing at 4:45 pm. The seats are economy class.
Yes, that is correct.
Your ticket is confirmed.
Thank you. Can you help me find some attractions there?
There is a performing arts venue called the 92nd Street Y.
Okay, that sounds good.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No thank you, that is all.
Ok, enjoy your trip.
Could you look for round trip flights for me?
When will you leave?
I want to leave on Sunday this week.
When will you come back?
I want to get back on the 13th.
Where will you visit?
I want to go to Atlanta.
Where will you leave from?
There are 3 people in my group leaving from NY.
There is an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 11:20 am and the return leaves at 6:25 am. The ticket costs $122.
That flight sounds cool. Could you help me find flight tickets?
Could you confirm that you want to leave from New York and go to Atlanta on American Airlines? You will depart on March 3rd and return on March 13th. The outbound flight leaves at 11:20 am and the return leaves at 6:25 am. You need 3 economy tickets. Is this all correct?
Yes that is perfect.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for helping. Would you show me attractions there?
How about Atlanta Botanical Garden? That is a park.
Okay, good. That is all. Bye for now.
Have a good trip.
I need to find a flight. Economy class. I'll be returning on the 12th of this month.
Where are you travelling to?
I want to go to Mexico City.
Where are you travelling from, and when would you like to leave?
I'd like to fly out of LAX on the 6th.
American Airlines has a flight to Mexico City from LAX that leaves at 2:45 PM and returns on the 12th at 8:05 am. The fare is $153 for Economy.
Where does it leave from? Is it a non-stop? (which is how real people say it has 0 stops).
The fligtht departs from LAX International Airport. It is a direct flight. (So it has 0 stops).
Ok. I need one ticket for that flight please.
You want 1 Economy class seat on the American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Mexico City on March 6th at 2:45 pm, returning on March 12th at 8:05 am. Is this correct?
Yes. That's what I want. What is my destination airport, and when does the return flight arrive?
Your flight is booked. The destination airport is Benito Juarez International Airport, and the reutrn flight arrives at 9:25 am.
Ok. What are some things I cna do while I'm there?
There is a Nature Preserve called Acuario Inbursa.
Is it free admission?
Sorry, there is an entry fee for this attraction.
What else is there?
There is a Museum called Arte Carrillo Gil Museum.
Is it free admission? Is it good for kids? I'm thinking of adopting some while I'm there.
Yes. The musuem is a good place to take children. Unfrotunately, there is an entry fee for this attraction.
Ok. What else can you tell me about?
There is a Park called the Bosque de Chapultepec. Admission is free to this attraction, and it is recommended for children.
That's great. Sounds like just what I'm looking for.
Do you require anything else?
Nope. I'm all set, thanks.
Enjoy your trip, and let me know if I can be of any further assistance.
Look for a round trip flight.
When are you leaving?
I'm leaving from NY on the 4th.
When will you return?
The 7th of March.
Where are you going?
Seattle.
American Airlines has a flight departing at 3:40 pm, returning at 4 pm for $287.
Perfect. Please assist me with the ticket purchase.
With your permission 1 Economy ticket from New York to Seattle leaving March 4th at 3:40 pm returning March 7th at 4 pm on American Airlines will be purchased.
A Premium Economy ticket for 1.
I understand Premium Economy for 1, right?
Exactly.
The ticket is yours.
What attractions are in the area.
One tourist attraction is Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site.
Super.
Do you need further assistance?
I'm fine thanks to you.
Have a good one.
Will you find round trip flights on Delta Airlines that returns on 14th of this month?
What's the destination?
Atlanta.
When and where are you departing?
March 12th from NY.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines that leaves at 11:25 am and returns at 3:40 pm for $138.
Ticket refundable? How many stop?
Ticket is not refundable. 0 stops.
Fine. Will you buy tickets for four?
Please confirm 4 Economy tickets from New York to Atlanta on Delta Airlines that departs on March 12th and returns on March 14th. Onward flight departs at 11:25 am. Return flight departs at 3:40 pm.
Great.
I've reserved your ticket.
Thanks. Any attractions?
Atlanta Botanical Garden, a Park.
Cool.
Anything else?
No. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Help me find round trip flights.
When will you be leaving?
I'm going to leave on the 4th of this month.
When are you returning? Where are you going? And where will you be traveling from?
I'll be going to Chi-Town from Seattle, WA. I want to return on March 10th.
There's an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight departs at 2:50 pm. The return flight is at 4 pm. It costs $258 per ticket.
What else is there? I want an Economy seat.
I've found 3 fights. There's a Delta Airlines flight. The outbound flight departs at 3:35 pm. The return flight is at 11:50 pm. It costs $175 per ticket.
Is there anything else? How about United Airlines, and traveling from New York.
There's a United Airlines flight. The outbound flight departs at 5:10 am. The return flight is at 10:10 am. It costs $309 per ticket.
And what's the departure airport?
The departure airport is JFK International Airport.
Is it a 1 stop flight?
It is a 1 stop flight.
Okay, that's good.
Do you want to buy a ticket.
Yes, I would like to buy a ticket.
You want 1 Economy ticket for New York to Seattle on United Airlines. The outbound flight is March 4th at 5:10 am and the return is March 10th at 10:10 am. Shall I proceed with the purchase?
Yes, please do. What does the outbound flight arrive? And what's the arrival airport?
I've purchased the ticket. The outbound flight arrives at 10:48 am at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
What's there to do over there?
There are 10 attractions that you might enjoy. How about Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site? It's a Tourist Attraction.
Can you give me their phone number. And what's the entrance fee?
There is no entrance fee, it is free. You can call them at 206-322-1582.
Nice. That's all I need, take care.
Have fun!
I need a round trip flight.
Where are you departing from and when are you returning?
I am travelling out of Atlanta, GA and will return on the 6th of this month.
What date are you departing?
I am departing this Sunday.
Where are you going?
I am going to Seattle.
Search found 4 options for you. There is an American Airlines round trip flight that departs at 11:40 am and then at 9:45 pm respectively and the total cost is $257.
What else do you have?
Delta Airlines departs at 4:20 pm and then at 11:50 pm respectively and the total cost is $191.
That works for me. Get me some tickets.
You want 1 Economy ticket on Delta Airlines from Atlanta to Seattle. The first flight departs at 4:20 pm on March 3rd and the second flight departs March 6th at 11:50 pm. Is that right?
That is right. What time does the first flight land and what airport does it depart from?
Your ticket is booked. You are flying out of Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and you will land at 8:22 am.
What is there to do there?
Search found 10 events for you. Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site is a Tourist Attraction.
Is there and entrance fee for this?
Yes, there is an entrance fee for that.
What else is there to do?
Burke Museum of Natural History and Culture is a Museum.
What other things under the Museum genre can you find?
Chihuly Garden and Glass is a Museum.
Would kids like this place?
Yes, kids really like the place.
Thanks a lot. That is everything. Bye.
Have fun.
Will you find flights in Economy for three from NYC?
What's the destination?
Seattle, WA.
Departure and return dates?
Leaving 5th of this month. Return on the 7th.
American Airlines offers outbound flight that leaves at 6:05 am and return flight that leaves at 4 pm for $281.
Anything else?
Delta Airlines offers outbound flight that leaves at 2 pm and return flight that leaves at 3:15 pm for $282.
Ticket refundable?
Yes.
Great.
Want to buy tickets?
Yes.
Please confirm 3 Economy tickets for Delta Airlines from New York to Seattle on March 5th till March 7th. Onward flight departs at 2 pm and return flight at 3:15 pm.
Fine.
Reservation is complete.
Thanks. Will you find child-friendly Museum?
I found 8. Burke Museum of Natural History and Culture is a Museum.
What's their number?
206-543-7907.
Cool. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find 3 tickets for a roundtrip flight?
Yes, when will you be departing?
We will leave on the 2nd of this month.
What is your departure city and destination? Also, when do you want to return?
I want to fly from Chicago to Seattle, WA, returning on the 13th of March.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:50 am for $257. The return flight departs at 4 pm.
When will the flight land at my destination?
The onward flight is scheduled to land at 1:27 pm.
How many layovers does that flight have and is this a refundable ticket?
The flight has 1 layover and the ticket would not be refundable.
That flight will work.
Would you like me to purchase tickets for that flight?
Yes, book tickets please.
Please confirm you would like to purchase 3 economy tickets on American Airlines for the flight from Chicago to Seattle that leaves on March 2nd at 7:50 am, with a returning flight on March 13th that departs at 4 pm.
Yes, please buy those.
Your tickets have been booked successfully.
Can you look for some things to do while I am there?
Yes, there are 10 attractions you might like. Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave site is a popular tourist attraction in the area.
Perfect! I don't need anything else right now.
Have a great trip!
I need two plane tickets, round trip.
When will you return?
I'm coming back on the 13th.
Where will you leave from? Where ya headed?
I'm departing Washington for London, England.
When will you go?
I plan to leave on the 1st.
Well, why not take the 3:05 pm. returning flight that departs at 2:50 pm? It's an American Airlines flight and only runs you $417.
Fine tee me up.
Ok, to confirm: 2 tickets leaving Washington March 1st at 2:50 pm, American Airlines, economy. Returning from London at 3:05 pm March 13th.
You nailed it.
Your tickets are confirmed for your party.
Can you get me something to do there that is child friendly?
What about checking out 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin). Its a Historical Landmark?
Sure, I shall.
Would you like mor details?
No, I think I get the gist.
Fine, fly safe and proud.
Hello there. I'm going to be traveling very soon. Can you find a round trip flight for me?
Where are you leaving?
I'm going to be leaving from Seattle.
And you're headed to where on what day? When do you plan on returning?
I'm going to be leaving today to see New York City. It won't be a super long trip, I'd like to return the day after tomorrow.
Okay. There's a Delta Airlines flight which heads out at 3:15 pm and returns at 6 am. A ticket for it costs $301. How's that sound?
Sounds good! Can you buy me four economy tickets?
So, you want a 4 seat economy Delta Airlines flight that travels from Seattle to New York on March 1st at 3:15 pm, and returns on March 3rd at 6 am?
Yeah, that sounds accurate. What airport will I depart from, and at what time will I be back in Seattle?
I booked the tickets. You'll be leaving the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, and should be back at Seattle at about 11:45 am.
Can you find me something interesting to visit there?
There's 10 neat places I found. I recommend the performing arts venue 92nd Street Y.
Good to know.
Can I help you out any further?
Not now. Thanks.
Enjoy your trip to New York!
Hey do a search for me for round trip flights.
When do you need to come back? where are you leaving?
I'm leaving New york City returning on the 10th.
Do you know when you'll leave?
Sure on the 7th.
Where you headed?
Just going to Phoenix.
You have 2 choices. How about the Southwest Airlines option? It takes off at 6:50 am and boards to return at 7:05 am, The total on that is $295.
Is that ticket refundable?
Sorry but no.
Go ahead and help with tickets then.
Sure to confirm: 1 economy for flight on Southwest Airlines leaving New York at 6:50 am on March 7th for Phoenix and returning at 7:05 am on March 10th.
perfect, that's great.
Your ticket is all set.
Fine thanks. Can you tell me about what there is to see around there?
Find the Arizona Capitol Museum. It's an educational type Museum.
What else is there?
How about Arizona Science Center, museum?
What else though.
Castles N' coasters is a cool theme park.
Good to know.
Will you need something further?
Not I, thanks.
Have fun in Phoenix.
Can you go find me a round trip flight? I'm going to be vacationing pretty soon.
When are you leaving, and for what place, exactly?
I'm leaving for Phoenix, AZ on the 12th.
When shall you return?
On the 14th of this month.
Where are you leaving from?
From Mexico City.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:05 am, returns at 3:55 pm, and a ticket of which costs $294.
When will the return flight arrive, and what airport does the flight head to?
The return flight comes here at 0:44 am, and the destination airport is Sky Harbor International Airport.
Sounds good. Can you get the tickets for me?
Sure thing. You want 1 economy ticket for an American Airlines flight from Mexico City to Phoenix that starts on March 12th at 8:05 am and ends at March 14th at 3:55 pm?
That's correct. Is there 1 stop for the flight? If my plans change, can I get a refund?
I confirmed your ticket. There is indeed 1 stop, but sadly you cannot get a refund.
Thanks for helping arrange that flight. Can you show me some interesting locations in Phoenix?
Yes. There's a great museum there called the Arizona Capitol Museum.
Is it free to enter?
No, you'll have to pay an entrance fee.
Good to know.
Is there any other way in which I could assist you?
No. You were a great help with all of that. Thanks.
Enjoy what Phoenix has to offer!
Look up round trip economy flights on Delta Airlines.
Destination and return date?
Leaving the 6th of March and returning the 8th of this month, going to NYC.
Departure city?
Vancouver, BC.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines leaving 2:50 am and returning 6 am for $319.
Good. Book it for two.
Please confirm: 2 economy seats on Delta Airlines from Vancouver to New York on March 6th at 2:50 am, returning March 8th at 6 am.
Yep. What's the departure airport? Is that refundable?
Your seats are reserved. It leaves from YVR International Airport and is not refundable.
Thanks. Look up child-friendly attractions there.
I found 10 things to visit. American Folk Art Museum is a good museum for kids.
Is it free? What's their number?
It's not free and the number is (212) 265-1040.
Ok, what else did you find?
American Museum of Natural History is a good museum for children.
Ok. Bye for now.
Enjoy!
I would like to find a round trip.
Where are you leaving from and where are you traveling?
I am traveling economy class from Las Vegas from March 5th till Friday next week.
Where are you traveling.
I will be traveling to LA.
There are 4 options. American Airlines leaves at 9:30 am and return leaves at 8:25 pm. $95
Tell me about another flight.
There is Delta Airlines that leaves at 12:20 pm and return leaves at 1:25 pm for $94.
When does the return flight arrive and which airport does it arrive?
It arrives at LAX International Airport at 2:35 pm.
Is there a flight with United Airlines?
There is a flight United Airlines that leaves at 12:05 pm the return is at 8:05 am for $95.
I would like One ticket.
Booking 1 economy ticket with United Airlines for Las Vegas to Los Angeles on March 5th to March 8th that leaves at 12:05 pm the return is at 8:05 am for $95.
Yes that is good.
Your ticket has been purchased.
Is there any attractions?
There are 10 here is angels flight railway historical landmark.
that is all thank you
have a good day
I want to search for the round trip flights and I need your help in this, can you help me?
What is your starting date of the trip and from which place you want to leave from?
I am planning to leave on 5th of March from ATL. I want to travel under Economy seating and search for the one according to my wish.
What is your return date of this travel?
I will return on 7th of March. Any more information you need to search for the flight?
yes, let know the place to which you are planning to visit?
LAX is the place to which I want to go.
Found 4 results. Hope the outbound flight with American Airlines which leaves at 11:40 am and the return flight leaves at 5:25 pm under ticket price $240 is okay to you. How about your opinion?
Any other available flights that you have in your search list?
What about a flight with Delta Airlines which is an outbound flight leaves at 5:40 pm and the leaving time of return flight is 8:40 pm for which the price of the ticket is $200? Is that okay to you?
anything else you have?
What about a flight with Southwest Airlines which is an outbound flight leaves at 1:30 pm and the leaving time of return flight is 1:40 pm for which the price of the ticket is $250? Is that okay to you?
That is okay for me. I want to book tickets to that flight and I want it for three persons.
Please confirm to book 3 Economy class tickets in a Flight with Southwest Airlines from Atlanta on March 5th at 1:30 pm to Los Angeles and the return flight leaves at 1:40 pm on March 7th.
That is okay to proceed. Let me know about the origin Airport and destination Airport for my reference.
I have successfully booked the tickets. Note that the origin Airport is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and the destination is LAX International Airport.
That's great. Thanks for your information. I like to visit some attractive places there, can you search for the one?
Found 10 places. What about your comments on a Historical Landmark at Angels Flight Railway?
That is nice. Anything else you have in your list. I like to visit the places with should have free entrance and also be a safest place for Children.
How about a Museum at Autry Museum of the American West. Is it Okay to you?
That is nice.
Anything else you need?
No, that'all for now. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I need an Economy round trip flight for 3 leaving out of Atlanta.
When do you plan on leaving and coming back?
I'm out of here Wednesday next week and get back on the 14th.
Where're you going?
I'm headed to Vancouver.
There're 2 flights that are decent options. Delta Airlines has a 3:20 pm outbound and 2:50 am return for $248.
Cool, let's book it.
Just to make sure, you want 3 Economy Delta Airlines tickets from Atlanta to Vancouver leaving March 6th at 3:20 pm and coming back March 14th at 2:50 am.
Yup. What time am I getting there?
You should be there by 2:56 pm and you're all set.
What airport am I leaving out of?
You're leaving from Hartsfield-Jackson International AIrport.
Thanks. What can I do while I'm there?
There's a Park you should check out called Bloedel Conservatory.
Nice. Got any other ideas, like a free wildlife spot?
There's 1 attraction you might be into. How about the Nature Preserve Vancouver Aquarium?
What's their number?
You can reach them at 604-659-3502.
Awesome. That'll be it, for now.
Have a good time.
I need to find a round trip flight.
Where do you wnat to go, when do you wnat to leave and when will you be returning?
I want to go to Phoenix, AZ next Monday and return on Thursday next week.
Where will you be traveling from?
Right here in San Fran.
There are 3 flights available. Delta Airlines has a flight a 5:50 am on Monday which returns next Thursday at 12:15 pm. The fare for that flight is $151.
When does the outbound flight arrive?
The outbound flight arrives at 7:57 am.
Is there a flight maybe a little later? there must be room for 4 passengers.
There are 2 flights available. Southwest Airlines has a flight at 11:10 pm on Monday that returns at 6 am next Thursday. The fare for that flight is $123.
What lese is there?
United Airlines ahs a flight that leaves at 1:40 pm on Monday that returns at 11:50 pm next Thursday. The fare for that flight is $124.
What is the destiantoin airport?
The destination airport is Sky Harbor International Airport.
Ok. That one works. Can you get the tickets?
You want 4 Economy class seats on United Airlines flight from San Francisco to Phoenix that departs at 1:40 pM on March 4th and returns at 11:50 pm on March 7th. Is that correct?
Yes. That's right. Which airport does it depart from?
Your tickets are confirmed. The flight leaves from SFO International Airport.
Cool. Can you tell me about some attractions in Phoenix?
There are 10 attractions you might be interested in. First, there is a Museum called the Arizona Capitol Museum.
That sounds interesting.
Do you require anything else?
Nope. I'm good to go.
Enjoy your trip and let me know if I can be of any further assistance.
I need to make a round trip.
Where would you be heading?
I want to travel economy class to SF on the 7th of this month.
When would you be returning?
On March 14th.
Where would you be departing from?
From Atlanta, GA.
There is an outbound flight on Delta airlines for 12:50 pm. It returns at 5:25 pm and costs $201
I don't trust delta. Is there anything on southwest airlines?
Yes, there is 1 convenient flight on southwest airlines. It leaves at 6:30 am and returns at 6:45 am. The cost of the flight is $218
That sounds good to me.
Would you like tickets?
Go ahead and make the booking.
You would like an economy ticket for 1 on southwest airlines flight from atlanta to san francisco that would be leaving on march 7th at 6:30 am and returning on March 14th at 6:45 am?
Yes, that suits me. What time is the flight returning?
I have confirmed your ticket. The flight reaches back at 5:19 pm
At which airport is the flight landing? What time does the onward flight land?
It would arrive at SFO international airport at 8:56 am.
Thanks a lot. Is there anywhere nice to visit there. Perhaps a historical landmark?
There are 8 of them that might interest you. Alcatraz is a historical landmark you should visit.
That would be fine.
Is there anything else you would like?
No. I have everything that I need. Thanks.
Take care.
Please help me look for round trip flights.
Where will you be going?
I'm going to SF.
And where will you be traveling from?
I'll be traveling from London.
And what date will you be leaving on?
I'll be leaving on March 9th.
And when will you be returning?
I'll be returning on the 11th of this month.
There's an American Airlines flight that departs at 3:05 pm and the return flight leaves at 7:05 am. A ticket is $393.
What other flights are there?
There's a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 8 am and the return flight leaves at 10:05 am. A ticket is $416.
When does the departure flight arrive?
It arrives at 4:57 pm.
That works for me.
Do you want me to buy the tickets?
Yes please, and get an Economy ticket.
Please make sure this is correct, I'll buy you 1 Economy ticket for Delta Airlines for London to San Francisco with a departure on March 9th at 8 am and return on March 11th that leaves at 10:05 am.
Yeah, buy that please. How many stops are there? And what's the departure airport?
I've purchased your ticket. There is 1 stop and the departure airport is Heathrow International Airport.
What are some attractions over there? Do you have any child friendly recommendations?
There are 10 attractions that you might enjoy. There's Alcatraz Island, which is a Historical Landmark, that you could go to.
Okay, cool. That's all the help I need, I'll talk to you later.
Have fun!
Can you please help me in finding a round trip flight?
What will be your place of departure and arrival and also on which date are you leaving?
I am planning to leave from SFO to Chi-town on 7th of March.
When will you be coming back?
I will be coming back on March 10th.
There are 4 convenient flights that I have found. One is American Airlines. The outbound flight leaves at 3:20 pm and return flight leaves at 7:05 am. It will cost you $201.
When does the flight arrive and from which airport does the flight departs from?
The return flight will arrive at 9:52 am and it will depart from SFO International Airport.
Are there other flights available? I will prefer United Airlines and Economy class.
There is 1 convenient flight for this. This is United Airlines which leaves at 9:20 pm and return flight leaves at 1:50 pm. It will cost you $222.
That sounds good to me.
Should I book tickets for the same?
Yes. I want to book the refundable tickets only.
Please confirm the following details: United Airlines from San Francisco to Chicago with departure date as March 7th and return date as March 10th. Thw onward flight will leave at 9:20 pm and return flight will leave at 1:50 pm. It is an economy class for 1 passenger.
Yes. That sounds good.
The tickets has now been confirmed.
Thanks for the help. Can you please help me in finding some attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that you may find interesting. You can check out 360 Chicago which is a tourist attraction.
Okay great. That's all I needed for now.
Enjoy and have a nice day.
I need a round trip flight but I can't book it on my own
I can do that for you, where do you wanna go?
The city is Sydney, australia
when do you want to leave?
On the day after tomorrow, I wish to be back on march 13th
where are you planning to leave from?
my departure city is SFO
I've found 1 flight to meet your requests, it is from united airlines and it leaves at 1:25 pm. it will arrive at 5:25 am an the ticket is $212
when will I land on my return flight?
you'll land at 5:06 am
may I ask for a refund if needed?
No you can't
I could use this flight, buy economy tickets for 2 people.
before I do so, I have to ask you to read and confirm me this short recap. You want 2 economy tickets for a united airlines flight leaving from san francisco to sydney. You'll leave on march 3rd at 1:25 pm and the return flight will take off on march 13th at 5:25 am
yes, tell me the name of the arrival airport and the time of arrival of the onward flight
your trip has been booked. the destination airport is kingsford smith international airport and the onward flight is scheduled to land at 1:06 pm
cool, now look for some things to do to entertain myself.
there's 10 things you could do to entertain yourself. I can suggest you to check out ANZ stadium, it is a sports venue
do I have to pay to see the place?
yes, you do.
okay, look for something themed nature preserve
okay, if this is what you're looking for, you should check featherdale wildlife park, it's a nature preserve as you asked
cool, thank you
you're welcome, do you need more support from me?
No I don't, see you
Have a nice time!
I'd like to search for some round trip flights. I've got three people in the group.
Where do you want to visit? Which airport are you leaving from?
I am leaving from LAX and want to go to Seattle, WA.
What date do you want to leave?
I would like to leave on the 1st of March.
What date do you want to return?
I'd like to return on the 12th of this month.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight for $136 that leaves at 7:10 pm. The return flight departs at 3:45 pm.
What time does the outbound flight arrive in Seattle, and at what airport?
The outbound flight will arrive at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport at 9:57 pm.
That all sounds good. Could you help book the tickets for me? I'd like refundable tickets since my plans may change. Any class is okay.
Alright, so you would like to book 3 tickets in economy on Alaska Airlines from Los Angeles to Seattle. Your departing flight will leave March 1st on 7:10 pm, and your return flight will leave March 12th at 3:45 pm. Is that correct?
That all sounds good. Does that flight have any stops?
Your ticket reservation is confirmed. The flight has 0 stops.
Which airport am I leaving from? What time will I arrive back home?
You are departing from LAX International Airport. Your return flight will arrive at 6:32 pm.
Okay, thanks. Can you find some attractions for me there?
I found 10 you might like. You should consider visiting the Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site, which is a tourist attraction.
Is that place good for kids? What's their contact info?
Yes, it's a good place to take your kids. You can reach them at 206-322-1582.
Thanks, that's all I need right now.
Okay, enjoy your trip!
I need a round trip flights from Los Angeles. I want to come back on the 9th of this month
What is the departure date? Where do you want to go?
I want to go to NY. Date of departure on the 2nd
There are 4 flights. With American Airlines there's a fligh at 6:20 pm, with return at 3:40 pm. It costs $256
What is the destination airport? What time does the return flight land?
The destination airport is JFK International Airport. The return flight lands at 7:57 pm
Ok, It's perfect for me! I want to buy the ticket
1 ticket in Economy with American Airlines, from Los Angeles to New York, on March 2nd at 6:20 pm, with return on March 9th at 3:40 pm. Is it correct?
Yes, It's correct, you can proceed with the purchase
Good! Your ticket is booked!
Can the ticket be refunded? How many stops are provided?
No, the ticket cannot be refunded. It has 1 stops
Thank you. I'm looking for something intresting to do.
What kind of event are you looking for?
I'd like Concert events
I suggest Amber Run Brooklyn at Warsaw on March 14th at 6 pm
I would like more information on this event. What is the Warsaw address?
This is a pop music concert. Warsaw is located in 261 Driggs Avenue, Brooklyn.
It looks nice, but I prefer other events
At La Boom on March 6th at 6:30 pm there's Americo
Yes, this sounds interesting
Do you want to book tickets?
Not now, thanks
Do you need anything else?
No, It's all. Thanks a lot
Have a good day
I want you to look for a round trip flight for me.
When would you like to leave and return?
I want to leave on the 10th and return on the 14th of this month. There would be four of us.
Where are you heading to and where would you be leaving from?
I will be leaving Seattle, WA and heading to Portland, Or.
There are 1 suitable flights. There is an outbound flight on united airlines that leaves at 4:15 am. The flight returns at 10:45 pm and it costs $75
Is it a refundable ticket?
No, sorry it is not.
What time would the onward flight land?
At 5:13 am.
That would be great.
Would you like the tickets?
Go ahead and book it for me.
You would like economy tickets for 4 on a united airlines flight from seattle to portland that leaves on march 10th at 4:15 am and returns on March 14th at 10:45 pm?
That sounds fine.
I have reserved the tickets.
There would be zero stops
There are 0 stops.
Thanks. What fun thing is there to do when I get there?
What type of events interest you?
Something in sports.
There is s portland thorns vs houston game at providence park on March 13th at 8:30 pm. How does that sound?
It sounds wonderful.
Would you like tickets?
Not at this time.
Is there anything else?
No. Thanks for assisting me.
Enjoy your day.
I'm going on a trip. Can you find a good plane for me? I want a round trip.
Sure. What city are you going to?
SFO.
What day do you want to return on? And what city are you departing from?
I want to be back on the 7th, and I'm departing from Vegas on the 4th of this month.
There are 3 flights available. One is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 5:30 am and costs $115. The flight bringing you back home departs at 5:30 pm.
Perfect.
Do you want me to reserve you a seat?
Yes please.
You want 1 seat to the American Airlines flight going from Las Vegas to San Francisco and leaves on March 4th at 5:30 am, with the return flight departing on March 7th at 5:30 pm. Is an economy seat fine?
That sounds great.
I reserved your seat.
What station does this plane take me to? And does it have 0 stops?
It goes to SFO International Airport, and yes it has 0 stops.
Thank you very much. Can you find me something fun to do there on Tuesday next week? Maybe a sports game? Baseball would be awesome.
I see 6 games you might like. How about going to see the Giants vs Brewers on March 5th at 7 pm at Oracle Park?
Sounds like fun.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
I would like to find a round trip flight for 3 people to Philadelphia.
When are you coming back?
I will be returning Tuesday next week.
When are you departing?
I will be leaving on March 1st.
Where are you leaving from?
I will be leaving from Atlanta, Ga and would like to return on the 6th of March.
There is a American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:25 pm and returns at 10:10 am for $217.
That flight sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yes I would like to purchase a ticket.
3 passengers on economy flight with American Airlines from Atlanta to Philadelphia on March 1st at 3:25 pm an returns March 6th at 10:10 am.
Yes, that is great.
Your ticket was purchased.
I want to find an event for that day.
Would you like music or sports event?
I would like a Games event.
There are 10 events. There is Eagles Vs Cowboys at Lincoln Financial Field on March 14th at 8 pm.
That event sounds good.
Do you want to purchase a ticket?
No, I just wanted the information.
Have a good day.
can you find me 2 round trip flight to portland, or on 7th of march
when are you returning
i will return on march 12th
where are you departing from
i will depart from sd
what about an alaska airlines for $159 depart at 1:20 pm and return at 5:40 pm
when does the onward and return flight arrive
your return flight arrive at 8:24 pm and onward flight arrive at 4:04 pm
ok perfect
would you like to purchase a ticekt
yes please
please confirm your booking for 2 economy tickets with alaska airlines traveling from san diego on march 7th at 1:20 pm and arrive at portland on march 12th at 5:40 pm
perfect
your ticket is booked
how many stops are there and what airport it depart from
you will depart from san international airport with 0 stop
thank you, please also find me some thing to do in that area
do you like music or sports event
i like to go to a concert
there are 7 events in that area. What about bryan adams at theater of the clouds on march 2nd at 8:30 pm
ok perfect
would you like to buy a ticket
no not yet
have a nice day
Hello! Please let me know if there is any round-trip flights available?
Where is your plan of visit?
I'll be travelling to Chi-town on 4th of March.
From where will you leave?
I'll be starting from San Fran.
When is your return?
I will be returning on Thursday next week.
Okay! I've found 4 flights to your convenience. The one, American Airlines will leave at 3:20 pm and the return flight will leave at 7:05 am. The cost of the travel will be $181.
Is it a refundable or non-refundable ticket? Does the flight have any stops or zero stops?
Sorry that the ticket is non-refundable. The flight has 0 stops.
Thanks. Is there any other flights available on the same day for, 4 of us will be travelling.
Yup! The Delta Airlines flight will leave at 10:05 pm and the return flight will leave at 10:40 am. The ticket price is around $201.
Wonderful! Looks great to me.
Do you need anything to be assisted with?
Yup! Please can you help me to reserve the tickets?
Sure! Please can you confirm me that you wish to book in Delta Airlines that flies from San Francisco to Chicago on March 4th at 10:05 pm. The return journey will be on March 7th at 10:40 am and you wish to reserve 4 tickets in Economy class. Is that correct?
Perfect! You're very correct.
Okay! I've confirmed the ticket for you.
Which is the departure airport of the flight?
SFO International Airport will be the departing airport.
So, when will the onward flight arrives?
It will arrive at 4:52 am.
Thanks much for your help. Also, Please can you find me something interesting stuffs to do on 5th of March.
Which event interests you more?
Do you have Games events, for I like them a lot.
Yup, the popular event Cubs Vs Mariners is going to take place on March 5th at Wrigley Field at 8:30 pm. Do you wish to book tickets for this event?
Looks good. But do you have any other best events coming up?
Yup, the event White Sox Vs Angels is going to held at Guaranteed Rate Field on March 5th and it starts at 7 pm.
Sounds good. Thanks. I'm done with.
Have a wonderful day.
I need you to search flights leaving Seattle, WA going to Vancouver, BC. I am not particular about which airline I travel with.$295
What day would you be leaving and when would you be come back.
I will be leaving March 4th and coming back on the 9th.
I have found a flight with Delta Airlines with an outbound flight leaving at 8:45 am. Your flight returning would leave at 2:50 am. The costs of the ticket of the $295.
Ok, I would like to book a flight.
So you would like me to book with Delta AirLines for a 1 round trip Economy ticket from Seattle to Vancouver with a departure date of March 4th and return of March 9th? The onward flight will leave at 8:45 am and your return flight leaves at 2:50 am.
Yes I do.
Your reservation is made.
What airport and what time does my onward flight arrive?
You will be arriving at YVR International Airport at 7:49 pm.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else I can do ?
Yes I would like to learn about any Concert Events to do on that day.
I have found 6 events you may be interested in. Billy Idol is at the PNE Amphitheatre on March 3rd. It starts at 6:30 pm.
That's great, but are there any Sports everts?
Yes. I have found 3 events. Whitecaps Vs Colorado Rapids is taking Place at BC Place on March 8th. It starts at 7:30 pm.
Great. But do you have any others?
Yes. Whitecaps Vs Earthquakes is taking place at the BC Place on March 14th. It starts at 6:30 pm.
Thanks. I am all set.
Have a nice day.
Can you please find me a round trip flight for today?
Sure, but first please tell me your departure location as well as when do you plan on returning.
I'm flying out of Chi-town returning next Tuesday.
Please tell me your desired destination.
I'm flying to NYC.
I found an American Airlines flight taking of at 12:30 pm with the return flight taking off at 5:25 am. Total cost is $135.
Can you please tell me when and where does the onward flight land.
Sure, it lands at 3:49 pm at JFK International Airport.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to get you tickets for this flight
Yes, please do.
Can you please confirm that you want me to get you 1 ticket in Economy for the American Airlines flight taking of from Chicago to New York on March 1st at 12:30 pm with the return flight on March 5th at 5:25 am.
Yes, that's correct. Please tell me from where does the onward flight take of as well as the landing time for the return flight.
I've successfully booked your ticket. Your onward flight takes of from O'Hare International Airport with the return flight landing at 6:44 am.
Can you find something interesting for me to do at destination. I'm into Rock.
Any particular category in mind, like maybe Sports, Music or maybe something else.
Please find me some Baseball Games.
There are 10 events meeting your criteria. How about Mets Vs Braves at Citi Field on March 13th at 6 pm?
Can you please tell me the address for this event?
Sure, the event takes place at 123-01 Roosevelt Avenue.
Sounds OK, but can you find me something else?
There's also Mets Vs Cubs at Citi Field on March 2nd at 7:30 pm.
Sounds OK, but can you find me something else?
There's also Mets Vs Diamondbacks at Citi Field on March 1st at 6 pm.
Can you please tell me the address for this event?
The event takes place at 123-01 Roosevelt Avenue.
Sounds awesome to me!
Do you want me to get you tickets to the even?
Not at the moment.
Is there anything else I could do for you today?
No, that will be all for now. Thank you!
Have a nice day!
Can you help me find a round-trip flight?
Please tell me your starting point, destination, and return date.
I want to fly from SF to Toronto, Canada and return on the 14th.
When do you plan to leave?
On March 6th.
I found 2 flights. There is an American Airlines flight for $280 that leaves at 7:05 am. The return flight leaves at 10:05 am.
That sounds good. Can you help me buy the tickets.
Just to confirm: You want 1 Economy class ticket for the American Airlines flight from San Francisco to Toronto departing on March 6th at 7:05 am. The Return flight leaves on March 14th at 10:05 am local time. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your ticket is confirmed.
How many stops does the onward flight have, and when does it arrive?
There is 1 stop, and it arrives at 8:28 pm.
Thanks. I want to find something to do there. Are there any baseball games on the 13th?
What kind of event? Music, sports, or something else?
Sports, please.
I found 4 events you may like. The Blue Jays Vs Astros game is going at at Rogers Centre on March 13th at 6:30 pm.
That sounds good. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Can you find round trip flights for me?
When are you leaving and coming back?
I want to leave on the 8th and come back on the 14th of March
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Las Vegas
Where are you headed?
I'm going to SFO
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:30 am and a return flight at 5:30 pm that'll cost $106
Is there anything available on the 6th?
I found 2 flights that might work, how about a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:50 pm and a return flight at 10:50 am for $107
What else can you find me?
How about a United Airlines flight that leaves at 3:05 pm and has a 7:15 pm return flight for $113
That flight sounds great
Cool, what else can I do?
Can you buy me economy tickets for that flight?
Confirming you want 1 economy ticket from Las Vegas to San Francisco via United Airlines with a March 6th 3:05 pm departure and a March 14th 7:15 pm return?
Yes that's right. What airports does this flight arrive and depart from?
Your ticket is booked! It goes from McCarran International Airport to SFO International Airport
I want to find some cool events to do there then
What kind of even?
How about baseball? Something on the 12th would be cool to watch some games
I found 5 things, including the Giants Vs Dodgers at Oracle Park on March 12th at 7:30 pm
That's awesome
Should I buy tickets?
No not right now
Then can I assist with something else?
Nothing at the moment, thanks
You're very welcome
I need a hand in finding round flights for my next trip
Where are you headed to and where will you leave from? When will you start your trip?
I'm traveling from New York to vancouver, the date is March 1st
When do you plan to be back?
I was thinking about the 3rd
My researchers tell me that there are 2 flights good for you. One is from Delta Airlines and it leaves at 7:30 am and the return leaves at 2:50 am. The cost for this flight is $313
I'm not interested in this solution. The trip is for 1 person
I have 1 more flight for you. It leaves at 8:20 am and the return flight leaves at 3:15 am. The company is united airlines and the ticket costs $315
This one satisfies me
I can buy tickets on your behalf
Yes, I would love so
In order to do that, you need to read and confirm me the procedure. I am going to buy 1 Economy tickets from united airlines. The flight leaves from new york on march 1st at 8:20 am. The return flight leaves from Vancouver on March 3rd at 3:15 am
Yes, you got it right
Tickets are yours
May I ask for a refund eventually? Tell me the time of my onward flight.
The ticket is not refundable. The time of the onward flight is 6:01 pm
Thank you for your services. Now look for an event I an attend to while there.
Tell me more about your personal tastes
I'm a fan on Concert events
There are 6 events, but. most of all, there's Billy Idol performing at pne amphitheatre on March 3rd at 6:30 pm
This one is an option but can you keep looking? I'm a blues fan and the date should be on 2nd of this month
There are 2 more things I can tell you about. There's colin james performing at pne amphitheatre on march 2nd at 7 pm
this one is also an option but can you show me more events?
Yes, if you like zz top you may see them at pne amphitheatre on march 2nd at 6 pm
I like that too
I can easily get the tickets if you want me to
No, I don't need you to do that
Do you still need me?
No, that's all. bye
Bye to you sir
Find me a round trip flight
From where and when do you want to leave? When will you return?
I need on the 3rd from Seattle, WA and returning on March 10th
Do you prefer any place to visit?
I want to go to Atlanta
How about the American Airlines that leaves at 9:45 pm and return flight leaves at 9:35 pm. The cost is $207
Do they refund for the ticket?
No the ticket is not refundable
Is there any other flights?
How about Delta Airlines that leaves at 11:50 pm and return flight leaves at 5:45 pm. The ticket cost is $272
That's great on. Get me the tickets.
Please confirm this: the flight is from Seattle to Atlanta. The airlines is Delta Airlines. The departure date is March 3rd and returning on March 10th. The flight leaves at 11:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:45 pm. It is economy class for 1 passenger
Please make it for two passengers
Please confirm this: the airlines is Delta Airlines for 2 passengers
That's perfect
ticket booked successfully
Find me something interesting to do there
Which category do you want
Look for Music events
How about Atlanta Summer Organ Festival at Peachtree Road United Methodist Church on March 5th at 8:30 pm
That's good. Find me some other events like Rock
How about Gorgasm at Kenny's Alley on March 5th at 6 pm
Give me the address
The address is 50 Upper Alabama Street
That's perfect. Thank you
Have a nice day
Find for me please round trip flight.
Where are you going?
To Philly I'm planning to go.
Tell me when you come back and when you wanna go.You will be leaving from where?
I plan to leave from Chi-town on March 2nd and get back on 7th of March.
I have 4 options that you might like.With American Airlines a flight that leaves at 5:55 pm and the return leaves at 10:10 am.Cost for a ticket is $135.
Other option you have?I would like to fly with United Airlines and I am part of a group of three people.
I have 1 good flight for you with United Airlines.Leave at 3:15 pm and return at 11:30 am.Price for ticket is $160.
I like this one.
You want to buy tickets?
Yes, will be great.In Economy class will be good.
With United Airlines you want 3 Economy tickets from Chicago to Philadelphia.Departure will be on March 2nd at 3:15 pm and return will be in March 7th at 11:30 am.Is that correct?
Yes but tell me at which airport will arrive the flight.
Reservation was made.PHL International Airport is the destination.
Find for me on there on that day something interesting to do.I want to be on next Wednesday and enjoy Pop.
What type do you like? Music or Sports or something else?
I enjoy Concert events.
I have one popular option for you called Toto.Is take place at The Met Philadelphia on March 6th at 7 pm.
That's sounds really good.
You want to buy tickets?
No.Not now,maybe later.
With something else I can help you?
No.Thank you very much.
Have a good day!
I need you to search round trip flights please.
What city are you leaving from?
Vancouver, BC is where I am departing from.
What city are you going to and when are you do you plan on traveling?
I want to travel to New York on March 12th and returning on March 14th.
I have a found a flight with Delta Airlines for $356 that leaves at 3:20 am and the return trip leaves at 6 am.
What airport will I will be arriving at ?
JFK International Airport will be your destination airport.
How many stops are there and which airport will I be leaving from?
There is one stop and you will be leaving YVR International Airport. There is only 1 stop.
Sounds great. I need to make reservations.
So you would like me to reserve a 1 Economy ticket with Delta Airlines leaving Vancouver on March 12th leaving at 6 am going to New York and returning on March 14th at 3:20 am?
Yes. Is my ticket refundable?
No, tickets are not refundable. I have successfully made your reservations.
What time will I arrive on my onward flight? Also what time does my return trip arrive?
Your onward flight will arrive at your destination at 6:40 pm and your return flight arrives at 11:11 am.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else I can do?
Yes. I want to find an event that involves Baseball Games on the 13th of March.
The Mets Vs Braves is happening at Citi field on March 13th. The game starts at 6 pm.
Can you tell me the address?
Yes. It is located at 123-01 Roosevelt Avenue.
Thanks, I am all set.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a round trip flight.
When are you leaving? Where are you going? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from San Francisco going to Las Vegas on the 4th of this month.
When are you coming back?
On the 14th of March.
I found 4 options including an American Airlines flight leaving at 5:30 pm. The return flight departs at 5:30 am. The ticket cost is $107.
Perfect, please buy the tickets now.
Please confirm, leaving San Francisco for Las Vegas on American Airlines. 1 seat in economy on March 4th at 5:30 pm. The return flight is March 14th and the flight is leaving at 5:30 am.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your ticket is confirmed.
I also want to find something to do while I'm there.
Music? Sports? Concert?
Hip hop music events.
I found Life Is Beautiful Festival in Downtown Las Vegas Events Center - DLVEC on March 1st at 6 pm.
What is the address?
200 South 3rd Street.
That is perfect.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
No, thats all I need.
Have a nice day.
Can you search for round trip flights?
Where will you be departing from?
I will leave from CDMX.
When would you like to leave?
I want to leave today.
Where would you like to go and when would you like to return?
I want to visit Vegas and return on the 9th of March.
I found 2 flights. I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:05 am and the return flight departs at 10:55 am. The ticket price is $228.
That sounds like a good flight for me.
Should I purchase tickets for it?
Yes, please book me a ticket.
Please confirm the trip details. The American Airlines flight going to Las Vegas departs Mexico City on March 1st at 8:05 am. The return flight leaves at 10:55 am on March 9th. You want 1 Economy class seat.
That is correct. What time does the onward flight arrive and which airport will I depart from?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The flight will depart from Benito Juarez International Airport. The onward flight arrival time is 2:35 pm.
Thanks for the assistance. I want to find some interesting things to do while there.
Do you have any event preferences?
I prefer Concert events and especially like Hip Hop.
The Life is Beautiful Festival is happening on March 1st starting at 6 pm. Its very popular and takes place at Downtown Las Vegas Events Center - DLVEC.
That sounds good. Can you find me events on March 2nd? I like Rock.
I found 1 event you may like. Young The Giant even is popular and takes place on March 2nd at 6:30 pm. It takes place in Downtown Las Vegas Events Center - DLVEC.
Can you give me the venue address?
The address of the venue is 200 South 3rd Street.
Great, that is all I needed.
Enjoy your day.
I'm looking for round-trip flights.
Please tell me your origin city, as well as your departure and return dates.
I wish to leave New York City on March 8th and return on 13th of this month.
What's your destination?
I'm going to Portland.
There's an outbound American Airlines flight leaving at 4:45 pm, with a 7:20 am return flight, at $337 per ticket.
Could you search for other available flights? I'm okay with any class.
Of the 2 suitable flights I found is the 2:35 pm outbound Delta Airlines flight with an 8:45 am return flight, at $323 per ticket.
What time does the onward flight land, and from which airport does it take off?
The onward flight arrives at 9:33 pm and takes off from JFK International Airport
That flight works for me. Please go ahead and purchase tickets for a group of 3.
Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like 3 Economy class tickets on the Delta Airlines flight from New York to Portland which departs on March 8th at 2:35 pm and returns on March 13th at 8:45 am.
No, sorry. My group has four people.
Okay. Please confirm that the return flight takes off at 8:45 am and that there are 4 passengers.
That is correct. What's the destination airport?
I've confirmed your ticket. The flight is destined for PDX International Airport.
Is the ticket refundable, and does the flight have 1 stop?
I'm sorry, the ticket is nonrefundable. There is 1 stop.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. Please find me something interesting to do on that day.
Any particular type of event I should search for?
I love Music events.
I found 7 events that might interest you. How about the very popular Bryan Adams playing at Theater Of The Clouds on March 2nd at 8:30 pm?
I like the sound of that.
Should I go ahead and reserve tickets for this event?
No, not at the moment.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Have a nice day.
Hello! I'd like to find 3 round trip flight tickets. Can you help me?
I'd be happy to assist you. Please tell me which city you will be departing from and when you plan to return.
We will be leaving Las Vegas and returning on the 8th.
What day will you begin your travels?
We expect to leave this Sunday.
What is your destination?
We are going to Phoenix.
There is 1 flight available. It is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm and returns at 3:05 pm with a ticket price of $82.
Which airport does it leave from and are the tickets refundable if I purchased them now?
It will be leaving McCarran International Airport. The tickets are nonrefundable.
That's okay. I'd like to purchase Economy tickets now if that's possible.
Certainly. Let me review the details: You'd like 3 Economy tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from Las Vegas to Phoenix leaving March 3rd at 4:45 pm. Your return flight will be March 8th at 3:05 pm.
That is correct.
Great! Your tickets have been confirmed.
Can you tell me which airport the flight will arrive at and what time it is expected?
It is scheduled to reach Sky Harbor International Airport at 5:59 pm.
Perfect. Can you help me find some things to do while I am there? I'd like to find a Music event on the 6th. I really enjoy the Blues, if you can find something.
Johnnyswim will be performing at The Van Buren on March 6th at 7 pm.
They are okay but I'd like to hear some other options if you can find some.
I'm sorry but that seems to be all for blues events. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you see if there is anything related to Sports on Monday next week? I enjoy Baseball.
Chase Field is hosting Diamondbacks Vs Brewers on March 4th at 7 pm.
I'm not a fan of the Brewers. Can you find something else?
The Diamondbacks Vs Cardinals will be at Chase Field on March 4th at 8:30 pm.
That works for me.
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
No, that will be everything. Thank you for your assistance.
You are very welcome. Enjoy the rest of your day!
Hi, could you help me search for a round trip flight to SF on the 13th of this month?
When do you plan to depart?
I will be departing on March 6th for a short trip.
And where do you plan to depart from?
I will be departing from CDMX.
I have found 2 available flightss, one of which is an American Airlines flight which departs at 2:55 pm and returns at 1:20 pm which costs $180.
I see, are there any alternatives available?
Yes, there is a United Airlines flight too which departs at 8:45 pm and returns at 9:15 am. This will cost you $261.
Do you know whether refunds are allowed for this flight?
Unfortunately, this is a non-refundable ticket.
I see, how many layovers does this flight have and when will I be returning from my trip?
There are 1 layovers for this flight and your return flight arrives at 8:05 pm.
This sounds great, could you help me purchase the flight tickets please?
Sure, please confirm your purchase of 1 economy class seat for the United Airlines flight from Mexico City to San Francisco from March 6th at 8:45 pm to March 13th at 9:15 am.
That is fine for me.
Your reservation has been made!
Thank you! Could you also help me search for some interesting events or activities I can do there?
Sure, any preference on the type of events?
A concert will be great!
Would you like the Allan Rayman concert taking place at August Hall on March 9th at 6 pm.
Sure, but could you find something more Classical instead?
There are 2 events you may like, one of which is the Carmina Burana event which takes place at San Francisco Symphony on March 12th at 8:30 pm.
That sounds great!
Would you like me to reserve event tickets for you?
No, that is not required. Thanks a bunch though!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
I am looking for a round trip flight. Do you have the information about it?
On which date do you plan to make a journey?
Its on March 2nd.
Please tell me about departure place and destination?
I plan to fly to New York from Seattle
On which date is return journey?
I would be coming back on the 10th.
Then you can choose American Airlines leaving at 4 pm. Departure time of return flight is 3:40 pm. You have to pay $308.
That will be the right one. Please book ticket on that flight.
Please verify: You need 1 ticket in American Airlines departing from Seattle to New York on March 2nd in Economy class leaving at 4 pm. The return flight leaves on March 10th and leaving at 3:40 pm.
Please book two tickets.
Ok, You need 2 tickets to New York, right.
Yeah, go ahead.
Reservation is successful.
Please give location of arrival and departure ports.
Departure is from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and arrival is at JFK International Airport.
Great help. How can I spend day interestingly there?
What are you looking for, Music or Sports?
Games will do.
You can enjoy Mets Vs Braves at Citi Field on March 13th at 6 pm
Good, thank you very much.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a round trip flight.
What dates are you departing and returning on?
I'm departing on next Wednesday and returning on the 10th.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm traveling to Atlanta next Tuesday.
Where are you departing from?
I am departing from Toronto.
There is an American Airlines flight departing at 10:05 am. The return flight departs at 3:25 pm and it is $239.
That flight works for me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I'd like to buy one economy ticket for the flight.
Okay, I have 1 economy ticket on American Airlines departing from Toronto to Atlanta on March 5th at 10:05 am. The return flight departs at 3:25 pm on March 10th, correct?
Yes, that is correct. How many stops does the flight have?
I have purchased the ticket and the flight has 1 stop.
I'd also like to find something interesting to do there.
Do you have any preference on the activity such as music or sports?
Yes, I like games events and I want to go next Wednesday.
I found 7 events you may like. What about the Falcons vs Buccaneers at Mercedes-Benz Stadium on March 6th at 6 pm?
That sounds great, that is all I needed.
Have a great day.
Can you find a round trip flight for my upcoming trip?
Where are you leaving from and when will you return?
I leave from New Delhi and should return on March 12th.
When are you leaving, and where are you going?
I intend to leave on the 5th of March to visit LAX.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:20 am, returns at 6:30 am, and a ticket for which costs $425.
Sounds good to me!
Want me to get tickets for it?
I'd like to get a ticket, yeah.
You want 1 economy ticket for an American Airlines plane traveling from Delhi to Los Angeles on March 5th at 9:20 am, and returning on March 12th at 6:30 am?
Yes, that's right. When does each flight arrive?
I got the ticket for you. The onward flight will come at 3:17 pm, while the return flight comes at 4:07 pm.
Okay, nice. Can you find me something interesting happening there? No point in going if you don't truly enjoy yourself.
Any specific type of happening?
Yes. I want to find games.
I found 10 games. I think you'd like the Dodgers vs Cubs baseball game at Dodger Stadium, which happens on March 12th starting at 8:30 pm.
What's the venue address?
At 1000 Vin Scully Ave.
Good to know. Can you find me a different one?
Another baseball game at Dodger Stadium is the Dodgers vs Diamondbacks one. It's a little earlier on March 12th, at 7 pm.
Okay. I think I'd rather just find a music event.
Okay. I found 10 music events around. Want to check out the Bill Callahan show at Lodge Room on March 2nd starting at 8:30 pm?
What's the venue address?
104 N. Ave 56, 2nd Floor.
Sounds great. I need nothing further.
Have a great time!
Hi, could you help me search for some round trips please?
When do you intend to return?
I will likely return on the March 12th.
Sure, and where do you plan to travel to?
I will be travelling to San Fran please.
Where and when do you plan to depart.
I will most likely depart from Chicago the day after tomorrow.
There are 3 convenient flights, one of which is an American Airlines flight which departs at 7:05 am and returns at 3:20 pm which will cost you $187.
I see, could you help me purchase flight tickets for 1 in the economy class please?
Sure, please confirm your purchase for 1 economy class ticket for the American Airlines flight from Chicago to San Francisco from March 3rd at 7:05 am till March 12th at 3:20 pm.
That is fine with me!
Your reservation has been made.
Could you help me find some interesting things to there on March 5th? A baseball game will be great.
Any preference on the type of event you will like to participate in?
Yes, a sports event will suffice.
There are 6 interesting events, one of which is the Giants Vs Brewers game which is held at the Oracle park on March 5th at 7 pm.
May I know the address of the event please?
Sure, you can visit them at 24 Willie Mays Plaza.
This sounds good, but do you have any alternatives?
There is a Giants Vs Cardinals game which is held at the Oracle park on March 5th at 6:30 pm.
This sounds great too!
Would you like me to purchase the tickets for you?
No, that is not necessary.
I see, could I further assist you then?
No, thanks for your help though.
Sure, have a great day ahead!
Can you assist me with round trip flights.
What is the departing city?
I am going from CDMX.
What location will you be visiting, when are you coming back and leaving?
I would like to travel Economy on the 13th for four people going to Seattle next Monday.
Delta Airlines has an outbound flight 1:45 pm returning 8:45 am for $290.
Would there be any other available flights?
The United Airlines outbound flight leaves 8:45 pm and returns 12:30 pm for $295.
Would there be any other flights leaving NYC the 7th of this month.
I have 2 convenient flights including American Airlines leaving 3:40 pm and returning 4 pm for $306.
The flight sounds great to me.
Can I buy tickets for it?
Yes, I want to book the ticket.
Please confirm a flight from New York to Seattle with American Airlines leaving March 7th and returning March 13th. The onward flight leaves at 3:40 pm and returns 4 pm with Economy seating for 4.
Yes, that sounds great.
The ticket is confirmed.
How many stops are on the flight?
The stops is 1.
Thanks so much for the help. I'd like to find something of interest to do that day there.
What is your preference for the category of events?
I love to see games.
Seeing the Huskies vs cougars is popular. The event is at Husky Stadium on March 5th at 8 pm.
That sounds nice and is all I need.
Have a nice day.
How about helping with round trip planes for me?
Absolutely, when will you leave? When are you planning a return? and Where will you depart from?
There are 4 people and we're leaving Chi-town on the 1st of March and returning on the 12th of March.
Where are you going?
Goin to Las Vegas baby.
Ok, I have an American Airlines that leaves at 4:30 am and leaves to return at 10:55 am. Your damage for that will be $254.
When does the plane back land? How many stops will there be?
Well, 1 stop. You'll land back at 8:12 pm.
Isn't there something leaving at a more reasonable hour?
Yes, there is a Delta Airlines flight. It leaves at 5:25 pm. It boards to return at 12:20 pm. It costs $241.
What else you got?
What about United Airlines flight? It departs at 10:35 am. The return leaves at 1:40 pm. Your cost will be $247.
Can you get me tickets? I need cheap economy please.
Sure, here's what I have: 4 tickets for March 1st flight going from Chicago to Las Vegas Economy on United Airlines at 10:35 am. You'll return on March 12th on the plane leaving at 1:40 pm.
Wow, you got it.
Your ticket is set.
Will I have 0 stops? Can I refund the ticket?
No, on the refund. You'll have 1 stop.
Cool, Is there a Hip Hop activity or concert where I'm going?
Well, there is Life is Beautiful Festival going on. It's in Downtown las Vegas Events Center - DLVEC. You can show up there at 6 pm starting on March 1st.
Fine, get me more though.
I'm sorry there isn't anything else that's acceptable. What can I get you now?
Nothing for me.
Enjoy Vegas and don't spend all your money.
I need for find a friendly round-trip flight for my elderly grandparents and myself. Would you walk through this with me, please?
I'm happy to help. What's your flight date and where are you going?
Well, short notice for you, but today is the day, going to Los Angeles, please?
What's your departure city and when are you returning?
We want to fly out of Washington and return on the 11th of March.
Got it. American Airlines is offering a round-trip flight, leaving at 2:50 pm and returning at 5:20 am for $297 per passenger.
Do you show any other flights with three seats available?
Delta Airlines has a round-trip flight, leaving at 10 am and returning at 4 am for $207 per passenger.
Okay, I'll go with that flight, please.
Are you ready to purchase tickets for the trip?
Yes, let's do it.
Sure thing. Do you want to confirm a Delta Airlines Economy round-trip flight for 3 passengers, flying out of Washington on March 1st at 10 am and arriving in Los Angeles, with a return flight scheduled for March 11th at 4 am?
Go ahead and set that in stone, please. What's the airport for the arrival and can I get a refund if I need to?
Your flight tickets are confirmed. Your flight will arrive at LAX International Airport, and I show that refunds are not available for this flight.
I see. That's okay. Now, what can we find that's something nice to do, maybe American football?
So, you want to five an interesting event, not in Music or some other type, but in the Sports category?
Yes, we all can enjoy Sports entertainment.
Of the 5 current event options, the Rams Vs Cardinals game is coming up on March 12th at the LA Memorial Coliseum, with a start time of 6 pm.
Yeah? Where's the coliseum located?
The street address is 3911 Figueroa Street.
Cool. This is working out really nicely.
Do you want to purchase tickets for the game?
I'll wait on that and make sure my grandparents are okay with it. So thanks for doing that.
Certainly. Enjoy your day.
Look up round trip flights from New York and returning on the 13th of this month.
Departure time? Destination?
I'm going to Seattle on the 7th of this month.
There's an American Airlines flight leaving 3:40 pm and returning 4 pm for $306.
What else?
There's a Delta Airlines flight leaving 6 am and returning 3:15 pm for $321.
That one, get tickets.
Please confirm: 1 economy ticket on Delta Airlines from New York to Seattle. Leaving March 7th at 6 am and returning March 13th at 3:15 pm.
Good.
Your seat is booked.
When does it get in?
11:45 am.
Is it refundable?
It is.
Thanks, look up stuff to do there that day.
Event category? Music, sports, etc.
Baseball games.
I found 7 events. Mariners vs Angels will be at T-Mobile Park on March 10th at 8:30 pm.
Great.
Do you want tickets?
Not now.
Anything else for today?
No, thanks.
Have a nice time.
I would like to fin da round trip flight.
When will you depart and return?
Iw ould like to leave on the 5th of MArch and return on the 13th.
Where are you leaving from and where are you going?
There are 4 people who will be traveling from Seattle to San Fran.
There are 4 convenient flights. Alaska Airlines has a flight departing at 12 pm and a return flight at 2:55 pm for a ticket price of $133.
That flight works.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, please purchase a ticket in any class.
Please confirm 4 economy tickets on Alaska Airlines flight from Seattle to San Francisco leaving March 5th at 12 pm and returning March 13th at 2:55 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What is the arrival time of the return flight?
Ticket confirmed. You will arrive at 5:06 pm.
Thank you. Now I would like to find a sports event like baseball to attend while I am there.
I found 8 events you may enjoy. The Giants vs Brewers play at Oracle Park on March 5th at 7 pm.
Great. That is all I need right now.
Enjoy the day!
search the round trips 1 person
where are you going from?
I am leaving san fran
where are you going to?
I am going economy 6th of march sunday this week
where are you headed?
I am going to london, uk
2 flights american airlines 7:05 am leaves 3:05 pm and is $399
is it refundable?
not it's not
any other flightd?
united airlines flight leaves 5:35 am returns 0:25 am and is $437
that is good and can I get tickets?
san francisco to london united airlines leaves march 3rd and returns march 6th and leaves 5:35 am and returns 0:25 am economy 1
yes that works
yes, return 9:31 am
I want tuesday next week
any preference for you?
I want concert events
1 event beyond the black in boston music room on march 5th at 6:30 pm
that is good
want some tickets?
no I do not
anything else for you?
no thank you
bye bye then
I need to find round trip flights.
When are you leaving and coming back and where from?
I want to leave Philly on the 2nd of March and returns on the 11th of this month.
Where are you visiting?
I am going to London.
An American Airlines flight is leaving at 10:10 am and returning at 2:05 pm for $342.
What airport are they leaving from?
The flight will be leaving from PHL International Airport.
At what airport will the flight arrive?
The final destination is Heathrow International Airport.
That sounds great to me.
Should I purchase the tickets?
Yes, I'd like to book a ticket.
Please confirm a flight on American Airlines from Philadelphia to London leaving March 2nd and returning March 11th. The outbound flight leaves 10:10 am and returns 2:05 pm Economy class for 1 passenger.
Yes, that sounds nice.
The ticket has been confirmed.
Can I get refunded on the ticket?
No, the ticket isn't refunded.
When will the flight return? Will the flight have 0 stops?
The stops is 1 and the return flight comes in at 0:16 am.
Thanks for the assistance. I would like something interesting to do that day there.
Do you like Music, Sports, or what other category?
I do enjoy sports.
At the Emirates Stadium Arsenal vs Lyon is occurring on March 7th at 6:30 pm.
Thanks sounds wonderful and is all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm trying to find a roundtrip flight for 2.
What is your departure city and where are you heading to? And when would you like to return?
I'd like to go from Chi-town to Los Angeles and return on the 7th of this month.
Leaving when please?
That's on March 3rd.
I have a flight on American Airlines departing at 9:35 PM and returning at 8:30 AM which costs $181.
Could you find something else?
There is a flight on Delta Airlines which departs at 11:15 PM and returns at 1:40 PM and that is a $176 ticket.
What is the return flight?
That is at 8:12 PM.
I think that will work.
What else may I help you with?
I'd like to make reservations.
Confirming a flight on Delta Airlines from Chicago to Los Angeles on March 3rd with a March 7th return. It departs at 11:15 PM and returns at 1:40 PM. This is for 2 economy tickets.
That's perfect, thanks.
The reservation has been booked.
I appreciate your help.
How else may I help you?
I'd also like to find a rock event to attend.
Would you like to see something music or sports related?
Something music related.
I have 5 good possibilities. Would you like to see Gloryhammer at 1720(tm)? That's on March 14th at 8:30 PM.
Yes, I like that.
Thank you very much.
Help me look for round trip flights on Delta Airlines. I'm traveling from Philly.
When will you be leaving and when are you returning?
I'm leaving on the 9th of March. I'm returning on the 11th of March.
Where will you be going?
I'm going to New York City. I want an Economy seat. And I'm actually returning on the 13th.
There's 1 flight that suits your preference. It's a Delta Airlines flight with an outbound flight that departs at 4:40 pm and a return flight that leaves at 7:40 pm. It is $63 per ticket.
And what airport is the arrival at?
The flight arrives at JFK International Airport.
Okay, that works for me. Can you get me tickets, I'll need four.
Please make sure this is correct, I'll purchase you 4 Economy tickets from Philadelphia to New York on Delta Airlines. The outbound flight leaves on March 9th at 4:40 pm and the return flights leaves on March 13th at 7:40 pm.
Yes, please purchase the tickets. What time is the return flight's arrival?
I've purchased the tickets. The return flight's arrival is 8:31 pm.
Okay, now I need some help finding something to do that I'd like over there.
Is there anything specific you like?
I prefer Music events.
There are 10 events you might enjoy. There's Amber Run Brooklyn which is popular. It's at Warsaw on March 14th at 6 pm.
That's good. But I'd prefer something Classical, and on the 11th of March.
There are 2 events you might enjoy. There's Joe Hisaishi which is popular. It's at Stern Auditorium / Perelman Stage on March 11th at 8 pm.
I'd definitely like that.
Would you like to purchase tickets for it?
No, I don't need tickets. That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you manage to get me some plane tickets.
When will you depart?
I'm not leaving until March 3rd.
Do you know when you'll return? Where are you going, where are you coming from?
I'm going from Chicago to Seattle, WA and I want to return on March 10th.
You have some choice. There are 4 options. How about American Airlines that departs 7:50 am. You'll board to return at 4 pm. It costs $252.
When will I get to Seattle? Can I get a refund on this?
No refunds on this flight. You'll land in Seattle at about 1:27 pm.
I think I'll snap that one up.
May I get the tickets now?
Sure, get me 2 together. I need economy please.
What about this: 2 Economy tickets for American Airlines that departs 7:50 am. from Chicago on March 3rd going to Seattle and returning March 10th at 4 pm.
Fine, How many stops though? What airport do I leave from?
You will have 1 stop and You'll leave from O'Hare International Airport.
Fine how about some sports or baseball tickets? I want to see a game next Monday.
Well, you can check out mariners Vs Rangers at T-mobile Park on March 4th at 8 pm if you want?
Cool beans, thanks.
Will you need anything else?
Nope, I'm all good thanks.
enjoy the game.
Can you help me book a round trip flight?
Sure, what is your origin and destination city and when are you coming back?
I'm going from San Diego to SF and am returning on the 7th of March.
And when are you departing?
The 3rd of this month.
For $108, you can get an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 5:10 pm with a return flight departure time of 6:10 am.
Where and when does it arrive?
At SFO International Airport at 6:50 pm.
That one works for me.
Should I get you tickets?
Yes, please book me one.
First confirm that you'd like 1 economy ticket on the Alaska Airlines flight from San Diego to San Francisco departing March 3rd at 5:10 pm with a return flight departing March 7th at 6:10 am.
Okay, where am I leaving from again and does the flight have any layovers?
I've confirmed your ticket. It departs from SAN International Airport and has 0 stops.
Thanks, can you tell me if there are any baseball events in the games category happening there on the 5th?
Yes, there are the Giants Vs Brewers game at Oracle Park on March 5th at 7 pm.
I'll look into that, thanks. That's all.
Enjoy your day.
I wanna be back the 8th and going to phoenix, az
when and where will you go?
SF later today
leaves 5:50 am from delta airlines and leaves 11:55 am and price is $126
when does it arrive?
sky harbor international airport leaves 2:02 pm
sounds good to be
wanna get tickets?
four people please
san francisco to phoenix from delta airlines that leaves march 1st and returns march 8th and onward one leaves 5:50 am and return leaves 11:55 am and economy seating 4 people
yes when does onward arrive?
onward gets back 7:57 am
what airport does flight leave from?
sfo international airport and 0 stops
I love baseball and wanna find something march 3rd and I like games
arizona vs la dodgers is good and it is at chase field on march 3rd at 6 pm
that is good
have a nice one
I need to search for round trip flights. I need 3 tickets and want to leave on the 8th.
Sure. Can you give me the following: return date, departure city, and destination?
I need tickets from Seattle, WA to San Fran. I want to return on the 11th of this month.
I found a flight on Alaska Airlines. It departs at 12 pm and the return flight leaves at 2:55 pm. The ticket costs $129.
Sounds good. Can you purchase tickets for me?
Please confirm the following: 3 Economy tickets on Alaska Airlines to San Francisco. Flight departing from Seattle on March 8th at 12 pm and returning on March 11th at 2:55 pm.
Yes, sounds right.
Your flight is confirmed.
When is the return flight arriving?
It arrives at 5:06 pm.
What are the departure and arrival airports?
The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and arrives at the SFO International Airport.
Thanks.
Is there anything else?
I want to find some fun things to do in San Francisco on the 9th of this month. Find me some Rock Music events.
I found 1 event for you. The popular Thee Oh Sees event is taking place at The Chapel on March 9th. It starts at 8:30 pm.
Can you get me the address?
The address is 777 Valencia Street.
That's great.
Do you want to book tickets?
No, not now.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks a lot.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
Find me some round trip flights.
Where and when are you leaving and where are you going?
I am departing on the 5th of March from Portland and going to Los Angeles.
What day are you returning?
I will be returning on the 10th of this month.
Search found an Alaska Airlines flight that costs $152. The first flight departs at 10:10 am and the second flight departs at 5:15 am.
That works for me. Get two tickets for this flight.
You want 2 Economy tickets on Alaska Airlines from Portland to Los Angeles. The first flight departs March 5th at 10:10 am and the second flight departs March 10th at 5:15 am. Is that right?
That is right.
Your tickets have been ordered.
Find me some interesting Concert events to attend there on Friday next week.
Search revealed 8 results. Bill Callahan is at the Lodge Room on March 8th at 8:30 pm.
Can you tell me the address and any other event info?
It is under the Country genre and is located at 104 N. Ave 56, 2nd Floor.
That works. What else can you find?
Girl in Red is at The Teragram Ballroom on March 8th at 8:30 pm.
That works. That is everything for now.
Have a good day.
Could you find me a round trip flight?
Where are you heading, from where, and when?
I'm heading to SF from New Delhi and I want to return on the 12th of march
when are you leaving?
this sunday.
There's an american airlines flight, the outbound leaves at 9:20 am, and the return flight leaves at 1:15 pm, the cost is $387.
Is there anything else?
United airlines has a flight leaving at 1:10 am, then the return leaves at 11:55 am, and costs $365.
Works for me, could you buy the tickets?
Please confirm: You want to buy a ticket from Delhi to San Francisco on united airlines leaving on march 3rd and returning march 12th, the return flight leaves at 11:55 am and the outbound flight leaves at 1:10 am, and you want an economy seat for 1.
Correct
Your ticket is confirmed
Thanks, could you find something for me to do that day?
Sure, do you want something music, sports, or other?
I'd like games.
How about the giants vs brewers at oracle park?
Works for me.
Do you want tickets?
No thanks
Do you need anything else?
No thanks!
have a great day
I'm looking for a round-trip flight with Southwest Airlines for 3 people.
When do you want to leave?
We're leaving tomorrow.
When are your coming back? What is your destination?
We're going to Atlanta, and want to return on the 14th of March.
Where are you leaving from?
We're leaving from San Francisco.
I found 1 flight for you. There is a Southwest Airlines flight for $257 that leaves at 6:45 am. The return flight leaves at 6:30 am.
That one sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets for it?
Yes, please, in Economy.
So, to confirm: You want 3 Economy tickets for the Southwest Airlines flight from San Francisco to Atlanta departing on March 2nd at 6:45 am and a return flight leaving on March 14th at 6:30 am. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Thanks. I'm looking for things to do on that day.
What are you interested in?
I like sports.
There is a Falcons Vs Buccaneers game at Mercedes-Benz Stadium.
That sounds good. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Hi, I would like to make a reservation for a round trip please.
Do you know where you plan to visit?
Yes, I will be travelling to Chi-town.
Where and when do you plan to depart?
I will be departing from Seattle later today.
May I know when will you be returning from your trip?
Sure, I will be returning on the March 10th.
Would you like the American Airlines flight departing at 4 pm and retuning at 2:50 pm which will cost you $267?
I see, do you know when will the return flight arrive and whether this is a refundable ticket?
Unfortunately, this is a non-refundable ticket. The return flight will arrive at 10:03 pm.
Are there any alternatives?
Would you like a Delta Airlines flight departing at 11:50 pm and returning on 5:25 pm? This will cost you $255.
This sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, could you reserve 4 tickets for the Economy class seats?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 4 seats for the Economy Delta Airlines flight from Seattle to Chicago from March 1st at 11:50 pm to March 10th at 5:25 pm.
Sure, that is fine with me! When does my return flight arrive?
Your reservation has been made! You will be returning at 0:27 am.
Do you know which airport does the flight depart from?
You will be departing from the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thank you, could you also help me find some interesting things to do?
Any preference on the type of events you will like, such as Music or Sports?
I would prefer a sports event, please!
There are 10 events which you might like, one of which is the Cubs Vs Brewers at Wrigley Field.
That sounds great!
Do you need to make a reservation for the event?
No, that is not necessary.
Do you require further assistance?
No, that is all the help I need, thanks!
Sure, have a great trip!
I would like to find a rounr trip flight.
Where wil you traveling to and from, and when will you be traveling?
I am traveling from Vegas to New York City on the 14th of March.
When are you leaving?
I will be leaving on March 4th.
American Airlines has a flight leaving at 5:30 am with a return flight at 4:45 pm. The ticket price is $309.
That flight will work.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, please purchase am economy ticket.
Please confirm 1 economy tickets on american Airlines flying from Las Vegas to New York leaving March 4th at 5:30 am and returning March 14th at 4:45 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What is the arrival time of the onward flight?
Your ticket has been purchased. The onward flightarrival is 6:01 pm.
I am aslo looking for baseball games on the 6th of this month.
The Mets vs Cubs are at Citi Field.
What time is the event and where will it happen?
The event takes place at 7 pm at 123-01 Roosevelt Avenue.
That works. Thanks, that is all I need right now.
Have a great day!
I have to get round-trip tickets to get to Los Angeles for my presentation at the Tech convention. It would be a huge relief if you would help me set the flight up, please.
Happy to help. What's the airport you want to fly out of and what's your return date?
I want a flight out of CDMX, and make my return date March 9th, please.
What's the date you intend to leave for your trip?
The 3rd of this month is the latest I can leave.
Okay. You have 3 convenient flight options. The American Airlines round-trip flight leaves at 8:05 am and will return at 2:45 pm for a ticket price of $171.
What other flights do you show there?
Delta Airlines is offering a round-trip flight, leaving at 1:45 pm and returning at 9:15 am for $254 per ticket.
What's the airport for the arrival?
The flight will arrive at LAX International Airport.
Very nice. Let's get tickets for four of us, traveling Economy, please.
Sure thing. Do you want to confirm an Economy round-trip flight for 4 passengers on Delta Airlines, flying out of Mexico City on March 3rd at 1:45 pm, going to Los Angeles and returning on March 9th at 9:15 am?
Right-O. All of that works great for me.
Your flight tickets are confirmed.
Really appreciate that.
Do you need more information?
It would be nice to find something fun to do the day we get there. What do you think?
Do you have an idea of something interesting?
A concert would be cool.
The Bill Callahan concert at the Lodge Room is one of 10 events coming up.
All right. Good to know. I'll let you know what I decide. Thanks for all you do.
Of course. Have a pleasant day.
I need 2 tickets for a round trip flight.
Where are you leaving from?
LA.
Where are you going?
Philadelphia.
When are you coming back? When are you leaving?
I am leaving on Sunday this week and returning the 5th of March.
I found 2 flights including Delta Airlines flight leaving at 1:40 pm. The return flight leaves at 2:20 pm. The ticket price $291.
I want an economy seat.
Please confirm, leaving Los Angeles for Philadelphia on Delta Airlines. You are leaving March 3rd at 1:40 pm and returning March 5th at 2:20 pm. I have reserved 2 seats in economy.
That is perfect. When does the onward flight leave?
Your ticket is confirmed. The onward flight arrives at 0:16 am.
Thanks! I want to do some things on the 4th of March.
Music? Sports? Concerts?
I want to see sports.
I found 5 events like Owls Vs Bison at Lincoln Financial Field.
Find something else, like baseball games.
I found 2 games, first is Phillies Vs Cubs Citizens Bank Park.
That sounds good.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
No, not now. That is everything I need.
Have a nice day.
I need a plane. Can you find one for me? Preferably a round trip. I need to be back on the 14th of this month and want premium economy seats.
Sure. What day are you going?
The 12th. Also, I need tickets for four.
What city are you going to? And which city are you departing from?
I'm going to ATL from Las Vegas.
There's a Southwest Airlines plane which departs at 6:25 pm and costs $437. The flight which brings you back departs at 6:30 am.
What station does the plane go to? And which one does it leave from?
The plane goes from McCarran International Airport to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Perfect. Could you reserve some seats for me?
4 premium economy tickets for the Southwest Airlines flight from Las Vegas to Atlanta which leaves on March 12th at 6:25 pm, with a return flight which departs at 6:30 am on March 14th. Is that correct?
That's right.
I have reserved your seats.
Can you also find me something interesting to do while I'm there?
Sure. What kind of activity are you looking for? A music concert? A sports game? Or something else?
I'd love to see a concert on the 13th of this month.
How about going to see Emmylou Harris at Atlanta Symphony Orchestra?
Awesome. Thanks for your help, I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
Let's look for round trip flights. I'll be going to Atlanta, GA.
When are you leaving?
I'm going on the 1st of this month.
When are you returning.
I shall return on the 14th.
Where will you be traveling from?
I'm going to travel from San Francisco.
There are 4 flights that could work for you. There's an American Airlines flight with a departure at 3:50 pm and a return that leaves at 11:40 am. The ticket costs $237.
I'm liking that. Please purchase me tickets.
I'll purchase you 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from San Francisco to Atlanta with a departure on March 1st at 3:50 pm and return on March 14th leaving at 11:40 am, is that okay?
Yeah, that's okay.
I've purchased the ticket.
Thank you. I'm also trying to find things to do that day. I could go for a Rock Concert on next Thursday
There's Gorgasm at Kenny's Alley.
What time does it begin?
It begins at 6 pm.
What else is there? Is there a Classical event on Sunday this week?
There's 1 event you might like. It's Atlanta Summer Organ Festival at Peachtree Road United Methodist Church.
I'm digging that.
Do you want me to get you tickets?
No, that won't be necessary. That's all the help I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Look up a round trip flight.
Destination?
San Francisco.
Return date?
Leaving San Diego on 4th of March and returning March 9th.
I found 4 flights. Alaska Airlines leaves 11:10 am and returns 7:10 pm for $140.
Where does it arrive? Are there zero stops?
There is 1 stop and it arrives SFO International Airport.
Anything else?
There's an American Airlines flight for $162 that leaves 9:20 pm and returns 5:30 pm.
Ok.
Should I book it?
Yeah, economy for one.
Please confirm: 1 economy ticket on American Airlines from San Diego to San Francisco from March 4th at 9:20 pm to March 9th at 5:30 pm.
Good. Where's it get in? Is it refundable?
Your seat is booked. It arrives SFO International Airport and is not refundable.
Thanks, look up a baseball game that day.
Even type?
Sports.
I found 8 events. Giants vs Brewers will be at Oracle Park.
Find something on the 8th of March.
I found 4 events. Giants vs Diamondbacks is at Oracle Park then.
Good. Ok that's all.
Have a nice day.
Can you get on and get me a round trip ticket?
Where will you go? Where you coming from?
I'm going to SFO from New York City.
When are you leaving? When will you return?
I need to get back on the 14th. I really insist on getting American Airlines tickets. I have mile advntage with them. I'm taking off on Sunday this week.
You're in luck, there's an American Airlines flight that takes off at 8:50 pm. You'll return leaving at 8:55 pm. You'll only pay $203 for everything.
Ok, just make sure I get the best economy deal.
Ok to be clear: 1 ticket from New York going to San Francisco on American Airlines at 8:50 pm on March 3rd, economy. You'll return boarding at 8:55 pm on March 14th.
Yes, what airport will I need to get to for departure? Can I get my money back on this ticket?
Your ticket is set up and no refunds on that. You'll depart JFK international Airport.
Fine, find something for me to do there.
What kind of event?
Sports please, for me.
Why not go see the Giants Vs Brewers at Oracle park then?
Wow, cool that sounds great.
How about getting tickets?
No, not yet, Maybe later.
Have a great trip.
I want to find some round trip flights. I want to get back on the 13th of this month. I will be leaving from New York City and there will be 2 people in my group.
When are you planning on leaving and where do you want to visit?
I want to travel to San Francisco and I will be leaving on the 6th of March.
OK great I have 4 flights for you there is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm the return flight leaves at 8:30 pm and the total price of the ticket will be $211.
That sounds great! Can you help me buy the tickets? I like travelling in economy.
First let's confirm the details. American Airlines flight from New York leaving at 4:45 pm on March 6th flying to San Francisco go. The flight Returns on March 13th at 8:30 pm There is 2 passengers and you will be seated in economy.
Can you tell me all the tickets refundable and which airport does the flight depart from?
Your ticket is confirmed. Unfortunately the ticket is not refundable the flight will depart from JFK International Airport.
I want to find something good to do on that day.
What kind of things do you like doing? Do you like music on sports or anything else?
I'm looking for music on that day I want something to see on March 12th I really like pop music.
There are 2 events that you might like the first event is Celine Dion and is at The Chase Center Experience.
Yeah that sounds great.
Thank you have a nice day.
Can you find me round trip flights for three passengers please?
When are you coming back and where are you trying to go? Where are you leaving from too?
I am headed to LA from Portland and wanna get back on the 6th
When do you want to leave then?
I want to fly out on Saturday this week?
I found 5 flights that work for you. There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am and has a 5:15 am return flight for $151
Are there other flights available
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:20 am and has a 11:15 pm return that will cost you $173
Is it refundable?
No it's not
Then that flight sounds good
Should I get you tickets?
Yes please do
OK confirming you need 3 economy tickets on American Airlines from Portland to Los Angeles with a 7:20 am March 2nd departure and a March 6th 11:15 pm return flight
Yes, that's really good
Your ticket is confirmed
Thanks for that, now help me find something to do there.
What do you want to do?
I want something in the sports field?
I found 10 things including a Dodgers Vs Cubs game at Dodger Stadium
What else? Maybe a concert on March 5th
I found 4 events including the Girl In Red at The Teragram Ballroom
That sounds great to me
Do you want tickets to it now?
No, now right now, for now we're good here.
OK, just update me if you need something
Hey, get me some Economy priced round trip flights please?
Sure, where will you go? When will you want to leave? When do you plan to go?
I'm going to Atlanta to LAX. I'm leaving day after tomorrow.
When do you want to get back to LAX?
On the 14th please.
What about American Airlines? They leave at 5:25 pm and then leave from Atlanta back at 2:30 pm. It's cost is $177.
Nah, something else.
what about Delta Airlines? They leave at 8:40 pm and the flight back boards at 5:40 pm. It's cost is $212.
Is it something I can get a refund on? When will the flight back home arrive?
No refunds sorry but the flight back comes at 7:39 pm.
Can you try, yet again? I need two tickets.
Well, there are 2 more options. What about Southwest Airlines that leaves at 1 pm? It's return boards at 6:30 am. It will cost you $299.
Fine, how about doing that?
Confirming: 2 for Southwest Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Atlanta. Departing on March 3rd at 1 pm. Coming back on March 14th at 6:30 am. Ticket is Economy.
Yes, that's great.
Your ticket is set.
What about something fun to do on the 13th of this month?
Do you want music or sports?
Music, a concert.
you have 4 options. What about Emmylou Harris at the ATlanta Symphony Orchestra.
Where and when is it?
It's at 6:30 pm at 1280 Peachtree Street Northeast.
What else is there?
well..you could go to Gorgasm in Kenny's alley.
Ugh, really? that's a thing? Try sports, maybe soccer.
Well, there's United Vs Earthquakes at Mercedes-Benz Stadium.
Fine, great work.
Enjoy your trip.
I need a round trip flight for 1 on the 9th of this month.
Where are you departing from and when is your return date?
I am departing SD and will be returning on the 13th of March.
Where are you going?
I am going to Atlanta.
Southwest Airlines has departure times of 1:20 pm and 12:05 pm respectively and costs $264.
How many stops are in the flight and what is the departing airport?
The flight is out of SAN International Airport and there is 1 stop.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets now?
Yes, get me plane tickets.
You want 1 Economy ticket from San Diego to Atlanta on Southwest Airlines. The first flight departs March 9th at 1:20 pm and the second flight departs March 13th at 12:05 pm. Is that right?
That is right.
Your flight is booked.
Find some something to do there.
What types of things do you like?
Find me Sports on March 11th.
Falcons Vs Buccaneers are playing at Mercedes-Benz Stadium
What type of event is this and what is the address?
It is a Football game and is played at 1 AMB Drive Northwest.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets?
No, not right now.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Can you find some round trip flights for me.
Where do you want to visit and when do you plan on departing? Where we you be departing from?
I am leaving San Fran on 1st of March and would like to go to Chi-town.
When would you like to come back?
I want to travel back on the 10th.
I found 4 trips. There is a American Airlines flight that departs at 3:20 pm with a return flight that departs at 7:05 am. The ticket price is $198.
What is the arrival time of the onward flight and is this a refundable ticket?
The ticket is not refundable and the onward flight arrival time is 10:07 pm.
Do you have another available flight?
I have a Delta Airlines fligth that leaves at 10:05 pm and the return flight leaves at 10:40 am. The ticket cost is $178.
That is a good flight. Can you buy me the tickets.
Please confirm the travel details. 1 Economy class seat for a flight from San Francisco to Chicago on Delta Airlines. The departure date is March 1st at 10:05 pm and the return date is March 10th at 10:40 am.
No, my party has 4 people.
Please confirm the number of passengers is 4 and the return flight leaves at 10:40 am.
That is correct. Are the tickets refundable and what airport does the flight depart from.
Your tickets have been booked. Unfortunately the tickets are not refundable. The departing flight leaves from SFO International Airport
I am also looking for things to do on that day. I enjoy Baseball events.
What are you interested in?
I like Sports.
The Cubs Vs Brewers event is at Wrigley Field.
That is great
Can I assist you with something else?
No thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I need to find a round-trip flight.
Where are you leaving from, and what is your departure date?
I want to leave LA on the 8th of this month.
What is your destination? When do you want to return?
I want to go to Portland, and return on March 10th.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight for $141 that leaves at 5:15 am. The return flight leaves at 10:10 am.
Are there any other flights?
There is an American Airlines flight for $178 that leaves at 11:15 pm. The return flight leaves at 6 am.
Which airport does it arrive at, and what time?
The flight arrives at PDX International Airport at 1:45 am.
Are there any other flights? I prefer flying Economy class with Delta Airlines.
There is a Delta Airlines flight for $177 that leaves at 9:50 pm. The return flight leaves at 5:40 am.
That one sounds good. I'd like to buy 2 tickets.
So, just to confirm: You want 2 Economy tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Portland leaving on March 8th at 9:50 pm. The return flight leaves on March 10th at 5:40 am. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets are confirmed.
I'm looking for things to do in Portland that day.
What kind of events do you like? Music, sports, or something else?
I like music.
I found 7 events you might like. Bryan Adams is playing at the Theater of The Clouds.
That sounds good. That's all I need.
Have a great day.
Find round trip Economy flights for me please.
Sure thing, but first please tell me, when would you like your return date to be?
No problem, Let's do the 13th of this month please.
Sounds good, Where would you like to depart from and on what date?
Let's shoot for LA and i'm trying to leave on the 11th of March. Make sure my tickets are refundable please.
Where would you like to visit?
I would like to go to Portland please.
Your in luck, I found an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 7:25 am and the return flight is for 1:55 pm. This flight will be $181 total.
That might work. Find out which airport I would arrive at, I also need to know what time the onward flight would arrive.
Your arrival destination would be PDX International Airport and the onward flight will arrive at 9:55 am.
This sounds good.
Shall I proceed and purchase your ticket?
Yes, go ahead and buy please.
Sure, but first please confirm your travel plans. I have a flight leaving Los Angeles on Alaska Airlines headed to Portland. This flight will be leaving at 7:25 am on March 11th. The return flight will be on March 13th at 1:55 pm. This is for 1 Economy class ticket. Do I have your details correct?
Yes, perfect.
Great news, I was able to successfully confirm your reservation!
Wow, that was easy. While we are here, let's go ahead and find some Pop events happening on the 12th of March in the area. Please make sure that we are looking up Music events please.
I found a show for Erica Fernandez playing at Newmark Theatre. Would you be interested?
Give me more options.
I apologize but I cannot find any other events matching your preference. Would you like to change your criteria?
No, don't worry about it.
Alright, Have a wonderful day.
Is it possible for you to find me Economy flight tickets for a round trip flight, for which I will leave on March 11th.
Can you tell me from where will you be leaving for the flight, and what is your destination?
I want to arrive to Vancouver, BC, and I will be leaving for my trip from NY.
Can you tell me the date when you will be returning?
I want to return on the 14th.
I have found a Delta Airlines flight which leaves at 6 am, and when it returns it flies off at 2:50 am. The ticket for this flight costs $286.
Can you check if the ticket can be refunded? Which is the airport from where the flight will depart?
I regret to say but the ticket can not be refunded. The flight will be leaving from JFK International Airport.
This flight seems nice to me.
Do you want to have tickets bought for this flight?
Yes I want to buy tickets for this flight, and I want to have tickets for four people.
Can you confirm that you want to buy Economy class flight tickets for 4 people, for the flight of Delta Airlines which leaves from New York on March 11th at 6 am to go to Vancouver, and when it returns it flies off on March 14th at 2:50 am.
Alright, that seems nice to me.
Your requested ticket has been booked.
I want to find things that I can do that day.
Is there some specific kind of event you are interested in? It can be a Music or Sports event or something else.
I usually enjoy the Sports events.
There are 3 events which match what you requested. One of the events is the match of Whitecaps Vs Colorado Rapids, which will happen at BC Place.
Can you tell me the location of the venue, and the time when the event starts?
The event is expected to start at 5 pm, and the address of the venue is 777 Pacific Boulevard.
Is there some other event you can find for me?
Another event which I would recommend is the match of Whitecaps Vs Earthquakes at BC Place.
That seems nice to me.
Are you interesting in buying tickets for this event?
No, I do not want to have tickets bought for this event. That would be all.
Have a good time!
Will you find round trip flights for next Tuesday?
When and where are you leaving from? Coming back when?
I'm leaving from LA to Philadelphia and returning on March 14th.
Delta Airlines offers outbound flight that leaves at 2:20 pm and return flight at 1:40 pm for $302.
Anything on Southwest Airlines?
I found 1 flight on Southwest Airlines that leaves at 8:35 pm with return flight at 1:40 pm for $312.
Great.
Buy tickets?
Yes for one.
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket from Philadelphia to Los Angeles for Southwest Airlines on March 5th at 8:35 pm and return date of March 14th at 1:40 pm.
Sounds good. What's the origin airport? Flight arrives when?
Flight arrvies at 0:16 am and departs from PHL International airport. I've made your reservation.
Will you find events for that day?
Any preference?
Music.
I found 10. Bill Callahan is at Lodge Room.
What's the location?
104 N. Ave 56 2nd Floor
Start time? Category?
7:30 pm. Country.
Will you find events on 12th of this month?
I found 5. Gloryhammer at 1720(tm).
Nice. That's all.
Have a nice day.
I need to find a round trip.
What dates will you be traveling? Where would you like to go?
I need to leave on the 3rd of this month and return on the 14th. I need to head to Phoenix, AZ. I earn double points when I fly on American Airlines?
What airport would like to depart from?
I will be flying out of CDMX
How about an American Airlines flight Departing at 8:05 am and the return flight departs at 3:55 pm for $293.
Awesome. I want to buy tickets for it.
Just to confirm you need 1 economy ticket for American Airlines departing Mexico City on March 3rd at 8:05 am going to Phoenix. Then returning on March 14th at 3:55 pm.
That's awesome. What time do I arrive in Phoenix?
Your ticket is booked. It arrives at 1:38 pm.
I would like to find something to do on the 6th of March.
What would you like to do?
I want to find some Games?
How about the Arizona Vs La Dodgers game at Chase Field. If you don't like that I have 3 other options for you.
That will be good. That's all for right now.
Have an amazing day.
I need some assistance please with roundtrip flights.
What's your destination and where will you be departing from? Also when would you like to return?
I'm going to San Francisco from Chi-town and I need to come back on the 14th.
Leaving when please?
Wednesday next week and it's for one person.
There are 4 flights that I've found. American Airlines has a 12:30 PM departure with a 3:20 PM return for $268.
Okay, that's great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, I do.
Confirming an American Airlines flight from Chicago to San Francisco on March 6th at 12:30 PM and returning March 14th at 3:20 PM for 1 economy passenger.
Great. Where does it leave from?
That flight takes off from O'Hare International Airport and your reservation is complete.
Thanks very much.
How else may I help you?
I'd like to find something interesting to do.
Are you interested in a music or sports event?
A concert please.
There are 10 possibilities for you. Would you like to see Allan Rayman at August Hall?
Are there any good pop events on the 13th?
Celine Dion is playing at Chase Center Experience.
I'd love to see that.
Do you want to buy tickets now?
Not now, thanks.
Is there anything else today?
No, thank you.
You're very welcome.
Can you search round trip flights for me?
Where are you planning to visit, and where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Mexico City to Phoenix, AZ and I want to return on the 9th of this month.
When do you want to leave?
I'm leaving on the 4th.
There is an American Airlines flight departing at 8:05 am and returns at 7:35 am for a cost of $250 per ticket.
That flight sounds good. Can you help me buy 1 ticket in economy?
Please confirm the following details: Purchasing 1 ticket on American Airlines from Mexico City to Phoenix departing March 4th at 8:05 am and returning March 9th at 7:35 am in economy class.
Yes, that is correct. What airport does the flight arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. The flight arrives at Sky Harbor International Airport.
When does my flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 8:05 pm.
Thank you. I am looking for a blues concert on March 7th.
I found 1 event for you. The event is the Greensky Bluegrass at the Van Buren.
That sounds good to me. Thanks, that is all I need for now.
Okay, have a great day.
Can yiu find me a roundtrip flight from Chi-town to Seattle, WA that returns on March 11th?
Sure, when do you want to leave?
I need to leave on March 1st and prefer to fly American Airlines.
There is 1 American Airlines flight available that leaves at 2:50 pm which a return flight leaving at 4 pm. The ticket cost would be $246.
What airport will the plan arrive at?
The flight lands at the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Is there only one stop and when does the return flight arrive back n Chi-town?
Yes, the flight has 1 stop. The return flight will land at 10:30 pm.
That works.
Would you like me to purchase a ticket for you?
Yes, I need two tickets in any class.
Please confirm you would like to buy 2 economy tickets on American Airlines from Chicago to Seattle, leaving on March 1st at 2:50 pm and returning on March 11th at 4 pm.
Yes, book it.
Your tickets have been successfully purchased.
Can you help me find something fun to do there?
I'd be happy to. What types of things do you like to do?
I enjoy watching sports.
There is a Huskies Vs Cougars game at Husky Stadium you might enjoy.
Where is that at and what time does it start?
The game begins at 6:30 pm and is located at 3800 Montlake Boulevard Northeast.
Great. That's all I needed to know.
Have a fun trip!
Will you find round trip flights?
What's the departure date and destination?
I plan on visiting Chi-town on Economy on the 2nd.
From where?
American Airlines leaving from London, UK.
What's the return date?
March 4th.
American Airlines offers an outbound flight that leaves at 0:10 am and return flight that leaves at 4:30 am for $424.
Terrific.
Want to buy tickets?
Yes for 2.
Please confirm 2 Economy tickets for American Airlines from London to Chicago that departs on March 2nd and returns on March 4th. Onward flight departs at 0:10 am and return flight departs at 4:30 am.
Great. Is ticket refundable? Departing from which airport?
I've completed your reservation. Non-refundable ticket on flight departing from Heathrow International Airport.
Will you look for events on that day?
Any preference? Music or Sports or something else?
Games.
Cubs Vs Brewers at Wrigley Field.
Cool. That's all.
Have a nice day.
Can you look for round trip flights that return on the 9th of this month?
Where would you like to go?
I want to go to Vancouver, BC.
Where are you leaving from, and when do you want to leave?
I'm traveling from Atlanta and want to leave on the 6th of this month. I would prefer to fly United Airlines in economy class.
I found 1 flight that fits your request. There is a United Airlines flight for $250 that departs at 6:15 am, with a return flight departing at 3:15 am.
Okay, that works for me.
Would you like to buy tickets?
Yeah I'd like to do that now.
Alright, so you would like to book 1 economy ticket on the United Airlines flight from Atlanta to Vancouver. The outbound flight departs March 6th at 6:15 am, and the return flight departs March 9th at 3:15 am. Is that correct?
Yes that's all fine. Is it a refundable ticket? When does the outbound flight arrive?
Your reservation was successful. The ticket is not refundable. Your outbound flight will arrive at 2:31 pm.
Can you find me something to do that day? I'd like some music to go to.
Sure, how about the Beach Boys at PNE Amphitheatre?
Okay, that sounds great.
Would you like to buy tickets for that event?
No, not right now. That's all I needed, thanks.
Okay, enjoy your day.
I need to find a round trip economy slight later today.
Where will you be departing from and when are you planning to return?
I'll be going from Seattle and coming back on the 11th of March.
What is your destination?
I'm going to Vegas.
I have a slight 90and United Airlines at 10:10 AM which returns at 1:40 PM for $245.
That sounds okay.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Sure, go ahead.
Confirming a United Airlines economy flight from Seattle to Las Vegas on March 1st at 10:10 am and returning March 11th. The flight is for 1 passenger and leaves at 1:40 PM.
Great, thank you. Is that a refundable ticket and it is the flight nonstop?
The reservation is complete. I'm sorry, but the ticket cannot be refunded and the flight has 1 stop.
No problem, thank you. I would also like to find a hip hop event to attend.
Certainly. Would you like a music or sports event?
Something music related please.
I have 1 possibility, which is the Life Is Beautiful Festival and that is happening at the Downtown Las Vegas Events Center - DLVEC.
That should be fun. I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
I would like a round trip flight.
Where would you be departing from?
I would be leaving from Atlanta.
Where would you be heading and when would you like to return?
I want to go to Seattle. I will be coming back on the 13th of March.
When would you like to set off?
On March 2nd.
There is an outbound american airlines flight at 9:35 pm. The flight returns at 9:45 pm and costs $200.
What is the arrival time of the onward flight?
It's at 0:07 am
That would work. Go ahead an order the tickets for me. It doesn't matter which class.
You would like 1 economy ticket on an american airlines flight from atlanta to seattle that leaves on March 2nd at 9:45 pm and returns on march 13th at 9:35 pm?
That would be great. When do the return flight land?
The tickets have been purchased. The return flight will be landing at 6:17 am.
Where would it be landing? Is the ticket refundable?
The flight lands at seattle-tacoma international airport. I am sorry, but the ticket is non-refundable.
Thanks a lot. What fun thing is there to do on that day?
What kind of activity do you like?
Maybe some games.
There are 10 such activities. There is a huskies vs cougars game at husky stadium.
That sounds like a plan. I am ok now.
Enjoy your day.
I need a round trip ticket.
When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving on the 1st of this month for Sydney, Australia.
When are you coming back?
I am coming back on the 13th.
Where are you going?
I am going to Phoenix.
I found 2 options starting with a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 5:50 pm. The return flight leaves at 11:55 am. The ticket is $328.
Anything else? I want to go home the day after tomorrow.
I found 1 option on United Airlines. The flight leaves at 10:05 pm. The returning flight leaves at 7:15 am. The ticket cost is $317.
That is the one.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
Yes, book it. I want to sit in economy.
Please confirm, flight on United Airlines from Sydney to Phoenix on March 1st at 10:05 pm. The return flight is on March 3rd at 7:15 am. I have reserved you 1 seat in economy.
Thanks that is perfect.
Your ticket is confirmed.
I want do stuff on that day.
What are you interested in?
I want to go to a music concert.
I found 8 events including Anberlin at The Van Buren.
That sounds good, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Can you find me a round trip flight?
Where are you wanting to leave from? When are you wanting to come back and where are you going?
I'd like to return on the 14th of March. I want to leave from LAX and go to Atlanta.
When are you wanting to leave?
I'd like to leave on the 6th.
I have found 4 flights that would work. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 pm and returns at 2:30 pm that costs $186.
Are there any other options? I like traveling Economy.
I have found 3 flights that might work. There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 1:40 pm and returns at 5:40 pm that costs $261.
When will the onward flight arrive? And when does the return flight arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 0:51 am while the return flight will arrive at 7:39 pm.
Are there any other options? There are 4 people with me.
I have found 2 possible choices. There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 1 pm and returns at 6:30 am that costs $306.
That will work for me. Could you buy the tickets for me?
Please confirm the following: You want 4 Economy tickets for a Southwest Airlines flight that is leaving from Los Angeles for Atlanta on March 6th at 1 pm and returns on March 14th at 6:30 am.
Yes, that will work. When will the return flight arrive? And where will it leave from?
The ticket has been bought. The return flight will arrive at 10:40 am and leaves from LAX International Airport.
I would like to find something to do on that day.
What are you looking for?
I'd like to find some Games.
There's a Falcons Vs Buccaneers event at Mercedes-Benz Stadium.
What kind of event is it? And where is it located?
It's a Football game and is located at 1 AMB Drive Northwest.
That would work for me.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No, I don't want to right now.
Is there anything else?
No, thanks for everything.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a roundtrip flight this Sunday and I don't care about the seating class.
What is your destination?
New York City and I'd like to fly on American Airlines.
Where would you like to fly out from and when do you want to return?
From ATL and it will be a return on the 10th.
I have 1 option, an American Airlines flight with a 3:25 PM departure and a 9:05 PM return and the ticket price is $138.
Where does it take off from and are there stops?
The flight has 0 stops and leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That should work.
Would you like to book a reservation?
Yes, for 2 please.
Confirming a flight on American Airlines from Atlanta to New York on March 3rd, leaving at 3:25 PM and returning March 10th at 9:05 PM. The tickets are for 2 economy seats.
Perfect. Where does it land?
JFK International Airport. The reservation was successful.
What's the arrival time of the return flight?
It's 11:27 PM.
Great. I'm also looking for something fun to do.
Are you interested in a music event or something sports related?
Something music related.
Amber Run Brooklyn will be at the Warsaw.
Oh, that should be fun.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Not just yet.
Anything else today?
No, thanks for your help.
It's my pleasure.
Help me look for round trip flights.
Where are you going and when are you leaving?
I want to go to Seattle on the 7th.
What will you be traveling from?
I'm traveling from NY.
And when do you want to return?
I want to return on the 10th of March.
There are 4 flights that match. There's an American Airlines flight with an outbound flight at 3:40 pm and a return flight at 4 pm. It is $306 per ticket.
What other flights are there? I want an Economy seat.
There's a Delta Airlines flight with an outbound flight at 6 am and a return flight at 3:15 pm. It is $318 per ticket.
Is there anything else? And it's for four passengers.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight with an outbound flight at 8:40 am and a return flight at 6:50 pm. It is $325 per ticket.
I think that's the best one.
Do you want to purchase tickets.
Yes, please purchase tickets.
You want 4 Economy tickets for Southwest Airlines. The departure is New York on March 7th at 8:40 am. You'll be flying to Seattle. The return is March 10th at 6:50 pm. Please confirm the purchase.
I confirm all of that.
The tickets have been purchased.
Thanks for helping me out. Can you look for things I can do that day?
What types of events do you like? Are you into Music, Sports, or anything else?
I really like Games.
There's the Huskies Vs Cougars at Husky Stadium.
Okay, that's interesting.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
No, I don't need to get tickets. That's all for now.
Have a terrific day.
Hi, could you assist me in searching for a round trip flight please?
Sure, where will you be departing from, and when will you be departing and returning?
I will be departing from LA on the 7th of this month and returning on March 13th.
Sure, where do you plan to visit?
I will be travelling to Chi-town for a vacation with a total of 3 passengers, and I would prefer to travel in Economy class.
There are 3 flights you may like, one of which is an American Airlines flight which departs at 8:30 am and returns at 4:30 am which will cost you $194.
Are there any alternative flights departing from Vancouver, BC instead?
Yes, there is a United Airlines flight departing at 3:15 am and returning at 12:45 pm which will cost you $321.
Any alternatives? I do not really like this flight.
Sorry, there are no alternatives available currently. Do you require any further assistance?
Could you try finding other flights? I'm fine with travelling with Delta Airlines and returning on March 12th instead.
Would you like a Delta Airlines flight which departs at 2:50 am and returns at 11:55 am which costs $259?
Does this flight have one layover?
Yes, there are 1 layovers on this flight.
I see, that's fine with me. Could you help to make a reservation please?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 3 economy class tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from Vancouver to Chicago from March 7th at 2:50 am to March 12th at 11:55 am.
That is great! Do you know which airport am I departing from and when will be returning flight arrive?
Your reservation has been made. You will be departing from YVR International Airport and you will return at 6:01 pm here.
Sure, could you also help me search for some events to do?
Sure, what type of events would you like? There are music, sports and many other types of activities.
Could you help me find some music events please?
Sure, there are 5 events you may like, one of which is Basta which is held at Concord Music Hall.
That is great!
Would you like to make a ticket reservation for this event?
No thanks, that is not needed.
Sure, do you need any other assistance?
No, that is all I need. Thank you very much!
No worries, have a safe trip!
Help me look up some round trip flights.
Where are you traveling from and to? And when will you be returning?
I'm going to go from New York to Atlanta, GA. I'll be returning on the 14th.
And when will you be leaving?
I'll be leaving on the 9th of this month.
There's an American Airlines flight with a departure that leaves at 11:45 am and a return that leaves at 3:25 pm. It is $132 per ticket.
When will the departing flight arrive?
It will arrive at 2:07 pm.
That works for me. Can you get me tickets. I would prefer three tickets in economy.
I'll get you 3 Economy tickets on the American Airlines flight from New York departing on March 9th at 11:45 am to Atlanta with a return flight on March 14th at 3:25 pm. Is that correct?
No, I actually want the Premium Economy tickets.
I'll get you 3 Premium Economy tickets, is that correct?
Yeah, that's it.
I've purchased the tickets.
Help me find things to do on that day also.
Do you have anything in mind?
Is there anything Sports related?
There are 10 events that you might enjoy. There's the Falcons Vs Buccaneers at Mercedes-Benz Stadium.
Yeah, that sounds nice. Okay, I'll talk to you later.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you do a search for round trip flights for me? I enjoy traveling in economy.
When are you planning to leave and when will you come back?
I would like to get back on 8th of March and I will be leaving later today.
Where will you be departing from? Where are you wanting to go?
I am going to San Fran and departing from Chi-town.
There is a flight on American Airlines. The departure flight is leaving at 12:30 pm and the return flight will leave at 4:25 pm. The ticket costs $297.
Are there other flights available? I have four people in my group.
There is also a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 10:40 am and coming back at 10:05 pm. The ticket price is $195.
What time does the onward flight arrive and does it have zero stops?
The number of stops is 0 and the onward flight will get there at 1:27 pm.
That flight sounds fine with me. Are you able to help me purchase the flight tickets?
Yes, confirm these details please: the flight leaves from Chicago and goes to San Francisco on Delta Airlines on March 1st at 10:40 am. The return flight comes back on March 8th at 10:05 pm. The seating class is economy and the number passengers is 4.
Yes that sounds fine.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
I am looking for something to do that day. I am interested in games and I want the one on Wednesday next week. I like events that are baseball.
I have found 1 event that fits your preferences, it is Giants vs Phillies and it is at Oracle Park.
What is the location of the venue.
The location of the venue is 24 Willie Mays Plaza.
That sounds fine with me. That's all I needed.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to find a round trip flight.
When will you be coming back Ark? Where are you planning to visit and when do you want to leave?
I want to return on the 13th of this month. I am travelling to San Francisco. I want to leave on the 11th of March.
What airport will you be leaving from?
I want to leave from cdmx.
I have 2 flights for you there is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:55 pm M&S the return flight leaves at 1:20 pm and the price of the ticket is $171.
That sounds perfect to me could you help me by the flight tickets? There are going to be 2 people in my group any class of seat will be fine.
Okay let's confirm the details. The flight is from Mexico City to San Francisco it is an American Airlines flight, the departure date is March 11th the return day is March 13th the onward flight leaves at 2:55 p.m. the return flight leaves at 1:20 p.m. The seating class is economy and the number of passengers is to the onward flight leaves at 2:55 pm the return flight leaves at 1:20 pm. The seating class is economy and the number of passengers is 2.
Yeah that sounds great.
Your tickets have been confirmed.
I want to find something good to do on that day.
What kind of things do you like doing?
I am looking for a concert I want to go to one on March 12th.
There are 5 events you might be interested in. The event is Allan Rayman and it will be at August Hall.
Yeah that sounds great.
Thank you have a nice day.
Can you find me a round trip flight?
Where and when are you leaving?
I'm leaving NY on the 9th of March, preferably via Southwest Airlines.
When will you return?
On March 12th, preferably via premium economy.
Where do you plan to go to?
To Seattle.
I did find a $555 Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 6:30 am and heads back at 5:25 am.
Sounds good to me.
Should I purchase some tickets for you?
Yes, purchase three, please.
Sure. You want 3 premium economy tickets for a Southwest Airlines flight from New York to Seattle, starting at 6:30 am on March 9th and ending at 5:25 am on March 12th?
Sounds good to me.
The tickets are booked.
Thanks. I'll be having fun checking out Seattle that day. What sports games are going on then?
There's a Huskies vs Cougars match at Husky Stadium.
Can you find me a soccer game on the 10th of this month instead?
Sure. How about Sounders vs Red Bulls at CenturyLink Field?
Sounds good to me.
Want to get some tickets?
Not now. I need nothing else from you at the moment.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me some round trip flights?
Where are you going? When do you want to depart and at what time?
I am travelling from Chicago to LA on the 3rd of this month.
When will you return?
I want to get back on Thursday next week.
I found an American Airlines flight at 9:35 pm which returns at 8:30 am and costs $181.
Sounds good to me.
Should I reserve the tickets?
Yes please, Economy class for 2.
You need 2 Economy tickets on American Airlines from Chicago To Los Angeles which departs on March 3rd at 9:35 pm and returns on March 7th at 8:30 am, correct?
Yes that is perfect.
Your tickets have been reserved.
When does my return flight arrive and at which airport does the outgoing flight arrive at?
The return flight arrives at 3:02 pm at LAX International Airport.
Thank you, I also need something to do on that day, maybe rock on the 4th of March.
What would you like to see.
Music on the 6th please.
I found 1 thing, the Murder City Devils at the Teragram Ballroom.
Sounds good, that is all I need.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to get a round trip flight from LA to SF.
When would you plan to leave? When would you like to return?
I'd like to leave on the 2nd of this month and return on March 13th.
Okay, I found 3 flights. One of them is with Alaska Airlines and leaves at 5:50 pm. The flight will return at 7:10 pm. It will cost $106 per ticket.
Which airport will it leave from? When does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 7:15 pm and departs from LAX International Airport.
Okay that sounds good to me.
Should I purchase the tickets?
Yes, I'd like that.
Okay, so I have a flight from Los Angeles to San Francisco with Alaska Airlines. You will depart March 2nd at 5:50 pm and return March 13th at 7:10 pm. The tickets will be for 1 passenger with Economy seating. Please confirm if this is okay.
Yes, that's good to me. Does the flight have 1 stop?
Okay, your ticket has been purchased. There are 0 stops.
Okay great thanks. I'm wondering if there is anything to do that day for music for next Wednesday?
I found 4 events there on that date. The Carmina Burana is at the San Francisco Symphony.
What about other events like sports? For the 12th of this month?
I found 3 events, one of which is Giants Vs Cardinals at Oracle Park.
What about a baseball game?
I found 2 events for baseball. One of which is a Giants Vs Dodgers game at Oracle Park.
Okay, thanks, that's all I needed.
you're welcome, have a good day.
I need to look for round trips flights that depart from NYC.
Where are you going? And what dates will you be leaving and returning on?
I'll be going to Atlanta. I want to leave on the 2nd and return on March 8th.
There's an American Airlines flight with an outbound flight leaving at 11:45 am and return flight leaving at 3:25 pm. It is $142 for a ticket.
Yeah, that'll work. I want to buy a ticket.
You want 1 Economy ticket for New York to Atlanta round trip on American Airlines. Departure is March 2nd at 11:45 am and return is March 8th at 3:25 pm. Shall I proceed with the purchase?
No, I actually need 4 tickets, there are four passengers.
You want 4 Economy tickets?
Yeah, that's right. What time does the departure flight arrive?
I've purchased the tickets. The departure flight arrives at 2:07 pm.
And what time does the return flight arrive?
5:47 pm is the arrival time of the return flight.
Thanks for the help. I also need to a rent a car there.
What time do you want to pick it up?
I want to get it at during afternoon 3:30.
Will you be renting the car from March 2nd to March 8th?
No, it's just a rental from March 3rd to March 4th. And I want a compact car.
Would you like the car to be at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport for pick up?
Yeah, that would work for me.
You want a Compact car at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport for pickup on March 3rd at 3:30 pm and return on March 4th. Shall I proceed with the rental?
Yes, please rent it. What type of car is it?
I've rented the car. It is a GTI.
Thanks a lot for the help.
Do you need me for anything else?
No, thanks again.
Have a wonderful day.
I will be traveling soon. Are there available round trip flights on the 8th of this month?
Where do you want to go? From where will yo leave?
Search for flights leaving from Phoenix and going to NYC.
On what date do you want to fly?
Look for something this Saturday.
There is 1 flight you might like. It is from Southwest Airlines. The departing flight takes off at 4:20 am and returning flight takes off at 1:30 pm. It has a cost of $323.
At what time does the return flight arrives?
It arrives at 8:17 pm.
To which airport does it arrive?
It arrives to JFK International Airport.
That sounds great. I want to book some tickets.
Please confirm: Booking 1 Economy class ticket from Southwest Airlines. The flight leaves from Phoenix on March 2nd at 4:20 am and arrives to New York. The returning flight leaves on March 8th and takes off at 1:30 pm.
That sounds great.
The ticket has been booked.
Thanks a lot, I will need to go some places in there. Find a rental car.
Do you want the car from March 2nd up to March 8th?
No, I need it on the 3rd of March until March 5th.
What type of car would you like?
Find a spacious car.
At what time do you want to pick it up?
I want to pick it up at five pm.
Please confirm: Booking a Full-size car from March 3rd until March 5th. Available for pickup at JFK International Airport at 5 pm.
That is correct, what is the name of the car? What is the total cost of it?
The car has been booked. It has a total cost of $96 and it is an Escape car.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I need a round trip flight leaving on the 5th of this month.
Where are you leaving from? When are you coming back? Where are you going?
I am leaving Phoenix, AZ on the 9th for ATL.
I found 4 options including American Airlines leaving at 11:25 pm. The return flight leaves at 11:40 am. The ticket cost is $235.
Anything else?
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 11:55 am, the returning flight leaves at 6:55 pm. The total cost is $250.
That will be perfect. I need 2 tickets.
Please confirm, leaving Phoenix for Atlanta on Delta Airlines on March 5th at 11:55 am. The return flight is March 9th at 6:55 pm. You have reserved 2 tickets in economy.
Perfect. What airport does the plane leave from? When does the return flight arrive?
The tickets are confirmed. The return flight arrives at 8:07 pm and leaves from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Please reserve a car too.
What time? Do you want to pick it up on March 5th?
I want to pick it up around 4 o"clock in the evening. I'll need the car until next Wednesday.
You want to return the car on March 9th?
I need it until the 8th.
Do you want a standard or full-size vehicle? Do you want to pick it up at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport?
Yes, I want a small car.
Please confirm, picking up compact car at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 6th at 4 pm. The car is to be returned on March 8th.
That is great. What kind of car is it?
Your GTI car has been reserved.
Thanks for your help.
Anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Hello! I am looking for a round-trip flight to Atlanta, GA and I will be leaving by this Saturday. Please can you find me a good deal?
From where your start of journey is?
I'll be leaving from Paris.
When is your return?
I'll be back on the 13th.
Okay! The Delta Airlines outbound flight leaves at 5:35 pm and the return flight leaves at 9:20 am. The cost of the ticket is just $327.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want me to book tickets for you in this flight?
Yup, I wish to book 4 tickets in this flight and in Economy class.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to fly from Paris to Atlanta in Delta Airlines on March 2nd at 5:35 pm and the return flight will be on March 13th at 9:20 am and you wish to get 4 tickets in Economy class, right?
Yup, sounds good to me. May I know at how many stops the flight will stop?
There is only 1 stop and your ticket confirmation is successful.
Is it a refundable or non-refundable ticket? From which airport does the flight departs?
Sorry that the ticket is a non-refundable ticket and the flight will depart from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Thanks much for your help. Please I wish to rent a car there. Can you help me to rent the car.
Sure! What type do you need - a small or Standard or a Full-size 'd car? At what time you want to pick it up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport?
I wish to pick up a Compact car on March 6th at around 2:30 pm.
Do you wish to rent the car till March 13th?
Nope, I need the car till the 9th.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to pick up a Compact car at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 6th at 2:30 pm and you will be dropping the car on March 9th, right?
Yup, sounds good. What is the total cost for the entire rental days?
You've to pay $75 in total and your car reservation is successful.
Thanks much for the help.
Do you want me to assist with anything else?
Nope, thanks much for the help.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you find round trip flights for three people in my group?
Where do you plan to go?
I am going to ATL.
From which place you are leaving?
I want to leave from Vegas.
What is your leaving and returning date?
On 3rd of this month i decided to leave and returning on march 13th.
I found Southwest Airlines which leaves at 2:35 pm and return flight leaves at 12:05 pm. The total cost is $263.
This is perfect flight for me.
Can i buy the tickets for it?
Yes. I want to book the ticket.
Please give confirmation details: the flight is Southwest Airlines from Las vegas which goes to Atlanta with economy class for 3 passengers. The leaving date is march 3rd and return date is on march 13th. The onward flight departs at 2:35 pm and return flight departs at 12:05 pm.
This is cool. From which airport does the flight depart?
It departs from McCarran International Airport. Your booking has been done.
I like to book a car there and pick up the car in Hartsfield-Jackson around afternoon 3:15. I want the car from 6th of march.
Are you like to use your car till march 13th?
No, only till 9th of march i want the car.
What type of car you need? like compact or full-size?
I need a compact car.
Please give confirmation details: Your pick up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on march 6th at 3:15 pm with compact car and the drop-off date is march 9th.
This is cool.What about the total cost?
Your car booking has been done. $75 is the total booking cost.
Can I know the name of the car?
I want GTI Car.
Thank you so much for the help. That's all i want.
Have a good day.
Could you help me find a round trip flight leaving from Los Angeles?
Where did you plan to visit and when were you planning on leaving?
I'm going to Washington and I plan to leave on 1st of March.
When did you plan to come back?
I'd like to return on 4th of March.
There is an outbound American Airlines flight leaving at 2:10 pm with the return flight leaving at 9:55 pm for $290.
That works for me.
Did you want me to buy tickets for it?
Yes, I'd like to book the ticket and I would like to travel in Economy.
Please confirm you're booking an American Airlines Economy flight for 1 passenger from Los Angeles to Washington departing on March 1st at 2:10 pm and returning on March 4th at 9:55 pm.
Yes, that works for me. Which airport does the flight leave from?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The flight is departing from LAX International Airport.
At which airport does the flight arrive and when will my return flight arrive?
Your destination will be Dulles International Airport and the return flight will arrive at 1:47 am.
Thank you. I'd also like to reserve a car there. I'll need it from Saturday this week until the 3rd.
What type of car did you want and at what time are you going to need it? What do you think about Standard or Full-size?
I'd like a small and I'd like to pick it up around quarter to 2 in the afternoon.
Please confirm you're picking up a Compact car from Dulles International Airport on March 2nd at 1:45 pm and dropping it off on March 3rd.
Yes, that is correct. What is the name of the car and what will the total cost be?
Sorry, your car could not be booked. Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thank you for your help.
Have a wonderful day!
Help me look for round trip flights.
Where are you departing from? And when are your departure and return dates?
I'm going to leave from LAX on Monday next week and I'll return on the 8th of March.
Where will you be traveling to?
I'm going to ATL.
There's an American Airlines flight with a departure that leaves at 5:25 pm and return that leaves at 2:30 pm. A ticket is $176.
I like the sound of that. Can you buy me one Economy ticket?
Please confirm that you want 1 Economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Atlanta departing on March 4th at 5:25 pm and with a return flight on March 8th at 2:30 pm.
I confirm that. Also, what time does the departing flight arrive? And can I refund my ticket?
I've purchased the ticket. The departing flight arrives at 1:24 am. I'm sorry but the ticket cannot be refunded.
Thanks for the help. I also need to reserve a car there. I'll need the car form March 5th to the 6th.
Would you like to pick up the car from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport? And what time would you like to pick it up?
Yeah, that pick up location is good. I want to get it at 3 pm.
Is there a type of car you prefer? Do you like Compact or Standard?
I prefer an intermediate car.
Please confirm that you want Standard car to be picked up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 5th at 3 pm with a return date on March 6th.
Yeah, that's what I want.
I've reserved the car for you.
Thanks for helping me out.
Do you need me to help with anything else?
No, thanks again for the help.
Have a terrific day!
Can you find me some round trip flights - bear in mind that I want to fly out on the 5th and return next Friday.
Please tell me your departure location as well as your destination.
I will be flying out of NY towards Vancouver, BC.
There are 2 flights meeting your criteria out of which I recommend the Delta Airlines one that takes of at 7:30 am with the return flight taking of at 2:50 am. Tickets are priced at $316.
Can you please tell me the destination airport as well as landing time?
The flight lands at 1:59 pm at YVR International Airport.
Anything else available?
Sure, there's also an United Airlines flight taking of at 8:20 am with the return flight taking off at 3:15 am. Tickets are priced at $321.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to get tickets for this flight for you?
Yes, please do.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book 1 Economy ticket for you for the United Airlines flight from New York to Vancouver taking of on march 5th at 8:20 am, with the return flight taking off on March 8th at 3:15 am.
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your ticket.
Thanks. Can you help with a car rental at destination?
Please tell me at what time do you need it as well as if you prefer Standard or Full-size.
I need an intermediate car I can pick up at quarter past 7 in the evening.
You plan on picking it up on March 5th at YVR International Airport?
Yes, that's correct except that I'll be picking it up on the 6th of this month.
Are you keeping in until March 8th.
No, only till the 7th of this month.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book a Standard car for you to pick up on March 6th at 7:15 pm from YVR International Airport which you will drop off on March 7th.
Please make it a Compact car and I prefer to pick it up at seven in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want a Compact car and you want to pick it up at 7 pm?
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your rental car.
Thanks for everythinng.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
No, not at the moment. Thanks again.
Have a nice day!
I want to go for a trip and for which I need to search for round trip flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
Yes, what is your present location to search for the flight and let me know about the starting date of your travel plan and also let me know to which place you are planning to visit?
My travel plan starts from tomorrow in NY to Mexico City.
What is your return date?
will be back no March 6th. Any more details you need to search?
No, thanks. I got 3 flights that will suit you. What about an outbound flight with American Airlines which leaves at 11:20 am and the return flight leaves at 12:05 pm under ticket price $222? Is that okay to you. How about your opinion?
Yes, I will choose this. Thanks.
Do you want to purchase tickets to this flight now?
Yes, I want the same now.
Please confirm to book 1 Economy class ticket in a Flight with American Airlines from New York on March 6th at 11:20 am to Mexico City and the return flight leaves at 12:05 pm on March 2nd.
That is confirmed and you can proceed now.
Ticket to this flight was booked successfully.
I want one more favor from you. Can you search for a car for 3rd of this month?
What type of Car you want to search for and please confirm whether you need it until March 6th?. Also let me know your expected pickup time?
Compact car is enough to me. Make the booking for the pickup time around evening 5:45 and up to March 5th.
Where do you want to pick up the Car, shall I try it from Benito Juarez International Airport? is it convenient to you?
Yes, that is perfect.
Okay, I need you to confirm the following: You want a Compact Car for pickup from Benito Juarez International Airport from March 3rd at 5:45 pm to March 5th.
That is correct. Please book the car as you said.
Your car was booked successfully.
Tell me which car you have booked for me? I am asking about the name.
It is a Fit car.
That's nice. Thanks.
Any more help you need?
No, thanks for all.
Have a good day.
With my vacation coming up, it's time to start planning for that and getting a round-trip flight booked. With your help, it will be a breeze and much appreciated.
I'm ready to help you set that up. What city do you want for your departure and when do you return?
I want to take off from Las Vegas and return on March 12th, please.
Okay, and where are you going?
I'll be on my way to Atlanta, GA.
When do you want your flight out?
I want to board the plane on March 9th.
Got it. I'm showing 2 convenient options for you. Would you like to take a Southwest Airlines flight, leaving at 2:35 pm and returning at 12:05 pm for $251?
That might work. Is this a straight flight, and when will it land?
I'm showing 1 stop for this flight that's scheduled to arrive at 1:24 am.
Okay. I'll give that flight a go for purchasing a ticket now.
All right. Do you want to confirm your trip for 1 passenger in Economy seating on Southwest Airlines, leaving Las Vegas on March 9th at 2:35 pm, going to Atlanta with your return flight scheduled for March 12th at 12:05 pm?
All well and good, my friend.
Your plane ticket is confirmed.
Fantastic. Now, set up a car rental for me, please.
Okay. What's the car you want to rent, and you'll be picking it up at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, right?
Right, indeed. I just need a small ride.
Please verify that you want to pick up the car on March 9th and the time.
Sure, but make the rental start on the 10th with a 1:30 pm pickup time.
Will you be returning the car on March 12th?
Make that a day earlier, March 11th.
Got it. Would you like to confirm your rental of a compact car, picking it up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 10th at 1:30 pm and returning the car on March 11th?
Yep, go ahead and confirm that, please.
Your car rental reservation is confirmed
I can't thank you enough for your help.
Would you like more assistance at this time?
That's all I need for now. Thanks again.
Sure thing. Enjoy your day.
Are there any round trip flights available? I wish to make a trip.
Your departure time and station please.
Leaving from ATL on the 2nd.
Where are you going to?
I am going to Las Vegas.
Your return details please.
Coming back on 14th of this month.
You can choose from 2 flights available. One is Southwest Airlines leaving at 12:05 pm and on return leaves at 2:35 pm. $280 will your expense for the travel.
How many layovers are there for the flight? What is the time of onward flight?
You can expect the onward fligt at 4:19 pm with 1 layovers.
That will be a right choice. Please buy tickets for me on that.
Please verify you journey details, you are leaving to Las Vegas from Atlanta by Southwest Airlines on March 2nd, leaving at 12:05 pm. You will be coming back by the flight taking off at 2:35 pm on March 14th. You need 1 ticket in economy class.
Good, everything correct.
You have got successful reservation.
Ok, No find a car there for me.
When do you want it? Do you want it until March 14th. Are you ok with a Standard Full-size one?
I would be picking it up around 4:45 in the evening till March 6th. A medium-sized car will be ok.
You will pick it up from March 2nd, won't you?
No, I want it from 3rd of March.
Do you like to pick it up from McCarran International Airport?
Great, that will be ok.
Please confirm the details, You need a Standard car from March 3rd till March 6th from McCarran International Airport, and pick up time is 4:45 pm.
Ok, thats it.
Sorry, tried in vain. Do you like to get a Prius from McCarran International Airport? It is available on March 3rd and you have to pay $117.
Good, that will be fine for me.
Succeeded. Your vehicle is ready.
Thank you very much.
Do you need any other help?
No, that's all.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a round trip flight for March 1st. I'm going to SF, and I prefer United Airlines.
When will you be back?
On March 13th.
Where are you leaving from?
From New York.
I found 1 flight for you. A United Airlines flight is leaving at 6:05 am. The return flight will leave at 5:50 am. It costs $221.
When would the return flight arrive?
It will arrive at 3:16 pm.
That's fine. I'd like flight tickets. It's for three people.
You want 3 economy class United Airlines tickets to go to San Francisco from New York on March 1st at 6:05 am. The return flight leaves at 5:50 am and the return date is March 13th. Is this right?
Yes, that's it.
Your tickets have been booked.
I'd also like to reserve a car there.
What type of car would you like?
I want an intermediate car. I'll pick it up around 16:30.
Would you like it on March 1st? Would you like to pick it up at SFO International Airport? Would you like it until March 13th?
I want it until next Thursday. I'll need it on the 2nd.
Picking up a car from SFO International Airport on March 2nd at 4:30 pm. You'll be dropping it off March 7th. It's a standard car. Is this right?
Yes, that's it.
Your car is now reserved.
Thanks. That is all.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking to find some options for roundtrip flights.
Your destination please?
Going to Chicago.
Where are you departing from and what is your return date?
Leaving from Vancouver and planning to return on the 8th of March.
Leaving when please?
I'm planning to leave on March 4th and I'd like a United Airlines flight.
I have 1 United Airlines flight leaving at 3:15 AM which comes back to 12:45 PM and that ticket price is $338.
Okay, I'd like to buy four economy tickets please.
Confirming a United Airlines flight from Vancouver to Chicago departing March 4th at 3:15 AM and returning March 8th at 12:45 PM for 4 economy passengers.
Perfect, thank you.
The reservation has completed successfully.
What's the arrival time of the return flight?
That is 7:49 PM.
Thank you very much.
May I help you with something else?
Yes, I'll need a car.
What kind of car would you prefer and when would you like to have it?
Just a small car and I'll need it at approximately 17:30.
Are you intending to pick that up from O'Hare International Airport?
Yes I am.
On March 4th?
Starting next Tuesday.
You'll be needing the car until March 8th?
No, just until the 6th of March.
Confirming a compact car rental on March 5th, picking up from O'Hare International Airport at 5:30 PM and returning on March 6th.
Perfect, thanks a lot.
I've completed the reservation.
What type of car is it?
It's a Cooper.
Great, thanks again.
Is there anything else you need?
Not right now.
Thank you very much.
Hello! I'm looking for a round-trip flight and I'll be returning on the 14th.
Where are you heading to?
I'm heading to Washington.
When are you planning to leave?
I'll be leaving on 10th of this month.
Which is your starting point of travel?
I'll be leaving from ATL.
Okay, there is an American Airlines outbound flight that will leave at 11:40 am and the return flight will leave at 9:30 am. The cost of the ticket will be only $163.
When is the arrival time of my return flight and to which airport it arrives?
The destination airport is Dulles International Airport and the flight will arrive at 1:42 pm.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want me to book tickets for this flight?
Yup, please book 1 ticket in economy class which should be a refundable one, since my plan might change later on.
Okay! Please can you confirm me that you wish to fly from Atlanta to Washington in American Airlines on March 10th at 11:40 am and the return journey will be on March 14th at 9:30 am and you wish to book only 1 Economy ticket, right?
Yup, you're right. Is it a zero stops flight?
Nope, the flight has 1 stop and your ticket confirmation is successful.
Thanks much for your help. Please can you reserve a car for me there?
Sure! I can do that for you. So, do you wish to rent the car from March 10th onwards?
Nope, I need the car only on March 11th.
Do you like to have a small sized, or compact car and at what time is your pick up and do you want to rent it till March 14th?
I wish to pick up the car at around evening 6:45 and am looking for a Full-size car till 13th of this month.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to rent a Full-size car from Dulles International Airport from March 11th till March 13th and you will pick up the car at 6:45 pm, right?
Yup, sounds good. Please can I've the name of the car?
It's Forester and your car reservation is successfuly.
Thanks much for your help.
Do you want me to assist with anything else?
Nope, thanks a bunch for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
I need support in finding round trip flights
What is your destination? When are you leaving? When will you be back?
I'm leaving from Portland on the 7th. My idea is to be back on 10th of march
Where do you want to go?
I'm going to delhi, india
American airlines goes there, the plane leaves at 5 am and the return flight takes off at 7 pm, the ticket will cost you $420
Can you tell me the name of the indian airport and the arrival time of the onward flight?
the airport is indira gandhi international airport and the onward flight lands at 10:32 am
I like this one
I can buy tickets then
Yes, do it please, the class doesn't matter
green light this before I do it. I'm about to book a flight for 1 passenger in economy class with american airlines from portland to delhi. The departure is march 7th at 5 am and the return is on march 10th at 7 pm
yes, may I ask for a refund eventually?
No you can't. The ticket is yours
where will I leave from? When will I be back?
You'll leave from pdx international airport and you will be back at 1:45 am
Great. Now I need a standard car to drive while there. I want it until 9th of march, I'll pick it up at 15:00
Do you need the car from march 7th?
I need it from next friday
confirm me the data I have. You are about to rent a standard car from march 8th at 3 pm and you'll drop it off on march 9th. The car is at indira gandhi international airport
yes, precisely.
car's yours
how much did it cost me?
$35
what car is it?
it's an elantra
awesome, I'll leave you now, bye
thank you and good bye
Find me Economy round trip fights.
Where and when are you departing and when will you be returning?
I am departing later today out of San Fran and returning on the 13th of this month.
What city are you visiting?
I am going to New Delhi and will be returning on the 12th of this month.
American Airlines has a flight that costs $340 a ticket. The first flight departs at 1:15 pm and the second flight departs at 9:20 am.
That will work for me.
Shall I get you tickets now?
Yes, book a ticket for one person.
You want 1 Economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from San Francisco to Delhi. The first flight departs at 1:15 pm on March 1st and the return flight departs at 9:20 am on March 12th. Is that right?
That is right and can you tell me if the flight offers refunds?
Your ticket has been booked and refunds are not available.
I need a to reserve a medium-sized car there for Monday next week.
Will you pick it up at Indira Gandhi International Airport and use it until March 12th?
I will pick it up there and I only need it until the 8th of March.
What time will you pick it up?
I will get the car at 7:15 pm.
You want a Standard rental car from Indira Gandhi International Airport at 7:15 pm on March 4th and want to return it March 8th. Is that right?
That is right? What type of car is it and what is the price?
Your car has been booked. The car is an Elantra and costs $120 total.
Thanks a lot. That is everything for now.
Have a good day.
I need help getting a round trip flight for my trip.
Where are you leaving?
I'm leaving Phoenix.
And where shall you travel to?
To LA.
When will you leave and return?
I plan on staying in LA from Thursday next week to March 11th.
Okay. I found a $173 American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:25 am and returns at 2:15 pm. How's that sound?
I don't know. Can you give me another option?
There's also this $162 Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 12:15 pm and returns at 3:05 pm.
I don't know about that one, either. I want another option.
There's also a $111 Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 7:05 am and returns at 12:10 pm.
Sounds good. Can you get me 3 economy tickets?
You want 3 economy tickets for a Southwest Airlines flight that travels from Phoenix to Los Angeles, starting at 7:05 am on March 7th and returning at 12:10 pm on March 11th?
Yes, that's right.
I got the ticket for you.
At which airport does it arrive at?
At LAX International Airport.
Thanks for helping me book a flight. I also want to get a rental car while I'm at LA.
Do you want a standard car, a compact car, or something different? Do you want it from March 7th to March 11th?
I want an intermediate car from Friday next week until the 9th of March.
And at what time will you get it?
At around four in the evening.
You want to pick up a standard car from LAX International Airport on March 8th at 4 pm and keep it until March 9th?
That sounds good.
I reserved your car.
Thanks for the help. I need nothing further.
Have a wonderful day!
Me me a round trip flight.
Where and when are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing Vancouver to NY on March 10th.
What day are you departing?
I am departing March 8th.
Delta Airlines has flights departing at 2:50 am and 6 am respectively with the total cost being $297.
Can you find flights with a March 1st departure date?
There is 1 United Airlines flight that departs at 3:15 am and at 8:20 am respectively with a total cost of $307.
Does the flight have 0 transfers?
No, the flight has 1 transfer.
What works for me. Can you get me tickets?
You want 1 Economy seat on United Airlines that flies from Vancouver to New York. The first flight leaves March 1st at 3:15 am and the second flight leaves 8:20 am on March 10th. Is that right?
That is right. What time does the first flight land?
Your ticket is booked and you will be landing in New York at 3:12 pm.
Can you get me a car reservation?
Do you prefer a Standard, Full-size, or another type of car?
I want a Compact car at around 4:45 in the evening.
Do you want to get it at JFK International Airport and return it March 10th?
I will pick it up at JFK and will return it on the 3rd.
Will you pickup the car March 1st?
I want the car from the 2nd until the 4th of this month.
You want a Compact car at JFK International Airport at 4:45 pm on March 2nd and will return it March 4th. Is that right?
No, I will pick it up at Charles de Gaulle Airport.
You want to get the car March 2nd at Charles de Gaulle International Airport. Is that right?
That is right.
I can't book your reservation. Do you want a Leaf at Charles de Gaulle International Airport on March 2nd for $60?
No, I don't want that.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I will leave toronto, ontario
when will you be back?
on the 5th
when will you leave>
this saturday then
where are you going?
atlanta, ga 2 people to nyc
american airlines 4 people 6:25 am returning 11:20 am $126
what airport then?
it is hartsfield-jackson international airport
any other flights?
yes delta airlines at 3:40 pm and comes back 11:25 am for $128
any other tickets?
atlanta to new york delta airlines leaves march 2nd and returns march 5th and leaves 3:40 pm and returns 11:25 am for 2 economy
yes that works
it has been done
around 7:15 pm for car
JFK international airport
yes that works
want car until march 5th?
4th of this month
want car march 2nd?
march 3rd medium-sized
jfk international airport march 3rd 7:15 pm drop off march 4th standard car
yes that works
jfk international airport march 3rd corolla $32
no that is all
bye bye now
I need a round-trip flight. I need to return on March 10th.
What day will you be leaving, and from what city?
I want to leave New York City on the 5th.
What is your destination?
I'm going to Phoenix.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight for $310 that leaves at 6:50 am. The return flight leaves at 7:05 am.
When does the return flight arrive?
It arrives at 6:40 pm.
That one sounds good. Can you book me an Economy ticket?
So, just to confirm: You want 1 Economy ticket for the Southwest Airlines flight from New York to Phoenix departing on March 5th at 6:50 am, with a return flight on March 10th at 7:05 am. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. What airport does it depart from?
Your flight is confirmed. The flight leaves from JFK International Airport.
Thanks. I also need to reserve a car there.
What kind of car do you want? Do you want to pick it up from Sky Harbor International Airport?
Yes, I'd like a medium-sized car there.
What time do you need the car? Would you like to reserve it from March 5th to March 10th?
I need it from the 7th of March until Friday next week, and I'd like to pick it up around 6 o"clock in the evening.
So, to confirm: You want to reserve a Standard car March 7th to March 8th, and want to pick it up at 6 pm at Sky Harbor International Airport? Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. What kind of car is it, and how much will it cost?
Your car has been reserved. It is a Prius, and will cost $29 in total.
Thanks.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I want to look for round trips flights that depart this Sunday.
When will you be returning and what's your departure area?
I'll be departing from Ciudad de Mexico, and I'll be returning on March 12th.
Where will you be traveling to?
I'll be heading out to Seattle.
There's an American Airlines flight with an outbound flight at 8:05 am and a return flight at 8:15 am. It's $289 per ticket.
What else is available?
There's a Delta Airlines flight with an outbound flight at 1:45 pm and a return flight at 7:40 am. It's $298 per ticket.
Is there anything else?
There's a United Airlines flight with an outbound flight at 8:45 pm and a return flight at 12:30 pm. It's $278 per ticket.
Okay, I like that one. Help me get some an Economy ticket.
Please make sure this is correct, you will be traveling from Seattle to Mexico City on a United Airlines flight with an outbound flight on March 3rd at 8:45 pm and a return flight on March 12th at 12:30 pm. You want to purchase 1 Economy ticket.
Yeah, that's all correct. What time does the return flight land?
I've booked the ticket. Your return flight will land at 2:05 am.
And what's the departure and arrival airport.
The departure airport is Benito Juarez International Airport and the arrival airport is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Okay, thanks. Now I need a car when I get there. I want to get it around half past 4 in the evening. It should be a Compact car.
And you want it from March 3rd?
I want it starting next Monday. And can you actually search for an intermediate car, I realized I need something bigger.
And will you return the car on March 12th?
I'll be returning it on March 5th.
I'll book you a Standard care to be picked up at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport on March 4th at 4:30 pm and returned on March 5th, is that correct?
Yeah, that's what I want.
I've booked the car for you.
What's type of car is it and what's the cost altogether?
It's a Civic and the cost is $35 altogether.
Thanks a lot, that's all for now.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you find me a round trip flight.
What are the dates you will be traveling? Where would you like to Fly out of.
I need to fly out on March 5th from Toronto, Canada and be back on the 9th of March. I earn skymiles when I fly with Delta airlines.
Where are you going?
I need to go to Seattle, WA.
i only have 1 flight on Delta Airlines and it deaprts at 2:10 am with the returning flight departing at 8:45 am for $349.
IS that a refundable ticket?
No it is a non refundable ticket.
ok that will be great. I would like an Economy ticket for that flight.
Just to confirm you would like 1 Economy round trip Ticket on Delta Airlines departing on March 5th at 2:10 am from Toronto going to Seattle and with the returning flight departing on March 9th at 8:45 am.
Yes that is great. Does it have any layovers.
Your ticket is booked. It does have 1 layover.
What time do I arrive in Seattle?
You arrive at 9:54 pm
ok thanks I need to rent a car at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Would you like to rent it on March 5th and return it on March 9th?
I want to rent it on march 7th till the 8th of March. I need to pick it up at afternoon 12:45.
Is there a preferred car you would like?
I need an intermediate.
Just to confirm you are renting a standard car on March 7th at 12:45 pm from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and returning it on march 8th.
Yes that is great. What is the cist and the model of the car.
You car has been booked. It is a Civic and it toatl cost is $34.
That will be all. Thnaks
Have an awesome day.
Can you please find me a round trip flight to Atlanta, GA? I plan to return on March 13th.
Please tell me your departure date and location?
I plan to fly out of New York on March 6th.
I found an American Airlines flight with the outbound flight at 11:20 am and the return flight at 6:25 am, priced at $116.
Can you please tell me when does the return flight land as well as the departure airport.
The flight takes off from JFK international Airport and the return flight lands at 8:47 am.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to book tickets for this flight?
Yes, please do.
Can you please confirm that you want 1 Economy ticket round trip from New York to Atlanta American Airlines flight that takes off on march 6th, with the return flight on March 13th. Take off times are 11:20 am for the outbound and 6:25 am for the return flight.
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me at which airport does it land?
I've successfully booked your ticket. The flight lands at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Can you help me reserve a car at destination?
Sure, at what time?
Please book it for 5 in the evening.
Do you want to pick it up on March 6th? And also please tell me if you need an Standard or Compact car.
I need a Compact car from the 10th.
Will you be needing the car until March 13th?
No, just until March 11th.
Can you please confirm that you want me to reserve a Compact car for you to be picked up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 10th at 5 pm, due for drop off on March 11th?
Yes, that correct. What car model is it?
I've placed your reservation. The car is a GTI.
Thanks. That will be all for now.
Have a nice day!
I need to finish planning for my upcoming trip. Can you look up round trip flight tickets for me?
Sure. Where are you flying from and going to?
I'll be going from Chicago to NY.
Ok, and when are you leaving and planning on coming back?
I'm planning to go from March 2nd to March 10th.
Sounds good. I found an American Airlines flight for $141 that leaves at 12:30 pm on the way there, and 5:25 am on the way back. How about that?
That sounds pretty good, actually. Can you book me those tickets?
Ok. To confirm, you want to book 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines from Chicago to New York departing March 2nd at 12:30 pm and returning March 10th at 5:25 am. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect. Is it refundable, and which airport does it fly out from?
Your ticket has been bought. It leaves from O'Hare International Airport and unfortunately is not refundable.
Ok, that's fine. Can you also book a car rental for me?
Sure. Would it be from March 2nd through March 10th? And what time would you be picking it up?
I can pick it up around 7 pm from JFK International Airport. I'll need it from next Monday through the 7th of March.
Ok. What kind of car do you prefer?
Just a full-size car is fine.
Ok. To confirm, you want to book a full-size car to be picked up from JFK International Airport on March 4th at 7 pm until March 7th. Is that right?
No, actually, can you change that from this Sunday until next Monday?
Sure. To confirm, you want to pick it up on March 3rd and return it on March 4th. Is that right?
Yes, that's fine. What type of car is it and how much will it cost?
I've made your reservation. It's an Escape, and the total will be $45.
Ok, thanks. That's all for now.
Sure, have a good day.
Can you find me a round trip flight?
Sure. Where are you going, and how long will it be?
My 3 person group is staying at Los Angeles from March 8th to March 14th.
Where will you depart from?
From ATL.
I found a $184 American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:30 pm and returns at 5:25 pm.
Sounds great to me.
Can I help you out any further?
Yes. Can you buy the tickets?
You want me to buy 3 economy American Airlines tickets for a flight that leaves from Atlanta to Los Angeles at 2:30 pm on March 8th, and returns March 14th at 5:25 pm?
Yes. When will the onward flight arrive, and what airport does it go to?
It arrives at 4:29 pm and heads to LAX International Airport.
Great. Thanks. I need a car there, also. I want to get it at evening 5:30, and keep it until the 11th.
What type of car?
A small one.
Want to get it on March 8th?
No, the 9th of March. Actually, I only need it for a day, so I instead will give it back on March 10th.
You want to pick up a compact car from LAX International Airport at 5:30 pm on March 9th, and keep it until March 10th?
Yes. What's the car called, and the cost?
I reserved your car. The Bolt will cost you $22.
Thanks. That's all I need from you for the time being.
Have yourself a splendid day.
I want to search a round trip flight.
What will be the date of departure and the date of return?
My date of departure is Wednesday next week and the date of return is 12th of March.
What will be your destination?
My destination is Atlanta, GA.
What will be your place of departure?
I will depart from LA.
There are 4 flights suitable to you. One is an American Airlines flight which departs at 5:25 pm and the return flight departs at 2:30 pm. The ticket costs $175.
Okay, That sounds good to me.
Do you want me to buy the tickets for the flight?
Yes, Please book tickets for the flight.
Please confirm: You want me to book 1 Economy class ticket in American Airlines traveling from Los Angeles at 5:25 pm on March 6th to Atlanta. The return flight takes off at 2:30 pm on March 12th.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked your ticket.
can you check how many stops does the flight have and the place of departure?
The flight leaves from LAX International Airport with number of stops as 0.
Thank you! can you reserve this car for me?
Is your pick up date be March 6th?
I will pick up the car on 9th of this month.
What will be the time for pick up? Will you pick it up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport?
Yes, That is correct. i will pick up the car at 14:15.
What type of car like Compact or Standard do you want and will the drop off date be March 12th?
I want a compact car until the 11th.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a compact car for pick up at 2:15 pm on March 9th from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. The date for drop off is March 11th.
Yes, That is correct.
Unfortunately your car was not booked. I found a nice GTI car available for pick up on March 9th from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport for the price of $48.
Yes, That is correct.
Unfortunately your car was not booked. I found a nice GTI car available for pick up on March 9th from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport for the price of $48.
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I need two round trip plane tickets.
When and where are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing CDMX, going to Portland, OR and will be back on the 11th.
What date are you leaving?
I am departing Thursday next week.
American Airlines has a flight that costs $258. The first flight departs at 2:35 am and the second flight departs at 7:20 am.
What time does the first flight land?
The first flight lands at 7:45 am.
Can I get refunds with this ticket and what airport does this flight depart out of?
There are no refunds and the first flight leaves out of Benito Juarez International Airport.
Can you find a flight departing Los Angeles on Alaska Airlines?
Search found 1 flight which is Alaska Airlines with a cost of $132. The first flight departs at 5:15 am and the second flight departs at 10:10 am.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets now?
Yes, book me Economy tickets.
You want 2 Economy tickets on Alaska Airlines going from Los Angeles to Portland. The first flight departs March 7th at 5:15 am and the second flight departs March 11th at 10:10 am. Is that right?
That is right. What time does the first flight land and what airport does it depart out of?
Your tickets are booked. The departing flight flies out of LAX International Airport and will land at 7:45 am.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
Get me a car reservation for there.
Will you be returning the car March 11th?
I will return it on the 10th.
Will you be picking up the car March 7th and if so at what time?
I will pick up the car on the 9th of March half past 2 in the afternoon.
Are you getting it at PDX International Airport? What type of car do you want?
I want a spacious car and will pick it up at PDX.
You want a Full-size car from PDX International Airport from 2:30 pm March 9th to March 10th. Is that right?
That is right. How much does this cost?
Your booking is complete and the total comes to $43.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything.
Have a good day.
Hey, can you get me a round-trip flight to Phoenix?
Sure, when and where will you depart from?
From Las Vegas on the 7th.
Okay, and when would you like to return?
I'll return on the 13th.
Great. I found 2 flights for you. How about an American Airlines flight for $89? The first flight departs at 4:40 pm, and the return flight departs at 7 pm.
That's great. Can you buy the ticket for me?
Of course. Please confirm that you'd like 1 economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from Las Vegas to Phoenix departing 4:40 pm on March 7th and returning 7 pm on March 13th.
Yes, that's fine. Which airport will I depart from?
You'l leave from the McCarran International Airport. Your ticket is booked.
Great, and when does each flight arrive?
The outbound flight arrives at 5:54 pm and the return flight arrives at 8:14 pm.
Great, thanks a lot. Can you get me a car from Phoenix Sky Harbor Airport from the 8th?
Of course, until March 13th? What type of car would you like? And what time will you pick it up?
I'll collect it at around seven in the evening, I need a spacious car until March 12th.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like a full-size car from Sky Harbor International Airport from 7 pm on March 8th until March 12th.
No, I need an intermediate car until March 11th.
Okay, a standard car until March 11th?
Yes thanks. How much will it be? What type of car?
It's a Prius, it will cost $87 in total. Your car is reserved.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else?
No thanks, that's all.
Okay, see you.
Please find me a round trip flights.
When do you leave and where you coming from?
I am coming from Chi-town on the 10th until 14th of this month.
Where are you going?
In Seattle.
I found a flight in Delta Airlines for only $181 which outbound flight leaves ar 9:15 am and return flight leaves at 4:55 am.
That one is good.
Will I buy you tickets now?
Yes please for 2 people.
Okay, you want 2 Economy seat at Delta Airlines going to Seattle from Chicago on march 10th until march 14th with an outbound flight leaves at 9:15 am and return flight leaves at 4:55 am. Please confirm.
Yes, that's great.
Ticket confirmed!
Thanks, please help me reserve a car going there.
Do you like Full-size or Compact?
Just medium-sized car.
Will you pick it up from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport?
yes.
Do you need it on March 10th until March 14th? And what time do you need it?
I need it on 11th of March at around 2:45 in the afternoon until 12th of March.
Okay, you want a Standard car and you will pick it up from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport on March 11th at 2:45 pm until March 12th. Please confirm.
Yes, correct. May I know the name of the car and the total cost?
The car cost $30 and it's a Civic. Your car has been reserved!
Thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks
You are welcome.
I need some round tickets departing NYC and returning next Thursday on Delta Airlines.
Do you have a plan on time to leave? Where will you go?
Well, there are two of us. We're leaving March 2nd and going to London.
well, there's a Delta Airlines flight. It takes off at 6:20 pm. The return on that is 3:35 pm You total is $248 American.
Fine do that, I need to make sure the tickets are economy, cheapest possible.
Here's what I have: 2 departing New York March 2nd at 6:20 pm via Delta Airlines headed to London on Economy. You'll return on March 7th taking off at 3:35 pm.
That's a mouthful, but correct.
Fine, I have your ticket.
How many stops are there? When will my flight arrive back home?
0 stops and you're back about 7:57 pm.
Cool, thanks. Get me a car for when I'm there.
Do you want Full-size or standard? You'll need the car until March 7th right? How about picking up at Heathrow international Airport?
Yes, I'll need it until next Wednesday. I need medium-sized car
What time will you want to pick it up?
I can pick it up around two pm.
You'll need it from March 2nd right?
How about getting me a small car? I need it from day after tomorrow.
Ok, to be clear: You will pick up a compact car on March 3rd at 2 pm. from Heathrow international Airport and you'll turn it back in on March 6th?
Fine, what car model?
You're getting a Forte, it's been reserved.
perfect Right o.
Cheerio, have a good time pip pip.
can you look for some round trip flights for me?
where are you departing from?
i'm leaving from san fran.
when are you leaving?
i leave on march 9th.
what's the destination and the return date?
i'm going to london and i'll be back on the 14th of this month.
i found 3 flights that could work for you. there's an american airlines flight that leaves at 7:05 am and returns at 3:05 pm for $377.
that works for me, can you book them?
you want me to book 1 american airlines flight from san francisco to london on march 9th and march 14th that leaves at 7:05 am and returns at 3:05 pm in economy?
yes, that's perfect.
it's been reserved.
thanks, can you get me a standard rental car for the 10th of this month too?
when will you need it?
i wanna pick it up at 4:45 pm.
will you be going to heathrow international airport?
yes
do you want to return it on march 14th?
no, i'll need it until the 12th of march.
okay, so you want a standard car from heathrow international airport from march 10th at 4:45 pm until march 12th?
yes. what's my total gonna be? and what kind of car is it?
it'll cost $64 total and you'll be driving a chevrolet cruze.
thanks
is there anything else?
no, that's it.
have a good day.
Find me some round trip flights.
What will be the place and date of departure?
I will be leaving from LA on Saturday this week.
What will be the the destination and the date of return?
My destination is Paris and I will be returning on 10th of this month.
I found an American Airlines flight which takes off at 9:40 am and the return flight takes off at 4:05 am. The ticket costs $343.
Can you search for any other flights?
I found a Delta Airlines flight which takes off at 8:25 am and the return flight takes off at 5:35 pm. The ticket costs $341.
What is the destination of the flight?
The flight goes to Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Can you search for any other flights?
Unfortunately I could not find any flight of your requirements. Is there anything else I can help you with?
can you search again for 4 refundable flight tickets to Chicago?
I found a Southwest Airlines flight which takes off at 6:45 pm and the return flight takes off at 2:50 pm. The ticket costs $247.
What is the arrival time for my return and onward flight?
The arrival time for onward flight is 4:07 am and for return flight is 5:22 pm.
Okay. That sounds good to me. Can you buy Economy tickets for the flight?
Please confirm: You want me to buy 4 Economy class tickets in the Southwest Airlines which travels from Los Angeles at 6:45 pm on March 2nd to Chicago and the return flight leaves at 2:50 pm on March 10th.
Yes, That is correct. Can you find the airport the flight departs from and the number of stops?
I have successfully booked your tickets. The flight takes off from LAX International Airport with 1 stop.
Thank you so much for the help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you reserve a rental car for me?
Is the destination O'Hare International Airport?What is your preferred pick up time and the type of car like Full-size, Standard or something else?
Okay, That sounds good to me. I need a compact car for pick up at 6:15 pm.
Is your pick up date March 2nd and drop off date is March 10th?
My pick up date is 7th of March and drop off date is 8th of March.
Please confirm: You want me to book a compact car for pick up at 6:15 pm on March 7th from O'Hare International Airport. And the date of drop off is March 8th?
yes, That is correct. Can you find me the name of the car?
I have successfully reserved your car and the name of the car is Mini Cooper.
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. have a great day.
Help me look for round trip flights by American Airlines.
Where will you be leaving from and on what date?
I'm going to leave from Phoenix, AZ on the 9th of March.
And when will you return?
I'll be back on March 13th. I want to get an Economy ticket.
Where will you be traveling to?
I'm going to LA.
I found 1 flight that will fit. It's American Airlines and the outbound flight is at 7:35 am. The return flight is at 7:50 am. A ticket is $95.
Is it a 1 stop flight? And what's the arrival airport?
It has 0 stops. The arrival airport is LAX International Airport.
Okay, that will work.
Would you like to purchases tickets?
Yeah, I'd like a ticket.
You will purchase 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines. It is a Phoenix departure on March 9th at 7:35 am to Los Angeles. The return is on March 13th at 7:50 am. Is that what you want?
No, I actually need four tickets, there are 4 people going.
So for American Airlines you want 4 tickets, is that correct?
Yeah, that's it.
The tickets have been purchased.
I also want to book a rental car while I'm there.
Would you like a Compact, Full-size, or another sized care? And will the rental be until March 13th?
I'd like a Standard car. It should be from the 10th of this month to the 12th of this month.
And what time would you like to pick it up?
I want to get it at half past 5 in the evening.
You want to book a Standard car from LAX International Airport to be picked up on March 10th at 5:30 pm and dropped off at March 12th. Shall I book this?
Yes, please book it.
I've booked the car.
Thanks so much. I don't need anything else.
Have a terrific day!
Will you find round trip flights?
When and where?
NYC. Return on 10th of March.
Leaving from?
ATL
When are you leaving?
March 6th in Economy.
American Airlines offers outbound flight that leaves at 6:25 am with return flight at 11:20 am for $121.
Cool. Will you buy nonrefundable tickets for 2?
Please confirm 2 Economy tickets on American Airlines from Atlanta to New York on March 6th at 6:25 am and return on March 10th at 11:20 am.
Great. Origin and destination airports?
Flight leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and arrives at JFK International Airport. Ticket is reserved.
Will you reserve a car there?
Pick up on March 6th? Drop off on March 10th at what time?
Pick up at quarter to 6 in the evening on Thursday next week. Keep it till 9th of this month.
Standard, Compact or other?
Something small.
Please confirm a Compact car from JFK International Airport on March 7th at 5:45 pm to be dropped off on March 9th.
Make that a medium-sized car.
Please confirm a Standard car from JFK International Airport.
Nice.
I was unable to reserve the car. Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I would like an economy ticket on a round trip flight.
When would you like to return?
I want to return on March 12th and I want to travel on southwest airlines.
When would you be leaving and from which city?
I will be leaving Atlanta, GA on March 4th.
Where are you heading to?
I am heading to SF.
There is 1 suitable flight. There is a flight on southwest airlines that leaves at 6:30 am. It would be returning at 7:10 am and costs $243
Which airport would it be leaving from and does it have 1 stop?
It leaves hartsfield-jackson international airport and has 1 stop.
That would be great.
Would you like tickets?
Go ahead and book the ticket for 1.
You would like an economy ticket for 1 on a southwest airlines flight from atlanta to san francisco that leaves on march 4th at 6:30 am and returns on March 12th at 7:10 am?
That would work. Is the ticket refundable? When would the return flight land?
I have reserved your tickets. The flight lands at 5:04 pm. I am sorry but the ticket is non-refundable.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
I would need a rental car.
You would like to pick it up on March 4th at SFO international airport? What time would be convenient for you?
I would need it next Thursday at afternoon 1:45.
What kind of car?
I would need a large one.
You would be dropping it off on March 12th?
I want to keep it till the 8th of March.
You would like to pick up a full-size car at SFO international airport on March 7th at 1:45 pm till March 8th?
That would be great. What type of car is it?
I was not able to reserve the car. Is there anything else you would like?
I really need a car. A compact car would work.
You would like to pick up a compact car at SFO international airport on March 7th at 1:45 pm till March 8th?
Yes, that would be fine.
I was not able to get the car. There is a lovely car available at SFO international airport on March 7th. It is a mini cooper and it would cost $25 in all.
That would be fine.
I have reserved the car.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
No. Thanks for your assistance.
Enjoy your day.
Can you find some Alaska Airlines round trip flights departing from San Fran.
When do you want to leave?
Next Friday.
Where are you going and when are you coming back?
San Diego, I want to be back on the 14th.
I found 1 Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 6:10 am. The return flight leaves at 11:10 am and the cost is $103.
That sounds great.
Do you want to buy the tickets?
Yes please.
Please confirm the following details: 1 Economy ticket on Alaska Airlines form San Francisco to San Diego. The departure date is March 8th at 6:10 am and the return flight departs on March 14th at 11:10 am.
Yes, what airport does the flight leave from? Is this ticket refundable?
Your ticket is confirmed. The flight leaves from SFO International Airport. The ticket unfortunately is not refundable.
I want to reserve a rental car on the 12th.
Will you drop it off on March 14th?
No, I need it until the 13th.
What kind of car do you prefer? What time will you need it?
I want a small car and I want to pick it up at quarter to 6 in the evening.
Do you want to pick it up at SAN International Airport?
Yes, that will work.
Please confirm the following: You are renting a compact car and will pick it up from SAN International Airport on March 12th at 5:45 pm and will drop it off on March 13th.
Yes that works.
Sorry I wasn't able to make the reservation. There is a Kia Forte for $29 available at SAN International Airport on March 12th.
No
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No that is all.
Have a good day!
I am interested in finding a round trip flight.
Can you tell me where you want to go, and when you plan to return?
I want to arrive in Vancouver, BC, and I will return from my trip on March 14th.
Can you tell me the date when you want to depart?
I want to depart for my trip on March 7th.
Which is the location from where you will depart?
I will begin my trip from Atlanta, GA.
There are 2 flights which match what you need. One of the flights is with Delta Airlines, and it leaves at 3:20 pm, as for the returning flight, it leaves at 2:50 am. The ticket for this flight will cost you $242.
Is there some other flight? I do not care very much about the airline.
There is also an United Airlines flight, which leaves at 6:15 am, and when it returns it takes off at 3:15 am. The ticket for this flight costs $253.
This flight seems as what I want. Can you buy me the tickets for this flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class flight ticket for 1 person for the flight of United Airlines which leaves from Atlanta on March 7th at 6:15 am to go to Vancouver, and it returns on March 14th at 3:15 am.
This suits me well.
Your requested ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help. I am also in need of booking a rental car there.
Will you be picking the car up on March 7th, and will need it till March 14th? Can you tell me the time when you need to have the car?
I will be needing the rental car till March 10th, and I will have to take the car on 9th of this month. The time when I will pick up the car is 4:45 pm.
Is there some specific kind of car you want to have?
I want to rent a Compact car, which I can pick up at Vancouver Airport.
Can you please confirm that you want to rent a Compact car, which you will pick up at YVR International Airport on March 9th at 4:45 pm, and you will need the car till March 10th?
That is what I want.
Your requested car has been booked.
Can you tell me the name of the car?
The car you requested is called Chevrolet Bolt.
I appreciate your help very much. That would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
I would like to find a flight.
Where are you leaving from and when are you returning?
I will be leaving from SF and returning on next Wednesday.
Where are you traveling and when are you leaving?
I'm traveling to NYC and leaving on March 3rd.
There is a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 8:30 pm and returns at 4:45 pm for $235.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, I would like to book a ticket.
1 economy ticket from San Francisco to New York with American Airlines from March 3rd to March 6th, leaving at 8:30 pm and returning on 4:45 pm.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your ticket has been purchased.
At what time does the onward flight arrive? Is the flight ticket refundable?
The flight ticket is no refundable. The onward flight arrives at 5:56 am.
I would like to rent a car to get there.
What type of car would you like?
I would like a full-size car.
At what time would you like the car on March 3rd?
I will need the car on next Monday at 10:45 till the 5th of March.
Are you going to pick up the car at JFK International Airport?
Yes, that works for me.
Booking a full-size car from JFK International Airport at 10:45 am on March 4th till March 5th.
Yes, that is perfect. What type of car is it and what is the cost?
I was unable to rent that car can I help with something else?
No, that is all for now.
Have a good day.
Find me round trip flights from LA on march 3rd?
What will be your destination?
My destination is SFO.
What will be the date of return?
I will be returning on 9th of March.
There are 3 flights you might like. One is in Alaska Airlines which departs at 5:50 pm and the return flight departs at 7:10 pm. The price of ticket is $102.
can you search for American Airlines flights on 5th of this month?
There is 1 American Airlines flight which departs at 6:30 am and the return flight departs at 4:25 pm. The ticket costs $96.
Can you check whether the ticket is refundable and what is the place of departure?
The flight takes off from LAX International Airport and the ticket is non-refundable.
Okay, That sounds good to me. Can you buy me Economy tickets for the flight?
Please confirm: You want me to buy 1 economy ticket in American Airlines traveling from Los Angeles at 6:30 am on march 5th to San Francisco. The return flight takes off at 4:25 pm on March 9th.
No, There is one people in my group.
Please confirm: You want me to buy 1 economy ticket in American Airlines.
Yes, That is correct. can you check how many stops the flight has?
I have successfully booked the ticket and the number of stops is 0.
can you reserve this car for me?
Is the date of pick up March 5th and the place of pick up SFO International Airport?
Yes. That is correct. I will pick up the car on the 6th.
What is your preferred time and type for the car?
I will pick up a medium-sized car at 7:15 pm.
Will you be needing it till March 9th?
The time for pick up will be 12 o"clock in the afternoon on March 7th. The drop of date is the 8th.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a standard car for pick up at 12 pm on March 7th from SFO International Airport. The date of drop off is March 8th.
No. Find me a small car.
Please confirm again: You want me a compact car for pick up at 12 pm.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked the car.
Can you tell me the total cost?
The total cost for the car is $25.
Thank you for the help!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Look up round trip economy tickets for 3 on United Airlines.
Departure city? Destination? Return date?
From Vegas to SF and returning March 12th.
Departure date?
The 9th of this month.
There's a United Airlines flight leaving 3:05 pm and returning 11:55 am for $158.
Sounds good, book it.
Please confirm: 3 economy tickets on United Airlines from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 9th at 3:05 pm and returning March 12th at 11:55 am.
Great.
Your seats are booked.
Thanks, get a rental car there too.
Pick up time? Is this to pick up at SFO International Airport and drop off on March 12th?
Yeah, picking up 20:00 and returning it March 11th.
Picking up on March 9th?
No, the 10th of March.
Would you like compact, standard, etc.?
Small.
Please confirm: compact car from picking up from SFO International Airport March 10th at 8 pm and dropping off March 11th.
Yep.
Your car is reserved.
Thanks.
Anthing else?
Nope, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I want to search for some round trip flights and I need to book the tickets in Economy class. Can you help me to find the one for me?
What is your starting place to search for the flight?
I am planning to leave from ATL.
Let me know the dates of your trip, so that I can search for the one that is convenient to you.
I have planed my trip from Thursday Next week to 10th of this month. Please search for the flight accordingly. Is that enough or do you want more details to search?
Yes, to which place you want to go for a trip?
to London, UK. Search it accordingly.
Okay. I found 3 results. An outbound flight with American Airlines which leaves at 8:40 pm and the leaving time of return flight will be at 2:05 pm under ticket cost $345. What is your suggestion on this? whether this is convenient or not?
No, I want further search in this and you can search with any Airlines that is not the matter to me.
Found 2 flight details. What about an outbound flight with Delta Airlines which leaves at 4:50 pm and the leaving time of return flight will be at 8 am under ticket cost $336?
How many stops doe the flight have, can you check whether it is 0?
No, it has 1 stop.
This seems to be okay for me. We will proceed with tickets booking for this flight.
Please confirm to book 1 Economy class ticket in a Flight with Delta Airlines from Atlanta on March 7th at 4:50 pm to London and the return flight leaves at 8 am on March 10th.
That is confirmed to proceed. Check out whether the tickets are refundable?
I have booked the tickets as per our wish and the same was not refundable.
Can you search for a Car for rent to go there. I need to pick it up at Heathrow Airport at 2 in the afternoon.
Let me know the type of Car that you want to book like Full-size or Compact and also confirm to proceed with the pickup date on March 7th and drop-off date on March 10th.
I need a large Car from next Friday to 9th of March.
Please confirm to book a Full-size car at Heathrow International Airport from March 8th at 2 pm to March 9th.
Yes, that is confirmed.
Your reservation was successfully confirmed.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a good day.
I need a round trip flight
What's the city of departure?
It's Los Angeles
What's the destination? When do you want to return?
Paris. The return is scheduled for the 9th of this month
What is the day of departure?
I would like to leave this Sunday
There are 2 flights. With American Airlines the outbound flight is at 9:40 am, the return flight at 4:05 am. The ticket costs $377
What time is the landing scheduled? Are there intermediate stops?
The landing is scheduled for 7:58 am. Yes, there's 1 stops.
Ok, it's fine for me! I want to buy the ticket
1 ticket in Economy with American Airlines from Los Angeles to Paris on March 3rd at 9:40 am. Return flight on March 9th at 4:05 am. Is it correct?
Yes, it is! What is the airport of departure? Can this ticket be refunded?
No, the ticket isn't refundable. The airport of departure is LAX International Airport. Your ticket is booked!
Perfect! I need a car to rent on Tuesday next week.
What kind of car would you like? What time do you have to pick it up? Is it okay from Charles de Gaulle International Airport?
Yes, It's ok from there. I'd like an intermediate car and I prefer at afternoon 1:45.
Do you need it until March 9th?
No, until the 8th
A Standard car from Charles de Gaulle International Airport from March 5th at 1:45 pm to March 8th. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. How much does the rental cost?
It costs $96 in total. Your car is booked!
Thanks a lot for helping
Do you need anything else?
No, thanks, it's all!
Have a good day!
Find me round trip flights.
What will be your boarding point, date of returning and the destination?
I will be leaving from Toronto to ATL and will return on 10th of this month.
What is your date of departure?
My date of departure is 2nd of March.
I found an American Airlines flight which takes off at 5:55 am and the returning flight takes off at 3:25 pm. The ticket is priced at $237.
What is the destination of the flight?
The flight arrives at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Where from will the flight takes off?
The flight takes off from Toronto Pearson International Airport.
Can you look for any other flights?
I found an Delta Airlines flight which takes off at 7:15 am and the returning flight takes off at 3:40 pm. The ticket is priced at $240.
Can you look for any other flights on 12th of this month?
I found an United Airlines flight which takes off at 5:35 pm and the returning flight takes off at 6:15 am. The ticket is priced at $233.
Okay. That sounds a good flight to me.
Would you like me to buy the tickets?
Yes, Please book two economy tickets for me.
Please confirm: You want me to buy 2 economy tickets in United Airlines which leaves from Toronto at 5:35 pm on March 2nd and goes to Atlanta. The return flight departs at 6:15 am on March 12th.
Yes, That is correct. Can you check the landing time of the flight and whether the flight has 0 stop?
Your ticket is booked successfully and the return flight lands at 12:33 pm with 1 stop.
Can you reserve a rental car for me?
Do you want me to reserve it to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport?
Yes, That is correct.
What is your preferred time and type of car? Will you return the car on March 12th?
Please book a medium-sized car for pick up at 3 pm till March 9th.
Should I put the pick up date as March 2nd?
Put the pick up date as Friday next week.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a standard car for pick up at 3 pm on March 8th from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. The return date is March 9th.
No. Please put the pick up date as March 3rd.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a standard car for pick up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 3rd.
No. Please put the return date as next Monday.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a standard car for pick up with the return date on March 4th..
Yes, That is correct. can you tell me the name of the car and total cost?
I have successfully booked your car. The name of the car is Chevrolet Cruze and the total price is $32.
Thank you for the help!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Hello, I'm looking for a flight with round-trip. Can you find me one?
When is your return? Where are you flying and from where?
I'll be travelling to New York from Chicago and the return will be on the 14th.
so, when are you planning to leave?
I'll be leaving on March 10th.
There are 4 flights available for the trip. The American Airlines outbound flight will leave at 12:30 pm and the return flight will leave at 5:25 am. The cost of the travel will be around $151.
Do you have any other flights available on the same day?
Yup, the Delta Airlines outbound flight leaves at 9:15 am and the return flight will leave at 6 am. The cost of the travel will be $146.
sounds good to me. Please can you book tickets in this flight?
Sure. Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 1 Economy ticket in Delta Airlines that is flying from Chicago to New York on March 10th at 9:15 am and the return flight will be on March 14th at 6 am, right?
Yup, sounds good to me.
I've confirmed your ticket.
Which is the departing airport and when will the onward flight arrive?
The flight will depart from O'Hare International Airport and the onward flight will arrive at 12:34 pm.
Thanks for the information. Please can I get a rental car there?
Yup! Can you pick it up on March 10th and drop it on March 14th?
Nope, I need the car from March 11th to March 12th only.
Okay! So, at what time can you pick up the car at JFK International Airport?
I can pick up the car at 1 pm.
What type of car like small, medium or big-sized car, do you prefer?
I'm looking for a small car.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to rent a Compact car from JFK International Airport on March 11th at 1 pm and will drop the car on March 12th, right?
Yup, you're correct.
Okay! I've reserved the car for you. Have a nice time.
Can I've the name of the car? How much it cost totally?
The car is Nissan Leaf and it will come around $34 for your reservation in total.
Thanks much for your help.
It's my pleasure. do you need any other help?
Nope, that's it. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a round-trip flight leaving next Wednesday.
Can you give me your point of departure and your destination? What day do you want to return?
I want to fly from Seattle, WA to NY, and get back on the 11th of this month.
I found 4 flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight for $298 that leaves at 4 pm. The return flight leaves at 3:40 pm.
Which airport does it arrive at?
It arrives at JFK International Airport.
That sounds good. I'd like to book tickets for that flight.
Please confirm: You want 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Seattle to New York departing March 6th at 4 pm, with a return flight on March 11th at 3:40 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your ticket is confirmed.
I'll also need a rental car there.
What time will you need it?
I want to pick it up in the morning 11:30.
Will you be picking it p on March 6th, and dropping it off on March 11th? Do you want a Standard, full-size, or something else?
I'd like a spacious car, from Thursday next week until the 10th of March.
So, to confirm: You want to pick up a full-size car at 11:30 am at JFK International Airport on March 7th and drop it off again on March 10th. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your car has been reserved.
Thanks.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I would like a round trip flight for one.
Where would you be heading and when would you be leaving?
I will be leaving from San Francisco to Chi-town on the 6th.
When would you be returning?
on the 14th of March.
There are 4 suitable flights. There is an outbound flight on american airlines that leaves at 4:25 pm. It would be returning at 7:05 am and costs $240
Is the ticket refundable? What time would the flight be arriving?
It returns at 9:52 am. I am sorry but the ticket is non-refundable.
That would be too early. Can I have another flight?
There is an outbound flight on delta airlines that leaves at 10:05 pm. It would be returning at 10:40 am and costs $190.
Is there anything else that returns on the 12th?
There is an outbound flight on southwest airlines that leaves at 5:50 pm. It would be returning at 11:35 am and costs $298.
That would be great.
Would you like tickets?
Go ahead and book a ticket for me.
You would like a economy ticket for 1 on a southwest airlines flight from san francisco to chicago that leaves on March 6th at 5:50 pm and returns on March 12th at 11:35 am?
That would be fine. What time does the onward flight land?
I have reserved your ticket. The flight lands at 0:37 am.
I need to rent a car.
You intend to drop it off on March 12th?
I would need it for the 11th.
Would you like a standard, full-size car or something else?
I just want a spacious car.
You would like to pick it up on March 6th?
I would need it on the 9th of this month.
You would like to pick it up at o'hare international airport?
Yes, that would be great.
For what time?
For 7:45 pm.
You would like to pick up a full-size car at o'hare international airport on March 9th at 7:45 pm till March 11th?
That would be fine.
I have reserved the car.
Thanks very much.
Is there anything else?
No. Thanks for your assistance.
Enjoy your day.
Find me a round trip flights in Premium Economy class for 4 people
Can you tell the leaving and returning time and your destination?
I want to go to ATL on March 1st and return on 12th of March
Where do you want to leave from
Fro Toronto
How about American Airlines that takes off at 10:05 am and return flight takes off at 3:25 pm. The cost is $352
Is there any other flights in Economy
There are 2 flights. How about Delta Airlines which takes off at 7:15 am and returning flight takes off at 7:50 am. The cost is $231
That's nice one
Do you want to reserve the ticket
Yes of course
Please confirm this: the flight is from Toronto. the flight goes to Atlanta. the airlines is delta airlines. the departure is March 1st and return date is march 12th. the onward flight leaves at 7:15 am. the return flight leaves at 7:50 am. the seating class is economy. the number of passenger is 4
That's perfect? What about the stops? What time does the return flight arrive?
Ticket booked successfully. There is 1 stop and return flight arrives at 5:08 pm
Thank you so much. Find a rental car there.
Do you want pick up on March 1st
No I want it on the 2nd
Which type of car do you want? Do you want it till March 12th. Do you want to pick up the car at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport
yes That's perfect. I want a medium-sized car till 5th of march
From when do you want it
the pick up is from quarter to 5 in the evening. Look for a compact car
Please confirm this: you are picking up the car from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. the pickup date is March 2nd. you are picking up the car at 4:45 pm. the drop-off is March 5th. It is a compact car
Please make the pick up time at quarter past 4 in the evening
Please confirm this: the pickup date is march 2nd at 4:15 pm
Make the pickup at Charles de Gaulle Airport on 3rd of this month
Please confirm this: you are picking up the car from Charles de Gaulle international airport on March 3rd
Yes that's perfect. How much does that cost and what car is that?
Car reservation successful. The car is Nissan Leaf and cost is $52
Thank you so much
Do you need anything else
No that's all for now
Have a nice day
Can you help me find some round trip flights
Where are you leaving from?
I'll be headed from NYC
Where are you going and when do you plan to go?
I'm going to Washington on the 4th of this month.
When are you returning?
I want to be back on the 14th of this month
There's a 10:55 am American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:05 am for $94
What other flights are available
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 5:15 pm and a return flight that leaves at 4:50 pm for $99
OK, can you buy me four economy tickets for that flight
Confirming you want 4 economy tickets from Southwest Airlines from New York to Washington that leaves on March 4th at 5:15 pm and returns on March 14th at 4:50 pm
Yes that's all correct
Your ticket is confirmed
Great, now help me find a rental car till the 10th.
What kind of car? And are you going to pick it up from Dulles International Airport?
Yes please, find me a spacious car that I can pick up at 19:30
Do you want to pick it up on March 4th?
I want to pick it up Tuesday next week from Intercity Terminal
So a full-size car from Intercity Terminal with a March 5th pickup at 7:30 pm and a March 10th drop off yes?
Yes that's right
Your car is booked
What is the cost and kind of car?
It's a Jeep Cherokee and will cost you $180
That's great, thanks so much, that's it for now
Have a great one!
Can you find me round trip flights for 4?
When do you want to leave and where are you going and coming from?
I'm leaving on the 1st of March from Las Vegas to Portland, OR
When are you returning?
I wanna get back on March 14th
I found 3 flights on American Airlines that leaves at 5:30 am and has a 7:20 am return flight that costs $199
How many stops does the flight have? Which airport does it arrive at?
It arrives at PDX International Airport with 1 stop.
Are there any other flights and am headed to San Fran.
I found 2 flights including a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:50 pm and a return flight at 10:50 am for $108
That flight is great
Should I buy it for you?
Yes please do
Confirming 4 passengers on Delta Airlines from March 1st with a return on March 14th that leaves at 10:50 pm and has a 10:50 am return flight via economy from Las Vegas to San Francisco.
Yes that's good
Your ticket is booked
I want to get a rental car too, how about a small one on the 6th of March from SFO International Airport
Will you drop it back on March 14th?
I need it till the 10th of this month
What time do you need it from?
I'll get it at 17:30
Confirming your SFO International Airport compact car pickup from March 6th to March 10th with a 5:30 pm pickup time
Yes that's perfect
OK, it's reserved
Thanks for your help
Can I do something else for you?
No, that's it thanks
Have a great one
Hello, could you help me search for some round trip tickets to LAX please?
When do you intend to return?
I would most likely be coming back on Tuesday next week.
Where and when do you plan to depart then?
I plan to depart from NYC on March 1st.
Would you like an American Airlines flight which departs at 3:40 pm and returns at 6:20 pm which costs $231.
Does this flight have one layover?
Yes, this flight has 1 layover.
Are there any alternatives? Will be travelling to Vancouver, BC instead and would prefer a Delta Airlines flight.
There is 1 flight available, which is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 7:30 am and returning at 12:20 pm which will set you back a total of $352.
This sounds great! Could you purchase the tickets for me?
Sure! Please confirm your reservation for 1 Economy Delta Airlines flight ticket from New York to Vancouver from March 1st at 7:30 am to March 5th at 12:20 pm.
This sounds perfect!
Your reservation has been made! Have a safe trip!
Thank you! How many layovers does this flight have?
There are 1 layovers for your flight.
May I also know if the ticket is refundable?
Unfortunately, this is a non-refundable ticket.
I see, what a pity. Thanks for your assistance!
Do you require any further assistance?
Could you also help me make a car reservation at the destination?
Sure, any preference on the type of car?
I would prefer a Standard car!
Will you be picking up the car at YVR International Airport on March 1st, and what time will you need it?
Yes, but I will need the car from the 2nd of this month at 4:45 pm instead.
Sure, and do you intend to drop the car off on March 5th?
No, probably on 3rd of March instead.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for a Standard Car for pick up from YVR International Airport on March 2nd 4:45 pm and for use till March 3rd.
That sounds fine with me.
Sorry, I was not able to make your reservation. Would you like a Hyundai Elantra for your pickup at YVR International Airport on March 2nd instead? This will cost you $36.
Sure, this is fine with me.
Sorry, I was not able to make your reservation. Would you like a Hyundai Elantra for your pickup at YVR International Airport on March 2nd instead? This will cost you $36.
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
No worries, have a great day ahead!
I need a round trip flights
What is the destination? When do you want to leave? When you will come back?
The destination is Atlanta, GA. I want to leave later today, and I will come back on 10th of this month
What is the city of departure?
The city of departure is San Fran
I found an American Airlines flight at 3:50 pm. The return flight is at 3:25 pm. Ticket costs $306
It's fine for me! I want a ticket for Economy class
1 ticket in Economy from San Francisco to Atlanta with American Airlines. Departure on March 1st at 3:50 pm, return flight on March 10th at 3:25 pm. Do you confirm?
Yes I confirm. Which airport will I arrive at in Atlanta?
In Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. Your ticket is booked
Thank you so much! I need a rental car there
Do you have car preferences? Do you want to rent it on March 1st? At what time?
I prefer a small car. I want to rent it on tomorrow at 1:30 pm
Until March 10th?
No, till 5th of March
A compact car from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport from March 2nd at 1:30 pm, until March 5th. Is it correct?
No, I want the car till March 3rd, and I prefer a medium-sized car
A standard car until March 3rd. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. What is the car model? How much does the rental cost?
It's a Chevrolet Cruze, and the rental costs $31 in total. Your car is booked!
Thank you so much
Do you need anything else?
No, thanks for helping
Have a nice day!
Can you search for round trip flights to Chi-town for the 11th of March?
No problem. Where are you leaving from? What day do you plan to leave?
I need flights out of London. I'm leaving on March 4th.
Okay. I found an American Airlines flight departing at 3:05 pm. The return flight will leave at 4:30 am. The total cost round trip will be $442.
That sounds good to me. Can you help me buy the tickets?
No problem, just confirm the following for me: Purchasing 1 Economy class ticket for the American Airlines flight leaving from London to Chicago on March 4th at 3:05 pm. Your return flight will be on March 11th at 4:30 am. Is this correct?
Yeah, that's right. What airport will I be leaving from? What time will the first flight get to Chicago?
The onward flight is departing from Heathrow International Airport and will arrive at its destination at 4:17 am. Your ticket is now confirmed. Have a nice trip!
Thanks for the help, can you also help me find a rental car?
Sure thing. What type of car do you prefer? Would you like to pick it up at O'Hare International Airport?
Sounds good, I just need a really large car. I will pick it up in the afternoon 3:15.
Would you like to rent it from March 4th through March 11th?
I'll need the car from the 6th through March 8th actually.
No problem. Please confirm the following for me: You're picking up the car from O'Hare International Airport on March 6th at 3:15 pm and dropping it off on March 8th. You want a large Full-size car. Is that correct?
No, I need to pick it up at 8:30 pm and I'll need it till March 9th.
Okay, please confirm the following details: You are picking up the car at 8:30 pm and will be dropping it off on March 9th.
Yes, that's correct. What's the name of the car?
Your car has been reserved! The type of the car is a Honda CR-V.
Thanks a lot of the help. That's all I need.
Thank you. Have a great day!
Could you help in finding round trip flights for me?
When will you leaving from? When will you back?
I wish to get back on the 11th and I am moving from NY.
Where do you want to go? When will you leave?
I will leave on 6th of March to LA and get back on March 10th.
I searched and found 3 flights for you. It is an American Airlines flight leaves at 7:45 pm and the return flight leaves at 6:20 pm. The cost of the ticket is $263.
What is the name of the arriving airport?
The reaching place is LAX International Airport.
Whether the ticket is refundable? Whether the flight have one stop?
Sorry, the ticket is not refundable. The number of stop is 1.
It is good for me.
Do you need any other help?
Could you help me in buying flight tickets?
Kindly ensure that, on March 6th, an American Airlines flight with Economy seat has been booked for 1 person from New york to Los Angeles at 7:45 pm. The flight returns on March 10th which leaves at 6:20 pm.
It is good.
Your booking is done.
Thank you so much for your help. I wish to book a small rental car upto March 9th. I wish to need the car on 7th of this month.
When will you need it?
I wish to pick it up at 1:45 pm.
Kindly ensure that, on March 7th, a Compact car has been booked and pick up from LAX International Airport. The drop off date is March 9th at 1:45 pm.
Yes. It is good.
Your car has been booked.
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other help?
No. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a nice day.
I need help finding 4 round trip tickets leaving on the 9th of this month.
Sure, where do you want to depart from?
I'll be departing from Chicago and don't have a preference on the class type.
Where you would like to travel to and when will you be returning?
I need to go to Philly and will return on the 13th.
There are 3 available flights. Would you like an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:40 pm with a return flight that departs at 10:10 am? It would cost $132
What other flights are there?
Delta Airlines has a flight departing at 11:05 am for $149. The return flight would leave at 12:20 pm.
That's the one I want.
Would you like me to purchase ticket for that flight?
Yes, buy them please.
You would like 4 economy tickets for the Delta Airlines flight to Philadelphia that leaves from Chicago on March 9th at 11:05 am with a return flight on March 13th departing at 12:20 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. Does the flight have any layovers?
I have confirmed your tickets. The flight have 1 layover.
Can my ticker be refunded if my plans change? Also, what airport will I arrive at?
I'm sorry, your ticket is not refundable. You will arrive at PHL International Airport.
Perfect, thanks! Now I need to find a car to rent for me trip. Can you find me a rental begining on the 11th of March. I'll pick it up at evening 6.
Do you plan to return the car on March 13th?
No, I only want the car through the 12th of March.
Would you like to reserve a standard, full-size, or different type of vehicle?
An intermediate car would be fine.
Please confirm you would like to reserve a standard car from March 11th to March 12th and will pick it up at the PHL International Airport at 6 pm.
Yes, that reservation is correct.
Your car rental reservation has been confirmed.
Perfect. Thanks!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Nothing further, thanks.
Have a niec trip.
I want to go for a short trip and for which I need to search for round trip flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
Yes, what is your present location to search for the flight and let me know about the starting date of your travel plan.
I want to search the flight from NY on 6th of this month.
To which place you are planning to visit?
I have planned to visit Vancouver, search for the flights to this place.
What is your planned return date, I want to know this to search accurately.
I will return on 11th of March.
Found 2 results. Hope the outbound flight with Delta Airlines which leaves at 6 am and the return flight leaves at 3:20 am under ticket price $297 is okay to you. How about your opinion?
That is okay for me. I want to book tickets to that flight and I want it for four persons in any class.
Please confirm to book 4 Economy class tickets in a Flight with Delta Airlines from New York on March 6th at 3:20 am to Vancouver and the return flight leaves at 6 am on March 11th.
That is okay to proceed. Let me know about the date and place of arrival of return flight.
I have booked your tickets successfully and please note that the return flight will arrive at 6:40 pm to YVR International Airport.
Thanks for that information. I want to book a small car to go there on next Thursday and I need to book it up to 10th of March.
What is your expected pickup time?
I want to pick the car at 18:45.
Please confirm to book a Compact car at YVR International Airport from March 7th at 6:45 pm to March 10th.
That is okay to proceed.
Sorry, I could not reserve that car. Shall I book another car which a Chevrolet Bolt at YVR International Airport on March 7th? The cost will be $84 in total.
No, thank you.
How can I help you further.
No, that's all I want for today. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
I want to go for a trip from the 3rd to the 12th and for which I need to search for round trip flights. Can you search for the one for four people?
What is your present location from where you want to leave from?
I want to search for the flight from ATL.
To which place you are planning to visit?
I want to visit Philadelphia. please search for the flight accordingly.
Found 3 results. Hope the outbound flight with American Airlines which leaves at 3:25 pm and the return flight leaves at 10:10 am under ticket price $236 is okay to you. How about your opinion?
What is the arrival time of my return flight? I need this for my reference.
The return flight will arrive at 2:56 pm. Is it okay to you?
Please search for some other flights which suit my requirements.
What about an outbound flight with Delta Airlines leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 2:20 pm for which the price of the ticket is $212. Is that okay to you?
No, I want to search for some other flights. Hope you have the one in your list that suits me.
How about the outbound flight from United Airlines leaves at 12:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:45 am under the ticket cost $191.
This seems to be a good one. Please book the tickets to this flight.
Please confirm to book 4 Economy class tickets in a Flight with United Airlines from Atlanta on March 3rd at 12:50 pm to Philadelphia and the return flight leaves at 4:45 am on March 12th.
That is confirmed to proceed.
I have booked your tickets successfully to this flight.
Can you check about the number of stops does the flight have?
It have only 1 stop.
Also let me know the time of arrival of Onward flight. One more thing, can you check about the tickets whether they are refundable as I may cancel the trip at any time.
Sorry, the tickets are not refundable and note that the arrival time of onward flight is at 4:36 pm.
Thanks for that information. I need one more favor from you that I want to book a car for rent from Monday next week to Friday next week. Can you search for the one to pick up at PHL International Airport?.
Do you have any preferred type of car that you want to book and also let me know the exact time when you need the car for pickup/
Small car is enough to me and please book it for the pick up time 6 in the evening.
Need your confirmation to book a Compact car for the pick up at PHL International Airport from March 4th at 6 pm to March 8th.
That is okay, go ahead. And also I want to know about the cost and name of the Car that you have selected.
I have reserved the Car and the cost for which is $108 in total. And note that the name of Car is Volkswagen GTI.
Thanks for that information and help. That's all for now.
Have a good day.
I need to search round trip flights.
What city will you be leaving from and when do you plan on returning?
I will be leaving from CDMX on the 14th.
When would you be leaving and what city are you planning to visit?
I will be leaving on the 11th of this month going to Phoenix. I would like to travel in Premium Economy.
I have found 2 flights that fit your critera. There is a flight with American Airlines that costs $377. The outbound flight will leave at 8:05 am and the return flight leaves at 8:40 am.
What are some other options?
United Airlines has a flight that leaves has a flight that leaves at 0:20 am and the return flight leaves at 11:05 am for $461.
What airport would I be leaving from and how many stops does it have?
There is 1 stop and you would be departing from Benito Juarez International Airport.
That will work. I need help making reservations for that flight.
So you would like me to make 1 Premium Economy reservation with United Airlines on March 11th leaving Mexico City going to Phoenix leaving at 0:20 am and returning March 14th at 11:05 am?
Yes I do.
Your reservations are confirmed.
Thanks, Now I need a rental car while I am there.
Will you be returning it on March 14th?
No. I only need it till the 13th of March.
Would you like a full-size, standard or something different? Will you be picking it up at Sky Harbor International Airport?
I would like a medium-sized car. I will need it in the afternoon 2.
Will the pick up date be March 11th?
No. I don't need it till the 12th.
So you would like me to reserve a a Standard car at Sky Harbor International Airport on March 12th until March 13th with a 2 pm pickup?
Yes I do.
Your reservation is all set.
Can you tell me the name of the car.
Your reservation is going to be a Toyota Prius.
Thanks. I am all set.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me some round trip flights?
When are you coming back?
I'm heading out later today and wanna be back on March 9th. I'm going to New York City
Where are you going?
I'm going to Vancouver, BC and wanna ride Delta Airlines
OK, there's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 7:30 am with a 2:50 am return that will run you $303
OK that sounds great
Should I book now?
Yes, book me one economy ticket
Confirming 1 Economy ticket from New York to Vancouver via Delta Airlines on March 1st till March 9th with 7:30 am and 2:50 am departure and return flights
Yes that's all correct
Your ticket is booked!
Now help me reserve a car there please
Sure, what time? And are you picking it up March 1st?
No, I'll get it on the 4th at three pm
What kind of car? And is it OK to pick it up from YVR International Airport?
Yes please, a medium-sized one
Wanna drop it off on March 9th?
No, I only need it till the 6th of this month
OK so a standard car from YVR International Airport for pickup on March 4th at 3 pm till March 6th
Yes that's awesome
It's been booked
What kind of car is that agian?
It's a Hyundai Elantra
Thanks, that's it for now
Cool, enjoy your day!
I need to check out flights.
Where to? Also on what date and where are you travelling from?
I am leaving Chi-town flying to New York City today.
When will you be returning.
On 4th of March.
There are 3 possible flights for you. One is with American Airlines which flies out at 12:30 pm and returns at 3:40 pm, costing $132.
What are the other options? I will require 4 tickets.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 9:15 am and returns at 6 am. The cost is $137 per ticket.
What else is there?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 9:50 pm and returning at 4:20 am, costing $136.
That suits me. Will you purchase the tickets and i prefer economy.
To confirm then that is 4 economy flights with Southwest Airlines going from Chicago to New York, on March 1st at 9:50 pm and returning on March 4th at 4:20 am.
Yes that is great. When will my return flight arrive and how many stops will the flight have?
0 stops and it will arrive at 5:39 am.
Can you assist me to rent a car while I am there?
Will you need it from March 1st? Also what size for example Compact or Full-size or something else?
I want an intermediate car from March 2nd.
What time will you collect it and will it be from JFK International Airport? Also will you return it on March 4th?
Yes that is correct. I will collect it at 5 o"clock in the evening and need it until Sunday this week.
To confirm then you need a standard car from 5 pm on March 2nd until March 3rd and ou will be collecting it from JFK International Airport.
Yes all that information is right.
Your booking is successful.
Thanks so much for your assistance?
May I assist you with anything else today?
No thanks and again thanks for all your help.
Your welcome enjoy the rest of your day!
I need a round trip flight.
When would you be returning?
Next Thursday, I would be leaving from Paris, France.
When would you be leaving and where would you like to visit?
I will be heading to LAX on the 3rd of March.
There is an outbound flight on American airlines that leaves at 4:05 am. It would be returning at 9:40 am and costs $382
Wow. That is too early. Is there anything else for later on in the day?
There is an outbound flight on delta airlines that leaves at 5:35 pm. It would be returning at 8:25 am and costs $383
That flight would be ideal.
Would you like tickets?
Go ahead and book it for me.
You would like a economy ticket for 1 on a delta airlines flight from Paris to Los Angeles that leaves on March 3rd at 5:35 pm and returns on March 7th at 8:25 am?
I need tickets for 4.
You would like an onward flight for 4 passengers that leaves at 5:35 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
I have bought your ticket.
Thanks very much. I would need a car to use when I get there.
What car would you like? Do you intend to pick it up at LAX international airport?
Yes, that would be fine. I need a small car.
For what time? You would like it from March 3rd to March 7th.
I would need it Monday next week at half past 1 in the afternoon till the 5th of this month.
You would like to pick up a compact car at LAX international airport on March 4th at 1:30 pm till March 5th?
Yes, that is exactly what I want.
I have reserved the car.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else?
No. I appreciate your assistance.
Enjoy your day.
Please help me find a round trip flight.
Where are you coming from?
From Seattle.
When do you plan to leave and when do you plan to come back?
I want to leave on 9th of March until 12th of March.
Where do you want to go?
To New York.
How about American Airlines for only $306 with an outbound flight leaves at 4 pm and return flights leaves at 3:40 pm.
That's good.
Will I buy you tickets now?
Yes, I prefer Traveling in Economy for 1 people only.
Okay, you want 1 Economy seat at American Airlines going to New York form Seattle on March 9th until March 12th. Onward flight leaves at 4 pm and return flight leaves at 3:40 pm. Please confirm.
Yes.
Ticket reserved!
Please help me reserve a rental car going there.
DO you plan to drop off on March 12th?
I need it until March 11th.
Do you plan to pick it up at JFK International Airport? What type of car do you want?
I want a standard car and yes I want to pick it up there.
How about picking it up on March 9th and what time you need it?
I need it on the 10th at 2 in the afternoon.
Okay, you want standard car and you will pick it up from JFK International Airport on March 10th until March 11th at 2 pm. Please confirm.
Good. What's the name of the car?
It's Toyota Corolla and your car has been reserved!
Thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
You are welcome.
I'm looking for round trip flights.
Where will you be going and when will you be returning?
I'm going to Philly. I want to come back on the 8th of March.
Where will you be traveling from? And when will you be leaving?
I want to leave tomorrow from Paris, France.
There's 1 flight that could work. It's American Airlines. The outbound flight is at 4:05 am. The return flight is at 4:45 pm. The ticket costs $293.
What's the departure airport?
The departure airport is Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Okay, that's what I want. Can you get me a ticket?
I'll get you 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines Paris to Philadelphia round trip. The outbound flight is March 2nd at 4:05 am. The return flight is March 8th at 4:45 pm. Is everything correct?
Yes, everything is right.
I purchased the ticket.
I also need a rental car there.
Would you like to pick it up at PHL International Airport.
Yes, I would.
Will pick up be March 2nd and return March 8th?
No, I'm going to pick it up on March 3rd and return it on the 5th of this month.
Is there a type of car you want?
I'd like a Standard car.
And what time do you want to pick it up?
I want to get it at 5:45 in the evening.
You want a Standard car from PHL International Airport with a pick up on March 3rd at 5:45 pm and a return on March 5th. Shall I proceed with the rental?
Yes, please do. How much is the total? And what kind of car is it?
I've booked the rental. It was $68 in altogether. And the car is a Chevrolet Cruze.
Okay, that's all I need. Thank you.
Have a terrific day!
Can you help me book a round trip flight for 2?
Sure, when are you leaving and returning and where are you going?
I'm going to LA on the day after tomorrow and returning on the 9th.
Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Atlanta.
I found an American Airlines flight for $193 per ticket. It leaves Atlanta at 2:30 pm and leaves LA at 5:25 pm.
Great, can you help me get a couple of economy tickets for that flight?
Sure, just to confirm, you need 2 economy tickets for the American Airlines flight from Atlanta to Los Angeles on March 3rd at 2:30 pm with a return flight on March 9th at 5:25 pm.
Great, what time will I get back home?
I've reserved your ticket. You'll arrive back at 1:24 am.
Great, I'll also need a rental car until the 8th of March.
Are you picking up on March 3rd at LAX International Airport? Do you know what kind of car you want?
Actually I'll need it on the 4th and I want a small one.
What time do you want it?
In the evening 5:15.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like to pickup a compact car from LAX International Airport on March 4th at 5:15 pm and drop it off on March 8th.
Yes, what kind of car is it?
I've confirmed your reservation and it will be a Chevrolet Bolt.
Awesome, thanks a lot.
Anything else I can do for you?
Not right now, thank you.
Have a good day!
Could you find round trip flights for me? There are four in my group. I do not care about the airline.
When will you leave and return? Where are you leaving from?
I want to leave on the 2nd of this month and return on 6th of March. I will leave from Atlanta.
Where will you visit?
I want to go to NYC.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6:25 am. The return leaves at 11:20 am. This tikcet costs $130.
That flight sounds good. Would you buy me economy tickets?
Please confirm that you want to leave from Atlanta and go to New York on American Airlines. You will leave on March 2nd at 6:25 am and return on March 6th at 11:20 am. This is an economy flight for 4 people.
Sounds good to me. Could I get a refund on the ticket i I needed one? Which airport does the flight arrive at?
The ticket has been confirmed and is refundable. You will arrive at JFK International Airport.
Thank you for helping. I would like to reseve a rental car there.
Would you like to pick it up on March 2nd and drop it off on March 6th? What time do you need to pick it up?
I would like to pick it up at half past 3 in the afternoon on March 3rd. I will drop it off on the 5th.
Would you full-size, standard or something else?
I would like a small car.
Could you confirm that you want to pick up the compact car from JFK International Airport on March 3rd at 3:30 pm, and that you will drop it off on March 5th?
No, I would like an intermediate car.
Could you confirm that you want the standard car dropped off on March 5th?
Sounds good to me.
The car was reserved.
Thank you for helping. That is all I needed.
Have a good one.
Could you look for round trip flights for me? I would like to leave next Friday. I need to return on 14th of this month.
Where do you want to leave from?
There are four people in my group and I will leave from San Diego.
Where do you want to visit?
I want to go to Seattle.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 4:10 am and returning at 8:15 am. This ticket costs $215.
That flight sounds great. Would you help me find flights?
Could you confirm that you want to leave from San Diego and go to Seattle? This flight is American Airlines. It leaves on March 8th and returns on March 14th. The onward flight leaves at 4:10 am while the return flight leaves at 8:15 am. You need 4 economy tickets. Is this right?
Sounds great.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
I would like a rental car there for March 9th.
What sort of car do you want to prefer?
I would like a medium-sized car.
Would you drop it off on March 14th? Would you like to pick it up at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and return it?
That sounds good. I will pick it up at afternoon 3:30 and need the car until the 11th.
Could you confirm that you want the Standard car for Seattle-Tacoma International Airport on March 9th at 3:30 pm? You can drop it off March 11th.
Sounds great. How much is the total cost?
The car has been reserved and costs $72 in total.
Thank you for helping. That is all I wanted.
Have a good day.
On this Sunday, could you find a round trip flight for me?
From which place you are moving from? What do you want to visit?
I am moving from London, UK to ATL.
When will you return back?
I will be back on March 11th.
A flight from American Airlines which leaves at 8:35 pm and the return flight will leave at 3:30 pm. The cost of the ticket is $371.
Whether any other flights available? I like United Airlines.
I searched and found 1 flight for you. It is a United Airlines flight which moves at 0:25 am and the return flight will leave at 6:15 am. The cost of the ticket is $343.
Is is refundable?
Sorry. The ticket is not refundable.
It is good for me.
Shall I book the ticket?
Yes. Book the ticket.
Kindly ensure that, on March 3rd, a United Airlines Economy class flight from London to Atlanta is moving at 0:25 am. The return date is March 11th and the flight leaves at 6:15 am. The ticket has been reserved for 1 person.
Yes. It is good. What is the arriving time of the flight?
Your ticket is booked. The return flight reaches at 0:49 am.
I wish to book a rental car there. I need a Compact car from the 4th to March 9th.
Are you want to pick it up at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. When will you need it?
It is good. I will pick it up at 16:15
Kindly ensure that, on March 4th, a Compact car from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport will pick up you at 4:15 pm and on March 9th, it will drop you.
Nope. On 5th of this month, I wish to pick it up at Charles de Gaulle Airport.
Kindly ensure that, on March 5th you will be picked up from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
It is good.
Your car is booked.
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other thing?
No. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
I want to find tickets for a round trip flight, and I want to leave today.
Can you tell me from where you will leave, and where you want to arrive? Can you also tell me when you plan to return?
I will be flying from Portland, and I want to arrive in SFO. I want to return from my flight on Friday next week.
There are 5 flights which match what you want. One of the flights is Alaska Airlines which departs at 7:55 am, and when it returns it flies at 12:20 pm. The ticket of this flight costs $133.
Can you check if there are other flights available? I need the tickets for 3 people, and I want to fly with Southwest Airlines.
There is 1 flight which matches what you requested. The flight is with Southwest Airlines and it departs at 3:15 pm, and when it returns it flies at 11:30 pm. The ticket for this flight will cost you $117.
This flight seems as what I want.
Do you want to book tickets for this flight?
I want to buy Economy tickets for this flight.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class tickets for 3 people for the flight with Southwest Airlines which departs from Portland on March 1st at 3:15 pm to arrive in San Francisco, and it returns on March 8th at 11:30 pm?
That suits me well.
Your requested ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help. I also need to make a booking for a rental car there. I will pick the rental car at night 8.
Will you be going at SFO International Airport? Will you be picking the car up on March 1st, and will need the car till March 8th?
Alright, that seems nice. I want to have the car on March 6th, and I will be needing to rent the car till 7th of this month.
Would you like to have a car which is Compact. Full-size, or something else?
I would prefer to have a medium-sized car.
Can you please confirm that you want to rent a Standard car which you will pick up from SFO International Airport on March 6th at 8 pm, and you will need the car till March 7th.
Alright, that's what I want. Can you tell me how much it will cost me?
Your requested rental car has been booked. The renting of this car costs $29.
I appreciate your help very much. That would be all.
Have a good time!
Search round trip flights to London.
From where?
LA
When do you plan to leave and return?
From March 1st till the 6th.
I found an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:05 am with your return flight leaving at 3:05 pm. The total is $362.
Sounds great.
Would you like to purchase these tickets?
Yes please. Three tickets in economy class.
To confirm, you would like 3 economy seats from Los Angeles to London on American Airlines from March 1st till March 6th with departure flight leaving at 9:05 am and returning flight leaving at 3:05 pm?
Yes sounds good
Ticket is confirmed
What time will I return and will there be one or more stops?
There is only 1 stop and it will arrive at 8:54 pm.
Can you find me a rental car?
Sure. Would you also like it for March 1st?
I need it on Sunday this week.
For what time? Is Heathrow International Airport okay for pickup?
I'll need it till the 5th of this month and would like to pick it up around 9:45 in the morning.
Would you like a standard or full-size vehicle?
Compact
So you would like a compact car from Heathrow International Airport from March 3rd till March 5th and you would like to pick it up at 9:45 am?
Sounds great. What kind of car? How much will it be?
I have reserved a Kia Forte for $58.
Thanks. That will be all.
Have a good day.
Can you help me find round trip flights? I'd like to return on March 13th and I have no preference for the airline.
Where are you leaving from and where did you plan on going?
I'm leaving from Paris and going to Chicago.
When did you plan on leaving?
I will leave on the 2nd of this month.
I found 1 flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines flight with the outbound flight leaving at 11:20 pm and the return flight leaving at 6:40 pm for $270.
What is the destination airport?
The flight will arrive at O'Hare International Airport.
How many stops will the flight have and where is the origin airport?
The flight has 0 stops and the origin airport is Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
That flight will work for me.
Did you want to buy tickets for it?
Yes, I would like to buy the ticket. I have three people in my group and I would like to travel in Economy.
Please confirm you're booking a Delta Airlines flight for 3 passengers from Paris to Chicago departing on March 2nd at 11:20 pm and returning on March 13th at 6:40 pm in Economy class.
Yes, that is correct. When will the return flight arrive?
Your reservation has been made. The return flight will arrive at 11:36 am.
When will the onward flight arrive and is the ticket refundable?
The onward flight will arrive at 2:16 am but unfortunately the ticket is non-refundable.
Thank you. I'd also like to book a rental car there. I'd like a large car.
Would you like to pick it up on March 2nd?
I will be needing the car on the 6th.
What time will you need the car and will you drop it off on March 13th?
I will need the car until March 11th and I'll be picking it up at six in the evening.
Please confirm you're picking up the Full-size car from O'Hare International Airport on March 6th at 6 pm and dropping it off on March 11th.
Yes, that is correct. What will the total cost be?
Your car has been booked. The total cost of the reservation will be $235.
Thank you, that's all I need.
Have a wonderful day!
Could you look up a flight for me for 4 people?
Sure! Where are you wanting to visit?
I'd like to go to NYC.
When would you return?
Well, there's 3 people in my group and I want to get back on the 12th. We'd leave from Chicago.
When do you plan to leave?
I'd like to leave later today if possible.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 12:30 pm and returns at 5:25 am. Each ticket costs $131.
Does it have zero stops? Could I get a refund if I need?
Unfortunately, there is no refund available. There are 0 stops.
Any other flights?
There's a Delta airlines flight that leaves at 9:15 am and returns at 6 am for $137 each ticket.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you reserve these tickets?
Okay. Please confirm the following: You'll be leaving from Chicago going to New York with Delta Airlines on March 1st at 9:15 am. You will return March 12th leaving at 6 am. These are for 3 tickets with Economy seating. Is this correct?
Yes, that's good. When will the flight arrive when I return? Will it have one stop?
There will be 0 stops and it arrives at 7:19 am.
I'd like to reserve a rental car, too.
Do you want a compact or full-size vehicle? Or something else?
I'd like a Standard.
What time will you need it? Would you want to drop it off March 12th?
I'd like to get it at 15:30 and would want it until the 10th of March.
Are you going to pick it up at JFK International Airport?
Yup, sounds good.
DO you want to pick it up March 1st?
I'd like it March 7th.
Okay, please confirm: you'll pick up a Standard car from JFK International Airport on March 7th around 3:30 pm. You will drop it off on March 10th.
Yes, that's good. How much will it be?
The total cost for your car will be $87. Your car has also been reserved.
Awesome, thanks so much. That's everything.
You're welcome, have a good day.
I need to look for a round trip flight. 4 people will be traveling.
Where will you be traveling from and to? And when will you be returning?
I'll be traveling from Philadelphia to Chicago. And I want to return on March 10th.
And when will you be leaving?
I want to leave on Tuesday next week.
There's a Delta Airlines flight with an outbound departure at 12:20 pm and return flight that leaves at 9:40 pm. It's $138.
That'll work, please get me tickets.
I'll get you 4 Economy ticket for Philadelphia to Chicago on Delta Airlines. The outbound flight is March 5th at 12:20 pm. The return flight is March 10th at 9:40 pm. Is everything correct?
Yeah, that's correct. Can I refund the ticket? Also what's the arrival airport?
I've booked the tickets, however, they are not refundable. The arrival airport is O'Hare International Airport.
I also want to rent a car when I'm there.
Do you want the car from March 5th to March 10th?
No, I'm going to need it from the 7th of this month until the 9th.
What kind of car do you want?
I'd prefer a Compact car.
What time would you like to pick it up?
I can go and get it at 17:30. I'm going to need it until next Friday actually.
I'll reserve you a Compact car for pick up at O'Hare International Airport on March 7th at 5:30 pm with a return on March 8th. Is that correct?
No, I actually want to pick it up at 3:30 in the afternoon.
Okay, so the pick up is March 7th at 3:30 pm?
Wait, no. I actually want to pick it on the the 6th of March.
So pick up will be March 6th at 3:30 pm?
Yeah, that's it. What's the cost all together, and what's the car name?
I've booked the rental. It's $70 all together and it's a Mini Cooper.
Thanks a lot. That's all for now.
Have an excellent day!
Please find me a round trip flights in United Airlines.
Where are you going and where you coming from?When do you plan to go back?
I am planning to go to Vancouver BC from Atlanta. I want to get back on March 11th.
When you will leave?
On 3rd of this month.
Okay, you want 1 flight with United Airlines for only $248 with an outbound flight leave at 6:15 am and return flights at 3:15 am. Please confirm.
Which airport it will arrive?
At YVR International Airport.
That's good.
Will I buy you tickets now?
Yes.
Okay, you want 1 economy seat with United Airlines going to Vancouver from Atlanta on march 3rd until March 11th with an outbound flight leaves at 6:15 am and return flights at 3:15 am. Please confirm.
Yes, is the ticket refundable?
No, it's not. Your ticket is now confirmed!
How many stops does this flight have and which airport it departs from?
It departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport with 1 stops.
Thanks. Please find me a intermediate rental car going there.
Will you pick it up on March 3rd until March 11th?
I want to pick it up on 4th of March at quarter to 4 in the afternoon until 5th of March.
Okay, you want a Standard car and you will pick it up from YVR International Airport on March 4th at 3:45 pm until March 5th. Please confirm.
yes.
Car reserved!
How much would that costs me and what is the name of the car?
Hyundai Elantra costs $30.
Thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Hi, could you help me purchase a round flight for 1 which returns on the 7th?
Sure, where do you plan to depart and travel to?
I will be travelling from San Diego to Phoenix.
And when do you plan to depart?
I plan to leave this Saturday.
There are 4 flights you may like, one of which is an American Airlines flight which departs at 3:15 pm and returns at 6:25 am which will cost you $143.
Sure, this is great!
Would you like me to purchase the tickets for you?
Yes, please do so, thanks!
Please confirm your purchase of 1 economy class American Airlines tickets from San Diego to Phoenix, which departs on March 2nd at 3:15 pm and returns on March 7th at 6:25 am.
Sure, may I know what time does my return flight arrive?
Your return flight arrives at 9:34 am. Your reservation has been made!
Could you help me rent a full-size car on March 5th in that area too?
Sure, what time do you need the car from and will you be picking the car up at Sky Harbor International Airport?
Yes, I will be picking it up at evening 5:30.
Sure, and do you intend do drop the car off on March 7th?
I will be using the car till next Wednesday.
Please confirm your rental of a full-size car at Sky Harbor International Airport from March 5th at 5:30 pm to March 6th.
Sure, how much will this cost me in total?
Your reservation has been made! This will cost you $46 in total.
Sure, that is all the help I need.
No worries, have a safe trip!
I need a round trip flight.
Where are you departing and travelling to?
Two people are going to Vegas out of CDMX.
What day are you returning?
I am returning on March 14th.
What day are you departing?
I am departing the day after tomorrow.
Search found 1 result which is an American Airlines flight that costs $259. The first flight departs at 8:05 am and the second flight departs at 6:40 am.
That is perfect.
Shall I get you plane tickets?
Yes, purchase plane tickets for me.
You want 2 Economy tickets on American Airlines from Mexico City to Las Vegas. The first flight departs March 3rd at 8:05 am and the second flight departs March 14th at 6:40 am. Is that right?
That would be correct.
Your booking is successful.
I need a small rental car for there.
What time are you getting it and will you pick it up at McCarran International Airport?
Yes, I will pick it up there at five pm and I need it until the 11th of this month.
Will you get the car on March 3rd?
I will pick the car up on the 9th of this month.
You want a Compact car for pickup at McCarran International Airport on March 9th at 5 pm and will return it on March 11th. Is that right?
That is right. How much does this cost me?
Your booking is complete and your total bill is $66.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I want to find a round trip flight
Where are you coming from and when do you want to leave and come back?
I'm leaving Saturday this week from Los Angeles and want to be back on the 12th.
Where are you headed?
I'm going to Paris
OK, there's an American airlines flight that leaves at 9:40 am and will return at 4:05 am that will cost $311
That sounds great
Should I book it?
Yes please do
Confirming your 1 economy ticket on American Airlines from Los Angeles to Paris that leaves March 2nd at 9:40 am and returns March 12th at 4:05 am
Yes please, that's right
OK it's now booked
Now help me find a rental car there too please
Are you returning in on March 12th as well?
I'll pick it up in the evening 7:15 pm and will need it till Wednesday next week.
Do you want something standard, compact, large? Do you want to pick it up on March 2nd?
I need the car on Monday next week, and I want a large car.
Are you also picking it up at Charles de Gaulle International Airport?
Yes that's right
Confirming your full-size car pickup from Charles de Gaulle International Airport? on March 4th at 7:15 pm with a March 6th return date.
Yes that's right
Your car is now booked
Thanks for that
Sure, can I do something else?
No, we're good now
Then enjoy your day!
Could you find round trip flights for me and i like to get back on march 6th.
When do you decided to leave? From which place are you leaving and to which place you are going?
I decided to leave on 2nd of this month from Sydney, Australia and traveling to Phoenix.
I have short listed 1 flights of your likings. One among them is Delta Airlines which leaves at 5:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 11:55 am and ticket cost is $333
This is perfect flight for me.
Can i buy the tickets for it?
Yes. I like to buy the tickets and want to travel in economy class.
Please give confirmation details: The flight is Delta Airlines which starts from sydney and goes to Phoenix with economy class and number of passenger is 1. The date of travel is on march 2nd and return date is march 6th. The onward flight leaves at 5:50 pm and return flight leaves at 11:55 am.
That is cool.
Your ticket is booked.
On what date the onward flight arrive?
It arrive at 9:18 am.
Thanks a lot for the help. I like to book a rental car there. Car should be compact and i want the car till the 4th.
Is the Sky Harbor International Airport is your picking up spot?
Yes. This is perfect.
At what time you need the car?
I want to pick it up at 18:00
Are you like to pick it up on march 2nd?
I want the car on 3rd of march till 5th of this month.
Please give confirmation details: Sky Harbor International Airport is the picking up spot on march 3rd at 6 pm. The drop-off date is on march 5th and the car is compact.
This is cool. Can you tell me the car name and the total price?
Your car has been booked and the car is Volkswagen GTI. Cost of booking is $64.
Thank you so much
Do you need any other help?
No, thanks for the help.
Have a nice day.
Search some round trip flights for me.
What are your travel dates and location?
i am traveling LAX to san francisco in a group of 2 and would get back on 14th of march
When do you leave?
I leave next monday and want to travel in economy
I have found 3 flights for you. There is an alaska airlines flight at 5:50 pm. The return flight leaves at 7:10 pm and costs $106
Sounds okay to me.
Should I buy the tickets then?
Yes, do that.
Booking 2 economy tickets for Alaska airlines flight from los angeles to san francisco on march 4th at 5:50 pm with a return flight on march 14th at 7:10 pm
okay, sounds good
Booking is confirmed.
How many stops would be there?
There are 0 stops on this flight
Thanks a lot
Is there anything else I can help with?
sure. I also need to rent a compact car
Is the pickup SFO international airport fine?
Yes, that works
What time should I book for?
Make the pick up for 19:30
THe pickup date is march 4th right?
No, it is 6th of march.
And the drop off date march 14th?
no, it is the 10th
Booking a compact car from SFO international airport from march 6th 7:30 pm to march 10th
Okay, that is correct
Booking is confirmed
Thanks, that would be all
Have a great trip.
Can you find round trip flights?
Where are you going and when are you returning?
I'm going to Los Angeles and returning on March 12th.
Where are you departing from and when?
I'm leaving Wednesday next week from CDMX.
I found 3 flights. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:05 am and the return flight leaves at 2:45 pm. The ticket is $156.
Sounds good, I want to buy the tickets.
Please confirm: 1 American Airlines ticket in economy seating from Mexico City to Los Angeles. The flight leaves March 6th and returns March 12th. The departing flight leaves at 8:05 am and the return flight leaves at 2:45 pm.
No, I need 3.
Please confirm: 3 passengers for the return flight at 2:45 pm.
That's correct. Thanks.
Your tickets have been reserved.
Thank you. I want to find a rental car.
Do you want to pick up on March 6th and drop off March 12th?
I need the car from March 7th til the 11th.
What kind of car do you want? Are you picking up from LAX International Airport? What time do you want to pick it up?
Yes, that's correct. I want a spacious car and I want to pick it up at 4 o"clock in the evening.
Please confirm: Picking up full-size rental car from LAX International Airport. Pick up is March 7th at 4 pm and drop-off is March 11th.
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservation has been made.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a good day!
I want to get a round trip flight.
Where would you like to go and where would you be leaving from? When would you like to return?
I would be leaving Washington on the 2nd of this month and arriving at New York on the 11th of this month.
There is an outbound flight on american airlines that leaves at 6:05 am. It would be returning at 10:55 am and costs $86
Which airport would the flight be leaving from and what time does the onward flight arrive?
It would be leaving dulles international airport. The onward flight arrives at 7:15 am.
That would be great. I want to get on a flight.
You would like a economy ticket for 1 on an american airlines flight from washington to new york that leaves on March 2nd at 6:05 am and returns on March 11th at 10:55 am?
I need premium economy tickets for three
You would like premium economy tickets for 3?
That would be great.
I have reserved the ticket.
Is it refundable? Which airport would the flight be landing at?
I am sorry but the ticket is non-refundable. You would be landing at JFK international airport.
Thanks a lot. I would need a rental car.
You would like to drop it off on march 11th? For what time would you like it?
I would like it on the 8th of this month for quarter past 10 in the morning.
Would you like to pick it up on March 2nd?
I want it on the 7th of March.
Would like a full-size, compact or another kind of car?
I just want a spacious car.
You would like to pick up a full-size car at JFK international airport on March 7th at 10:15 am till March 8th?
I want a compact car for the 9th.
You want a compact car for March 9th?
No, I want it on March 4th.
You want a compact car for March 4th?
Yes, that would be great.
I have reserved the car.
Thanks very much. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
I am going to phoenix, az
where are you going to and when?
southwest airlines tuesday next week and I want to be back the 14th and leaving from sf.
southwest airlines 1 flight please that leaves at 11:10 pm and returnd 6 am and is $132
flight has 1 stop and what airport?
sfo international airport and 0 stops
that sounds good
should I get tickets for it?
yes I want it
confirm san francisco that goes to phoenix and is southwest airlines and leaves march 5th and returnd march 14th and leaves at 11:10 pm and leaves at 6 am and is economy and there is 1 passenger
yes that works
the ticket is confirmed
I wanna get phoenix sky harbor airport with full-size car
get it march 5th
I want it march 6th
drop off march 14th
get it 16:15 and till 10th of march.
confirm sky harbor international airport on march 6th and car is 4:15 pm and drop off is march 10th and full-size car
yes that is fine
car is nissan rogue and cost is $136
thanks a lot
anything else for you?
no thank you
have a good one
Would you mind looking for roundtrip flights for me?
Of course not. Where are you departing from?
I'll be leaving from LAX and returning on March 9th and there will be four people in my party.
What is your destination and when are you departing?
Going to Seattle on the 3rd of March.
There are 5 flights that might work for you. Alaska Airlines has a flight leaving at 7:10 PM with a 3:45 PM return which is a $151 ticket.
Could you tell me what else you have?
Sure, I've got an American Airlines flight at 11:45 PM and that comes back at 8:15 AM. That ticket costs $150.
I think that works.
How else may I help you?
I'd like to buy economy tickets please.
Confirming an American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Seattle departing on March 3rd at 11:45 PM and returning on March 9th at 8:15 AM for 4 economy passengers.
Perfect, thank you. Where does the flight leave from?
From LAX International Airport. The reservation has been booked.
I'm going to need a rental car too please.
Is that for pickup at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport?
Yes it is and I'd like a small car.
When would you like to pick up?
I'll need it by 5 o"clock in the evening.
On March 3rd?
Actually I've got to have it on the 5th of this month.
For a March 9th drop-off?
No, just till the 7th of March.
Confirming a compact car rental for pickup from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport on March 5th at 5 PM and returning on March 7th.
Excellent. What kind of car is it and how much?
The vehicle is eight Chevrolet Bolt and it will cost $62. The reservation is complete.
Thank you for your help.
It's my pleasure.
I want you to help me find a round trip flight.
Can you tell me the time when you will be coming back? From where will you leave for your flight?
I want to travel in Economy class, and I want to have tickets for 2 people, for a flight which leaves from New York, and it returns on the 9th.
Can you tell me which is your destination?
I want to arrive in London?
When do you want to have this trip?
I want to leave for my trip on March 1st.
There are 2 flights which suits what you requested from. One of the flights is the American Airlines flight which leaves at 6:15 pm, and when it returns it flies at 2:05 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $282.
Can you tell me the airport where this flight will go to? Can you check if the flight has 0 stops?
The number of stops for this flight is actually 1, and this flight will arrive at Heathrow International Airport.
Is there some other flight you can recommend?
Another flight I can suggest with Delta Airlines which leaves at 6:20 pm, and when it returns it flies at 3:35 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $255.
This flight suits me well.
Do you want to buy tickets for this flight?
Yes I want to make reservation for tickets for this flight.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class flight ticket for 2 people for the flight of Delta Airlines which leaves from New York on March 1st at 6:20 pm to arrive in London, and when it returns it flies at 3:35 pm on March 9th.
Alright, that seems nice.
Your requested ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help. I also need to find a rental car there.
Are you going to pick up the car on March 1st?
I want to have the car on Saturday this week.
Will you need the car till March 9th? Is there a specific kind of car you want to have? Can you confirm that you will pick up the car from Heathrow International Airport?
That seems right. The car I want to have should be an intermediate one, and I will need it till March 7th.
Can you tell me the time when you need to have the car?
I want to pick up the car at afternoon 3:45.
Can you please confirm that you want to have a Standard car which you will pick up on March 2nd at Heathrow International Airport at 3:45 pm, and will need the car till March 7th.
Yes, the details are correct.
I apologize but I couldn't book your requested car. Another good car I can recommend is a Chevrolet Cruze which you can pick up on March 2nd at Heathrow International Airport, and will cost you $130.
Also this one seems nice to me.
Unfortunately I could not book this car. Is there something else I can help you with?
Can you try again to make a reservation for a Compact car?
Can you please confirm that you want to book a Compact car which you will pick up on March 2nd at Heathrow International Airport at 3:45 pm, and will need the car till March 7th?
Alright, that seems good also.
I apologize but I could not make the booking for this car. Another nice car I can suggest is a Kia Forte which you can pick up on March 2nd at Heathrow International Airport, and it would cost you $145.
No, I don't want this car. That would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
I am in need of finding a round trip flight.
Can you tell me when you will be leaving? Can you tell me what is your destination, and when will you be returning?
I will need tickets for two people, and I will be leaving for my trip on 2nd of this month. I want to arrive in Paris, and I want to return on the 14th.
Can you tell me from where you will depart?
I will be departing from NYC.
There are 2 flights which match what you need. One of the flights is the American Airlines flight which leaves at 3:40 pm, and it returns at 4:05 am. The ticket for this flight costs $301.
This flight seems nice. I want you to buy me Economy class tickets for this flight.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class tickets for 2 people for the American Airlines flight which leaves from New York on March 2nd at 3:40 pm to arrive in Paris, and returns on March 14th at 4:05 am?
That suits me well. Can you tell me if the tickets are refundable? Also please tell me from which airport will the flight depart?
Your requested tickets have been booked. I regret to say but the tickets can not be refunded. The flight you asked for leaves from JFK International Airport.
I appreciate your help. I also need to rent a car there.
Will you need to rent the car till March 14th?
No that's not right, because I will need the car till the 10th.
Which is the time that you need to rent the car? Are you willing to pick the car up at Charles de Gaulle International Airport?
Yes, that seems right. I will be picking the car up at 4:45 in the evening.
Would you like to pick the car up on March 2nd? Is there a specific kind of car you would like to rent?
I want to rent the car on March 8th, and the car I want is a Compact one.
Can you please confirm that the car you want to rent is a Compact car, and that you will pick it up on March 8th at 4:45 pm from Charles de Gaulle International Airport, and you will need the car till March 10th?
That's what I want.
I apologize but your requested car could not be booked. There is also another nice car which is a Nissan Leaf and can be picked up at Charles de Gaulle International Airport on March 8th. Renting this car will cost you $52.
No I don't want it. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I need a plane ticket for a round trip I'm taking on the 8th of this month.
When will you come back and where are you now?
I'm leaving Los Angeles on the 12th of March.
Where to you want to go?
I'm headed to Mexico City
You do have 3 choices. What about the American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:45 pm? It's return takes off at 8:05 am. You have to pay $161.
I will need three tickets, are there other choices?
Will you like Delta Airlines which takes off at 9:15 am? The return is a 1:45 pm flight. It will run you $253.
When will I land back in Los Angeles? What about Mexico City?
You'll get to Mexico City at 6:53 pm. When you get home it will be 5:15 pm.
Are there any more flights that have good Economy tickets?
There might be 1. Do you think you'd like the United Airlines that leaves at 4:25 am? It's return takes off at 8:45 pm. The price is $152 which you might like.
That sounds pretty good.
What can I help with?
Get me them tickets machine.
Sure, to be clear: United Airlines flight leaving Los Angeles at 4:25 am on March 8th, Economy class, 3 people. You're headed to Mexico city, which you'll leave from on March 12th at 8:45 pm.
Wonderful, that's going to save me money.
Your ticket is set.
Hey, get me a rental car there.
You want it on March 8th right? What time?
No wrong, I want it on March 9th. I can get it around in the afternoon 2:30.
Will you bring it back on March 12th?
No I'll need a standard car until the 11th only.
what about picking up and dropping off at Benito Juarez International Airport?
That's perfect, thanks.
To be sure: Pick up your standard car at 2:30 pm on March 9th from Benito Juarez International Airport and you'll bring it back there March 11th?
Fine, how much, and what kind of ride will I end up with?
You have the car all set, it's going to be Nissan Sentra and it only costs $50.
Fine, you rock.
Have a safe and fun trip.
I want you to find me a round trip flight which leaves from Portland, OR.
Can you tell me when are you planning to leave?
I want to leave for my trip on March 1st.
Can you tell me when will you be returning, and where would you like to go?
I want to arrive to CDMX, and I want to return next Friday.
I can suggest a Delta Airlines flight, which leaves at 8:45 am, and when it returns it flies at 1:45 pm. The ticket for the flight costs $266.
Is there some other flight you can suggest?
There is another flight with United Airlines which leaves at 12:05 pm, and when it returns it flies at 8:25 am. The ticket for this flight costs $310.
This flight seems as what I want. Can you buy me the tickets for this flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class ticket for 1 person for the United Airlines flight which flies from Portland on March 1st at 12:05 pm to go to Mexico City, and when it returns it takes off on March 8th at 8:25 am.
Alright, that seems right.
Your requested ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help. I also need to rent a car there.
Can you tell me if you are going to pick up the car on March 1st?
I want to rent the car on the 4th.
Will you need the car till March 8th? Can you please tell me the time when you need to have the car, and what kind of car you would like to rent?
I want the car to be a spacious one, and I will need it till March 5th. I will pick up the rented car at 2:15 in the afternoon.
Will you be picking the car up at Benito Juarez International Airport?
Yes, that is correct.
Can you please confirm that you want to rent a Full-size car which you will pick up from Benito Juarez International Airport on March 4th at 2:15 pm, and will need it till March 5th?
Alright, that seems as what I want.
Your requested car has been booked.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a wonderful time!
I wanna be back 14th of this month
where are you leaving from?
leaving from san francisco
where and when are you leaving?
4th of march to sd
3 flights alaska airlines 6:10 am leaves 11:10 am price is $111
how many stops?
it is 0
is it refundable?
leaves sfo international airport
that is good
buy tickets for it
yes I do
san francisco to san diego alaska airlines leaves march 4th departs march 14th onward 6:10 am returns 11:10 am seating economy 1 passenger
yes that works
it is a go
thanks a loy
pick up march 4th? pick up san international airport?
yes that works march 8th
march 14th drop for full-size, standard
intermediate till the 13th and pick up 5:45 pm
confirm san international airport pickup march 8th 5:45 pm drop march 13th standard
roissy airport small car
charles de gaulle international airport compact car
yes that works
car is reserved
thanks a lot
have a good one
Please help me find a round trip flights.
Where are you going?
To NYC.
When do you plan to leave and come back? And where you are coming from?
I am planning to leave on the 1st until the 8th and I am coming from San Francisco.
How about American Airlines for only $221 with an outbound flight leaves at 8:30 pm and return flight leaves at 4:45 pm?
When does mt return and onward flight arrive?
Return flights arrives at 8:11 pm and return flight arrives at 5:56 am.
Any other available flights?
How about Southwest Airlines for only $223 with an outbound flight leaves at 9:20 pm and return flight leaves at 5:55 pm?
Any other available flights?
How about United Airlines for only $220 with an outbound flight leaves at 5:50 am and return flight leaves at 6:05 am?
That one is good. Please help me buy the tickets.
Okay, you want 1 economy seat at United Airlines going to New York from San Francisco on March 1st until March 8th with an onward flight that leaves at 5:50 am and return flight that leaves at 6:05 am. Please confirm.
That's great!
Ticket confirmed!
Please help me reserve a rental car going there.
What type of car do you want and do you need it until March 8th?
I need a Full-size car until 7th of March.
Will you pick it up on March 1st and until what time do you need it? Do you prefer picking it up at JFK International Airport?
Yes, that's perfect. I need it on 4th of March at 5 o"clock in the evening.
Okay, you want a Full-size car and you will pick it up from JFK International Airport on March 4th at 5 pm until march 7th. Please confirm.
Yes, that's great!
Car reserved!
Thanks for your help.
No worries.
Can you find me some round trip flights?
Can you first tell me your departure date?
I'm leaving on Sunday this week. Find something in Economy.
Can you tell me your return date?
On the 8th.
Can you give me your destination?
I'm traveling to Phoenix, AZ.
Can you give me your departure city?
I'm leaving from CDMX.
I found 2 flights that might be convenient for you. How about American Airlines? There is an outbound flight that leaves at 8:05 am. The return flight leaves 7:35 am. The ticket costs $253.
How many stops are there?
Just 1 stop.
When do the flights arrive?
The flight arrives at 1:38 pm and the return flight arrives at 8:05 pm.
Can you help me book tickets? That flight sounds good.
I am booking an Economy flight to Phoenix on American Airlines for 1 passenger. The flight leaves from Mexico City on March 3rd. The flight will leave at 8:05 am. The return flight on March 8th will leave at 7:35 am.
Yes, that sound good.
Your ticket is confirmed.
What is the arrival airport?
Sky Harbor International Airport.
Thanks. I need to reserve a small rental car until Thursday next week.
Would you like to pick the car up on March 3rd? What time will you need it?
I want to pick up on the 5th of this month at half past 3 in the afternoon.
Confirming that you want to pick up a Compact rental car at Sky Harbor International Airport on March 5th at 3:30 pm. You will be dropping the car off on March 7th. Is this information correct?
No, I want to pick it up at 3:15 pm.
You want to pick the Compact car up at 3:15 pm?
Yes, that is correct.
I was unable to reserve that car. How about a Volkswagen GTI? It is available for pickup on March 5th at the Sky Harbor International Airport. It costs $54 total.
Yes, that sounds good.
Sorry. I couldn't reserve that car. How about a Volkswagen GTI? It is available for pickup on March 5th at the Sky Harbor International Airport. It costs $54 total.
Forget it. That's all.
Sorry. Have a good day.
leaving 1st of march chi-town delta airlines
where and when?
the 6th los angeles
1 delta airlines flight 7:15 pm leaves 11:15 pm and is $192
I want economy
Los angeles to chicago from delta airlines departs march 1st and returns march 6th and leaves 7:15 pm and returns 11:15 pm and economy 1
four people in group
departs march 1st with 4 people
premium economy class
premium economy with 4
yes that works
ticket is good
one stop there
1:47 am with 0 stops
thanks a lot
wanna get it march 1st?
I want the car saturday this week
drop off march 6th
4:30 pm and need it till day after tomorrow
O'hare international airport
yes that is good
what type of car?
standard car please
o'hare international airport march 2nd pickup 4L30 pm drop off march 3rd standard car 4:30 pm
yes, what is the cost?
reservation is $39 total
thanks a lot
any other thing?
no thank you
bye bye now
I need round a round trip flight on the 7th of March leaving Las Vegas going to Phoenix. Can you help me?
When will you be returning?
I will be returning on the 14th of this month.
I have found 1 flight that fits your criteria. There is a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 4:40 pm and returns at 6:25 am and only costs $92.
Are those tickets refundable?
No they are not.
Okay, sounds good. Can you help me reserve a flight in Economy?
So you want me to reserve a 1 Economy ticket with American Airlines from Las Vegas going to Phoenix On March 7th leaving at 4:40 pm and returning on March 14th at 6:25 am?
Yes I do.
Your reservation is all set.
Which airport will I be leaving from and when does my return flight arrive at its destination?
The return flight leaves McCarran International Airport and arrives at 7:39 am.
Thanks. Now I need to reserve a rental car.
Will you be picking it up at Sky Harbor International Airport on March 7th and returning it on March 14th?
Yes. I need the car on the 11th of March and only until the 13th.
What kind of car do you need compact, Full-size or something different.
I would like to rent an intermediate car please.
What time will you be picking it up?
I need it at 18:00.
So you would like me to reserve a standard car rental on March 11th until March 13th from Sky Harbor International Airport with a pickup time of 6 pm.
No. I would like it at 7:30 in the evening instead.
So you would like to reserve it on March 11th with a pickup time of 7:30 pm.
Yes, I would.
Your reservation is all set.
Can you tell me the name of the car I am renting?
Yes, your reservation is for a Toyota Prius.
Thanks for all your help.
Can I do anything else for you?
No. I am all set.
Have a nice day.!
I need a round trip flight departing San Francisco next Wednesday.
When are you returning?
I am returning on the 13th of this month.
Where are you going?
I am going to ATL.
Search found 4 flights. American Airlines has a trip departing at 3:50 pm and then at 11:40 am respectively and the price is $229.
Can I get refunds with this ticket and what is the departing airport?
The flight leaves SFO International Airport and there are no refunds.
That works for me. I need 3 tickets in any class.
You want 3 Economy tickets on American Airlines from San Francisco to Atlanta. The first flight departs March 6th at 3:50 pm and the return flight departs March 13th at 11:40 am. Is that right?
That is right.
Your flight is all set.
What time does the first flight land and what airport does it land at?
You will be landing at 1:24 am at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks a bunch. I need a rental car from the 9th to the 11th and I want to get it half past 4 in the evening.
Do you prefer Full-size, Standard, or another type of car?
I want a Compact car on March 7th.
You want a Compact car at 4:30 pm on March 7th at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and want to return it March 11th. Is that right?
That is right and can you tell me the total bill?
Your booking is complete and the total is $132.
What type of car is it?
It is a Volkswagen GTI.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Can you help me find some round trip flights?
When are you coming back and where are you coming from?
I'm leaving on the 7th from NYC and wanna be back on the 14th
Where are you headed?
I'm going to LAX
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:40 pm and has a return flight at 6:20 pm that costs $271
Which airport does the flight leave from?
It departs from JFK International Airport
Are there other flights I can see?
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 7:30 am and has a 10:55 pm return flight for $200
That sounds great
Cool, what else can I do?
Can you buy me four tickets on that flight?
Confirming your Economy Delta Airlines flight for 4 from New York to Los Angeles on March 7th with a March 14th return date that leaves at 7:30 am and has a 10:55 pm return flight
Yes that's great
Your ticket is confirmed
Great, is it refundable? Does it have 0 stops?
Yes 0 stops and it is non-refundable
Thanks for the help, no help me find a rental car that I need till the 12th?
Do you wanna pick it up at LAX International Airport directly?
Yes, a full-size car at 15:30 pick up please.
Do you want to pick it up on March 7th?
I need it on the 11th of March actually
Confirming your March 11th 3:30 pm pickup at LAX International Airport with a March 12th drop off date for your full-size car.
Yes that's good
Your car is reserved
Thanks so much, that's all I need right now
Great, have a safe trip
I'm looking for a roundtrip flight leaving from Vancouver, BC on March 1st.
What is your destination and your return date?
I'll be going to New York and coming back on the 11th of March.
I have 2 possible flights for you. Delta Airlines has a flight that leaves at 3:20 AM and comes back at 6 am which costs $332.
From which airport?
That flies out of YVR International Airport.
What else do you have?
There's a United Airlines plane leaving at 3:15 AM which comes back at 8:20 AM and that ticket price is $304.
Leading from where please?
That also departs from YVR International Airport.
I think that will work. I'd like to buy tickets.
Confirming a flight on United Airlines from Vancouver to New York on March 1st at 3:15 AM and returning March 11th at 8:20 AM. Purchasing 1 economy ticket.
Perfect, thank you.
The purchase is complete.
I also need to get a rental car on the 4th of March which I will need until Friday next week. A standard car please.
What time would you like to pick up?
I'll need it at half past 4 in the evening.
Would you like to pick up to be at JFK International Airport?
Yes I would.
Confirming a standard rental pick up from JFK International Airport on March 4th at 4:30 PM and returning on March 8th.
Sorry, I think I'll need it this Saturday.
Confirming a pickup date of March 2nd and a return date of March 8th.
May I pick it up at Roissy Airport?
Confirming a 4:30 PM pickup from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
That sounds right.
You're all set.
What kind of car is it and how much?
The vehicle is a Toyota Prius and the cost of the rental will be $234.
Thank you so much.
Is there anything else today?
No, I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
Can you get 2 round trip tickets to Atlanta, GA with a return date of March 14th?
Sure, where are you leaving from and when?
On March 1st from Seattle.
Great, I found an American Airlines flight departing at 9:45 pm and returning at 11:40 am. The price is $257.
That sounds good, can you get the tickets?
Just to confirm, you'd like 2 economy seats on the American Airlines flight from Seattle to Atlanta departing March 1st at 9:45 pm and returning on march 14th at 11:40 am?
Yes, which airports am I departing from and arriving to?
I've confirmed your reservation for the flight. You're leaving from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and arriving at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Great, I'll also need a car there.
Is your pick up date on March 1st?
No, the 7th at two pm.
Is your drop off date March 14th and do you have a preference in vehicle?
I want a compact car until the 12th.
Just to confirm, you want a compact car for pickup March 7th at 2 pm from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport with a return date of March 12th?
Yup, that's correct.
I've reserved your vehicle.
What car did I get?
You're renting a Volkswagen GTI.
How much is it?
The total reservation is $150.
Thanks, that's all for now.
My pleasure, enjoy your day.
Find me round trip flights?
What will be the date of departure and the date of return?
Date of departure is March 2nd and the date of return is March 14th.
What will be the place of departure?
Find me Delta Airlines flights from Paris.
What is your destination?
My destination is Chi-town.
I found a Delta Airlines flight which takes off at 11:20 pm and the return flight takes off at 6:40 pm. The ticket costs $272
What is the destination of the flight?
The flight lands in O'hare International Airport.
Okay. That sounds good to me. can you by me Economy tickets for the flight?
Please confirm: You want me to buy 1 Economy class ticket for Delta Airlines traveling from Paris at 11:20 pm on March 2nd to Chicago.And the return flight takes off at 6:40 pm on March 14th.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked the tickets.
Can you find whether the ticket is refundable and the number of stops?
Sorry, It is non-refundable ticket and the flight has 0 stop.
Thank you for the help! Can you reserve a rental car for me?
Is your drop off date March 14th and the pick up date March 2nd? What type of car do you want?
I want a spacious car for pick up on 4th of March and will drop it off on the 8th.
What is the pick up time?
The time for the pick up is quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a Full-size car for pick up at 12:45 pm on March 4th from O'Hare International Airport. And the drop off date is March 8th.
Yes, That is correct. can you find me the total cost and the name of the car?
I have successfully reserved the car for you. The name of the car is Honda CR-V and the price is $176.
Thank you so much!
Is there anything else I can help you with
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Hello! Could you help me search for round trip flights returning on the March 12th for 3 passengers?
Sure! Where do you plan to depart and travel to, and when do you plan to leave?
I will be departing from Seattle on the 1st of this month to Vancouver, BC.
Sure, there are 2 available flights, one of which is a Delta Airlines flight which departs at 3:20 am and returns at 7:40 am, and this will cost you $288.
Sure, could you help me purchase economy class tickets for the flight please?
Sure, please confirm your purchase for 3 economy class tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from Vancouver to Seattle from March 1st at 3:20 am to March 12th at 7:40 am.
That sounds great!
Your reservation has been made.
Could you also help me reserve a car there too?
Sure, what time will you be needing the car?
I would likely pick up the car at 4 in the evening.
Will you be picking up the car at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, and would you like a Standard, Full-size or some other type of car?
That sounds great! I would prefer to travel in a compact car please.
Sure, will you be using the car till the March 12th?
Sorry, could I pick up the car at Roissy Airport instead? I will only need the car till March 3rd.
Sure, will you be picking the car up on March 1st?
I will need the car tomorrow instead, thanks!
Please confirm your reservation for a compact car for pickup at Charles de Gaulle International Airport from March 2nd at 4 pm to March 3rd.
That sounds great with me.
Your reservation has been made!
Do you know how much will the rental cost me?
Your rental will cost you $29 in total.
Sure, thank you for your help!
Sure, do you require any further assistance?
No, that is all I need, thank you!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
Let's search for a round trip flight please.
Sure, I would love to help you. First, please tell me, Where do you want to fly to? and what date are you thinking of flying?
Let's try to get to Phoenix leaving from Vancouver, BC.
What are your travel to and fro dates please?
Sure, leaving out on March 2nd and returning on March 9th.
Ok, I can work with this. I discovered 2 flights for your consideration. Up first, Delta Airlines departing at 3:20 am and returning flight departing at 11:55 am. This ticket is $244.
This will work.
Shall we proceed and purchase your ticket now?
Yeah, go ahead and book now.
Alright, but first please confirm your details please. 1 Economy ticket on Delta Airlines. Flight will leave out of Vancouver and arrive to Phoenix. Your departure date will be on March 2nd at 3:20 am and return on March 9th, departing at 11:55 am. Do I have this correct?
Yes, please book now.
Great news, I was able to confirm your ticket.
Thanks, while we are searching I will need to reserve a car as well.
Sure, Will this pick up for a rental also be on March 2nd? Would you like a compact or Standard vehicle?
I need the car for next Tuesday and let's find an intermediate size car please.
Sure thing, Will you be returning your rental on March 9th? Will you be able to pick up the rental from Sky Harbor International Airport? I will also need to know your pick up time please.
I will need the car until the 8th of this month, I will pick up at 10:45 am and yes I can pick up there.
Alright, one moment. Please confirm we will be picking up a standard rental at Sky Harbor International Airport on March 5th at 10:45 am, I have a return date for March 8th. Is this correct.
Alright, that is correct. Find the cost and the type of car please.
Great news, I was able to confirm your rental for a Toyota Prius, total cost will be $96.
Great, thank you.
your welcome, Can I assist you with anything else?
Nope, that's it. Good bye.
Alright, have a wonderful day.
I need a roundtrip flight departing from LAX please on any airline.
What is your destination?
That's Paris, France.
When would you like to leave?
The 6th please.
And how about your return?
On the 9th.
American Airlines has a 9:40 AM flight with a 4:05 AM return and a ticket price of $377.
That should work.
Do you want to make reservations?
Yes I do.
Confirming a March 6th American Airlines flight departing at 9:40 AM from Los Angeles and returning from Paris March 9th at 4:05 AM for 1 economy ticket.
Perfect, thank you.
The reservation was successful.
Are there any stops on that flight?
Yes, there's 1 stop.
Where do I fly out of and what time do I get back?
The flight leaves from LAX International Airport and the return time is 10:40 AM.
Great. Would you mind helping me with a rental car as well? I need something I can pick up from Charles De Gaulle International Airport.
Are you planning on returning it on March 9th?
No, I'll just need it until the 8th.
What kind of car would you like, compact, full-size, or something different?
Something spacious please.
And your pickup time?
I'd like to pick it up at 14:15.
Is that on March 6th?
No, the 7th of this month.
Confirming pick up of a full-size rental car from Charles De Gaulle International Airport on March 7th at 2:15 PM and returning on March 8th.
Great. What kind of car is it and how much?
The vehicle is a Toyota Highlander and the charge will be $48 total. The reservation is complete.
Thanks for everything.
It's my pleasure.
I want to go for a short trip and for which I need to search for round trip flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
To which place you are planning to visit?
I have planned to visit Chi-town and I will return on March 9th.
Let me know about the starting date of your travel plan, so that I can search accordingly.
Search for the flights from today. Anything else you want to search?
Yes, what is your present location to search for the flight?
I want to search the flight from Portland from where am planning to leave.
Found 2 results. Hope the outbound flight with Southwest Airlines which leaves at 3:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:35 am under ticket price $293 is okay to you. How about your opinion?
Any other available flights that you have in your search list?
What about a flight with United Airlines which is an outbound flight leaves at 10:45 pm and the leaving time of return flight is 4 am for which the price of the ticket is $277? Is that okay to you?
I want to know the arrival time of my return flight for my reference. Can you get me the same?
Yes, it will arrive at 9:58 am. Hope it is okay to you.
Also I need to check whether the ticket is refundable or not? Because there will be a chance of cancelling my trip.
Sorry, the tickets are not refundable.
That is okay, I can manage and this flight is Okay for me.
Shall I book the tickets to this flight?
Yes, do it for me.
Please confirm to book 1 Economy class ticket in a Flight with United Airlines from Portland on March 1st at 10:45 pm to Chicago and the return flight leaves at 4 am on March 9th.
That is confirmed to proceed further.
I have successfully booked the tickets to that flight.
I want to search for a Car for rent to go there and I need your help to find the suitable one.
Let me know whether you want to pick up the car at O'Hare International Airport on March 1st? and at what time your want the Car for pickup?
Your mentioned place is Okay but change the date to Saturday this week at evening 6:30.
What type of car you want to book whether it is a Compact one or Full-size or something else?
I need a large size car for my ride.
Shall I proceed with the booking for drop-off date on March 9th.
No, I need to book it till March 5th. Make it as per my requirement.
Please confirm to book a Full-size Car for pickup at O'Hare International Airport from March 2nd at 6:30 pm to March 5th.
Yes, that is confirmed to proceed and also get me the details about total cost for that ride.
Total cost for that reservation will be $150 and I have booked the Car successfully.
Let me know the name of the Car so that I can identify it easily.
It is a Honda CR-V model Car.
Thank you for your all help and that's all for now.
Have a good day.
Will you fine Economy round trip flights for two?
Departure and return dates? Where are you leaving from ?
I'm departing from Vegas Wednesday next week and return on the 9th.
What's your destination?
SF.
American Airlines offers outbound flight that leaves at 5:30 am with return flight at 5:30 pm for $119.
Origin and destination airports?
Departs from McCarran International Airport and arrives at SFO International Airport.
Cool.
Buy tickets?
Yes.
Please confirm 2 Economy tickets for American Airlines from Las Vegas to San Francisco on March 6th at 5:30 am with return date of March 9th at 5:30 pm.
Fine. Does it have 1 stop? Refundable ticket?
I've completed your reservation. Nonrefundable ticket with 0 stops.
Will you reserve a car there?
Pick up March 6th at what time? Drop off on March 9th?
I want the car from next Thursday at 4 pm till the 8th.
Standard, Compact or other?
Something large.
Please confirm a Full-size car from SFO International Airport on March 7th at 4 pm with drop off on March 8th.
Cool. Name of the car?
Ford Escape. I've made your reservation.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a nice day.
I want you to find me a round trip flight. I will be departing from Seattle.
Can you tell me when you will be leaving, and when will you be returning? What is your arrival destination?
I need tickets for two people. I will be departing this Saturday, and I want to arrive in San Fran. My returning date is 6th of March.
I have found an Alaska Airlines flight which leaves at 12 pm, and when it returns it flies at 2:55 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $131.
This flight seems nice to me. Please buy the tickets for this flight, and I want the tickets to be Economy ones.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class flight tickets for 2 people for the flight of Alaska Airlines which departs from Seattle on March 2nd at 12 pm to arrive in San Francisco, and it returns on March 6th at 2:55 pm.
That suits me well. Can you tell me from which airport leaves the flight?
Your requested ticket has been booked. The flight you want leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Can you tell me the time when the return flight is expected to arrive, and if the ticket of the flight is refundable?
Your return flight should arrive at 5:06 pm. I regret to say but the flight ticket you want is not refundable.
I appreciate your help. I want to have a rental car booked there, which I will pick up at 5 pm.
Are you willing to pick the car up on March 2nd? Which kind of car you want to rent Standard, Compact or something else? Can you pick the car up at SFO International Airport?
That suits me well. I want to have a Compact car, which I will pick up on 4th of March.
Will you need the rented car till March 6th?
I will be pick up the rented car at Roissy Airport. I want to have the car on day after tomorrow. I will need to have the car rented till 4th of March.
Can you please confirm that you want to rent a Compact car which you will pick up from Charles de Gaulle International Airport on March 3rd at 5 pm, and you will need it till March 4th.
Alright that seems nice.
Your requested rental car has been booked.
Can you tell me the name of the rented car?
The name of the rented car is Nissan Leaf.
Can you tell me how much renting this car will cost me?
Renting this car would cost you $29 in total.
I appreciate your help very much. That would be all.
Have a good time!
Hello! Please can you find me a flight with round trip?
Sure! When is your return? From where will you be starting your journey?
I'll be returning on 11th of March and will be leaving from LAX.
Okay! Where are you flying? When are you planning to leave?
I'll be travelling to Atlanta, GA by next Tuesday.
Okay! The American Airlines outbound flight will leave at 5:25 pm and the return flight will leave at 2:30 pm. The cost of the ticket will be $179.
Sounds good to me.
Please can I help you to buy tickets for this flight?
Yup! Please reserve tickets in Economy class.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to reserve 1 Economy ticket in American Airlines that is flying from Los Angeles to Atlanta on March 5th at 5:25 pm and the return flight will be on March 11th at 2:30 pm. Is that right?
Nope, Please book the ticket in Premium Economy.
Okay! Please confirm that you wish to book the ticket in Premium Economy and the return flight will leave at 2:30 pm, right?
Yup, sounds good to me.
Okay! I've confirmed the ticket for you.
I'm looking for some rental car there. I can pick it up at Hartsfield-Jackson Airport. Please can you find me one?
Can you pick it up on March 5th? What is the preferred time? What type of the car like small, compact, medium etc are you looking to rent?
I'm looking for a small car to rent from next Thursday and I can pick it up at 2:45 pm.
Can you drop off on March 11th?
Nope, I can drop before that on 8th of March itself.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to rent a Compact car from March 7th till March 8th and you will pick up the car at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport at 2:45 pm, right?
Nope, I might need the car till the 9th.
please confirm me that you will pick up the car on March 7th and drop it on March 9th, right?
Yup. What's the name of the car and how much its cost totally?
It's Volkswagen GTI and it will cost $52 in total.
Thanks much for the help
Do you need any other help?
Nope thanks much
Have a wonderful day.
search round trips for me
when will you leave?
on the 4th
where are you going from?
I am going from lax
when will you be back?
I will be back on the 11th
where are you heading?
I am going to seattle
alaska airlines leaves 7:10 pm and returns 3:45 pm and is $162
any other flights?
american airlines at 11:45 pm and leaves at 8:15 am and is $128
is it a refundable one?
No and the flight leaves lax international airport
that sounds good. help me buy flight tickets cause I like travelling in economy and there is one person with me
confirm los angeles to seattle from american airlines leaving march 4th and coming back march 11th and it leaves at 11:45 pm and returns 8:15 am and is seating class economy and 1 person
yes that works
it has been confirmed
when does the return flight arrive and what airport?
arrives 11:02 am and destination seattle-tacoma international airport
I want the car on the 6th of this month and a spacious one
drop it off march 11th
I want till 9th of march
what time is that?
quarter to 3 in the afternoon
pick up car from seattle-tacoma international airport on march 6th at 2:45 pm and drop off is march 9th and it is a full-size car
yes, and what is the cost?
subaru forester is $120
thank you very much
anything else for you?
no thank you
have a good one
Could you look up round trip flights for my sake? I have one person in my cohort.
What location will you depart from, and what date do you intend to return? What time do you intend to depart?
I am departing on 5th of March from LAX, and I'd like to return on 14th of March.
What location do you intend to travel to?
I am visiting Chicago.
I discovered 3 convenient flight for your travel. There is a ticket costing $190 for an American Airlines flight that departs at 8:30 am and the return flight departs at 4:30 am.
That sounds perfect for me. Could you assist me in purchasing the tickets?
Please verify the following information: an American Airlines flight for 1 in an economy seat that departs from Los Angeles to Chicago, with the departure date being March 5th and return date being March 14th. The departing time is 8:30 am, and returning flight departs at 4:30 am.
Yeah, that's correct.
I verified your ticket.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
I'd like to book a rental vehicle there.
Do you prefer full-size, compact, or some other type of car? Do you plan to pick it up at O'Hare International Airport?
Yeah, that sounds perfect. I'd like a spacious vehicle.
Would you like to pick it up on March 5th? When will you require it, and will you drop it off on March 14th?
I require the vehicle from 8th of March to the 9th of this month. I'll pick up the car at evening 7:15.
Please verify the following information: You are picking up a full-size car from O'Hare International Airport. The pickup will be at 7:15 pm on MArch 8th and the drop-off day is March 9th.
Yeah, that's perfect. How much does it cost, and what's the vehicle's name?
Your vehicle has been booked. The vehicle name is Honda CR-V and your booking costs $50.
Thank you for your assistance; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon!
Please help me find a round trip flights.
Where do you plan to go? When you will leave and until when?
I want to leave on 4th of March until 14th of this month and I am planning to go to Atlanta.
Where you are coming from?
From Paris.
I found a flight with American Airlines for only $382 with an outbound flight leaves at 4:05 am and returns at 3:25 pm.
Which airport does it depart from and when does my return flight arrive?
It departs from Charles de Gaulle International Airport and return flight arrives at 1:37 pm.
Any other available flights?
How about Delta Airlines for only $395 with an outbound flight leaves at 5:35 pm and return flight leaves at 3:40 pm.
That one sounds good.
Will I buy you tickets now?
Yes please.
Okay, you want 1 Economy seat class with Delta Airlines from Paris to Atlanta on March 4th until March 14th. Onward flight leaves at 5:35 pm and return flights leaves at 3:40 pm. Please confirm.
No, just one people.
Okay, you want 1 flight that return flight leaves at 3:40 pm.
Good, is the ticket refundable and which airport does the flight arrive?
Ticket booked! Tickets are not refundable and your destination is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks. Please help me reserve a small rental car there on Next friday at 2 pm.
Until March 14th?
Until 13th of this month.
Okay, you want a Compact car and you will pick it up at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 8th until March 13th at 2 pm. Please confirm.
Yes. that's good.
Car reserved!
Thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
You are welcome.
find round trip flights
when are you returning?
6th of march to london, england 13th of march return
where will you be going to?
leaving from washington
2 trips to american airlines 10:15 am leaves 3:05 pm and is $412
what airport then?
1 heathrow international airport
that is good to me
anything else then?
help me get tickets
washington to london american airlines march 6th to march 13th at 10:15 am to 3:05 pm economy 1
yes that works
4:57 am arrives
I will get it evening 5:30
standard, compact pick up march 6th
I want car 7th of march an intermediate car
march 13th then
I need it march 9th
heathrow international airport march 7th at 5:30 pm drop off march 9th standard car
yes that works
car is reserved
total cost then
it is chevrolet cruze and is $74
thanks a lot
bye then now
Hi, could you help me purchase some flight tickets please?
When will the return flight depart?
Somewhere in the afternoon 3:15 is fine for me.
When, where and what time do you plan to depart from?
I will be departing later today at about half past 11 in the morning from Philadelphia.
May I also know when will you be returning and where will you plan to visit? Any airline preferences?
Would prefer travelling to Chicago with United Airlines and return on 10th of this month.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 economy class seat on the United Airlines flight from Philadelphia to Chicago from March 1st at 11:30 am and returning on March 10th at 3:15 pm.
That sounds fine to me!
Your ticket reservation has been made.
Thank you! Are there any hotels I can stay in that area?
Yes, there are 10 hotels. Would you like to stay at Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown with a 4.3 rating?
That is great to me!
Would you like to make a hotel reservation?
Sure, could you reserve one rooms for me please?
Will you be staying from March 1st to March 10th?
No, I wish to stay from next Monday to next Wednesday.
I see, please confirm your stay in 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago from March 4th to March 6th.
Sure, this is fine with me. Where can I locate them?
They are located at 630 North Rush Street.
I see, are there any nice attractions in that area too?
There is a nice tourist attraction called 360 CHICAGO.
I see, that is great!
Could I further assist you?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
Sure, have fun.
I need to buy flight tickets.
Where are you leaving from?
SFO.
Where are you going? What airline?
I want to travel to Phoenix, AZ on Southwest Airlines.
When do you want the return flight? When are you coming back?
I want to return next Wednesday and leave around 18:15. I need to leave around half past 6 in the morning.
When are you leaving?
3rd of March.
Please confirm, leaving San Francisco for Phoenix on Southwest Airlines on March 3rd at 6:15 pm. The return flight is March 6th that leaves at 6:30 am. 1 seat in economy reserved.
Cool, how much?
Your ticket could not be completed.
I want to leave today from ATL.
Please confirm, leaving San Francisco for Atlanta on Southwest Airlines on March 1st at 6:15 pm. The return flight is March 6th that leaves at 6:30 am. 1 seat in economy reserved.
Yes, perfect.
Your ticket is confirmed.
I also need three hotel rooms.
Aloft Atlanta Downtown has a rating of 4.0.
Anything else? I need 1 room.
I found 9 hotels like Country Inn & Suites by Radisson, Atlanta Downtown South at Turner Field, Ga and the rating is 3.3.
What is the phone number and street address?
The phone number is +1 404-658-1961 and the address is 759 Pollard Boulevard Southwest.
Make a reservation for the 3rd of March.
Are you checking out March 6th?
Yes.
Please confirm, Country Inn & Suites by Radisson, Atlanta Downtown South at Turner Field, Ga in Atlanta checking in March 3rd, checking out March 6th. Reservation for 1 room.
Yes.
Your reservation is complete.
I want some free, child-friendly things to do.
You could see Cathedral of Christ the King, it is a place of worship.
Ok, that is all.
Bye!
Find plane tickets.
Departure city and time?
From New York City at evening 7:45.
United Airlines, British Airways, any airline preference?
American Airlines.
Departure date and return?
The 2nd through the 6th.
Destination and time of return flight?
Chi-town and 12:30.
Please confirm: flight for 1 from New York to Chicago on American Airlines in economy. Leaving March 2nd at 7:45 pm and returning March 6th at 12:30 pm.
Good. Where's it leave from and when's the return flight get in?
You're booked. It departs JFK International Airport and the return arrives 3:49 pm.
Thanks, find a hotel there.
I found 10 places. AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown is rated 4.3.
Good, book it.
Checking out March 6th?
The 5th of this month.
Checking in March 2nd?
No, Monday next week.
Please confirm: 1 room at Ac Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago from March 4th to March 5th.
Yes. Their number?
You're booked. It's +1 312-981-6600.
Thanks, what are nearby attractions?
360 Chicago is a tourist attraction there.
Is it kid friendly?
It is.
Great.
Anything else for today?
No, thanks.
Enjoy!
Can you purchase airplane tickets?
Yes. When are you leaving? Do have an airline preference?
I like Delta Airlines. I'm leaving on the 3rd of March.
Where are you traveling to?
I am going to SFO.
What time do you want the return flight to depart? And where are you leaving from?
I plan to leave around 14:30 pm. I am leaving from Seattle.
At what time do you want to leave?
There are 4 people in my group. For my first flight, I want to depart around 7:45 am.
What day do you want to return?
I want to return on March 12th.
Please confirm the following details: Booking 4 economy tickets for the Delta Airlines flight departing from Seattle on March 3rd, at 7:45 am, and arriving in San Francisco. On March 12th, your return flight will leave at 2:30 pm.
Yes, sounds great. Are the tickets refundable?
The tickets have been confirmed! And they are refundable?
Thanks for the help! I want 1 room at a hotel in San Fran.
How about Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco? It has a rating of 3.5.
What's the address and the number?
The number is +1 415-673-3277. The address is 749 Taylor Street.
That's great. I want to make reservation for the 6th of this month.
Would you like to check out on March 12th.
Yes, that works.
Please confirm the following: Making a reservation for 1 room at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco. Check-in is March 6th. The check-out is March 12th.
Yes, that is great.
The reservation was successful!
How much is it? Are pets allowed?
It costs $1,116. Pets are not allowed.
Thank you. What attractions are nearby?
You may like the historical landmark, Alcatraz.
Cool, what else is there?
You may really like the historical landmark, Alcatraz Island!
Why are you repeating yourself? I am looking for a child-friendly historical spot.
Coit Tower is a historical landmark.
What's the number? Is there an entrance fee?
Yes, admission is free. The number is 415-249-0995.
Good, thanks for the info.
May I help you further?
No, I'm good, goodbye!
Have a wonderful day!
I need a plane ticket. I want the return trip to leave at around a quarter to 9 in the night.
What time do you want to leave, and what day do you want to return?
I'd like to leave at a quarter past 6 in the evening, and return on March 13th.
Where are you leaving from , and what is your destination? What day do you want to leave?
I want to leave on the 10th of this month from Chi-town to San Francisco.
Which airline? Air Canada, British Airways, or something else?
I like Southwest Airlines.
So, just to confirm: You want 1 Economy ticket for a Southwest Airlines flight from Chicago to San Francisco leaving March 10th at 6:15 pm. The return flight leaves on March 13th at 8:45 pm. Is that correct?
No, I want to return on the 12th of this month.
So you want a Southwest Airlines flight that returns on March 12th?
Yes, that's right.
Your ticket is confirmed.
I also need 2 rooms at a pet-friendly hotel.
The Argonaut Hotel has a 4.4 rating.
What's the phone number?
The phone number is +1 415-563-0800
What's the street address?
It's at 495 Jefferson Street.
That sounds good.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes. I want to check in on the 10th of this month, and check out on the 12th of this month.
So you want to reserve 2 rooms at the Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco from March 10th to March 12th? Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your rooms have been reserved.
Thanks.
Can I help with anything else?
Is there anything cool to do there?
I found 10 attractions you might like. Alcatraz is a popular historical landmark.
Okay, cool. That's all I need right now.
Have a nice day.
I need to find economy flights for 1 from Toronto, Ontario.
What is your departure time and return date?
I would like to leave ar0ound night 10:30 and return on the 13th.
Would you like me to check a specific airline? What is your departure date and where is your destination?
My favorite is Delta Airlines. I'm going to NYC on March 3rd.
At what time do you want to return?
I would like to leave at 6:30 pm.
Please confirm you want to book 1 economy ticket on the flight on Delta Airlines leaving from Toronto on March 3rd at 10:30 pm and returning from New York on March 13th at 6:30 pm.
Thanks. That's right.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
What is the arrival airport and how many stops?
The flight has 0 stops and arrives at JFK International Airport.
I need to find a hotel there also. Thanks.
1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge is a 4.5 star hotel in the area.
Is there something else?
1 Hotel central Park has a 4.5 rating.
Anything else available?
11 Howard has a 4.3 rating.
That one is great.
Should I book your room?
Yes. Thanks. I need 1 room checking in on Wednesday next week and check out on the 12th.
Please confirm you want to reserve 1 room at 11 Howard in New York from March 6th to March 12th.
That's just perfect. I can't wait.
The room was successfully booked.
What's their address and phone number?
They're located at 11 Howard Street and their phone is +1 212-235-1111.
Thanks. I want to go to some attractions nearby as well.
There are 10 options. 92nd Street Y is at the Performing Arts Venue.
That one sounds fun.
Is there anything else?
Thanks. That's all.
Please enjoy your day.
I'm looking for an economy flight to Portland. I need to leave about half past 8 in the morning for the return flight.
Sure, when will you be returning?
I hope to fly back on the 8th of March.
Alright, what time do you want to leave on your flight to Portland?
It doesn't matter that much, but around 11:45 would work.
OK, Alaska Airlines and United Airlines have flights to Portland. Or I can see if another airline has a flight there. Do you have a preference.
Let's try Alaska Airlines. I need to leave on Saturday this week.
What city will you be departing from?
I need to find a flight from SFO.
Alright, can you confirm that you need 1 economy ticket from San Francisco to Portland on Alaska Airlines departing on March 2nd at 11:45 am and returning on March 8th at 8:30 am.
Yes, I think that's right. Does the flight have any stops?
I'm sorry, there isn't a flight available that matches your criteria. Would you like help with anything else?
Yeah, I need to make a airline reservation so can we try to see if American Airlines has anything. I will be leaving from NY and traveling to LAX.
Alright, can you please confirm the details of the reservation. You will need 1 economy flight on American Airlines from New York to Los Angeles on March 2nd leaving at 11:45 am and returning on March 8th at 8:30 am?
That sounds good, but can you tell me what time I will be arriving n LA?
Yes, the flight arrives at 4:29 pm and the ticket has been reserved.
You have been so much help. Can you also help with a hotel reservation for while I am there?
Sure, there are 10 hotels close by. The Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills is highly rated at 4.4.
That sounds great, but do they allow pets? I have a severe allergy to pet dander. If you don't know I can call if you have the number.
They don't allow pets, but the phone number is +1 323-852-7000 if you have any other questions.
Thanks so much, the hotel will be perfect!
Do you want to make reservations now?
Sure, go ahead and make them.
Alright, will you be checking in on March 2nd?
Yes, works for me!
And you will be checking out on March 8th?
No, I'll check out on the 4th of march. I am going to stay at my cousins after that.
Alright, I will book 1 room at Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles checking in on March 2nd and leaving on March 4th. Is that correct?
Actually, I will need 2 rooms, some friends are going to meet us there and they need a room there.
Alright, so you want to book 2 rooms for the 2nd thru March 4th.
Yes, that will work!
Alright, the reservation has been made.
How much will it cost?
The cost will be $528.
That's not so bad. Thanks so much. Do you know if there are any attractions around there?
Sure, there are 10 attractions. One of the most popular ones is a historical landmark called Angels Flight Railway.
That sounds really interesting. That's all I need right now. Bye.
Bye! Enjoy the trip!
I need to take a trip. Can you help me buy tickets for a flight?
Sure thing. What time would you like to leave? Also, any prefered time for the return flight?
I'd like to get a ticket for 10:30 for my flight out of LAX. I'd like to to get a return flight for half past 4 in the morning.
Okay, any airline preferences? Maybe American Airlines, British Airways, or another airline you prefer? Also, what's your destination?
I'm headed to Chicago and I plan to leave on Saturday this week. I really prefer American Airlines, they have the best flights in my opinion.
Okay. What date would you like to return?
I want head back home on the 4th of this month.
Alright, just confirm the following for me: Booking 1 Economy class ticket for the American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Chicago. The departure date is March 2nd at 10:30 am with a return flight scheduled for March 4th at 4:30 am. Correct?
Yeah, that sounds good to me. Can you tell me the name of the airport we will be landing in? Also, what time will my return flight make it back home?
Your destination is O'Hare International Airport and your return flight will arrive at 7:02 am. Your tickets are now confirmed.
Cool, thanks for the help. Can you find me a nice hotel to stay in?
Sure thing. I've found 10 hotels you may like. how about the Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown? It's a nice hotel with an average rating of 4.3.
Okay, that sounds perfect. Thanks.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, go ahead and make one for me. I need to book one room.
Are you checking in on March 2nd?
No, I will be checking in on the 3rd.
Are you checking out on March 4th?
Yeah, that's right. Thanks.
Okay, please confirm the following for me: Making a reservation for 1 room at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago for March 3rd. You will be checking out on March 4th.
Yeah that's cool with me. Do you know if they allow pets? Also I forgot to ask the price. How much will the room cost me?
Your reservation is complete. They are pet friendly and your ticket will cost $192.
Thanks a lot. Can you show me any child-friendly attractions in the area? Preferably without a an entry fee. I'm really looking for a nice Park to visit.
No problem. I've found 3 attractions I think you'd love. I think you should check out the Burnham Park. It's considered a top rated Park in the area.
Sounds interesting. Can you get me their phone number?
Of course. There number is 312-742-8520.
Okay, great. That really helps a lot. See you later.
Thank you. Enjoy!
I want to find flight tickets for 3 people through Delta Airlines.
Where are you going and when do you want to leave? When would you like the return flight to leave?
I want to leave around nine am and the return flight to leave around 6:30 am. I'm going to LAX.
Where are you leaving from and when?
I'm leaving from Seattle, WA on the 3rd of this month.
When are you returning?
I want to return on the 11th of this month.
Please confirm: 3 economy seating flight tickets through Delta Airlines form Seattle to Los Angeles leaving on March 3rd at 9 am and returning March 11th, leaving at 6:30 am.
That sounds great.
Sorry, your ticket couldn't be made. Anything else I can do for you?
I want to make a reservation to leave around morning 8:15.
Please confirm: 3 economy seats on Delta Airlines from Seattle to Los Angeles on March 3rd at 8:15 am and returning on March 11th, leaving at 6:30 am.
No, I want to return on the 5th of March through American Airlines.
Please confirm: an American Airlines flight returning on March 5th.
Yes, sounds great.
Your ticket has been booked.
Thanks. I want to find a hotel.
Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills is rated 4.4.
Do you have anything else available? I want to find a place pets are allowed.
Airtel Plaza Hotel is rated 3.9.
What is the address and phone number?
The phone number is +1 800-224-7835 and the address is 7277 Valjean Avenue, Van Nuys, California 91406, United States.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, I want to make a reservation on the 3rd of this month for 2 rooms.
Do you want to check out on March 5th.
I want to check out on the 4th of this month.
Please confirm: a reservation for 2 rooms at Airtel Plaza Hotel in Los Angeles on March 3rd until March 4th.
Yes, sounds great. What is the price?
The reservation has been made. It is $210.
Thank you. I want to find some attractions.
I found 10 attractions you might like. Angels Flight Railway is a historical landmark.
Okay, sounds great.
Anything else I could help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I would like tickets to los angeles.
When would you like to return? Would you want a flight on delta airlines, alaska airlines or another one?
I want a tickets for 4 on an american airlines flight leaving this saturday and returning on the 6th of march.
What time would you like to leave?
For my onward trip, I want to leave at 12:15 in the afternoon on any class.
Where would you be leaving from?
I will be leaving from SF.
When would you like your return flight to depart?
At 6:30 in the morning.
You would like economy tickets for 4 on an american airlines flight from san francisco to los angeles on March 2nd at 12:15 pm and returning on March 6th at 6:30 am?
That would be fine.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
When would the return flight arrive?
It arrives at 7:55 am.
Thanks a lot. I would need a hotel to stay in when I get there.
I have found 10 hotels. How about Ac hotel by marriott beverly hills. It has a rating of 4.4.
May I have a number and address?
The number is +1 323-852-7000 and the address is 6399 wilshire boulevard.
Go ahead and make the reservation.
You would like to check in at March 2nd and check out at March 6th?
I want to check out on march 3rd.
You would like to reserve 1 room at ac hotel by marriott beverly hills in los angeles from march 2nd to march 3rd.
Yes, that would be great.
The hotel room has been reserved.
What does it cost?
That would be $200 in all.
Thanks. Is there anywhere to take my kids that has no entry fee?
There is a museum called autry museum of the american west.
What is the number I can get them at?
The number is 323-667-2000.
Ok, then. That would be all. Take care.
Enjoy your day.
I need to buy flight tickets.
When are you leaving? What time? When do you want the return flight?
I am leaving on the 5th of this month around 12:45 pm. I want to return around 07:45.
When are you coming back?
The 11th.
Where are you going? Do you like Alaska Airlines or Southwest Airlines?
Delta Airlines to New York City.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Vancouver, BC.
Please confirm, flight leaving Vancouver to New York on Delta Airlines of March 5th at 12:45 pm. Returning March 11th at 7:45 am. 1 seat in economy.
No, I am leaving at six in the morning from LA.
Please confirm, leaving Los Angeles at 6 am.
Yes, that is correct.
Your ticket is reserved.
Thanks, I need 2 hotel rooms there.
1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge is a 4.5 rated hotel.
What is the phone number an street address?
The phone number is +1 833-625-6111 and the address is 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn.
That is perfect. I want to check in on the 5th of this month.
Are you checking out March 11th?
No, checking out March 9th.
Please confirm, checking in to 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York on March 5th. Checking out March 9th. You have booked 2 rooms.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your reservation is complete.
I want to find a museum to visit while I'm there that is child-friendly.
I found 10 choices including a museum called the American Museum of Natural History.
Ok, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I need round trip planet tickets and want the first flight to depart at morning 8.
Do you like United Airlines, Southwest Airlines or some other carrier? Where are you going and what day are you leaving?
I want Delta Airlines for a March 5th departure to Toronto, Canada.
What city are you departing and what time will your return flight depart?
I want an Economy class ticket from San Francisco to Portland, OR and want the return flight to depart at 08:45.
What day are you returning?
I am returning next Thursday.
You want 1 Economy class ticket on Delta Airlines from San Francisco to Portland. The first flight departs at 8 am on March 5th and the second flight departs at 8:45 am on March 7th. Is all that correct?
That is correct. Are there 0 transfers?
Your ticket is booked. There is 1 transfer.
Thanks a lot. Now I need to find a hotel.
Search yielded 10 results. Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station has a 4.3 rating.
That is great.
Shall I book you a hotel room?
Yes, get me a room with an arrival date of March 5th and a departure date of next Thursday.
You want 1 room at the Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station in Portland from March 5th to March 7th. Is that right?
That is right. What is their location and are pets allowed?
It is located at 9920 Northeast Cascades Parkway and pets are welcome.
Thanks. What attractions are near there?
Search yielded 10 results. Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden is a cool Park.
That is great. Thanks for everything. Bye.
Have a good time!
Could you assist me in purchasing flight tickets? I'm headed to Philadelphia from NYC, and I'd like to return on the 14th of this month.
What time do you intend to depart?
I intend to depart on next Friday, and go out at night 9 for the return flight. I prefer to travel in Premium Economy.
When would you like to depart?
I can depart near 10:45 for my onward trip.
Is there an airline you prefer, such as American Airlines, Air Canada, or some other?
I'd like to get United Airlines.
Please verify the following information: 1 premium economy seat for a United Airlines flight departing from New York to Philadelphia. The departing day is on March 8th, 10:45 am, and the return day is on MArch 14th, 9 pm.
That sounds perfect. What airport does the plane come to, and can I get my money back from the ticket?
Your ticket is verified, and yes - it can be refunded. The plane will arrive at PHL International Airport.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
I'd like to look for a hotel nearby.
I discovered 10 hotels. What do you think about Aka University City, which has a 4.6 rating?
Can you tell me its contact number and whether it permits pets?
The contact number is +1 215-372-9000, and it does not permit pets.
Can you offer an alternative? I'd like to reserve 1 room.
What do you think of Aloft Philadelphia Airport, which has a 4.0 rating?
That would be wonderful.
Would you like to proceed to book the hotel?
Yeah, I'd like to make a booking.
Would you like to check out on March 14th, and check in on March 8th?
I'd like to check out on 11th of March, and check in on the 10th.
Please verify the following information: reserve 1 room at the Aloft Philadelphia Airport in Philadelphia with a check-in day on March 10th. The check-out day is March 11th.
Yup, that's fine by me.
Your booking is complete.
Can you tell me their contact number?
Their contact number is +1 267-298-1700.
Does it permit pets, and can you tell me their location?
The hotel permits pet, and is located at 4301 Island Avenue.
Thank you for your assistance. Could you tell me about attractions nearby, preferably something without an entry free and is friendly tochildren?
I recommend the tourist attraction called Art Museum Steps.
Alright, can you offer some other attraction?
I recommend the park called Bartram's Garden.
Can you tell me its contact number?
Its contact number is 215-729-5281.
Alright, wonderful. That's all; see ya.
Have fun there!
I need to buy flight tickets.
What time are you leaving?
I am leaving around quarter to 7 in the morning.
What airline? Alaska Airlines or Air Canada?
I like Delta Airlines. I am leaving from Seattle, WA.
When are you leaving?
2nd of March.
When do you want the return flight to leave? Where are you going? When are you coming back?
I am coming back on 12th of March. I am leaving around morning 11:45 and traveling to San Fran.
Please confirm, flying Delta Airlines from Seattle to San Francisco. Leaving March 2nd at 6:45 am and returning March 12th at 11:45 am. 1 seat in economy.
Yes, that is perfect.
Sorry, that ticket was not available.
Please make the reservation. Leaving around 10:30 am for the onward trip and half past 2 in the afternoon for the return flight.
Please confirm, leaving Seattle for San Francisco on Delta Airlines on March 2nd at 10:30 am. The return flight is March 12th at 2:30 pm. The reservation is for 1 seat in economy.
Yes, that is good.
Your ticket is booked.
I need three hotel rooms there too.
I found 10 hotels like Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco with a rating of 3.5.
Anything else?
The Argonaut Hotel is rated 4.4.
That is perfect.
Are you ready to make a reservation?
Yes.
Are you checking in on March 2nd?
No, checking in March 9th.
Are you checking out March 12th?
No, I want to check out on 10th of March.
Please confirm, reservation at Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco for 3 rooms beginning on March 9th and ending March 10th.
Yes, that will be cool.
Your reservation is complete.
Does it allow pets? What is the street address?
The welcome pets. The address is 495 Jefferson Street.
Thanks, can you find me some attractions there?
Alcatraz is cool and a historical landmark.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I need your help buying tickets for a flight to LAX.
Okay, I can help with that. Where will you be leaving from?
I would like to leave from Chicago.
Would you like a return trip as well? If so, when would you like to come back?
Yes I would, and I'd like the return flight to be on the 9th of this month.
When do you plan to leave, and what time would you like the return flight to be?
I'd like to leave on the 1st of March, and have the return flight leave at around 13:00.
Okay. Do you have a preferred airline?
Yes, I prefer Southwest Airlines.
What time of the day would you like to leave?
I'd like to leave around 9:45 in the morning.
You would like 1 two way economy ticket on Southwest Airlines from Chicago to Los Angeles on March 1st at 9:45 am. The return flight leaves at March 9th 1 pm. Does this sound correct?
Yes that all sounds correct. Can you tell me which airport the flight leaves from? And where it arrives?
Your ticket has been purchased. The flight departs from O'Hare International Airport, and will touchdown in LAX International Airport.
Awesome thank you. Can you also help me book 1 room at a hotel?
Sure. What about Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills, which has a rating of 4.4?
Maybe. What's their phone number?
Their phone number is listed as +1 323-852-7000.
What's their address, and do they allow pets?
Their address is 6399 Wilshire Boulevard, and they do not allowed pets.
Sounds good to me. Can you make a reservation there for me? I'd like it to be from this Saturday until Wednesday next week.
You would like to book 1 room at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles from March 2nd to March 6th. Is that correct?
Yes that all works for me. What will the price be?
Your reservation has successfully been made. The total price comes to $640.
What's going on for attractions in the area?
There are 10 attractions which could interest you in the area. You should check out Angels Flight Railway while you there. It's a cool Historical Landmark.
Okay I will. Thanks for your help, that will be all for now.
Okay, let me know if you need anything else.
Can you find me a flight that returns on the 10th?
When and from where do you want to depart? Do you have an airline preference, perhaps Air Canada or American Airlines?
I need tickets for 2 on Delta Airlines at eight pm from SF.
What is your destination? What time would you like to depart?
I would like to depart at 10 in the night to Portland.
When will you be leaving?
I will be leaving on March 3rd.
You need 2 economy tickets from San Francisco to Portland on Delta Airlines on March 3rd at 10 pm and returning on March 10th at 8 pm, correct?
Yes that's correct.
Your tickets have been reserved.
Which airport will we arrive at? What airport do we depart from?
You will be departing from SFO International Airport and Arriving at PDX International Airport.
Thanks I also need a hotel there.
I found 10, how about Aloft Portland AIrport At Cascade Station which is rated 4.3.
What is the phone number there?
The number is +1 503-200-5678.
Do you have anything else?
Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites is rated 4.4.
What is the phone number and address to that one?
The number is +1 503-251-9991 and it's located 11938 Northeast Airport Way.
What else did you find?
Canopy by Hilton Portland Pearl District is a 4.7.
Perfect, please reserve 1 room on March 3rd through the 8th of this month.
You want to reserve 1 room at Canopy by Hilton Portland Pearl District in Portland on March 3rd through march 8th.
That's correct, how much is it?
Your reservation was successful. It is $660 total.
Thanks can you find some attractions?
I found 10. The park, Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden is nice.
Great that is all for now thanks.
Have fun!
I need to purchase tickets for a flight please.
When will you be departing?
I will depart on the 7th of this month and return on March 14th.
At what time would you like your return flight to leave? Do you have an airline preference such as American Airlines or Delta Airlines?
I want to return around 07:15 on United Airlines.
Where will you depart from?
I would like to depart from Los Angeles at morning 8:45.
Where will you be visiting?
I'm going to Phoenix, AZ.
You want to book an economy flight for 1 on United Airlines from Los Angeles to Phoenix, departing on March 7th at 8:45 am and returning on March 14th at 7:15 am, correct?
Yes that's correct.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
I need a hotel there as well.
I found 10 hotels. The aloft Phoenix-Airport is a 4.2.
What else did you find? I need one room.
The Arizona Grand Resort & Spa is a 4.3.
What else did you find? I need two rooms at a place that allows pets please.
I found 9 places. How about the Comfort Suites Phoenix North which is rated 3.8?
What is their number?
The number is +1 602-861-3900.
Where are they located?
At 10210 North 26th Drive.
That sounds perfect thanks.
Would you like a resrvation?
Yes please, I need to check out on March 9th.
Are you checking in on March 7th?
I am checking in on March 8th.
You want to reserve 2 rooms in Phoenix at the comfort Suites Phoenix North From March 8th to March 9th, correct?
No I need the rooms from the 11th of March to March 13th.
You want to check in March 11th and check out March 13th, correct?
Correct, what is the total?
Your rooms are reserved. The total is $396.
Thanks, can you also find free attractions that are child friendly?
I found 5, how about Castles N Coasters which is a theme park?
What is the number?
The phone number is 602-997-7575.
Great, thanks. That's all I needed.
Okay have fun!
I need to buy flight tickets.
Where are you going?
I am going to Atlanta.
When are you leaving? When do you want the return flight to leave?
I need 4 tickets. We are leaving on the 7th of this month around 3 in the afternoon. We are returning March 14th.
Any preferred airline?
I like United Airlines.
Where are you leaving from? What time are you leaving?
I am leaving San Fran at quarter past 2 in the afternoon.
Please confirm, leaving San Francisco for Atlanta on United Airlines on March 7th at 2:15 pm. The return flight it March 14th at 3 pm. I have reserved 4 tickets in economy.
Yes, that is good. What airport does the plane leave from?
Your tickets are confirmed. You are leaving from SFO International Airport.
I need one hotel room there.
I found Ac Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza. It is rated 4.5.
What is the address?
3600 Wieuca Road Northeast.
What is the phone number?
+1 470-231-3030.
That is perfect.
Are you ready to reserve the hotel?
Yes, I want to check in on the 7th of this month and check out the 9th of this month.
Please confirm, staying at Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza in Atlanta. Arriving March 7th and departing March 9th. I have reserved 1 room.
Yes, that is perfect. What is the price? Do they allow pets?
Your reservation is complete. The cost $280 and they do not allow pets.
Thanks, show me some stuff to do there.
I found 10 options including Atlanta Botanical Garden. It is a park.
Ok, cool that is all.
Have a nice day.
I need assistance finding one flight ticket that will be leaving from New Delhi. I want to leave around the evening 7.
I can schedule the return flight for you. At what time do you want to return?
I'll be leaving my destination around 6:45 am in the morning.
Please identify your departure and return date for the flight. If you don't have a preferred airline, I suggest American Airlines or Alaska Airlines.
I'll be departing from New Delhi on Saturday this week and leaving Atlanta on March 7th. If possible, I'd like to fly on American AIrlines.
Confirm the following plane ticket information: Departing from Delhi on March 2nd at 7 pm for Atlanta on American Airlines. The return flight will be on March 7th at 6:45 am. The ticket will be 1 Economy class seat.
Yes please confirm that flight for me.
Your ticket to Atlanta has been purchased and confirmed.
What is the price of the ticket and is it refundable?
The ticket price is $420 for the round trip flight. Sadly, the ticket is non refundable.
That's okay. Thanks for telling me. Now I want to find a hotel in Atlanta.
The AC Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza is a highly rated hotel. It has a customer rating of 4.5 Perhaps this is the hotel for you?
It just might be. Please give me the phone number.
The phone number for the hotel is +1 470-231-3030.
Thank you! That sounds just right. Go ahead and book one room for Saturday this week.
Do you want the check out to be on March 7th?
No I'll be checking out a bit earlier than that. Make it March 3rd.
Confirm your reservation request: Making a reservation for the Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza in Atlanta. I will book 1 room with a check-in date of March 2nd and a check-out date on March 3rd.
I think that's everything. Yeah, go ahead with that reservation.
I have reserved your hotel room. I hope it's a nice establishment.
I need to know the street address of my hotel.
The hotel is located at 3600 Wieuca Road Northeast.
How much will I be paying for my stay?
The total cost of the hotel will be $240.
That's not too bad. Thanks again. Now, I need you to find some attractions in Atlanta. I'd prefer something child-friendly like a garden.
There is a park called the Atlanta Botanical Garden that is very child friendly.
A park huh? Yeah that should be fine!
Do you require anything else?
No no. You have helped me more than enough. Thank you.
Enjoy your trip and have a good time!
Assistant. Help me locate affordable flight tickets for my trip.
Please tell me the time of your departure as well the arrival city. I need your return date as well.
First, my departure date for my trip to Seattle, WA time will be 4:45 am. I want to return back here on March 12th.
What airline do you wish to fly with? Alaska Airlines, Air France, and numerous other airlines are options. After that, please tell me the departure date and city.
If I had to choose, I'd like to go with Alaska Airlines. I'll be leaving Los Angeles on the 1st of this month by the way.
At what time do you wish for your return flight to depart?
Any time around 12 in the afternoon should be sufficient.
Confirm your flight details: Purchasing 1 Economy seat on Alaska Airlines. You wish to depart from Los Angeles at 4:45 am on March 1st. You will be returning from Seattle on March 12th at 12 pm.
Those details are all correct. Please book my flight.
I was unable to book your flight. I apologize for any trouble this may cause. Do you require help with anything else?
Oh that's not good. Despite that, I still want to continue to make a reservation for my trip. Change the departure time to morning 5:15.
Confirm the following altered details for your flight: Purchasing 1 Economy class seat on Alaska Airlines. You will depart from Los Angeles at 5:15 am on March 1st and return from Seattle on March 12th at 12 PM.
If possible, please confirm and purchase that ticket. I forgot to ask, but is the ticket refundable? And when does my return flight arrive?
I have confirmed your flight purchase. I am sorry to say that the ticket is not refundable. To answer your other question, your flight returns at 5:15 pm.
Okay. Thank you for helping me book my flight. Moving on, I'll be needing somewhere to stay. Help me find a hotel there.
There are 10 hotels in the Seattle area that you may be interested in. Ace Hotel Seattle is a nice place to stay with a rating of 4.5.
4.5? Wow that will be perfect for me.
Do you wish for me to reserve the hotel for you?
That hotel sounds like what I'm looking for. Go ahead and make a reservation for me.
Will you be checking out on March 12th?
No. I'll be checking-out of the hotel a day early on March 11th.
Do you want a check-in date of March 1st?
Yeah the check-in date should be fine. One room is all I need. However, I'll be checking out on March 5th.
Confirm your reservation details: Booking 1 room at the Ace Hotel Seattle in Seattle. The check-in date is March 1st with a check-out date of March 5th.
Yep. Please confirm my reservation.
I have successfully processed your reservation for the Ace Hotel Seattle.
What is the address of the Ace Hotel? Oh yeah, does it allow pets?
The Ace Hotel is located at 2423 1st Avenue. The hotel allows visitors to have pets.
Nice. I can bring my pet with me then. Okay, next, I need something to do while I'm there. Can you show me attractions?
Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave site are a well-known Tourist Attraction in Seattle.
Does it cost anything to get in there?
No. There is no entry fee associated with this attraction.
Oh that's great. I think that's a good spot to visit.
Do you require any other assistance?
No. You've helped more than enough. Thank you.
You are welcome. Enjoy your stay in Seattle!
I need help to book a flight
When do you plan to return?
I want to return on 14th of March
Where are you visiting?
I'm heading to Los Angeles
Do you have a preferred airline? What time do you want to leave?
Getting there, I want to leave around 12:15 in the afternoon. Returning I'm thinking around half past 6 in the morning. Can you look at American Airlines as I have miles.
Sure, were are you flying out from?
I am leaving from SF.
What date are you leaving SF?
I need to leave on March 3rd.
Okay confirming the following details: you want a 1 economy ticket for a flight from San Francisco to Los Angeles on American Airlines. Departing March 3rd at 12:15 pm and returning on March 14th at 6:30 am.
Yes thank you. What time does the onward flight arrive?
I have confirmed your reservation. The flight gets in at 1:40 pm.
Is this a refundable ticket?
No, this ticket is non-refundable.
Thanks. I need a hotel aswell.
What about Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills, rated 4.4 stars.
Whats the address?
It is 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
Are pets allowed? Whats the phone number?
Unfortunately pets are not allowed. Their phone number is +1 323-852-7000.
Okay great.
Do you want to reserve a room?
Yes, thank you
Do you want to check out on March 14th?
I'd like to check in on March 3rd and Check out on March 9th.
Okay confirming you want to reserve 1 room at Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles, checking in on March 3rd and checking out on March 9th.
Yes, thanks. Whats the cost?
Your booking is successful. The total cost is $864.
Any good attractions nearby?
Yes, Angels Flight Railway is a popular historical landmark.
I'd love some more recommendations for a historical landmark
There's 6 nearby that you might like. Bradbury Building is a popular historical landmark.
What's their number, and is it free entry?
Yes, entry is free. You can reach them on 213-626-1893.
Okay thanks so much for your help.
Have a great trip.
I need to buy plane tickets.
When do you want to come back, and where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Delhi and coming back on the 8th.
Do you have a preferred airline? Where are you heading and when do you want the return flight to leave.
I'd like an American Airlines flight to San Fran, leaving around afternoon 1:15.
What day and time do you want to leave?
I want to leave March 3rd afternoon 1:45. There are four people in my party.
Please confirm the following: You want to book the 4 economy tickets on the March 3rd 1:45 pm American Airlines flight from Delhi to San Francisco. You return date is March 8th, leaving at 1:15 pm.
Yes, that sounds great. Is this ticket refundable? Also does it have zero stops?
Your tickets have been confirmed. The tickets are not refundable, there is 1 stop.
I also need a hotel there.
I found 10 hotels. There is the 3.5 rated Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco. What about that?
What's the street address?
It's located at 749 Taylor Street.
Yes, that works perfectly.
Do you want to go ahead and reserve a room?
Yes, make the reservation.
Do you want the check in date to be March 3rd?
Yes, that works.
And check out date of March 8th?
Exactly, that's right.
Please confirm: Book 1 room at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco from March 3rd to March 8th. Is that correct?
No, make the check in date of the 5th of March and the check out on 7th of March.
Please confirm: You want to check in on March 5th and check out on March 7th?
Yes, that is correct. Can you tell me the phone number? And if they allow pets?
Your reservation is complete. No, it does not allow pets. The contact number is +1 415-673-3277.
Thanks. Can you also see what attractions are near there? A Tourist Attraction without an entry fee that's child friendly.
I found 2 possibilities. A Tourist Attraction is Crissy Field.
Okay, that sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that was all I needed, thanks.
Enjoy!
Hi, could you reserve some flight tickets for me please?
Any preferred airlines you would like to travel with and when will you be returning?
I would prefer American Airlines and will be returning on the 4th.
When when will you be departing and returning and any preference on the departure location?
I would like to depart from LA at 10:30 an return at 8:15 in the morning.
Sure, and when and where do you plan to visit?
I plan to travel to Seattle, WA this saturday.
Sure, please confirm your purchase for 1 economy class seat on the American Airlines flight travelling from Los Angeles to Seattle from March 2nd at 10:30 am to March 4th at 8:15 am.
I am fine with that!
Your reservation has been made.
Could you also help me search for a hotel in that area?
Sure, there are 10 hotels in that area, would you like Ace Hotel Seattle with a 4.5 rating.
That is great!
Would you like me to make a hotel reservation?
Sure, could you make a reservation for one rooms please?
Will you be checking in on the March 2nd?
Yes please, thank you!
And will you check out on the March 4th?
No, I will check out on the 3rd instead.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 room at Ace Hotel Seattle in Seattle from March 2nd to March 3rd.
That is fine with me!
Your reservation has been made.
Sure, can I have their contact number and address please?
They are located at 2423 1st Avenue and you can contact them at +1 206-448-4721.
I see, are there any nice attraction in that area?
There are 10 attractions, how about a Tourist Attraction called Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site?
Sure, that is all I need for now, thank you!
Enjoy your trip!
I need help booking a flight. I want to leave Portland at around 8 pm.
What is your destination? What time do you want to return?
I'm going to LA. On my return trip, I want to leave at around a quarter past 9 in the morning.
Any preferred airlines?
I prefer to fly on Delta Airlines.
What are your departure and return dates?
I want to leave on Sunday this week. I want to return on March 11th.
Please confirm the following: You will need 1 Economy ticket on Delta Airlines. You will be traveling from Portland to Los Angeles. You will be departing on March 3rd at 8 pm. You will be returning on March 11th at 9:15 am. Is this information correct?
Yes that is correct.
Your ticket reservation is confirmed.
Is there 1 stop on this flight? Is my ticket refundable?
Yes, there is 1 stop and your ticket is not refundable.
Thank you for your help. Can you find me a nearby hotel?
How about the Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills? It has a rating of 4.4.
That sounds perfect.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes. Book me 1 room with a check out date of March 9th.
Will you be checking in on March 3rd?
Yes, I will.
Please confirm the following: You need 1 room at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles. You will be checking in on March 3rd. You will be checking out on March 9th. Is this information correct?
No. My check in will be the 5th and my check out will be March 8th.
Please confirm the following: You will check in on March 5th and check out on March 8th.
Yes. Does the hotel allow pets? What is the address?
No pets are allowed. The address is 6399 Wilshire Boulevard. Your reservation is successful.
Thanks. Can you get me some attractions?
You might like Angels Flight Railway. It is a Historical Landmark.
Okay, that's great. That's all for now.
Enjoy!
I would like to purchase some tickets for a flight please!
When are you departing?
I would like to depart Sunday this week.
I will need to know what time do you want to leave and where your destination is and when you would like your return flight to be.
I would like to depart around 6:45 am for Phoenix, and for the return I would like to leave around 6:30 in the morning.
I will need to know your preferred airlines and your departure date and time of preference and city you will be departing from.
I would like tickets for three people on Southwest Airlines traveling from San Francisco to NY, arriving back on the 5th of this month.
Please confirm you would like to book a flight on Southwest Airlines for 3 passengers in Economy class from San Francisco to New York departing on March 3rd at 6:45 am and returning on March 5th at 6:30 am.
That is correct!
I have confirmed your ticket.
Thank you, I also would like to book 1 room in a hotel there please.
There are 10 hotels. There is one with a 4.5 rating called 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge. Would you be interested in that one?
Yes, that one sounds good!
Would you like to reserve the hotel right now?
Yes, I would like to book it for March 4th, checking out on the 5th of this month please.
Please confirm you would like a reservation for 1 room at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York checking in on March 4th and checking out on March 5th.
Yes, that will be perfect! Can you tell me if they allow pets and provide me with the phone number please?
The reservation has been booked an fortunately they do welcome pets. The phone number is +1 833-625-6111.
Do they have any attractions there, something kid friendly like a Museum?
There are 10. You would like the Museum called American Folk Art Museum.
Are there any other attractions?
Yes, there is American Museum of Natural History. It is a great Museum!
Great, thanks!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thanks, thanks for your help!
Enjoy your time!
Can you help me find a flight?
When did you want to leave?
Wednesday next week.
When did you want to return? Is there an airline you prefer?
I like American Airlines. I just need one economy ticket. I want to leave around quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
Where would you like to go?
I'm going to Philadelphia.
Where are you leaving from?
From Chi-town.
When did you want to return?
I'd like to return the 14th.
What time would you prefer to leave.
I'd like to leave in the morning 11:15
To verify: You would like 1 economy ticket on an American Airlines flight from Chicago to Philadelphia on March 6th at 11:15 am. And a return flight leaving at 1:15 pm on March 14th.
Yes, that's correct.
I was unable to get that ticket. Is there something else you would like?
Try for a ticket again, I could leave earlier around morning 10:45.
To verify: You would like 1 economy class ticket on American Airlines from Chicago to Philadelphia at 10:45 am on March 6th and to return on a flight leaving at 1:15 pm am on March 14th.
Yes, that's right.
Your ticket is confirmed.
I would also like to find one hotel room there.
I found 10 hotels. There's Aka University City with a 4.6 rating.
That works. I want to check in on the 9th.
Did you want to check out March 14th?
Yes I do.
Please confirm: You would like 1 room at the Aka University City hotel in Philadelphia from March 9th until March 14th.
Correct. What is their address and phone number?
Your reservation is confirmed. It is at Cira Centre South, 2929 Walnut Street and their number is +1 215-372-9000.
I'd like to find something to do while I'm there. Something that is cost free and child-friendly.
Art Museum Steps is a popular tourist attraction.
Thanks, sounds great.
Did you need anything else?
No, I'm good, thanks.
Have a great trip.
Will you buy flight tickets?
Departure date and time? Return date?
I want to depart on the 3rd and return on the 6th around quarter to 8 in the morning.
Destination? Departing from?
I plan to travel from San Fran to Seattle, WA and return Tuesday next week.
Any preferred airlines? Southwest Airlines, United Airlines or something else? Departure time?
I plan to leave around afternoon 2:30 on Delta Airlines.
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket for Delta Airlines from San Francisco to Seattle with departure on March 3rd at 2:30 pm and return on March 5th at 7:45 am.
Great.
Ticket is reserved.
Thanks. Will you find 1 hotel room?
I found 10 hotels. Ace Hotel Seattle is rated 4.5.
Their number?
+1 206-448-4721.
Great. Will you make a hotel reservation with check out on Tuesday next week?
Check in on March 3rd?
Check in on Monday next week.
Please confirm 1 room at Ace Hotel Seattle in Seattle with check in on March 4th and check out on March 5th.
Fantastic.
I've made your reservation.
Will you find a child-friendly garden there?
Gas Works Park is a Park.
Nice. Anything else?
Golden Gardens Park is a Park.
Their number? Free entry?
206-684-4075. No, it's not free.
Fine. Anything else?
Kerry Park is a Park.
Fantastic.
Anything else?
That's all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me a flight for four from NY on American Airlines please?
What time would you like to depart? What date and time will you return?
I need to return next friday at around night 8:15. I would like to return at around 8:30 in the night.
Where are you travelling?
I am goind to SF.
When do you want to leave?
I am going tomorrow.
You want a flight from New York to San Francisco for 4 on American Airlines on March 2nd at 8:15 pm and returning on March 8th at 8:30 pm in Economy, correct?
Yes that is perfect thank you.
I could not book tickets at that time. Can I do anything else?
I need tickets for 2 at 4:45 pm for the outbound flight.
You want Economy tickets for 2 from New York to San Francisco on American Airlines on march 2nd at 4:45 pm and returning on March 8th at 8:30 pm, correct?
Correct. Which airport does it arrive at? Where does it depart from?
Your tickets are confirmed and you will be leaving from JFK International Airport and going to SFO International Airport.
Thank you very much.
Can I do anything else?
I need a hotel, 1 room.
I found 10, how about Argonaut Hotel which has a 4.4 rating.
SOunds great thanks.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes please I will check in on the 5th.
Will check out be on March 8th?
Yes that is correct.
You want 1 room at Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco from March 5th to March 8th, correct?
No I need to check in tomorrow.
You want 1 room on March 2nd, correct?
Yes that's correct.
Your room is booked.
Can you find a child-friendly museum please?
I found 10. One museum you may like is the Cable Car Museum.
Great thank you.
Can I help with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Enjoy yourself!
I need to book a flight.
On Delta Airlines? United Airlines? Pick anything.
Delta Airlines for next Thursday.
What else? From where? To where? When are you returning?
From LA to Portland, OR on the 12th.
OK. What time?
At a quarter past 9 in the morning. I'd like to take off for the return at 08:45.
OK. 1 economy seat on a 9:15 am Delta Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Portland on March 7th. Return takes off at 8:45 am on March 12th. Is that correct?
Yes. You have it.
And you have a ticket.
How about a hotel?
There are 10. Try Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station. They got a 4.3 rating.
Can I bring Fido?
Sure. Pets are welcome.
Where they at, exactly?
9920 Northeast Cascades Parkway.
Cool. Book it.
From March 7th to March 12th?
Actually until March 11th.
1 room at Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station in Portland from March 7th to March 11th. Correct.
No, make it 3 rooms until the 9th of this month.
3 rooms until March 9th?
Yes. Whats this going to run me? An how do I speak with them?
Its $768. Their phone is +1 503-200-5678.
Ok. What is there to see around there thats good for the kids?
There are 10 places. Try Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden. Its a park. Kids like parks.
Is it free? Whats the number there?
Its free. 503-771-8386.
Cool, thanks.
What is next?
Nothing. I am good to go.
Great. See you later.
Will you buy flight tickets?
Departure and return dates?
I want to depart on the 6th of this month and return on the 11th of this month.
Destination?
New York City with onward flight to depart around night 8:30 and return flight around evening 4:45.
Origin airport? Any preference? United Airlines, Southwest Airlines or other?
Departing from SFO on American Airlines.
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines from San Francisco to New York with departure on March 6th at 8:30 pm and return on March 11th at 4:45 pm.
Terrific.
I've reserved your ticket.
Will you find one room in pet-friendly hotel?
I found 10 hotels. 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge has a rating of 4.5.
Anything else? Will you reserve 2 rooms?
1 Hotel Central Park has a rating of 4.5.
Fantastic. Will you reserve a room with check in on the 9th.
Check out on March 11th?
Check out on the 10th.
Please confirm 2 rooms at 1 Hotel Central park in New York with check in on March 9th and check out on March 10th.
Perfect. Address and phone number?
+1 212-703-2001. Address is 1414 6th Avenue. I've completed your reservation.
Will you find attractions?
I found 10 attractions. 92nd Street Y is a Performing Arts Venue.
Wonderful. That's all.
Have a great time.
I need to book a flight out of Chi-town. Economy fare, and on United Airlines, if possible.
What is your destination and what are the dates you like to travel?
I'm going to Portland, OR. I can leave around 13:15 and I want to come back on the 13th of March.
What date do you plan to leave?
Oops. I want to leave on March 5th.
When do you want the return flight to leave.
Coming back I can leave around 07:15. Outbound, though, I need to leave around a quarter to 1 in the afternoon. Just 1 passenger.
You want 1 Economy fare on United Airlines flight from Chicago to Portland leaving March 5th at 12:45 pm and returning March 13th at 7:15 am. Is that correct?
Yes. That is correct.
Your flight is confirmed.
What time to I get back? And what airport is Portland?
You will arrive at PDX International Airport, and the reutrn flight arrives at 2:55 pm.
Ok. I'll need to find a hotel there.
The Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station is rated 4.3.
Does it allow pets?
It welcomes pets.
Ok. Lets try somewhere else because I have pet allergies.
The Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites is rate 4.4. They do not allow pets.
What's their address?
Their address is 11938 Northeast Airport Way.
Sweet. I want 1 room, checking out on the 12th. I'll just live hang out at the airport until my flight leaves.
Checking in on March 5th?
Yes, but actually, I want to check out on the 11th. I really like sleeping in airports.
You want 1 room at the Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites in Portland cheking in on March 5th and checking out on March 11th.
Yes. That is correct.
Your room is confirmed.
What was the price? What's their ohone number?
The total cost will be $504. The hotle's phone number is +1 503-251-9991.
What are soem attractions in that area?
Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden is a Park in that area.
Ok. What else? Free admission, if possible.
Lan Su Chinese Garden is a Park in that area.
Do they have a phone number there? Is it child friendly?
Reviews say it is a nice place to take your kids. Their phone number is 503-228-8131.
Ok. Thanks for the help. That's all for now.
Enjoy your trip and let me know if I can be of any further assistance.
Could you assist me in purchasing flight tickets for two people?
When do you intend to depart, and what day do you plan on returning?
I can depart at half past 9 in the morning for my onward trip, and I'd like to return on the 14th.
What location will you depart from, and is there an airline you prefer, such as Alaska Airlines, Delta Airlines, or some other? What day do you intend to depart?
I am departing on the 1st of this month from LA, and I'd like to get American Airlines.
What place do you intend to visit, and wen would you like the return flight to depart?
I prefer to travel in economy, and I intend to depart at 6 in the morning for the return flight to head to Portland.
Please verify the following information: 2 economy seats for an American Airlines flight departing from Los Angeles to Portland on MArch 1st, 9:30 am. The return flight leaves on 6 am on March 14th.
Yeah, that's perfect for me. Can I get the money back for the ticket?
Your ticket is verified. Sadly, you cannot get your money back for the ticket.
Does the flight have stops?
There is 1 stop.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
I'd like to look for a hotel in the area and reserve 1 room.
What do you think about Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station, which has a 4.3 rating?
Can you tell me its contact number and location?
The contact number is +1 503-200-5678 and its location is 9920 Northeast cascades Parkway.
That's fine by me; Id like to reserve a hotel room.
Would you like to check in on MArch 1st?
No, I'd like to check in on next Thursday.
Would you like to check out on March 14th?
I would like to check out on the 12th.
Please verify the following information: you'd like to reserve 1 room at Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station in Portland. The check-in day is on March 7th, and the check-out day is March 12th.
Yeah, that's fine by me; does the hotel perit pets?
Your booking is complete, and the hotel permits petes.
How much does it cost?
The price is $760.
Thank you for your help. Could you tell me about attractions there, preferably child-friendly ones?
I recommend the park called Crystal Springs Rhododendron garden.
Can you tell me their contact number?
Their contact number is 503-771-8386.
Is the park's entry free of charge?
Yes, the the entrance is free of charge.
Alright, wonderful. That's all; see ya.
Have fun at the attraction!
Can you please find me two round trip flight tickets, flying out on the 6th of March and returning on the 10th?
Please tell me if you prefer a specific airline, like maybe American Airlines, Air France or any other one, as well as your departure and when do you want your return flight to take off.
I like flying Southwest Airlines and I'm leaving from LAX. I'd like to return around 6:30 in the morning.
Please also tell me your preferred take of time for you onward flight as well as your destination.
I'm flying to NY and I'd like to leave around one pm.
Can you please confirm that you want to book 2 Economy tickets from Los Angeles to New York for the Southwest Airlines flight taking off on March 6th at 1 pm with the return flight on March 10th at 6:30 am.
Yes, that's correct. Please tell me if it has one stop and also the price.
I've successfully booked your tickets. Indeed the flight has 1 stop and the price is $297.
Thank you for everything.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
Please find me two hotel rooms at destination.
There's 10 hotels meeting your criteria, out of which I recommend 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge, rated at 4.5
Can you please tell me their phone number as well as if they allow pets?
The hotel can be reached at +1 833-625-6111 and it welcomes pets.
Perfect. Let's place the reservation.
You want the rooms from March 6th to March 10th?
Yes, that's correct.
Can you please confirm that you want 2 rooms at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York from March 6th to March 10th?
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me the price as well as their address?
I've successfully booked your rooms which cost $1,440 in total. The hotel is located at 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn.
Can you find me any kind of attractions there?
There are 10 attractions matching your criteria out of which I recommend checking out a nice Performing Arts Venue, the 92nd Street Y.
Cool, please tell me their number.
You can reach them at (212) 415-5788.
Do you know if they're child-friendly as well as if they charge admission?
The place is not exactly kids friendly. However, they do not charge admission.
Great, that will be all for now.
Have a nice day!
I would like to find a flight ticket.
Do you prefer United Airlines, Air France or another airline? Where are you departing from?
I prefer United Airlines and I'm leaving from Vancouver, BC.
When are you leaving and returning?
I will be leaving on the 7th around 17:30 and returning 12:45 pm.
Where are you traveling?
I'm traveling to Chi-Town.
When are you coming back?
I will get back on the 12th.
Booking 1 economy flight Vancouver to Chicago with United Airlines for March 7th leaving at 5:30 pm and return is March 12th at 12:45 pm.
Yes, that sounds good. Is the ticket refundable and what is the cost?
I was unable to book this flight.
Can you find a trip around quarter past 3 in the morning?
Booking 1 economy flight Vancouver to Chicago with United Airlines for March 7th leaving at 12:45 pm and return is March 12th at 3:15 am.
Yes, that works for me.
Your ticket has been purchased.
I would like to book an hotel.
There is AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown and has a 4.3 rating.
That would work for me.
Would you like to book a room?
Yes, a reservation on the 7th and checking out on the 8th of this month, 3 rooms.
Booking 3 rooms at AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown from March 7th to March 8th in Chicago.
Yes, is it pet friendly?
The reservation was made. Yes it's pet-friendly.
What is the address and the cost?
The address is 630 North Rush Street and the cost is $252.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with anything else?
Is there a child-friendly attraction there?
There are 10 attractions. There is 360 Chicago it's a tourist Attraction.
Thank you that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
leaving 09:15 from portland, or
where are you going and what time?
leaving eight in the night and going to la
delta airlines, american airlines
friday next week delta airlines
when will you leave?
Leaving march 5th
confirm portland los angeles delta airlines march 5th and returning march 8th and onward 8 pm and return 9:15 am 1 economy
yes what is return?
return is 2:13 pm
thanks a lot
anything else for you?
I want a hotel
10 hotels ac hotel by marriott beverly hills 4.4
anything else for you?
airtel plaza hotel 3.9
what phone number?0-224-7835
+1 800-224-7835
check in march 5th
check out march 8th
7th of march check out
airtel plaza hotel los angeles check in march 5th march 7th checkout 1 room
yes that works
cost is $504
what is address?
7277 valjean avenue, van nuys, california 91406, united states
looking for place of interest
7 places hollywood walk of fame tourist attraction
Okay good then
enjoy it now
I'd like to find a roundtrip flight on the 3rd.
Where are you leaving from?
I'll be going from LA.
Returning when please?
Coming back next Wednesday.
What is your destination?
I'm going to Atlanta from New York City.
I have 4 possible options for you. American Airlines has a flight at 11:20 AM with a 6:25 AM return which costs $129.
What is the arrival time of the onward flight?
That is at 1:42 PM.
How many stops are there and is it a refundable ticket?
It has 0 stops and the ticket can be refunded.
Is there anything on United Airlines for two people?
I have 1 United Airlines flight which leaves at 8:20 AM and comes back at 12:50 PM for $143.
That will do.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I'd like to purchase tickets.
Confirming a United Airlines flight from New York to Atlanta on March 3rd at 8:20 AM and returning March 6th at 12:50 PM for 2 economy seats.
Sounds good, thank you.
The reservation is complete.
Now I need a hotel, someplace that takes pets.
I have 10 hotels. Would you like to stay at the Aloft Atlanta Downtown, which is rated 4.0?
Sounds good, yes.
How else may I help you?
I'd like to book a hotel room.
Checking in on March 3rd and checking out March 6th?
Checking in March 5th please.
Confirming a reservation at the Aloft Atlanta Downtown in Atlanta on March 5th for 1 room and checking out March 6th.
Sounds good, thank you.
The room has been reserved.
I need the address please.
The address is 300 Ted Turner Drive Northwest.
Great. I'd also like to find some attractions please.
I have 10 possibilities for you. How about Atlanta Botanical Garden, which is a park?
Great, I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
I'm looking for a round trip flight.
Where are you leaving from, and what's your destination?
I want to fly from LA to San Fran.
What are your departure and return dates?
I want to leave on the 8th of this month and get back on the 10th of this month.
There is an American Airlines flight for $106 that leaves at 6:30 am. The return flight leaves at 3:50 pm.
How many stops does it have? Is it refundable?
It has 0 stops. But the ticket is not refundable.
That sounds good. I'd like to buy tickets for that one.
So, just to confirm: You want 1 Economy ticket with the American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to San Francisco leaving March 8th at 6:30 am. The return flight leaves on March 10th at 3:50 pm. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right. What airport does it land at, and what's the ETA?
Your ticket is confirmed. It is scheduled to land at SFO International Airport at 7:55 am.
I need to book a hotel there too. I only need 1 room.
I found 10 hotels. How about Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco? It has a 3.5 rating.
Yeah, that's good.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, book me a room.
Will you be checking out on March 10th?
Yes, that's right.
Are you checking in on March 8th?
No, I'll be checking in on the 9th.
So you want to reserve 1 room at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco from March 9th to March 10th. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation has been made.
Is there anything cool to do there?
You can see Alcatraz. It's a popular historical landmark.
Okay, cool.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I need a hand because I need a round trip flight
Where will you start your trip?
I'll be in SF and I wish to travel with united airlines
do you already know when do you want to be back?
The date is March 9th
I've noted it down, tell me the leaving date now.
The leaving date is the 3rd of march
where do you want to land?
I need to be in chi-town
There's this 1 flight that you may like if united airlines works for you. You'll leave at 9:20 pm and your return flight will take of at 1:50 pm. You'll pay $245 for this trip.
Tell me the name of the departure airport and the time the plane will land in my destination
You'll leave from sfo international airport and you'll land at 4:07 am
it's a possibility
I can make it a reality
Make it happen then.
confirm the data I have and I'll but the tickets for you. You want 1 economy tickets for a united airlines flight leaving from san francisco and going to chicago. You'll leave on march 3rd at 9:20 pm and you'll take off from your destination on March 9th at 1:50 pm
sounds like my perfect plan
I can confirm you that the procedure is final
thanks, now we have to think about a place to stay while there
you have something like 10 hotels to chose from. I can suggest you ac hotel by marriott chicago downtown, rating is 4.3
give me phone number and street address.
you'll find it at 630 north rush street and you can reach it at +1 312-981-6600
Look for something else, I only need one room
there's ace hotel chicago, rating is 4.6
I like it, take it for me. Check in is on the 4th of this month and check out is next wednesday
greenlight this: I'll book 1 room for you at ace hotel chicago in chicago from march 4th till march 6th
yes, verify the price and if the place is pet friendly
You can bring your furry friend and the costs for your stay is $768. I confirm you that the room has been booked.
that's nice.Now I would like to plan some activities to do while there, I don't have a specific request but it must be something that a child can do.
there's a tourist attraction called 360 chicago
sounds like something I may like
do you still want my assistance for some other question?
no, I don't need anything else, bye bye
have a wonderful day
Can you find me some round trip Economy flights to London, England?
Sure, when do you plan to fly there?
I plan to fly on the 5th.
Please tell me when do you return as well as your departure location.
I'll be flying out of LAX and I want to return on the 13th of this month.
There's an American Airlines flight which takes off at 8:30 am with the return flight taking off at 3:05 pm. Total cost is $342.
Perfect. Can you get tickets for two persons for me?
Can you please confirm that you want 2 Economy tickets for March 5th for the American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to London which takes off at 8:30 am with the return flight on March 13th taking off at 3:05 pm?
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your ticket.
Perfect, now let's find 1 hotel room at destination.
There are 10 hotels meeting your criteria out of which I recommend 45 Park Lane rated at 4.7.
Sounds perfect to me.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you?
Sure, please do. I'll be checking in on the 5th.
I presume you'll be checking out on March 13th?
No, I plan to check out on March 12th.
OK, can you please confirm that you want to book 1 room at 45 Park Lane in London from March 5th to March 12th.
Yes, that's correct. Please tell me their address as well as if they're pet friendly.
Your reservation was successful. The hotel is located at 45 park Lane and is pet friendly.
Thanks. Can you find some child friendly attractions in the area?
There's 10 meeting your criteria, but you should definitely check your a great Historical Landmark, 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin).
Perfect. Thanks. That will be all for now.
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
I would like to find a round trip to Portland, Or for four people.
When do you plan to leave and where are you located?
I'm leaving from Seattle tomorrow and would like to travel with United Airlines.
When are you returning?
I will be returning on March 11th.
There is 1 United Airlines flight that leaves at 4:15 am and returns at 10:45 pm for $72.
I would like to buy economy tickets.
4 economy tickets to United Airlines from Seattle to Portland on March 2nd leaving at 4:15 am and returning on March 11th at 10:45 pm.
Which airport does the flight depart from?
Your ticket is purchased. The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
I would like to find an hotel.
There are 10 hotels. There is Aloft Portland Airport At cascade Station the rating is 4.3.
Do you have other hotels?
There is Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites that has a 4.4 rating.
That hotel sounds perfect.
Can I help with something else?
I would like to book a room for March 3rd till the 8th of this month.
Booking 1 room at Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites from March 3rd to March 8th in Portland.
What is their phone number and is it pet-friendly?
Your book is reserved. Their phone number is +1 503-251-9991 and it's not pet friendly.
Thank you for the information.
Can I help with something else?
I'm looking for a garden.
There are 3 attractions. There is Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden it's a park.
Thank you for the information.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
I need a round trip flight.
What day are you returning?
I am returning Wednesday next week.
Where are you departing?
I am departing out of LAX.
Where are you going?
I am going to SFO.
What date are you departing?
I am departing Sunday this week.
Search revealed 3 results. There is an Alaska Airlines round trip flight that departs at 5:50 pm and then at 8:20 pm respectively and the cost is $101
That works for me. Get me an Economy ticket for one person.
You want 1 Economy class ticket on an Alaska Airlines flight from Los Angeles to San Francisco. The first flight departs at 5:50 pm on March 3rd and the second flight departs at 8:20 pm on March 6th. Is that right?
That is all correct. How many total stops are there?
Your ticket is booked and there are 0 stops.
Can I get a refund on the ticket and when does the second flight land?
The ticket is not refundable and the second flight will touch down at 9:45 pm.
Thanks a lot. I need to find a hotel now nearby.
Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco has a 3.5 rating.
How do I contact them and are pets allowed?
You can contact them at +1 415-673-3277 and no pets are allowed.
That is great. Book me a room.
Are you checking out on March 6th?
I am checking out Tuesday next week.
Are you arriving March 3rd?
Yes, and get me 3 rooms.
You want 3 rooms at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco? in San Francisco from March 3rd to March 5th, correct?
That is right. What is the total bill?
Your booking is complete and the total bill is $504.
What is their venue location?
They are located at 749 Taylor Street.
Thanks. Find me some attractions that kids would enjoy.
Search revealed 10 results. Alcatraz Island is a Historical Landmark.
What is their contact number and is this free?
You can contact them at 415-561-4900 and they do charge entrance fees.
I see. That is everything. Bye.
Have a great trip.
Can you check some round trip flights for me?
What date are you returning?
On the 14th.
What date do you want to leave. Where do you want to leave from and where do you want to go?
The 5th of this month, from ATL to NYC.
I found 4 possible flights. There's one on American Airlines That leaves at 6:25 am and the return flight leaves at 11:20 am for $147.
That sounds good.
Shall I buy the ticket?
Yes, please do.
To verify: You would like 1 economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from Atlanta to New York that leaves at 6:25 am March 5th and the return flight leaves at 11:20 am on March 14th.
Yes that's right.
Your flight is confirmed.
Great, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
I'll need a hotel while I'm there.
I found 10 possible hotels. There's 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge, with a 4.5 rating.
What is another choice? I want to get one room.
There's still 9 others. 1 Hotel Central Park has a 4.5 rating.
Are pets allowed?
Yes they are.
That sounds good.
Shall I make a reservation?
Yes please, with a check out day of March 13th.
Do you want to check in March 5th?
No, on the 11th.
Okay, to make sure this is correct: You want to book 1 room at 1 Hotel Central Park in New York from March 11th until March 13th.
That's right. What is their phone number?
+1 212-703-2001. Your reservation is confirmed.
Great. Can you look at some things to do while I'm there. I'd like to visit a child-friendly museum without an entry fee.
A good museum choice is the American Museum of Natural History.
Sounds great. That's all I need. Bye
Enjoy your trip.
Could you look up round trip flights for me? I'd like to return on March 4th.
What time do you intend to depart, what place will you go to, and what location will you depart from?
I am going to London, and I will depart from SF on March 1st.
There is a ticket costing $385 for an outbound American Airlines flight departing at 7:05 am eith a return flight leaving at 3:05 pm.
That sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to purchase tickets for it?
Yeah, I'd like to reserve the ticket.
Please verify the following information: 1 economy seat for an American Airlines fight departing from San Francisco to London on March 1st at 7:05 am. The flight will return on March 4th, leaving at 3:05 pm.
That's perfect. What date does my return flight come, and how many stops does it have?
Your ticket is verified. The return flight comes at 11:45 pm, and has 1 stop.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
I'd like to look up a hotel there.
What do you think of 45 Park Lane, with a 4.7 rating?
That's good.
Would you like to continue to book the hotel?
Yeah, I'd like to make the booking.
Do you wish to check in on March 1st?
I'd like to check in on tomorrow.
Would you like to check out on March 4th?
Yeah, that's good. I'd like to reserve 2 rooms.
Please verify the following information; a booking for 2 rooms at the 45 Park Lane hotel in London, slated to check in on March 2nd and check out on March 4th.
Yeah, that's good. How much does it cost, and what is the contact number?
Your booking is successful, and the price is $840. The contact number is +44 20 7493 4545.
Could you tell me about several attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that may suit your tastes. I recommend the 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin), which is a Historical Landmark.
Alright, how wonderful!
Is there something else I could help with?
Nah, thank you for your help.
Have fun at the event!
Can you find round trip flights for me? I am going to Paris, France and leaving on March 5th.
What is your point of departure? When are you returning?
I would like to get back next Friday. I will be leaving from Chicago.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 5:10 am and a return flight leaving at 4:05 am. The ticket costs $333.
Are there other flights that are available? I like to travel in economy.
There is a flight on Delta Airlines. The outbound flight departs at 6:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 11:20 pm. The flight will cost $256.
This flight sounds very good to me.
Should I purchase the tickets for you?
Yes, I want to have the ticket booked.
Please confirm for me these details: the flight leaves from Chicago and lands in Paris on Delta Airlines. The flight will depart on March 5th at 6:40 pm and the return flight leaves March 8th at 11:20 pm. There will be 1 passenger in economy.
Yes that sounds fine. What time does the onward flight get there?
The ticket is confirmed for you. The onward flight will reach its destination at 11:36 am.
Is there 1 stop on this flight? Which airport will the flight depart from?
This flight has 0 stops and departs from O'Hare International Airport.
Thanks very much for your help. I would like to book 1 room in a hotel there. I need to find one that allows pets.
What do you think of Ac Hotel By Marriott Paris Porte Maillot? It has a rating of 4.3.
That sounds perfect to me.
Would you like to keep going and reserve the hotel.
Yes, I would like to reserve a room, checking in on next Thursday.
Would you like to check out on March 8th?
Yes, that would be good for me.
Please confirm these details: make a reservation for 1 room at Ac Hotel by Marriott Paris Porte Maillot in Paris. You will check in on March 7th and check out on March 8th.
Yes that's very good for me.
The reservation is successfully confirmed.
Can you show some attractions there for me?
You should go see a place of worship, American Church in Paris.
Okay, that's great.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
No, that was very helpful. Thanks a lot.
Have a great time!
Search round trip flights for me please.
What are your travel dates? where will you be leaving from?
I am traveling from San Francisco on the 8th and want to get back on the 13th
What is the destination?
It is LA
I have found an alaska airlines flight that leaves at 7:10 pm and costs $102 The return flight leaves at 5:50 pm.
Which is the airport of departure?
It leaves from SFO international airport
Is the ticket refundable? what is the arrival time?
The ticket is non refundable and flight arrives at 8:35 pm
Find me something else. There are 4 people.
There is a American airlines flight at 3:50 pm that costs $99. the return flight leaves at 6:30 am
Cool, book this one.
Booking 4 economy tickets on the American airlines flight from San Francisco to Los Angeles on March 8th at 3:50 pm and returns on march 13th at 6:30 am
cool, which airport does the flight depart from and what is the time for onward flight's arrival?
It departs from SFO international airport and arrives at 5:15 pm
Cool, also search for a hotel there.
I found 10 hotels for you. How about the 4.4 rated ac hotel by marriott beverly hills?
What's their number?
It is +1 323-852-7000
Is it pet friendly?
No, it is not.
show me something else. I need two rooms
How about the 3.9 rated airtel plaza hotel?
Sounds good to me
Should I book it then?
Yes, do that.
The check in date is march 8th right?
Yes, that is correct.
And check out on March 13th?
no, it is the 11th
Booking 2 rooms at airtel plaza hotel in Los Angeles from march 8th to march 11th
Cool, that is perfect
Booking confirmed.
Can you also show me some attractions there?
How about a historical landmark angels flight railway?
I want something child friendly, like a museum
There are 10 museum for you. How about the autry museum of the american west?
That works. Thanks. That's all I need for now.
Enjoy your trip!
I want you to find me a round trip flight.
From where will you be leaving from, and where you want to arrive?
I will be flying from Los Angeles, to go to Vancouver.
When do you want to leave for your trip, and when will you be returning?
I want to leave on 5th of March, and I will return on 11th of March.
There are 2 flights which match what you want. One of the flights is with American Airlines, which has an onward flight departing at 3:05 pm, and when it returns it flies at 11 pm. The ticket of this flight costs $193.
Can you tell me when the return flight arrive, and at which airport the flight arrives at?
The returning time of the flight is 2:04 am. The destination of the flight is YVR International Airport.
This flight seems nice to me. Is it possible for you to buy me tickets for this flight?
Can you confirm that you want to buy Economy flight ticket for 1 person, for the American Airlines flight which leaves from Los Angeles on March 5th at 3:05 pm, to go to Vancouver, and returns on March 11th at 11 pm?
This suits me well.
Your requested ticket, has been booked.
I appreciate your help. I also want to have a place to stay there, so I need to find a hotel.
There are 10 hotels which you might like. How would you like to stay at Atrium Inn Vancouver, which has a rating of 3.7?
That is good. I want to book a room at this hotel.
Will you be leaving the hotel on March 11th?
That's not right, because I will need the room in the hotel till the 10th.
Will you go at the hotel on March 5th?
That's not correct, because I will go at the hotel on March 8th.
Can you please confirm that you want to book 1 room at Atrium Inn Vancouver hotel in Vancouver, and that you will go there on March 8th, and you will need the room till March 10th?
Alright, that is what I want.
Your requested room has been booked.
Is there some attractions I can visit there?
There are 10 attractions which you might like. You might consider visiting Bloedel COnservatory, which is a Park.
Alright, good. That would be all, good bye for now.
Have a good time!
I need two tickets for a trip. Leavin the 4th of March and coming back the 9th.
Where would you like to go and where are you leaving from?
I want to go from San Diego to Vegas.
There is a $89 American Airlines flight leaving at 4:40 pm. The return flight leaves at 7:15 pm.
That sounds good, can you help me buy the tickets?
No problem, please confirm the following for me: You want 2 economy tickets for the 4:40 pm American Airlines flight leaving San Diego on March 4th, going to Las Vegas. The return ticket is March 9th and leaves at 7:15 pm. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct. What's the departing airport?
Your ticket is confirmed. It leaves from SAN International Airport.
Thanks for the assistance. I also want to find a hotel there.
There is a 4.3 rated Best Western Plus Las Vegas West.
That would work just perfect.
Do you want to go ahead and make that reservation?
Yes, I want to make a reservation.
Do you want to check in on March 4th and check out on march 9th?
Yes, that works perfect.
Please confirm the following: 1 room at the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West in Las Vegas. Check in date of March 4th and checing out March 9th.
Actually make the check in March 5th and the check out March 8th.
Ok, please confirm the following changes: You'd like a check in of March 5th and to check out on March 8th?
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation is complete.
Thanks! Are there any interesting attractions there? Preferrably without an entry fee?
There is a museum - the DISCOVERY Children's Museum.
What other attractions are there. Are there any garden s?
There is a Park called Floyd Lamb Park.
Ok cool, that's all I needed, thank you.
Have a good day!
I need flights for two people?
Where will you depart from and when will you return?
I am leaving from ATL and will return on 14th of March.
Where are you going?
I am going to Vancouver.
On what date are you leaving?
On the 12th.
There are 2 possibilities for you, one is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 3:20 pm and returning at 2:50 am costing $249 all in.
That suits me fine.
Would you like me to purchase tickets for you?
yes please I would like tickets
To confirm then that is 2 economy tickets flying with Delta Airlines from Atlanta to Vancouver on March 12th to March 14th leaving at 3:20 pm returning at 2:50 am.
Yes that all suits fine. Now can you tell me which airport we will arrive at and also if it is possible to refund the tickets?
Your tickets are now booked. Your will arrive at YVR International Airport and sorry but your ticket is non refundable.
Could you help me to source 1 room in a hotel which allows pets?
There is one that has a 3.7 rating called Atrium Inn Vancouver.
That is exactly what I want, could you book it for me please?
Will you be checking in on March 12th?
No on March 13th.
Will you be checking out on March 14th?
Yes that is correct.
To confirm then you want 1 room from March 13th to March 14th at Atrium Inn Vancouver in the city of Vancouver.
Yes that suits fine, how much will it cost?
It will cost $117 and your booking is now confirmed.
Thanks for that now can you show me some tourist attractions to see, ideally I would like a natural spot that is child friendly.
Your should go to the Nature Preserve called Vancouver Aquarium.
fine that is good, that is everything I need for now, good bye.
All the best.
Can you help me find a round trip flight? I prefer to fly with Delta Airlines.
Where do you want to visit? When will you be coming back?
I need to go to Los Angeles and I need to arrive back on the 10th of this month.
When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I leave on March 3rd from Vancouver. I'd prefer to fly premium economy.
I found 1 good Delta Airlines flight. The outbound leaves at 3:20 am and the return leaves at 10:55 am. It costs $219.
Is the ticket refundable? When does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight arrives at 6:24 am. The ticket is not refundable.
That sounds good to me. Can you buy it for me?
Please confirm: 1 seat on the flight from Vancouver to Los Angeles via Delta Airlines on March 3rd and March 10th. The onward flight will leave at 3:20 am and the return flight will depart at 10:55 am. You'll be traveling in premium economy.
Yes, that sounds correct. Which airports does it travel between?
Your ticket is confirmed. It travels between YVR International Airport and LAX International Airport.
Thanks so much for your help.
Do you need help with anything else?
I need to find a hotel there with 1 room.
I found 10 options. How about the Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills? It's rated at 4.4.
Anything else? And can you make it two rooms please?
I found 9 hotels for you. What do you think of the Airtel Plaza Hotel? It's rating is a 3.9.
That one sounds good.
Do you want to reserve the rooms?
Yes, I'd like that.
Will your check out date be March 10th?
No, I want to check out on the 9th of this month.
And you'll check in on March 3rd?
No, I'll check in on the 4th.
Please confirm: 2 rooms at the Airtel Plaza Hotel in Los Angeles from March 4th through March 9th.
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservation was successful.
Do they allow pets? How much does it cost?
They do allow pets, and the total of the reservation is $1,215.
Thanks so much. Do you know of any free attractions nearby?
How about the Autry Museum of the American West? That's a museum.
Okay, that one sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
No thanks, that'll be all.
Enjoy your trip!
I need a round trip flight.
Where would you be leaving from and when would you be returning?
I am leaving chicago and I want to return on the 14th of march.
Where are you heading to and when would you like to leave?
I would be traveling to London, UK Monday next week.
There is a flight on american airlines that leaves at 4:30 am and returns at 2:05 pm. The cost of the ticket is $342.
Which airport would it be leaving from?
From o'hare international airport.
I am not sure if I want to go so I need to know if the ticket is refundable?
I am sorry but the ticket is non-refundable.
That would be fine. I want 4 economy tickets.
You would like economy tickets for 4 on an american airlines flight from chicago to london that leaves on march 4th at 4:30 am and returns on march 14th at 2:05 pm.
That would be great.
I have confirmed your ticket.
What time would the return flight arrive and what time would the onward flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 6:34 pm and the onward flight arrives at 6:04 am.
Thanks a lot. I need two rooms at a hotel.
I have found 10 hotels. 45 park lane is a lovely 4.7 rating hotel that you might like.
That would be great. I want to make reservations there.
You would like to check out on March 14th?
I want to check out on the 13th of this month.
You would like to check in on March 4th?
I want to check in on the 6th of March.
You would like 2 rooms at 45 park lane in london from march 6th to march 13th?
Yes, that would be fine. Would I able to bring my pet?
I have made the reservation. You can bring the pet.
What is the address and price.
It is at 45 park lane and the price is $2,184.
Thanks. Is there a mall close by there?
There is a shopping area called borough market.
Would kids enjoy going there?
Yes, they would.
Is there a cost to enter and what is the number?
There is no entry fee and the number is 20 7407 1002.
Well, that would be fine.
You need help with anything else?
No. You have been most helpful. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
I'm looking to take a trip soon. Can you search for round trip flights for me?
Sure. Where will you be leaving from?
I'm flying out of Philadelphia.
What's your destination?
I'm taking a trip to Chi-town.
What date do you wish to leave?
I'd like to leave on the 4th.
Ok, when would you like to return?
I'd like to be back by Thursday next week if I can.
Okay, I found an American Airlines flight departing at 10:10 am. The return will be leaving at 6:40 pm. The ticket price is $129.
Okay, that flight sounds perfect. Thanks.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yeah, go ahead and book a ticket for me.
Okay, please confirm the following details: Purchasing 1 Economy class seat for an American Airlines flight from Philadelphia to Chicago on March 4th at 10:10 am. The returning flight will be on March 7th at 6:40 pm. Is this correct?
Yeah, that sounds good. Can you tell me when my return flight will arrive back home? How many stops will it have?
The return flight will arrive at 9:51 pm and there are 0 stops. Your ticket has been confirmed. Enjoy your trip!
Thanks. Can you find me a hotel to stay in out there?
What about the Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown? It's has a rating of 4.3.
Do they allow pets? What's the address?
Yes, pets are welcome. The address is 630 North Rush Street.
Okay, that's perfect. I'd like to go ahead and make a reservation. Can you book a room for me next Wednesday? I'd like to stay until the 4th.
No problem. Please confirm the following details: making a reservation for 1 room at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago on March 4th. Your check-out date will be March 6th. Correct?
Yea, that works for me. Thanks.
Your reservation was successful. Enjoy!
Thanks. I'd like to have some fun while i'm out there. Can you show me some fun attractions around town?
I've found 10 attractions that may interest you. I think you should check out the 360 CHICAGO. It's a pretty popular Tourist Attraction around town.
Okay, that sounds great.
Anything else I can assist you with?
No thanks. That was helpful, appreciate it. Bye.
My pleasure. Enjoy!
I am looking for flights.
On what date will you be leaving?
on the 8th of this month.
Where are you going and from which city are you leaving?
I am leaving from Seattle to Phoenix, AZ.
On what date will you be returning?
On March 10th.
There are 3 possible flight options for you. There is an American Airlines flight which departs at 8:15 am and returns at 6:15 am costing $256.
What are the other options?
There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 8:45 am and returns at 11:55 am. The total ticket price is $268.
What else is there?
There is a United Airlines flight which departs at 5:30 am and retuns at 6:10 pm costing $222.
When will the return flight touch dowwn?
At around 11:43 pm.
Which airport will the returning flight be going from and is it possible to refund the ticket?
Sorry but the ticket is not refundable and the flight leaves from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That flight suits me fine.
Will I buy some tickets for you?
Yes I want two economy tickets.
To confirm then that is 2 economy tickets from Seattle to Phoenix with United Airlines. The flight departs at 5:30 am on March 8th and returns on March 10th at 6:10 pm.
Yes that all sounds good. At what time will the outbound flight touch down?
it arrives at 10:35 am and you ticket is now booked.
Thanks for your assistance, now Will you help me to get a hotel?
There is one called Aloft Phoenix-Airport which has a rating of 4.2.
Excellent that is the one.
Will I book it for you?
Yes Please book it.
Will you be checking in on March 8th and out on March 10th?
Yes that is correct.
To confirm then that is a booking for 1 room from March 8th to March 10th on Aloft Phoenix-Airport in Phoenix.
Yes all that infomation is correct.
Your booking is now confirmed.
Thanks now can you recommend any good attractions there?
There is a museum called Arizona Capitol Museum.
that sounds good, thanks and bye for now.
Have a good trip.
Can you find round trip flights?
Where are you going and when are you coming back?
I'm going to LA and coming back next Thursday.
When are you leaving and where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from San Fran on March 4th. I want to travel premium economy. There are three in our group.
I found 2 flights. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 12:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 6:30 am. The ticket is $172.
Sounds good. I want to buy tickets.
Please confirm: 3 passengers in premium economy. American Airlines flight leaving from San Francisco to Los Angeles. Departure is March 4th and the return date is March 7th. The onward flight leaves at 12:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 6:30 am.
Sounds good. When does the return flight leave and when does the onward flight arrive?
Your ticket has been booked. The return flight arrives at 7:55 am and the onward flight arrives at 1:40 pm.
Thank you. I want to find a hotel. I want to book one room where pets are allowed.
I found 10 hotels. Airtel Plaza Hotel has a rating of 3.9.
Sounds good. I want to make a reservation to check out next Thursday.
Is March 4th okay for check in?
I want to check in on March 5th.
Please confirm: a reservation for 1 room at Airtel Plaza Hotel in Los Angeles on March 5th. Check out is March 7th.
No, I'd like to check out on March 6th.
Please confirm: Check in March 5th and check out March 6th.
Yes, sounds good.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you. I want to find attractions.
I found 10 attractions. Angels Flight Railway is a historical landmark.
Okay, thanks. That's all.
Have a good day!
I wanna be back tuesday next week
where and when?
I am going to Vancouver and leaving 2nd of march from new york
delta airlines leaves 6 am and 12:20 pm for $324
that is good
should I get tickets?
yes I would
new york to Vancouver delta airlines march 2nd and march 5th leaves 6 am and returns 12:20 pm with 1 person in economy
yes that is good
ticket is good
thanks for the help
atrium inn vancouver rated 3.7
that is good
wanna reserve it?
I want one room next monday
check in march 2nd
yes that works
atrium inn vancouver hotel vancouver check in march 2nd and check out march 4th for 1 room
yes that works and what is the price?
it is $174 totally
I want garden
check out bloedel conservatory in the park and 5 attractions
wanna say this place is child friendly?
no it is good for kids
okay that is good
enjoy it now
I'd like a round trip ticket to ATL on the 14th of this month
When are you leaving?
march 5th
From where?
San Francisco
There are 4 flights. How about a 3:50 pm american airlines flight that returns at 11:40 am for $230?
Sure, that sounds good.
Anything else you need?
Yes, please book that ticket.
Please confirm: 1 economy american airlines flight from san francisco to atlanta on march 5th at 3:50 pm and returning march 14th at 11:40 am
Correct, is the ticket refundable and where does my oward flight arrive?
Ticket transaction is complete. No, it's not refundable and 1:24 am
I'd like one hotel room reservation too.
How about a 4.5 rated ac hotel by marriott atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza?
Sure, make it for march 5th and the check out march 12th
Please confirm: 1 room at the ac hotel by marriott atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza on march 5th and checking out march 12th in atlanta
Perfect, thanks
This reservation is complete
Can you tell me their number and address?
+1 470-231-3030 and 3600 wieuca road northeast
What attractions are near there?
There's a park called atlanta botanical garden
Perfect, thanks for everything.
Have fun!
I am looking for a round trip flight to Los Angeles. I want to fly on American Airlines.
What date would you be returning?
I'd like to return on March 13th.
What day will you be leaving?
I want to take off on the 10th of March, and there will be 2 in my party.
What will be the starting point of your trip?
I'd like to leave from Ciudad de Mexico.
Okay, I've located 1 flight that will work conveniently. It's on American Airlines, and it leaves at 8:05 am. The flight back leaves at 2:45 pm, and the ticket will cost $164.
What is the airport the flight leaves from?
It takes off from Benito Juarez International Airport.
Will the ticket be refundable?
No, this ticket won't be refundable, which is too bad.
Can you go ahead and help me get tickets for that flight? It sounds good.
Okay, but let me confirm first. You want to leave from Mexico City, traveling to Los Angeles on American Airlines. You want to take off on March 10th and come back March 13th. The flight out is at 8:05 am, and the flight back is at 2:45 pm. There will be 2 passengers, and you want to fly Economy.
That sounds just right. What time does the return flight get in?
The flight back gets in at 8:05 pm. I've got the ticket all reserved for you.
Great. I'd like to look for a hotel there too.
Here's one. It's Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills. It's rated 4.4.
That sounds just right. I'd like to go ahead and make a hotel reservation, checking in on the 10th of March and checking out on the 12th of March.
Sure! Let me make sure I have this right. You want to stay at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills, in Los Angeles. You want to stay from March 10th to March 12th, and you want 1 room.
You've got everything right.
Good. I successfully made a reservation for you.
Thanks! Could you tell me about some attractions near there?
Yes. There are 10 attractions around there I think you'd be interested in. One you might like is Angels Flight Railway. That's a Historical Landmark.
Terrific! That sounds good.
Can I do anything else for you today?
No, thanks. That's all.
I hope you enjoy your trip!
Could you please help me in finding a round trip flights?
When will you back? When will you plan to leave and from where?
I will be back on 10th of March. I will leave on 3rd of March from ATL.
Where do you want to go?
I want to go to Vancouver.
I searched and found 1 flight for you. A Delta Airlines flight starts at 12:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 2:50 am. The cost of the ticket is $290.
Whether the ticket is refundable? From which airport the flight starts from?
Sorry, the tickets are not refundable. The flight starts from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
It it good for me. Could you please book the flight tickets?
Kindly ensure that, on March 3rd, 1 Economy ticket has been booked in a Delta Airlines flight from Atlanta to Vancouver starts at 12:50 pm and the return flight leaves on March 10th at 2:50 am.
It is good for me.
Your ticket is booked.
Thank you so much for your help. I am looking for a hotel there.
I searched and found 10 hotels. What do you think about Atrium Inn Vancouver with the rating 3.7.
Do you have any other thing?
What do you think about Auberge Vancouver Hotel with the rating 4.1.
What is their contact phone number?
The contact phone number is +1 604-678-8899.
It is nice.
Shall I continue to reserve the hotel?
Yes. I wish to make a reservation.
Are you want to check out on March 10th and check in on March 3rd?
I want to check out on 7th of this month and check in on Wednesday next week.
Kindly ensure that, on March 6th, 1 room has been booked at Auberge Vancouver Hotel at Vancouver. The check out date is March 7th.
Yes. It is good for me. What is their contact address? Whether pets are permitted?
The reservation is done. The contact address is 837 West Hastings Street. Sorry, the pets are not permitted.
Thank you so much. Could you please show me some attractions without entry fee.
I found 6 attractions for you. Your check out is Bloedel Conservatory. It is a park.
Whether it is child friendly? What is their contact phone number?
No. It is not good for kids. Their contact phone number is 604-257-8584.
Okay. nice.
Do you need any other help?
No. That was so helpful. Thank you so much.
Enjoy the day.
Will you find Economy round trip flights departing on the 7th?
Departing from?
NY.
Destination? Return date?
Travel to LAX on American Airlines and return on 12th of this month.
I found 1 flight. American Airlines offers outbound flight that departs at 3:40 pm and return flight at 6:20 pm for $263.
How many stops? Onward flight arrival time?
1 stop. Onward flight arrives at 7:57 pm.
Perfect.
Buy tickets?
Sure.
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket for American Airlines from New York to Los Angeles that departs on March 7th at 3:40 pm and returns on March 12th at 6:20 pm.
Great.
I've made your reservation.
Thanks. Will you find a hotel there?
I found 10. Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills is a 4.4 star hotel.
Anything with one room?
Airtel Plaza Hotel is a 3.9 star hotel.
Anything else?
Banana Bungalow - Hollywood Hostel has a rating of 4.1.
Pet friendly? Their number?
+1 323-469-2500. No pets allowed.
Nice. Will you reserve a room with check out on 12th of this month.
Check in on March 7th?
Check in on March 10th and check out on 11th of this month.
Please confirm 1 room at Banana Bungalow - Hollywood Hostel in Los Angeles with check in of March 10th and check out of March 11th.
Perfect. Address and price?
5920 Hollywood Boulevard, Hollywood, CA 90028, USA. Total of $100. Your reservation is complete.
Will you find attractions?
I found 10. Angels Flight Railway is a Historical Landmark.
Nice.
Anything else?
That's all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Hey, can you help me search for some round trip flights?
What's the destination? When do you plan to leave and come back?
I'm traveling to Chicago. I plan to leave on the 6th and return on the 14th.
Where will you leave from?
Leaving from LA.
I found 3 flights. There's a American Airlines one that leaves at 5:20 am and returns at 4:30 am. The ticket will cost you $251.
At what time does the first flight arrive? In which airport does it depart from?
Departs from LAX International Airport, arriving at the destination at 2:55 pm.
Any other flight available?
There's a Delta Airlines one that leaves at 1:40 pm and returns an 11:15 pm. The ticket costs $181.
This one sounds real good.
Should I buy the tickets?
Yes please.
Just to confirm: you want 1 Economy ticket to a flight leaving from Los Angeles to Chicago then back on a Delta Airlines airplane. The onward flight leaves on March 6th at 1:40 pm and the return flight on March 14th at 11:15 pm.
Sounds good. Does the flight have one stop or more than that? From which airport does the onward flight departs from?
Ticket confirmed. It a flight with 0 stops leaving from LAX International Airport.
Thanks a lot. Help me find a hotel there too.
The Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown is a great one with a 4.3 stars rating there.
Any other available?
The Ace Hotel Chicago is also a great one with a 4.6 rating.
Sounds great. I want to make a reservation.
Will you be checking out on March 14th?
On Friday next week, actually.
Will you check in on March 6th or on another date?
On the 7th of March please. And it's just one room.
So 1 room at the Ace Hotel Chicago in Chicago, checking in on March 7th and checking out on March 8th?
Yes that's it.
Your reservation was successful.
Do they allow pets?
They do allow them.
Is it an expensive restaurant?
Your bill totaled in $92.
Thanks. Can you show me some Museum I could go to over there?
The American Writers Museum is a great Museum there.
Okay, good to know.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you. That was helpful.
Enjoy the day!
I'm looking for round trip flights.
What are you leave and return dates?
I'm leaving on the 6th and returning on March 8th. I'll be going to NYC.
And where will you be traveling from?
I'll be traveling from ATL.
There's an American Airlines flight with an outbound flight that leaves at 6:25 am and a return flight that leaves at 11:20 am. The ticks is $129.
What's the destination airport? And when does the return flight land?
The destination airport is JFK International Airport. And the return flight lands at 1:42 pm.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you get me a ticket?
I'll get you 1 Economy ticket for Atlanta to New York on American Airlines. The departure is March 6th at 6:25 am and the return is March 8th at 11:20 am. Is everything correct?
Everything is correct.
I've purchased the ticket.
I'll also need a hotel in New York.
There's 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge with a 4.5 rating.
What's their address and phone number?
They are located on 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn, and you can reach them at +1 833-625-6111.
That's just what I'm looking for.
Would you like to book a room?
Yes, please book 1 room for check in on the 6th and check out on March 8th.
I'll get you 1 room at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York with a check in on March 6th and a check out on March 8th. Is everything correct?
Yes, that's correct.
I've made you the reservation.
Thanks. I'm also looking for places to visit. Can you recommend a religious spot that doesn't cost anything.
There are 5 places that might interest you. There's First Corinthian Baptist Church. It's a place of worship.
I'd like to give them a call, what's their number.
You can call them at 212-864-5976.
Alright, nice. I don't need anything else, talk to you later.
Have fun there!
Hi, could you reserve a round trip to Phoenix, AZ please?
Where will you depart from and when is your intended period of travel?
I will be departing from SFO and travelling from 5th of this month to March 10th.
Would you like an American Airlines flight from 8:10 am to 6:15 am costing $167?
May I know which airport does this flight arrive at?
You will arrive at Sky Harbor International Airport.
Are there any available flights for a group of four travellers?
Would you like the Delta Airlines flight which departs at 5:50 am and returns at 11:55 am which costs $138?
This sounds great to me!
Would you like to purchase tickets for it?
Yes please, could you book an economy class tickets for us please?
Sure please confirm your reservation for 4 economy class tickets or the Delta Airlines flight from San Francisco to Phoenix which departs at March 5th at 5:50 am and returns at March 10th at 11:55 am.
That sounds good to me. Do you know which airport does the flight depart from and when will my return flight arrive?
Your reservation has been made. Your return flight arrives at 2:02 pm which will depart from Sky Harbor International Airport.
I see, could you search for some nice hotels there too?
There are 10 hotels, would you like the Aloft Phoenix-Airport with a 4.2 rating?
Do you have any alternatives?
How about the Arizona Grand Resort & Spa with a 4.3 rating?
That is fine with me.
Would you like me to reserve the hotel for you?
Yes, could you do so please?
Sure, will you be checking out on March 10th?
No, I wish to check out next Friday.
And will you be checking in on March 5th?
No, I will need 2 rooms for checking in on March 6th.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 rooms at the Arizona Grand Resort & Spa which is located in Phoenix from March 6th to March 8th.
This is perfect! Do you know how much will this cost me?
Your reservation has been made, which will cost you $528 in total.
Thank you, are there any child-friendly museum which I can visit in that area?
Yes, there is a museum called Arizona Science Center.
Can I have their contact number please?
Sure, you can contact them at 602-716-2000.
Sure, that is all I need for now, thank you!
Sure, enjoy your trip!
I'm about to take a trip soon. Can you help me search for some round trip flights?
Sure thing. Where will you be taking off from? Where are you planning to visit.
I am looking for flights from NYC to London, England.
Okay, I just need to know a few more details. What date are you planning to leave? And when do you wish to return?
I want to leave on the 9th of this month and I need to return by the 13th of March.
Okay, I've found 2 convient flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight taking off at 5:25 am with a return flight taking off at 2:05 pm. Total cost round trip will be $368.
No, that doesn't work for me. Are there any other available flights?
There is an outbound United Airlines flight leaving at 2:40 pm with a return flight that leaves at 0:25 am. The total cost round trip would be $282.
Okay, now that flight sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
Yes, can you help me buy tickets? I'd like to purchase 2 Economy class tickets.
No problem, just confirm the following for me: Purchasing 2 Economy class tickets for a round trip United Airlines flight from New York to London. The outbound flight takes off at 2:40 pm on March 9th and the return flight takes off at 0:25 am on March 13th. Correct?
Yes, that all sounds good.
Alright, your ticket is now confirmed. Enjoy your trip!
Thanks for the help! I'd also like to find a nice hotel in the area.
Okay, I've located 10 hotels for you. What about 45 Park Lane? It's a very nice hotel rated at 4.7.
What's the address?
They are located at 45 Park Lane.
Okay, what's their number? Are they pet friendly?
The phone number is +44 20 7493 4545 and they do welcome pets.
Can you find something else for me? I'm not sure about that place. I only need to book one room.
What about Abc Hyde Park Hotel? It's rated at an average of 3.2.
Okay, now that sounds perfect!
Would you like to reserve a room there?
Yes, go ahead and make the reservation for me.
Are you checking in on March 9th and checking out on March 13th?
Almost, I will be checking out on the 10th.
Okay, please confirm the following: making a reservation for 1 room at the Abc Hyde Park Hotel in London. You will be checking in on March 9th and checking out on March 10th. Correct?
Yes, that works for me. Are they pet friendly?
You've successfully made the reservation. Unfortunately, they do not allow pets.
Ok thanks. What are the attractions in the area?
There are 10 attraction that I think may interest you. How about the 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin). It's a Historical Landmark.
Okay that sounds great. Thanks.
Anything else I can help you with?
No that's enough for now. Thank you.
My pleasure. Enjoy your trip!
I need to find 1 economy round trip flight.
What is your departure location and return date?
I will be leaving from Vancouver, BC and going to ATL the 12th of this month.
What is your departure date?
I leave on March 9th.
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 2:50 am and arriving at 3:20 pm for $245 per ticket.
What is the arrival time of the return flight?
The return flight arrives at 6:01 pm.
Great. Please book it for me.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy flight on Delta Airlines on March 9th from Vancouver at 2:50 am returning from Atlanta at 3:20 pm on March 12th.
That sounds great.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
What is the departing airport?
The departing airport is YVR International Airport.
Thanks. Can we book 1 hotel room now?
AC Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza is a 4.5 rated area hotel.
That sounds great.
Would you like to continue with your reservation?
Yes. Please book.
Will you be checking in March 9th and checking out March 12th?
Actually, I'll be checking in on the 11th of March.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 room at the AC Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza in Atlanta checking in on March 11th and checking out on March 12th.
Yes. That is correct.
Your booking was a success.
What address is it located in?
It is located at 3600 Wieuca Road Northeast.
What their phone?
Their phone is +1 470-231-3030.
Thanks. Can you help me find some attractions near there?
Atlanta Botanical Garden is a Park near there.
Great. Thanks. That's all.
Please enjoy your day.
Can you find me some round trip flights?
Sure, but first please tell me your departure date and location as well as your return date.
I'm flying out of Los Angeles Sunday this week and I plan on returning next Friday.
Where are you flying to?
I'm flying to Seattle, WA.
There are 5 flight matching your criteria, out of which I'd recommend Alaska Airlines flight taking off at 7:10 pm with the return flight taking of at 3:45 pm with tickets priced at $141.
Any other flights available?
There also an American Airlines flight taking off at 11:45 pm with the return flight taking of at 8:15 am with tickets priced at $159.
Does it have stops?
No, it has 0 stops.
Perfect. Please tell me when does it land at destination as well as is the tickets are refundable.
The flight lands at 2:32 am and the tickets are non refundable.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to get tickets for you?
Yes, please do.
Can you please confirm that you want 1 Economy class ticket for the American Airlines flight taking off at 11:45 pm from Los Angeles on March 3rd to Seattle with the return flight taking of at 8:15 am on March 8th.
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your ticket.
Can you please tell me the destination airport?
Sure, the flight lands at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thanks. Now let's find 3 rooms at destination in a pet friendly hotel.
There are 10 meeting your criteria, out of which I recommend Ace Hotel Seattle rated at 4.5.
Anything else available? Also, please change the number of rooms to two.
How about Belltown Inn rated at 4.2.
Perfect, let's place the reservation.
Are you checking out on March 8th.
I'll be checking out Monday next week.
Are you checking in on March 3rd?
Yes, that's correct.
Can you please confirm that you want me to place a reservation for you at Belltown Inn in Seattle for 2 rooms from March 3rd to March 4th?
No, please change my stay - make it from next Wednesday to next Friday.
Can you please confirm that you'll be staying from March 6th to March 8th?
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me their phone number and address?
I've successfully placed your reservation. The hotel is located at 2301 3rd Avenue and you can reach them at +1 866-525-4704.
Thanks. Can you please find me some attractions at destination. I would be particularly interested to see a Historical Landmark.
If you want to see a cool Historical Landmark you should definitely check your Fremont Troll.
Is it child friendly?
No, unfortunately is not suitable for kids.
Do they charge admission?
Yes, they do.
OK, thanks for everything.
Have a nice day!
I need to find round trip flights.
Where are you going?
Going to Phoenix.
What is your departure date and location?
Leaving from Vancouver, BC on the 5th of this month.
What is your return date?
Returning on the 14th of March.
There is a flight on Delta Airlines leaving at 5:05 pm and returning at 11:55 am for a cost of $266.
That flight is good.
Would you like me to book the flights?
Yes. Please book.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy flight at Delta Airlines leaving from Vancouver on March 5th at 5:05 pm and returning from Phoenix on March 14th at 11:55 am.
Yes. Sounds perfect.
Your ticket has been booked.
Thanks. Can you help me find a hotel here?
The Aloft Phoenix-Airport is a hotel in the area with a 4.2 rating.
Where is it located?
It is located at 4450 East Washington Street.
Yes. That's right.
Should I reserve the room?
Yes. Please reserve.
Is your check in date March 5th?
Checking in next Friday.
Will you check out on March 14th?
Checking out on March 13th.
Please confirm you want to book 1 room at Aloft Phoenix-Airport in Phoenix checking in on March 8th and checking out on March 13th.
Yes. That one is right.
Your room reservation was a success.
I want to find some nearby attractions.
Arizona Capitol Museum is an area museum.
Are there any other free attractions?
There are 6 options. Castles N' Coasters is a Theme park in the area.
Great. That's all for now.
Okay. Please enjoy your day.
Could you look up round trip flights for my sake? I am departing next Wednesday from Vancouver, and I want Delta Airlines.
When will you return, and what place do you intend to visit?
I'd like to return on the 10th, and I intend to go to NY.
There is a ticket costing $311 for a Delta Airlines flight departing at 2:50 am, with a return flight that departs at 6 am.
Is there zero stops on the flight? What time does the onward flight come?
There is 1 stop, and the onward flight will come at 2:24 pm.
That sounds perfect for me. Could you assist me in purchasing flight tickets?
Please verify the following information: an economy seat for 1 for a Delta Airlines flight departing from Vancouver to New York. The flight will leave on March 6th at 2:50 am, and the return flight will depart at 6 am with a date of March 10th.
Nope, there are four people in my cohort.
Please verify the following information: 4 passengers for a flight returning on MArch 10th.
Yeah, that sounds perfect. Can I get my money back on the ticket? What airport does the flight leave from?
Your ticket is verified. Sadly, you cannot get a refund on the ticket. The flight leaves from YVR International Airport.
I'd like to look for a hotel for a reservation of three rooms.
I discovered 10 hotels. What do you think about 1 hotel Brooklyn Bridge, which has a 4.5 rating?
That's wonderful.
Would you like to continue booking the hotel?
Yeah, I'd like to make a booking.
Would you like to check in on March 6th?
I'd like to check in on the 8th.
Would you like to check out on MArch 10th?
I'd like to check out on the 9th.
Please verify the following information: a reservation for 3 rooms at the 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York on March 8th, with a check-out date on March 9th.
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Your booking is successful.
You have my gratitude.
Is there anything else I can assist with?
Can you tell me several attractions there? I'd like something that is friendly to children.
There are 10 attractions that may suit your tastes. I recommend the museum called American Folk Art Museum.
Alright, wonderful. That's all; see ya.
Have fun at the event!
Hi, could you search for some Economy round trip flights for me?
Where do you plan to visit, and when are your intended dates of travel.
I plan to visit Toronto from the 6th of March to March 13th.
Where will you be departing from?
I will be leaving from SF.
There are 1 available American Airlines flight which departs at 7:05 am and returns at 10:05 am costing $280.
That sounds great to me!
Do you require further assistance?
Sure, could you help me purchase the flight tickets?
Please confirm your purchase of 1 economy seat on the American Airlines flight travelling from San Francisco to Toronto. The flight departs on the March 6th at 7:05 am and returns on March 13th at 10:05 am.
Yes, this is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you! Could you also help me search for 1 room at a hotel, preferably one which allows pets on their premises.
There are 10 hotels you might like, one of which is the Best Western Premier Toronto Airport Carlingview Hotel with a 4.0 rating.
That is great! Could you help me make a hotel reservation on the 11th of march please?
Do you intend to check out on the March 13th?
No, I will be checking out on the 12th instead.
Please confirm your reservation for 1 room at the Best Western Premier Toronto Airport Carlingview Hotel in Toronto from March 11th to March 12th.
Sorry, could you check me in on the 6th of March till the 9th?
Sure, please confirm your stay from March 6th to March 9th.
Yes, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has been succesfully made!
Thank you for your help!
No worries, do you need further assistance?
Could you help me find some attractions there too?
How about a tourist attraction called 3D Toronto Sign?
I see, that is great!
Do you need any other help?
No, you have been very helpful, thanks!
Enjoy your trip!
Could you help me search for some round trip flights with Delta Airlines?
Any preference on the departure location and when will you be flying back?
I will be departing from Vancouver, BC and returning on March 13th.
Also, when do you plan to depart and where will you be visiting?
I will be departing on the 8th of March to Las Vegas.
There is 1 flight currently available, which is a Delta Airlines flight which departs at 3:20 am and returns at 12:20 pm, which will cost you $230.
Sure, do you know which airport will I be landing at?
You will be landing at the McCarran International Airport.
Sure, and which airport does the flight depart from and when will the departure flight arrive?
The departure flight will arrive at 9:15 am at the YVR International Airport.
This sounds great to me, could you help me to purchase the tickets please?
Sure, please confirm your purchase of 1 economy seat for the Delta Airlines flight from Vancouver to Las Vegas from the March 8th at 3:20 am to March 13th at 12:20 pm.
That sounds great to me! May I know if the ticket is refundable and when does the returning flight arrive?
Your reservation has been made. The return flight will arrive at 7:49 pm and unfortunately, your ticket is not refundable.
No worries, could you help me book 1 room at a hotel in that area please?
Sure, would you like the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West hotel with at 4.3 rating?
Sure, that is perfect. Could you check me in on the 8th of March please?
And will you be checking out on the March 13th?
Sorry, could you change my period of stay from the 9th to the 11th instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 room at Best Western Plus Las Vegas West which is located at Las Vegas from March 9th to March 11th.
Sure, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has successfully been made.
Thank you! Could you help me search for some attractions which I can visit there too?
Would you like a museum called DISCOVERY Children's Museum?
I see, that is fine with me!
Do you require any further assistance?
No, you have been very helpful, thank you!
Sure, enjoy your trip!
Hi, could you help me search for some round trip flights?
Any preference on the destination of the flight?
I will be travelling from Vancouver to NYC, and would prefer to travel in a Premium Economy class.
May I know your intended period of travel?
I will be travelling from March 9th to the 13th.
Sure, there is 1 Delta Airlines flight which departs at 6 am and returns at 2:50 am which costs $517.
That sounds great to me.
Would you like me to purchase some tickets for you?
Sure, could you purchase four tickets for me please?
Please confirm your purchase of 4 premium economy flight tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from New York to Vancouver, which departs at 6 am on March 9th an returns at 2:50 am on March 13th.
This sounds great to me!
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you, could you also help me search for a hotel which allows pets on premises?
Sure, there are 10 available hotels, would you like the Atrium Inn Vancouver with a 3.7 rating?
Sure, may I have their street address please?
They are located in 2889 East Hastings Street.
Do you have any alternatives? I am looking to book one room only.
Sure, how about the Best Western Plus Chateau Granville Hotel & Suites & Conference Ctr. with a 4.1 rating?
May I have their street address and contact number please?
You can contact them at +1 604-669-7070 and visit them at 1100 Granville Street.
Sure, could you make this reservation for me on March 9th please?
Sure, and do you intend to check out on March 13th?
No, I will be checking out on March 12th instead.
Please confirm your reservation for 1 room at Best Western Plus Chateau Granville Hotel & Suites & Conference Ctr. in Vancouver from March 9th to March 12th.
Yes, I am fine with this arrangement.
Your reservation has been made.
Could you help me search for some child-friendly attractions too?
Would you like to visit a park called Dr. Sun Yat-Sen Classical Chinese Garden?
I see, are there any alternatives available?
How about a theme park called FlyOver Canada?
I see, that is fine.
Could I further assist you?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
Sure, enjoy your trip!
I'm looking for round trip flights going to SFO.
When are your departure and return dates? And where will you be flying out of?
I'm going to be flying out of New York City. I want to leave on March 1st and return on March 11th.
There are 4 flights that could work. There's an American Airlines flight that is $219 per ticket. The departure flight leaves at 4:45 pm. The return flight leaves at 8:30 pm.
What else is there?
There's a Delta Airlines flight that is $207 per ticket. The departure flight leaves at 2:35 pm. The return flight leaves at 10:55 am.
Okay, that sounds like it'll work. Help me book a ticket.
I'll get you 1 Economy ticket for New York to San Francisco on Delta Airlines. The departure flight is on March 1st at 2:35 pm. The return flight in March 11th at 10:55 am. Please make sure everything is correct.
Yeah, that's everything I want. Does the flight have stops? Also, can I refund the ticket?
I've booked the ticket. There are 0 stops. The ticket cannot be refunded.
Now I also need a hotel room there. I need 2 rooms.
Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco is rated 3.5.
What else is there?
Argonaut Hotel is rated 4.4.
I really like the sound of that.
Do you want to book the rooms?
Yes, let's book them. I want to check out on March 4th.
Will check in be on March 1st?
No, check in will be on the 3rd.
I'll book you 2 rooms at Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco with a check in on March 3rd and check out on March 4th. Please make sure this is correct.
It's not correct. Make the check in March 6th and check out March 11th.
You want check in March 6th and check out March 11th, is that right?
Yes, that's right. Can you give me their phone number? I might want to call them.
I've booked the rooms. You can call them at +1 415-563-0800.
And what's their address? Also, are pets allowed?
495 Jefferson Street is the address. Pets are allowed.
Thanks. What are some attractions over there?
There's Alcatraz. It's a Historical Landmark.
Alright, cool.
Do you need any more help?
No, you've been really helpful, thanks.
Have fun there!
Hi, could you help me find a round trip flight?
Of course, when are you leaving?
I want to go on March 3rd.
Where are you departing and where would you like to go? Also, when will you return?
I want to leave San Diego and fly to Seattle, then come back home on 6th of this month.
Okay, there's a Delta Airlines flight costing $225 that departs at 11:05 am, and the return flight leaves at 8:45 am.
Yeah, that works. I'd like to get ticket 1 ticket in economy.
Great, confirming 1 economy ticket on Delta Airlines, flying from San Diego to Seattle on March 3rd at 11:05 am. Returning March 6th at 8:45 am.
Yeah, you got it all.
The ticket has been purchased.
Thanks so much, now I need to find a hotel for my trip.
There are 10 hotels you could stay on. How do you feel about Ace Hotel Seattle, which is rated 4.5?
Can you give me its number?
Sure, you can call them at +1 206-448-4721.
What's the pet policy and where are they located?
The hotel accepts pets and their address is 2423 1st Avenue.
That's great, I'd like to reserve 1 room, checking on the 6th of this month.
And you'll be checking in on March 3rd?
Yep, that's right.
Okay, please confirm: 1 room at Ace Hotel Seattle in Seattle, checking in March 3rd and checking out on March 6th.
That's perfect. How much does it cost?
The reservation has been placed. In total, the hotel will cost $1,404.
Okay, can you find me some attractions in the area that are good for kids?
Sure, there are 10 attractions you'd like. Try Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site, which is a good tourist attraction.
That sounds good, I don't need anything more right now. Bye!
Have a good time!
Can you find me a round trip flight via American Airlines for four people leaving on the 1st of March
Where will you leave from, and when are you coming back, also where are you planning to go?
I want to go to Philly from NY on March 10th
I found 1 flight on American Airlines that leaves at 7:55 am and has a 5:35 pm return flight for $67
What airport does that flight leave from?
The flight leaves from JFK International Airport
When does the return flight arrive?
It gets in at 6:26 pm
That sounds good, can you help me buy tickets?
Confirming you want 4 economy seats on American Airlines from New York to Philadelphia On march 1st to March 10th with 7:55 am and 5:35 pm departing and returning flight times
Yes please. What airports do the flights arrive on and what time?
Your ticket is booked and you arrive at PHL International Airport at 8:46 am
OK cool, now book me 1 hotel room
What about Aka University City that has a 4.6 rating
What's the address?
It's addressed at Cira Centre South, 2929 Walnut Street
That sounds great
Do you want to continue booking the hotel
Yes please do
Checking out on March 10th?
No I want to check out on March 6th
And checking in on March 1st?
No, I want to get in there this Sunday
Confirming you need a room for 1 from March 3rd to March 6th at Aka University City hotel in Philadelphia?
No, I want to check in on the 2nd
OK, so checking in on March 2nd at Aka University City ?
Yes that's correct
You've booked the room
Great, now show me some cool attractions
How about a cool tourist attraction like the art museum steps
That sounds great, but let's talk more later
OK, look forward to it
Hello, I'm looking for a round-trip flight in Economy class and I'll be travelling on today?
Sure. What is your source and destination place of visit? When is your return?
I'll be travelling from Seattle, WA to SFO and I'll be returning by 11th of this month.
Sounds good. The Alaska Airlines outbound flight will leave at 12 pm and the return flight will take off at 2:55 pm. The cost of the travel will be $130. Do you wish to board this flight?
When is the onward and return flight will arrive?
The onward flight will arrive at 2:11 pm and the return flight at 5:06 pm.
Sounds good to me.
Please can I have your name to reserve tickets in this flight?
Yup, I would like to book two tickets and I've send you the details.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 2 tickets in Economy class in Alaska Airlines that is flying from Seattle to San Francisco on March 11th at 12 pm and the return flight is on March 1st on 2:55 pm, right?
You are perfectly right? Is there any stops or it's a zero stop flight?
It's a 0 stop flight. your ticket confirmation is successful.
Which is the arrival airport of the flight?
The flight will arrive at SFO International Airport.
Thanks much for your helps. Please can you find me some good hotels there?
Do you wish to stay at the hotel Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco, whose rating is 3.5?
Might be... Do they allow pets? At what number should I've to contact them?
Sorry, they are not pet-friendly hotels. You can reach them at +1 415-673-3277.
Sounds perfect to me.
so can I book rooms at this hotel?
Sure. Please reserve 1 room and I need the room from 2nd of this month till March 9th.
Please confirm me that you wish to book 1 room at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco hotel located in San Francisco from March 2nd till March 9th, right?
Yup, that sounds great.
Okay! your reservation is successful
Please can you suggest me some attractions there?
Sure, you've a Historical Landmark, Alcatraz. How about going to this place?
Is this a child-friendly place?
Nope, its not for kids.
Do you have their contact number?
Yup, you can reach them at 415-561-4900.
Thanks for the information. great of you.
Do you want me to assist with anything else?
Nope, that's it. I'm done with.
Have a nice time.... enjoy!!!
can you look for some flights for me?
where are you wanting to go? when is your desired arrival date and departure airport?
i'm going to atlanta, and i'm leaving from toronto, ontario on the 12th of this month.
when do you want to leave?
i'm thinking next tuesday.
i see there's an american airlines flight that leaves at 10:05 am and the return flight leaves at 3:25 pm for $236
when does the onward flight get there?
it arrives at 2:56 pm.
what airport does it leave from?
it leaves from toronto pearson international airport.
alright that works.
do you want to book it?
yes please
you want me to book 1 economy ticket for the american airlines flight from toronto to atlanta that leaves on march 5th at 10:05 am and returns on march 12th at 3:25 pm?
yup, perfect. what airport does the flight arrive in and how many stops will it have?
i've booked the ticket. there's only 1 stop and it arrives at hartsfield-jackson international airport.
thanks, can you look for a hotel?
there's ac hotel by marriott atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza that got 4.5 stars.
where's it at?
it's on 3600 wieuca road northeast.
that'll work, book it.
are you checking in on march 5th and leaving march 12th?
yes, i want to check out on the 11th though.
okay, so you want 1 room at the ac hotel by marriott atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza in atlanta from march 5th to march 11th?
yup. do they allow pets.
it's been booked. no they don't allow pets, sorry.
can you show me cool places to go there? maybe a museum or something free.
there's a museum there called children's museum of atlanta
ok thanks, that's it.
enjoy your time.
I need to round trip flight.
When would you like to leave and when would you like to return?
I want to leave next friday and return on the 12th of march.
Where would you like to go?
I want to go to LA.
Which city would you be leaving from?
I would be traveling from SFO via economy class.
There is an outbound flight on alaska airlines that leaves at 7:10 pm. The return flight is at 5:50 pm and it costs $97
I am not sure if I would be going, so would I be able to get a refund on the ticket, if necessary?
I am sorry, but the ticket is non-refundable.
Where would the flight be leaving from?
SFO international airport.
That would be fine. I want tickets for 2?
You would like economy tickets for 2 on alaska airlines flight from san francisco to Los Angeles that leaves on March 8th at 7:10 pm and returns on March 12th at 5:50 pm?
There would just be one person travelling.
You want seats for 1 on the flight for March 8th?
Yes, that would work. When does the flight return and what is the arrival time of the onward flight?
I have reserved your tickets. The return flight lands at 7:15 pm and the onward flight lands at 8:35 pm.
I would need one room at a hotel when I get there.
There is ac hotel by marriott beverly hills and it has a rating of 4.4.
That would be excellent. Go ahead and reserve the room for me.
You would like to check in on March 8th?
Yes, and check out on the 12th of March.
You would like to book 1 room at ac hotel by marriott beverly hills in los angeles from march 8th to March 12th?
That would be great.
I have made the reservation.
What interesting place can I visit when I get there?
There are 10 locations available. There is a historical landmark called angels flight railway.
Ok, fine. That would be all. Goodbye.
Enjoy yourself.
I want to look for round trip flights. I'm in a party of four that wants to get back on the 12th of march.
Where are you leaving from and going to? And what date will you be leaving?
I want to go from SF to London, England with a departure on the 6th.
American Airlines has a flight for $394 per ticket. Outbound take off is at 7:05 am and return take off is at 3:05 pm.
What time does the outbound flight arrive, and what's the arrival airport.
Outbound flight will arrive at Heathrow International Airport at 6:37 am.
Okay, that works for me.
Would you like me to purchase tickets?
Yes, please purchase tickets.
I'll purchase 4 Economy tickets for San Francisco to London on American Airlines. Departure is March 6th at 3:05 pm. Return is March 12th at 7:05 am. Is everything correct?
Yes, that sounds excellent. Is it a refundable tickets. And does the flight have stops?
I've purchased the tickets. Is it not a refundable ticket. Thre is 1 stop.
Thanks so much. Let's look for hotels.
There's a 4.7 rated hotel called 45 Park Lane.
Where is that located, and are pets allowed?
It is at 45 Park Lane, pets are allowed.
Fantastic. Please book a room there with check in on the 10th.
Will you be checking out on March 12th?
No, check out will be on the 11th of this month. And it's just 1 room.
I'll book you 1 room at 45 Park Lane in London with check in on March 10th and check out on March 11th. Is everything correct?
Yeah, you got it all. Can you give me their telephone number?
I've booked the room. You can reach them by phone at +44 20 7493 4545.
What attractions to visit are over there?
You can go to 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin), it's a Historical Landmark.
Nice, anything else, maybe something kids can go to?
There's Alexandra Palace, it's a Performing Arts Venue.
And what's their phone number? And is it free?
You can reach them by phone at 20 8365 2121. And it is not free.
Okay, are the any other attractions, perhaps a place of interest?
There are 8 attraction that you might enjoy. How about Granary Square, it's a Tourist Attraction.
Okay, nice. That's all the help I need, goodbye.
Have fun!
Can you find a flight from the 2nd of this month till March 10th with Southwest Airlines?
Where are you leaving from and arriving to?
I'm leaving from Chi-town to LA and would prefer to fly economy.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight for $227. It leaves at 2:50 pm. The return flight leaves at 6:45 pm.
That sounds good.
Would you like to buy tickets?
yes. There are 3 of us.
So you would like 3 economy tickets for the Southwest Airlines flight from Chicago to Los Angeles? It will be departing at 2:50 pm on March 2nd. The return flight leaves at 6:45 pm on March 10th.
Perfect.
Your reservation is confirmed
Thanks. Can you find me a hotel there?
How about the Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills? It's rated 4.4.
Are pets allowed? What's the address?
6399 Wilshire Boulevard. Unfortunately, they don't allow pets.
Great. That sounds lovely.
Would you like to reserve a room?
yes please
From March 2nd to March 10th?
No. From March 8th till the 9th of this month.
So you would like 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles from March 8th till March 9th?
Yes. What's their number? How much is it?
I've booked your reservation. It's $192. Their number is +1 323-852-7000.
Can you find attractions nearby.
I've found 10. If you want a historical landmark, ehck out Angels Flight Railway.
Anything child-friendly?
I've found 10. If you would like a museum, the Autry Museum of the American West is highly recommended.
Hmm, any others?
Bradbury Building is another popular historical landmark.
Thank you.
Anything else I can help with?
Nope. Thanks again.
Have fun!
Hi, could you help me search for some round trips economy flights for 2 please?
Where do you intend to visit and when is your intended period of travel?
I will be travelling to Atlanta, GA from the 1st to the 10th of this month.
And where will you be departing from?
I will be departing from San Francisco.
There are 4 flights you may like, one of which is an American Airlines flight which departs at 3:50 pm and returns at 3:25 pm which will cost you $306.
That sounds great, could you purchase the tickets for me please?
Please confirm your purchase for 2 economy class American Airlines tickets for the flight travelling from San Francisco to Atlanta from March 1st at 3:50 pm and returns on March 10th at 3:25 pm.
That sounds great! Do you know which airport does the flight depart from and when does it arrive?
Your reservation has been made. Your departing flight arrives at 1:24 am at the SFO International Airport.
Thank you, could you also help me search for a hotel room please?
There are 10 hotels you may like, one of which is AC Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza with a 4.5 rating.
Do you know their contact number and whether pets are allowed on their premises?
Unfortunately, they do not allow pets but you can contact them at +1 470-231-3030.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Do you want to make a hotel reservation?
Sure, could you assist me in doing so?
Will you be checking out on March 10th?
Yes, could you help me book 2 rooms from the 3rd of this month?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 rooms at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza in Atlanta from March 3rd to March 10th.
Yes, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you! Are there any nice attractions there I can visit?
There are 10 attractions available, one of which is a park called Atlanta Botanical Garden.
Is this a free attraction and is this child-friendly?
Yes, kids would love this place, although the entrance is not free to this attraction.
Sure, are there any other attractions I can visit?
How about a museum called the Atlanta History Center?
Sure, this is fine.
Do you require further assistance?
No thanks, you have been very helpful.
Sure, enjoy your trip!
Can you find me a return flight from London?
Absolutely. When are you leaving and coming back?
I'm leaving next Thursday and coming back on 13th of March.
Great, and where do you want to fly to?
San Fran please
Okay, well I've found 2 good flights for you. There's a Delta Airlines flight for $454, it leaves at 8 am and returns at 10:55 am. Does that sound any good?
What else is there?
There's a United Airlines flight for $421, that one leaves at 0:25 am and returns at 5:35 am.
That sounds better. How many stops is there?
There's just the 1 stop
Yeah okay, I like the sound of that good
Do you want me to book your tickets?
Yes please, that would be great
No problem. Can you just confirm for me that you want me to book 1 economy ticket on United Airlines flight from London to San Francisco? You'll be leaving on March 7th at 0:25 am and returning on March 13th at 5:35 am.
Yes, perfect, thank you
Ticket is all booked for you!
Great, thank you. Can you see what hotels are there? I'm gonna need two rooms.
How does the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco sound? It has a 3.5 rating.
Can you grab me the phone number, and do you know if they accept pets?
No pets unfortunately. I can get you the phone number though - its +1 415-673-3277
Hmmm, what other hotels are there?
How does the Argonaut Hotel sound? That has a rating of 4.4
Yeah that sounds better
Want me to book it for you?
Yes please, I need to check in on the 10th of this month.
Great, do you want to check out on March 13th?
No, on the 12th please
Okay. Can you just confirm that you want me to book 2 rooms at the Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco? You'll check in on March 10th and check out on March 12th.
Yes, perfect! Does this one allow pets?
Pets are more than welcome at this hotel! And I've booked the rooms for you.
Great, thanks. Can you see if there's a museum near the hotel?
I sure can. There's a museum called the Cable Car Museum.
Cool. Thank you, I don't need anything else.
No problem, enjoy your trip.
I would like to find a round trip.
Where are you traveling? When would you like to depart and return?
I am traveling to Atlanta, GA tomorrow and I will get back on the 14th.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from San Francisco.
There are 4 flights. There is American Airlines leaving at 3:50 pm and the returns leaves at 11:40 am for $240.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yes, I would like a ticket.
Booking 1 economy flight from San Francisco to Atlanta with American Airlines leaving on March 2nd at 3:50 pm and the returns is March 14th at 11:40 am.
Yes, that is perfect. When does the onward flight arrive?
Your ticket is purchased. The onward flight arrives at 1:24 am.
Thank you. Can you find me a hotel?
There are 10 hotels. There is AC Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps plaza and the rating is 4.5
That hotel sounds good.
Would you like to book a room?
Yes, I would like to book a room.
The check out date is March 14th?
No, I would like to check out on the 9th of this month.
Do you want to check in on March 2nd?
I would like to check in Friday next week.
Booking a room at AC Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza from March 8th to March 9th for 1 person in Atlanta.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your room is booked.
Can you find me an attraction?
There are 10 attractions. There is Atlanta Botanical Garden it's a nice park.
Is there a fee and what is their phone number?
There is a entry fee and their number is 404-876-5859.
That is all I needed for now.
Have a good day.
Find me round trip flight
whats the departing city?
Leaving from NYC
when are you leaving?
leaving wednesday next week
where are you going?
Travelling to London
when are you coming back?
coming on next Friday
There is a American airlines flight leaving at 6:15 pm and the return is at 2:05 pm and costs $317
at what time the departure flight arrive
it arrives at 6:37 am
And how many stops it has and at what time my return flight arrive
its has 1 stop and arrives at 1:19 am
that is good.
should i book the tickets of it?
please book 2 economy tickets
please confirm: Book 2 economy tickets to London from New york American airlines flight leaving at 6:15 pm on march 6th and the return is at 2:05 pm on march 8th
yes, thats right. Whats the arrival airport for the outbound flight?
your ticket is booked. The airport for outbound flight is Heathrow International airport
find me a hotel there
i got 10 of them of which 45 park lane is rated 4.7
sounds good. Please book 2 rooms with check in on wednesday next week and check out on the 7th
Please confirm: Booking 2 rooms at the 45 park lane in London for a March 6th checkin and March 7th check out
yes, thats fine
your booking is done
Find me some attractions there
check out the Historical Landmark, the 30 st mary Axe (the Gherkin)
anything else? Looking for a child-friendly museum
There is a museum, the Apsley house
ok, good
any thing else?
no, thats all thanks
have a good day!
Could you find round trip flights for the date 9th of this month and i like United Airlines.
To where you decided to visit? From which place you leaving and when is your leaving date?
I want to travel San Fran on Tuesday next week and starting from Atlanta, GA.
I found a flight of your choice. The onward flight leaves at 9:40 am and the return flight eaves at 10:15 am. This is a United Airlines and ticket cost is $214.
To which airport does the flight arrive? Can you tell me the number of stops the flight have?
It arrives at SFO International Airport and it has 0 stops.
This is perfect for me. Can you help me in buying tickets? I want economy class ticket and there are 3 people in my group.
Please give confirmation details: The flight is United Airlines with economy class ticket. The flight is from atlanta nad goes to San Francisco. The departure date is march 5th and the return date is on march 9th with 3 number of passengers. The onward flight leaving time is at 9:40 am and return flight leaving time is at 10:15 am.
This is perfect.
Your booking is confirmed.
I like to find a hotel there.
What is your opinion about Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco with rating 3.5?
Do you know anything else? I like to book 1 room.
What is your opinion about Argonaut Hotel with rating 4.4?
Are they welcome pets? Can you tell me their street address?
Yes they welcome pets. 495 Jefferson Street is the address.
Is there anything else? I like to book 2 rooms.
I searched 8 hotels for you. What is your opinion about Beck's Motor Lodge with 4.4 rating?
This is perfect.
Do you like me to continue the reservation?
Yes, i like to book the hotel and the check out date is 9th of this month.
Is march 5th is your check in date?
I like to check in on Thursday next week.
Please give confirmation details: Hotel reservation at Beck's Motor Lodge which is in San Francisco for march 7th and check out date is march 9th. The booking is for 2 rooms.
This is okay for me. Can you tell me its price and street address?
Your booking has been confirmed. The hotel cost is $464 and address is 2222 market street.
Thanks a lot. Could you find me some attractions there?
What is your opinion about Alcatraz? It is a Historical Landmark.
Fine. That's all i want. Bye
Have fun.
I'd like to look for a round trip flight.
Where will you be traveling from? When you you plan to leave, and when do you want to return?
I will be leaving from SFO and want to go to Las Vegas. I want to leave on March 5th and return on the 11th of this month.
I found 4 flights that might work for you. There is an American Airlines flight for $113 that departs at 8:10 am, with a return flight leaving at 5:30 am.
Does the flight have any stop?
It has 0 stops.
That sounds good. Can you help me buy tickets for that flight?
Alright, so you would like to book 1 economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from San Francisco to Las Vegas, departing at 8:10 am on March 5th, with a return flight departing at 5:30 am on March 11th. Is that correct?
No, I need tickets for 2 people.
Okay, so there are 2 passengers, and the return flight departs at 5:30 am, is that okay?
Yeah that's good.
Your tickets have been confirmed.
Thanks. Can you find me a hotel there?
How about the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West? It is rated at 4.3.
What's their address?
It is located at 8669 West Sahara Avenue.
Okay, that's great.
Do you want to reserve a room at that hotel?
Yeah, I'd like to do that now.
Will you be checking out March 11th?
Yes, that's a good day.
And will you check in March 5th?
I'd like to check in on the 9th of March.
Alright, so you'd like to book 1 room at the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West in Las Vegas, checking in March 9th and checking out March 11th. Is that correct?
Yep, that's good. What is their phone number?
Your reservation was successful. You can reach them at +1 702-256-3766.
Are there any attractions there?
I found 9 attractions you might like. You could go to DISCOVERY Children's Museum, which is a museum.
Thanks, that sounds good.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that was all, thanks.
Alright, enjoy your trip!
Can you find me round trip flights?
Sure, but first please tell me the departure location and date.
I'll be flying out of Los Angeles on March 12th.
OK. Now tell me your destination as well as the date of your return.
I'm flying to San Fran and I'll return on March 14th. I want two tickets.
There are 4 flight meeting your criteria. How about Alaska Airlines flight taking off at 5:50 pm with the return flight taking off at 7:10 pm. Tickets are $107 each.
Perfect. Let's purchase Economy tickets for this flight.
Can you please confirm that your want 2 Economy tickets for the Alaska Airlines flight taking off at 5:50 pm from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 12th with the return flight taking off at 7:10 pm on March 14th?
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me when does the outgoing flight land?
I've successfully booked your ticket. Your flight lands at 7:15 pm.
OK. Now please tell me if the tickets are refundable as well as the departure airport.
The ticket is non refundable and the flight takes off from LAX International Airport.
Perfect. Now let's find a hotel at destination.
There are 10 meeting your criteria our of which I recommend Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco rated at 3.5.
Please tell me their phone number.
You can reach them at +1 415-673-3277.
Perfect. Now let's place a reservation.
Do you plan on staying from March 12th to March 14th?
I will be checking in on 13th of this month.
Can you please confirm that you want 1 room from March 13th to March 14th at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco.
Yes, that's correct. Pleas tell me their address as well as if they're pet friendly.
I've successfully booked your room. The hotel located at 749 Taylor Street and is not pet friendly.
OK. Can you find me some free child friendly attractions in the area, preferably a Historical Landmark.
Sure, go see Coit Tower, a true Historical Landmark.
Can you please give me their phone number?
Sure, you can reach them at 415-249-0995.
Perfect. That will be all for now.
Have a nice day!
Can you find me some round trip flights?
Sure, but first tell me where are you flying out of and when are you returning.
I want 4 tickets and I'll be flying out of Phoenix on March 1st, returning the day after tomorrow.
Where are you flying to?
I fly to Portland.
How about a Delta Airlines flight taking off at 10:15 pm with the return flight taking of at 8 pm. Tickets are $210 each.
Sounds perfect for me. Can you get Economy tickets for me?
Can you please confirm that you want 4 Economy tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from Phoenix to Portland taking off at 10:15 pm on March 1st with the return flight taking of at 8 pm on March 3rd?
Sure, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your tickets.
Thanks. Now let's find a hotel at destination.
Would you like Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station, rated at 4.3?
It's absolutely perfect.
Do you want me to book a room for you?
Yes, please do.
Do you plan on staying from March 1st to March 3rd.
Yes, that's correct.
Can you please confirm that you need 1 room at Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station in Portland from March 1st to March 3rd?
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your room.
Can you please tell me the room price as well as if they're pet friendly.
They are pet friendly and the room costs $232.
Thanks. Now can you find me some free attractions in the are, preferably a wildlife spot?
There's a Nature Preserve which you should see, the Oregon Zoo.
Perfect. That will be all for now.
Have a nice day.
Help me to search a round trip flights
When and where are you planning to visit when will you come back
I want to fly to San fran on the 5th. All net pack on March 12th
From where will you be leaving
From London, England
There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at at 3:05 pm and return flight leaves at 7:05 am which cost $437
Look some other flights there are 3 people in my group
I found 2 flights. How about Delta Airlines which leaves at 8 am and return flight leaves at 10:05 am. which cost $441
From which airport will it department form
From Heathrow international airport
Does it have zero stops to which airport does a flight arrives
It has 1 stop the destination is sfo international airport
That's perfect for me
Shall I get the tickets for it
Yes please make it
Please confirm the following the flight is from London to San Francisco and is Delta Airlines and departure date is March 5th 8 am and return flight is March 12th at 10:05 am number of passengers is 3 with economy class
That sounds great
Your ticket is been confirmed
Thanks a lot can you help me to search a hotel there I want to book 1 room
There are 10 hotels there how about Amsterdam hostel San Francisco which is 3.5 rating
Please check some other else
How about argonaut hotel which rates 4.4
Shall I get the phone number
The phone number is is +1 415-563-0800
What is its street address
495 Jefferson Street is the address
That's great I want to make a hotel reservation I wish to check out on 9th of this month and check in on the March 8th
Please confirm the details of making a reservation at argonaut hotel in San Francisco the check in date is March 8th and check out is on March 9th for 1 room
Yes that works for me
Your reservation has been successfully made
Help me to search some attractions there
There are 10 attractions you should check Alcatraz which is a historical landmark
What's the phone number
The phone number is 415-561-4900
That's great
Should I help you more
That was very helpful thank you
Enjoy have a nice day
Please help me search a round trip flights in Economy.
Where do you plan to go? Where you are coming from and when you will come back?
I prefer going to Delhi India from New York City on 4th of this month.
When you will leave?
On 2nd of this month.
I got 1 flights with American Airlines for only $407 with an outbound flight leaves at 5:25 am and return flight leaves at 9:20 am.
How many stops?
1 stops only.
Good, please help me buy a ticket for his flight.
Okay, you want 1 Economy seat at American Airlines going to Delhi from New York on March 2nd until March 4th with an outbound flight leaves at 5:25 am and return flight leaves at 9:20 am. Please confirm.
That's perfect.
Ticket confirmed!
When does the onward flight arrive and which airport does it arrive?
Onward flight arrives at 9:04 am and it's destination is Indira Gandhi International Airport.
Thanks, please help me find a hotel there.
How about Aloft New Delhi Aerocity with 4.4 rating?
Great! Please help me reserve a room there.
Will you check out on March 4th?
On March 3rd.
Will you check in on March 2nd?
Yes, I need 2 rooms please.
Okay, you want 2 rooms at Aloft New Delhi Aerocity in Delhi on March 2nd until March 3rd. Please confirm.
Yes, what is their phone number and street address?
They are located at 5B Igi T3 Road, Delhi - Ajmer Expressway, Aerocity, New Delhi and their phone number is +91 11 4565 0000. Your reservation is now confirmed!
Please show me some attractions there.
Check out Adventure Island. it's a theme park.
May I know their phone number?
It's 83770 02902.
Is this a child-friendly place?
Yes.
Okay, good.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks for your help.
You are welcome.
I need you to look for round trip flights for me, can you?
When are you moving?
I am planning to start on March 7th
Which place are you going to and which place are you starting from and when are you coming back?
I will be departing from New York to Atlanta GA and i will be coming back on 11th of March
There is an American Airlines flight starting at 6:25 am and returning back at 11:20 am with ticket cost at $133
When is the flight arriving and is there a ticket refund?
The flight arrives at 8:47 am and the ticket is refundable
There are 1 people in my group and are there any other flights available?
I have short listed 3 flights for you of your choice. One among them is Delta Airlines which is departing at 3:40 pm and returning at 11:25 am with ticket costing $127
Fine ten. Can you proceed with buyin gtickets?
Please give confirmation details: Ticket booking for 1 passenger in Economy class in the flight Delta Airlines starting from Atlanta going to New York at 3:40 pm on March 7th and the drop off date is at 11:25 am on March 11th
No, my reference is Premium Economy
Please give confirmation details: Number of passengers is 1 and ticket is Premium Economy class
That is fine and when is the flight arriving here?
Your ticket is booked ad flight comes here at 1:47 pm
I need to look for a hotel there
What is your opinion on 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge with 4.5 rating?
Do you have anything more as i need to book a three rooms where pets are allowed
How about 1 Hotel Central Park with rating 4.5?
It is fine and i need to make check in on March 8th
You require to check out on March 11th?
Fine for me
Please give confirmation details: Booking 3 rooms at 1 Hotel Central Park in New York on March 8th with check out on March 11th
That is okay
Your booking is done
Can i know its location and cost please?
Its location is 1414 6th Avenue and total cost is $1,224
Thanks a lot. Can you show some child-friendly attractions there?
You can have a look in American Folk Art Museum and this is a Museum
Can i know its contact number?
Their contact number is (212) 265-1040
That is fine
Any other help you need?
No, thank you
Enjoy, have fun
Would you find round trip flights for me? I would like to leave from Atlanta to London and return on the 9th.
When would you like to leave?
I want to leave this Sunday.
I have 3 flights that will be convenient for you. How about an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:30 pm? The return flight leaves at 8:35 pm and costs $366.
Could I get a refund?
Yes, the ticket is refundable.
That flight sounds great.
Do you want tickets?
Yes, let's book the flight.
All right. Please confirm that you want to leave from Atlanta and go to London on American Airlines. The flight leaves March 3rd at 3:30 pm and returns March 9th. The return flight departs at 8:35 pm. You need 1 economy ticket.
Sounds perfect.
Your tikcet has been confirmed.
I want to find a hotel there.
I have 10 hotels. What do you think about 45 Park Lane? It has a 4.7 rating.
Sounds perfect. Book it.
Would you like to check out on March 9th?
I want to check out next Monday.
Would you like to check in March 3rd?
Yes, that works for me.
Could you confirm that you want to make a reservation at 45 Park Lane in London? You will check in on March 3rd and check out on March 4th. You would like to book 1 room. Right?
Sounds good to me.
You have made the reservation successfully.
Would you show me some attractions there?
How about checking out 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin). It's a historical landmark.
Sounds great.
Would there be something else I could assist you with?
No, that helped so much. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Can you help me in finding round trip flights? I prefer to travel by economy class.
On which date do you plan to leave?
I am leaving today.
On which day are you coming back?
I am coming back on the 4th?
Where are you planning to go?
I am going to travel to New York.
From which place are you planning to leave?
I am leaving from San Fran.
American airlines is there. The outbound flight leaves at 8:30 pm and return flight leaves at 4:45 pm. It will cost you $193.
The flight sounds good to me.
Shall I book tickets for the same?
Please book the tickets.
Please confirm the details: American airlines from San Francisco to New York with departure date as March 1st and return date as March 4th. The outbound flight leaves at 8:30 pm and return flight leaves at 4:45 pm. It is an economy class for 1 passenger.
From which airport the flight departs and arrive?
The flight leaves from SFO International airport and will arrive at JFK International Airport.
Thanks for the help.
Shall I assist you with anything else?
I want to book a hotel there.
I have found 10 hotels. What do you think about 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge with rating of 4.5?
Does it allow pet and what is the street address?
It is pet friendly and address is 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn.
That's perfect. I want to book 1 room and want on check in on 2nd of March and check out on this Sunday.
Please confirm the details: 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge which is located in New York with check in date as March 2nd and check out date as March 3rd for 1 room.
I want to check out on the 4th and check in today.
Please confirm the details: The check in date is March 1st and check out date is March 4th.
I want to book 3 rooms.
Please confirm the details: Booking of 3 rooms with check in date as March 1st.
Yes. That's good. What is the phone number and the price?
It will cost you $792 and the address is +1 833-625-6111.
Can you show some attractions there?
There are 10 attractions I have found. You can check out 92nd Street Y which is Performing Arts Venue.
Is this place child friendly and what is the phone number?
No. This place is not good for kids and its phone number is (212) 415-5788.
Okay. Great.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. That was helpful.
Enjoy!
Hello! Please can you check if round-trip is available in United Airlines for I've to leave on March 5th and my return will be on the 10th.
Sure. Where is your travel from and to?
I'll be travelling from Toronto to Philadelphia.
Okay! please give me a moment....Yup, there is a United Airlines flight available with a round-trip. The outbound flight will take off at 5:35 pm and the return flight will take off at 11:30 am. The cost of the travel will be $235.
Which is the departure airport?
The departure airport will be Toronto Pearson International Airport.
Is it a refundable or non-refundable ticket?
Sorry, that the ticket is non-refundable.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want to block tickets in this airlines?
Yup, please do it in Economy class for 4 persons.
Please can you confirm that you wish to book 4 Economy tickets to fly from Toronto to Philadelphia in United Airlines flight that departs on March 5th at 5:35 pm and the return flight leaving at 11:30 am on March 10th, right?
Yup, you are correct.
Okay! your ticket confirmation is successful.
So, please may I know the arrival time of the onward flight?
It will arrive at 0:16 am.
At what time will the return flight arrive and to which airport?
The return flight will arrive at PHL International Airport at 5:08 pm.
Sounds good. Please can you help me to find a good hotel there?
Yup, do you wish to stay at Aka University City whose rating is 4.6, which is very good.
Please can I've their address. Do pets are allowed?
Sorry, they don't allow pets. It is located at Cira Centre South, 2929 Walnut Street.
sounds perfect.
Can I reserve a room at this hotel?
Yup, please make a reservation for 1 room for I wish to check in on March 5th and check out on the 9th of this month.
Okay! Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 1 room at Aka University City located at Philadelphia on March 5th and you wish to vacate it on March 9th, right?
Yup, that will work for me.
Okay! I've booked the room successfully for you.
Please can you suggest some attractions there?
Sure, there are 10 attractions that you might like. There is a Tourist Attraction, Art Museum Steps, how about visiting this one?
Do we've to pay the entrance fees or its free? Please can I've their contact number?
Yup, its a free entry and you can reach them at 215-763-8100.
Thanks. Sounds great.
Do you want anything to be assisted with?
Nope, I'm okay with everything. Thanks.
Have fun and a nice time.
I need a round trip flight.
Where are you leaving from and what is your destination? When would you like to return?
I will be leaving Portland with 4 people total traveling to LA and returning on March 11th..
When would you like to leave?
Preferably, March 1st.
I have 5 flights. There is a 5:40 pm departure on Alaska Airlines returning at 5:15 am for $169.
Good, can you book them for economy?
Yes, please confirm four tickets on Alaska Airlines from Portland to Los Angeles leaving March 1st and returning March 11th. The departure time is 5:40 pm and return flight time is 5:15 am. The economy tickets are for 4 people.
Great, does it have zero stops?
Your tickets are booked. No, there is 1 stop.
What is the name of the airport and when does the departure flight arrive?
The arrival time is 9:44 pm to LAX International Airport.
Thanks, I need a hotel for one room that allows pets.
There is Airtel Plaza Hotel with a rating of 3.9.
Great, please reserve it from the 8th of March until the 3rd of this month.
Please confirm checking in for 1 room at Airtel Plaza Hotel in Los Angeles on March 3rd and checking out on March 8th.
That is good.
The reservation has been completed.
Is there a museum nearby that is free?
There are 10 that qualify as a museum. You should try Autry Museum of the American West.
Wonderful, thank you.
Have a good trip.
I would like to find a round trip.
When are you leaving and where are you traveling?
I'm traveling to SFO from London on the 12th of March.
When are you traveling?
I would like to travel with United Airlines on Premium economy flight on the 9th of March.
There is 1 flight that is with United Airlines and leaves at 0:25 am and the returns leaves at 5:35 am for $658.
That flight sounds good.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yes, I would like a ticket.
There is a flight with United Airlines from London to San Francisco leaving on march 9th at 0:25 am and the return March 12th leaves at 5:35 am for 1 passenger that is premium economy.
Yes, how many stops does the flight have?
Your ticket is confirmed and there is 1 stop.
I want to search for an hotel.
There are 10 hotels. There is Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco that has a 3.5 rating.
Does it allow pets and what is the address?
It's does not allow pets and the address is 749 taylor street.
I would like to find a place where it's pet-friendly.
There are 10 hotels. There is Argonaut hotel that has a 4.4 rating.
I would like to check in on the 9th of March and check out on the 10th.
1 room at Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco on March 9th and the check out is March 10th.
What is the phone number and what is the address?
The phone is +1 415-563-0800 and the address is 495 Jefferson Street.
What are the attractions there?
There is Alcatraz that is a historical landmark.
Is this child-friendly and is it free?
It's not child-friendly and there is a cost.
That is all I need.
Have a good day.
I need a round trip flight in premium economy on United Airlines on the 10th of this month.
Where are you going? Where are you leaving from? When are you coming back?
I am leaving from Atlanta, GA to NY on the 13th.
I found a United Airlines flight leaving at 12:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 7:05 pm. The ticket is $240.
That flight will be perfect.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
Yes, I am ready.
Please confirm, flying on United Airlines, 1 seat in premium economy leaving Atlanta for New York on March 10th at 12:50 pm. Your return flight is on March 13th at 7:05 pm.
No, I need 2 seats.
Please confirm, 2 seats on the flight from Atlanta.
Yes, that is perfect.
You ticket is confirmed.
When does my return flight arrive? Any stops?
The return flight arrives at 9:27 pm and their are 0 stops.
Thanks, I need 1 hotel room there too.
I found 10 hotels including 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge. The rating in 4.5
That is perfect, lets make the reservation now.
Are you checking in on March 10th? Are you checking out MArch 13th?
Yes, but I want to check in on the 12th of March.
Please confirm, reserving 1 room at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York beginning on March 12th until March 13th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation is complete.
Any cool attractions there?
I found 10 things including 92nd Street Y, it is a performing arts venue.
Is it free or child-friendly?
Not good for kids and not free.
Anything else? Something child-friendly?
A museum called American Folk Art Museum is cool.
Ok, awesome.
Anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks!
Have a nice day.
Can you find me a round trip flight to Atlanta on United Airlines on March 9th
When are you coming back?
I want to get back on the 12th of this month via economy class
Where are you leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Chicago
There's a United Airlines flight that leaves at 9:50 pm and has a 6:15 am return flight that costs $128
That sounds good, find me tickets to book for that
Confirming you want the flight from Chicago to Atlanta for 1 on economy via United Airlines with a March 9th 9:50 pm departure and a March 12th 6:15 am return flight
No, I just need 1 ticket
OK, so March 9th for 1
Yes please, is it refundable? And how many stops does it have?
Your ticket is booked, and there are 0 stops, and it's not refundable
Cool, now let's find a hotel there.
What about the 4.5 rated Ac Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza?
What else do you have, I just need 1 room
I found 9 hotels, what about the 4.3 rated Ac Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Downtown?
That's great, make me a reservation from the 10th of March till the 11th of this month
Confirming you want a book for 1 at Ac Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Downtown in Atlanta from March 10th to March 11th
I want to check out on the 10th of March and check in on March 9th
Confirm you are checking in on March 9th and out on March 10th?
Yes, that works
OK, you're now booked
Great, now find me some attractions there
You should checkout the beautiful Atlanta Botanical Garden Park
Is this place child friendly?
Yes, it's great for kids
OK, that's awesome
Can I do something else for you now?
No, not right now thanks
OK, I hope you enjoy
Search round trip flights.
Departure date?
I'm leaving today.
Departure city? Destination? Return date?
LAX to Portland on 5th of March.
How about an Alaska Airlines flight? It departs at 5:15 am and costs $148. The return flight departs at 10:10 am.
Does the flight have 1 stop? What is the arrival airport?
The flight has 0 stops and arrives at PDX International Airport.
Any other flights?
How about American Airlines? It departs at 11:15 pm and costs $180. The return flight departs at 6 am.
Anything else?
How about Delta Airlines? It departs at 9:50 pm and costs $184. The return flight departs at 3:20 pm.
Sounds good. Can you book me 2 refundable Economy tickets?
Confirming you want 2 Economy tickets from Los Angeles to Portland. You will be flying on Delta Airlines and leaving on March 1st at 9:50 pm. You will be returning on March 5th at 3:20 pm.
Sounds good. What is the departure airport? When does the flight arrive?
Your outbound flight arrives at 0:20 am. It departs from LAX International Airport.
Thanks. I need a hotel.
How about Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station? It is rated 4.3.
Can I get the phone number?
Their number is +1 503-200-5678.
Great.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes.
Are March 1st and March 5th your check in and check out dates?
I want to check out this Sunday.
Confirming that you want to book 1 room at the Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station in Portland. You will be checking in on March 1st and checking out on March 3rd.
Yes, that works.
Reservation successful.
Show me some attractions.
I found 10 attractions. How about Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden? It is a Park.
Great. That's all. Goodbye.
You're welcome. Enjoy!
I need a round trip flight for the 5th of this month.
Where would you like to go?
To new york city.
When would you like to return and where would you be leaving from?
I will be leaving vancouver and I want to return on the 10th of this month.
There are 2 convenient flights. Delta airlines has a outbound flight that leaves at 12:20 pm. It returns at 6 am and costs $340.
I want that flight.
You would like to buy a ticket?
Yes. Book it.
You would like an economy ticket for 1 on a delta airlines flight from vancouver to new york that leaves on march 5th at 12:20 pm and returns on March 10th at 6 am?
Yes, that would be fine.
Your tickets have been confirmed.
Thank you. I would need a hotel when I get there.
I have found 10 suitable hotels. I recommend 1 hotel brooklyn bridge, which has a rating of 4.5.
That would be ideal.
Would you like to reserve a room?
Yes, I would.
You would like to check out on March 10th?
I want to check out on the 9th of March.
You would like to check in on March 5th?
I want to check in on the 6th of this month.
You would like 1 room at 1 hotel brooklyn bridge in new york on march 6th till march 9th?
Yes. Is there a number I can reach them at?
I have made the reservation. The number is +1 833-625-6111.
Are pets allowed?
They are welcome
Thanks. What historical spot can I visit when I get there?
There are 10 such spots available. Bayonne bridge is a historical landmark.
Ok. That would be great.
Anything else you need help with?
No thanks. You have been very helpful.
Enjoy your day.
Would you search round trip flights for me?
Where and when will you be leaving from?
I would like to leave March 4th from Paris France to NYC.
When will you be coming back?
I would like to come back March 6th.
I have an American Airlines flight leaving 4:05 am returning at 7:35 am for $233.
That will sound good to me.
Should I purchase the tickets for it?
Yes, I'd like to book the Economy ticket.
Please confirm an American Airlines ticket from Paris to New York leaving March 4th and returning March 6th leaving 4:05 am and returning 7:35 am for 1 passenger Economy.
Yes, that would be good. What is the number of stops the flight has?
The ticket is confirmed with 0 stops.
I would like to search and book one hotel room there.
Would you like 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge rated 4.5? I have found 10 hotels.
Tell me the street address.
The address is 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn.
Tell me the phone number and if it allows pets.
The phone is +1 833-625-6111 and it welcomes pets.
That is great. I'd like to reserve a hotel and check out on the 5th.
Would you like to check in on March 4th.
Yes, that will work for me.
Please confirm a hotel at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York check-in March 4th and check-out March 5th booking 1 room.
Yes, that works.
The reservation is successful.
Thanks. Can you tell me some garden attractions there child-friendly.
You should look at Astoria Park a park that is one of 10 attractions that may interest you.
Thanks, what other attractions are there? Is there an entry fee.
You can check out Flushing Meadows Corona Park which is a park and one of 7 attractions that may interest you.
Okay that is wonderful.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that was helpful for me. Thanks!
Have a nice time.
I need a round trip flight for three people on the 12th of march.
Sure. Please tell me where you're departing from, what you'd like to go and what day you'll be back.
I'm departing from SFO and want to go to new delhi on the 14th of march
How about an american airlines flight that leaves at 1:15 pm and returns 9:20 am for $389?
Perfect.
Shall I book the tickets?
Yes, for economy please.
Please confirm: 3 economy american airlines tickets for a 1:15 pm flight san francisco to delhi on march 12th with a return flight at 9:20 am on march 14th
Correct.
This ticket is confirmed.
Please find me a hotel
There are 10. How about the 4.4 rated aloft new delhi aerocity hotel?
Sure, I'll need one room.
Will this be for a check in date of march 12th and a check out on march 14th?
Yes
Please confirm: 1 room on march 12th for aloft new delhi aerocity until march 14th in delhi.
Yes, this is correct.
This reservation is complete.
Where are they located?
5b Igi T3 road, delhi - ajmer expressway, aerocity, new delhi.
Thanks so much, please tell me what attractions are in the area?
There's a theme park called adventure island
Awesome, thanks.
Have a wonderful trip
I need a round trip flight.
What is departure city?
Paris is departure city.
What is departure date?
The date is the 6th.
Where are you going and coming back?
Going to LAX and back on March 14th.
I found 2. I have an American Airlines that leaves 4:05 am with return flight of 9:40 am for $374.
What is the departing airport and is it refundable?
Charles de Gaulle International Airport and not refundable.
Go ahead and get tickets.
Confirm American Airlines economy for 1 to Los Angeles from Paris on March 6th at 4:05 am and return flight at 9:40 am on March 14th.
Yes, I confirm all.
You are now confirmed.
Thanks, I need to book two rooms too.
I have a 4.4 hotel Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills.
Is it pet friendly?
Is is not pet friendly.
Is there anything else?
I have a 3.9 at Airtel Plaza Hotel.
That will work for me.
Did you want to reserve?
Did you want to reserve?
Is March 6th check in?
Yes and check out March 10th.
Confirm 2 rooms at Airtel Plaza Hotel in Los Angeles for March 6th to March 10th.
Yes that works for me.
You are now confirmed.
I need an attraction for a child too.
I have a Museum called Autry Museum of the American West.
That is all I need today.
Have a great day.
Please help me find a round trip flights.
Where do you plan to go and when you are coming back?
I want to go on Delhi India until 14th of this month.
Where you are coming from?
From LA and I am planning to leave on Sunday this week, Please find a round trip flights for three.
How about American Airlines for only $339 with an outbound flight leaves at 6:30 am and return flight leaves at 7 pm?
When will be the onward flight arrive?
At 4:07 pm.
How many stops does it have?
1 stops.
Good. Can you help me buy tickets for this flight? I prefer traveling in Economy.
Okay, you want 3 Economy seat at American Airlines goint to Delhi from Los Angeles on March 3rd until March 14th with an outbound flight leaves at 6:30 am and return flight leaves at 7 pm. Please confirm.
That's all good!
Ticket confirmed!
When does my return flight arrive and which airport does it depart from?
Return flight arrives at 8:04 pm and it departs from LAX International Airport.
Thanks. Please help me search a hotel for two there.
Do you want Aloft New Delhi Aerocity with 4.4 rating?
Are pets allowed there and what is their phone number?
No, they don't allow pets and their number is +91 11 4565 0000.
That's good!
Will I reserve you the hotel?
Yes please.
Will you check in on March 3rd until March 14th?
I want to check in on 5th of March until next Wednesday.
Okay, you want 2 rooms at Aloft New Delhi Aerocity in Delhi on March 5th until March 6th. Please confirm.
Yes, what is the price?
$200 in total. Reservation is now confirmed!
What is their address?
It's at 5B Igi T3 Road, Delhi - Ajmer Expressway Aerocity, New Delhi.
Thanks for your help.
Anything else I can help you with?
Please show me some child-friendly attractions there.
Check out a theme park named Adventure Island.
Okay, thanks.
You are welcome!
I need to fly an American Airlines economy flight to Los Angeles, is there anything available?
From where will you be departing, when do you plan to leave, and when will you be returning?
I will depart from Portland, OR on March 4th, and will return on the 14th.
There is 1 American Airlines flight available, are you interested in a $186 ticket flight that leaves at 7:20 am and its return flight departs at 11:15 pm?
From which airport does the flight depart from?
The PDX International Airport is the airport the flight will depart from.
Alright, that flight sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets right now?
Sure, book me a ticket to the flight.
Of course, you are booking 1 economy ticket to an American Airlines flight to Los Angeles from Portland, which departs on March 4th and will return on March 14th. The flight will depart at 7:20 am, and its return flight will depart on 11:15 pm, is that fine by you?
That all sounds good to go, can you tell me when will the return flight will arrive and to which airport?
The ticket has bee confirmed, the return flight arrives at LAX International Airport at 1:45 am.
Much appreciated for all your help, can you also find me a hotel near there that allows pets?
May I interest you in the Airtel Plaza Hotel, it is rated at a 3.9?
Sounds perfect, please book me 1 room on the 6th, and make it so I check out on the 13th.
You are reserving 1 room to the Airtel Plaza Hotel, it is located in Los Angeles, and you plan to check in on March 6th and checking out on March 13th correct?
All correct, thank you, what about the price and their phone number?
The reservation has been made, the total price will be $819, contact them via +1 800-224-7835.
What are some attractions near there, something child-friendly and without an entry free like a nature preserve.
One nature preserve you can check out is the Cabrillo Marine Aquarium.
Sounds great, thanks for all your help, goodbye.
Your welcome, enjoy your trip!
I'm not good in finding round trip flights so can you please do it for me?
yes, you need to tell me where are you headed to and when do you want your trip to start.
the place to reach is vegas and I plan to leave on the 2nd
which is your departure city?
it's san francisco
when are you planning to be back?
on the 9th of march
you have 3 possibilities to chose from. if you don't mind flying with american airlines, you can leave at 5:30 pm and arrive to your destination at 5:30 am. You'll have to pay $113 for the ticket
I need to know the arrival time of both flights.
you'll land to your destination at 7:05 pm and you'll be back to the starting point at 7:05 am
everything works for me
then we should buy tickets before they're gone
yes, it's a wise advice
before proceeding, I'll recap everything for you and you'll tell me if I am right. You want to buy 1 economy ticket on american airlines. You'll leave from san francisco on march 2nd at 5:30 pm to go to las vegas on march 9th at 5:30 am.
yes, correct. tell me about the airport I will land to
ticket is bought and the airport is mccarran international airport
Magnificent. Now I need 2 hotel rooms where I can rest with my pet
you have 4 picks, how about best western plus las vegas west? rating is 4.3
skip to the next proposal
next one is budget suites of america and rating is 3.4
give me address and phone number
if you need to talk to them, you better call +1 702-638-1800. the place to reach is at 2219 north rancho drive
skip to the next result
My nex result is la quinta inn & suites by wyndham las vegas summerlin tech. the rating is 4.2
this one has everything I need
then we should book a room pronto
good idea. check in is on the 3rd of this month and check out is friday next week
confirm me this first and then I'll place the reservation. You want 2 hotel rooms at la quinta inn & suites by wyndham las vegas summerlin tech in las vegas. check in is march 3rd and check out is march 8th
yes, I confirm everything you said
you have your reservation
I'm satisfied but there's still something missing, I would enjoy to go see some attractions while there
you have 9 choices, there's a museum called discovery children's museum
I wrote it down, bye for now
Have a wonderful day!
I'm looking for a round trip flight.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm flying to Paris.
What date are you returning on?
I'm returning on March 4th.
Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Chicago.
What date are you departing on.
I'm departing on the 1st.
There is an American Airlines flight departing on 5:10 am with the return flight departing at 4:05 am for $345.
Is the ticket refundable? How many stops does the flight have?
The flight is not refundable and it has 1 stop.
That flight sounds good. I'd like to buy an economy ticket.
Okay, I have 1 economy ticket for an American Airlines flight departing from Chicago on March 1st at 5:10 am and arriving in Paris. The return flight departs on March 4th at 4:05 am, correct?
Yes, that is correct. What airport does the flight arrive at? What time does the return flight arrive?
I have purchased the ticket. The flight arrives at Charles de Gaulle International Airport and arrives back in Chicago at 8:22 pm.
Thank you for your help. I also need one room at a hotel.
I found 10 hotels for you. How about the AC Hotel by Marriott Paris Porte Maillot? It has a 4.3 rating.
That is perfect. I'd like to make a hotel reservation from March 2nd to March 4th.
Okay, confirm these details: 1 room at the AC Hotel by Marriott Paris Porte Maillot in Paris checking in on March 2nd and checking out on March 4th.
That is correct. What is the address of the hotel?
I have booked the reservation for you. The address is 6 Rue Gustave Charpentier, 75017.
Thank you, now can you show me some attractions there?
There are 10 attractions you might like. How about the Place of Worship American Church in Paris?
That sounds good. That is all I needed.
Have a great day.
I need to start a round trip travel and tickets must be 2 economy ones.
start by telling me departure date
it's the 5th of march
When are you planning to return? where are you leaving from?
I'll depart from SF and I'm planning to be back on march 14th
where do you need to be?
My destination is atlanta
You can reach your destination with american airlines for just $230. you'll leave at 3:50 pm and the return is scheduled at 11:40 am
tell me if the stops are 0
No, there's 1 stops
it can still be okay for me
I am perfectly able to buy the tickets on your behalf
good to know, do it then.
ok, in order to do so, you need to tell me if I got it right. You will be traveling in 2 with american airlines economy class from san francisco to atlanta. You'll take off on march 5th at 3:50 pm and you'll be on your return flight on march 14th at 11:40 am
Yes, you're very smart
tickets have been bought for you
amazing, tell me the destination airport now
it's hartsfield-jackson international airport
great, now I'll need 2 rooms there
there's a 4.5 rated hotel called ac hotel by marriott atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza
it might be a nice one so please book a room for me there
check in is march 5th, right?
no, not right. it's on the 11th of this month
check out is on march 14th?
no, it's the day before, the 13th of march
read and confirm please. I'm about to make a reservation for 2 room at the ac hotel by marriott atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza in atlanta. check in is march 11th and check out is march 13th
you need to fix the check in - out dates. I want the rooms from next thursday untill march 12th
ok, I've updated the request, tell me if it is okay. check in is march 7th and check out is march 12th
yes, you may proceed now
I can proudly tell you that the room is booked
I'll need the phone number too
it's +1 470-231-3030
got it. now look for some funny activities
I can show you 10 but the funniest one is a park called atlanta botanical garden
roger that
do you need to ask me something else?
no, I don't, I have enough info at the moment. take care
you too!
Can you help me find a round-trip flights to Sydney, NSW?
When would you like to leave? Where will you be leaving from?
I will be leaving from San Diego on the day after tomorrow.
When will you return?
I am returning on the 14th.
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 11:05 am for $299. The return flight leaves at 5:50 pm.
That one sounds good. Would you help me buy a ticket?
Please confirm: You are booking 1 economy seat on Delta Airlines from San Diego to Sydney. The flight departs on March 3rd at 11:05 am. The return flight is March 14th at 5:50 pm.
Yes, that's right. When does my return flight arrive? Which airport do I leave from?
Your ticket is confirmed. This flight departs from SAN International Airport. Your return flight will arrive at 8:34 am.
I also need to look for a hotel there.
I have 10 hotels for you. How about 28 Hotel Sydney? It has a 4.2 rating.
That's perfect. Would you please reserve two rooms there for me?
Will you be checking in on March 3rd? Will you check out on March 14th?
I would like to check in on the 5th of this month, and check out on the 11th of March.
Please confirm: you are making a reservation for 2 rooms at 28 Hotel Sydney in Sydney. You will check in on March 5th, and check out on March 11th.
Wait, please change that. I will check in on March 7th, and I'll check out on March 9th.
Please confirm: Your check-in date is March 7th, and your check-out date is March 9th.
Yes, that's right. What's the street address there?
Your reservation has been made. Their street address is 28 Regent Street, Chippendale New South Wales 2008, Australia.
Great. Can you tell me some attractions there?
I have 10 attractions that might interest you. You might check out ANZ Stadium. That's a sports venue.
Okay, thanks. That's all I need today.
Have a great trip!
I need round trip flights departing Chi-town.
Where and when are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing March 1st, returning on the 8th of this month and going to Los Angeles.
American Airlines has a flight that departs at 4:30 am and then at 8:30 am respectively and the total price is $176.
Can I get refunds for this flight and what is the departing airport?
The departing airport is O'Hare International Airport and the ticket can't be refunded.
That works for me. Can you buy me tickets?
You want 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines flying from Chicago To Los Angeles. The first flight departs at 4:30 am on March 1st and the second flight departs at 8:30 am on March 8th. Is that right?
That is right. What time does my second flight land?
Your ticket is booked. You will touch down at 3:02 pm on your return home.
What airport does the first flight fly into and what time does it land?
You will be arriving at LAX International Airport at 7:02 am.
Thanks a bunch. I need a hotel for there.
Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills has a 4.4 rating.
How can I contact them?
You can contact them at +1 323-852-7000.
What is the venue address?
They are located at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
That works for me. Book me a room from March 2nd until Sunday this week.
You want 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles from March 2nd to March 3rd. Is that right?
That is right.
Your hotel is booked.
Thanks. What is there to do nearby?
Search found 10 things that might interest you. Angels Flight Railway is a Historical Landmark.
Does this place charge an entry fee?
Yes, this place charges and entry fee.
What else can you find?
Autry Museum of the American West is a Museum.
Okay, I see.
Do you need something more?
No, that is it. Thanks.
Have a fun time.
Find me round trip flights in Economy class.
When are you returning?
I am departing on the 10th of March and returning on the 14th of March.
What city are you departing?
I am departing NY and headed to Chicago.
Search revealed 4 results. American Airlines has a round trip flight departing at 5:25 am and then again at 12:30 pm respectively and the ticket costs $136.
Does the flight have zero layovers and what airport does it depart out of?
There are 0 layovers and you are departing from JFK International Airport.
What else can you find?
I found a Delta Airlines round trip flight with departure times of 6 am and then 9:15 am respectively with a cost of $132.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets now?
Yes, book a ticket for 1 person.
You want a ticket for 1 person in Economy class on Delta Airlines from New York to Chicago. The first flight departs March 10th at 6 am and the second flight departs March 14th at 9:15 am. Is that right?
That is right.
Your flight is booked.
What airport does it fly out of and when does my return flight land?
You are departing out of JFK International Airport and the return flight will land at 12:34 pm.
Thanks a bunch. I need a hotel while there.
Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown as a 4.3 rating.
What is their contact number?
You can contact them at +1 312-981-6600.
That works for me.
Shall I book your hotel?
Yes, book me a room.
Are you arriving on March 10th?
I will arrive on the 11th and leave on the 14th of March.
You want 1 room at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago from March 11th to March 14th. Is that right?
No, I am arriving on the 10th of March and departing on March 13th.
You will arrive March 10th and leave March 13th, correct?
That is correct.
Your room is booked.
How much does it cost?
The total bill is $468.
Thanks. What is there to do around there?
Search found 10 results for you. 360 Chicago is a Tourist Attraction.
Is it free and what is their contact number?
You can contact them at 888-875-8439 and the attraction is free.
That is nice.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks
Have a good time.
Can you find me a round trip flight?
What is your departure date and location and what is your destination?
Leaving from SD next Monday and going to San Francisco.
What is your return date?
Getting back March 12th.
There is a flight on Alaska Airlines leaving at 11:10 am and returning at 6:10 am for a cost of $113.
How many stops are there?
There are 0 stops.
Are there other options?
There is a flight leaving on American Airlines leaving at 9:20 pm and returning at 12:15 pm for a cost of $143.
Is it a refundable flight and what airport does the return flight take off from?
It is a non refundable flight from SAN International Airport.
That flight is good.
Should I book?
Yes, please book the ticket.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy ticket on the flight on American Airlines leaving from San Diego on March 4th at 9:20 pm and returning from San Francisco on March 12th at 12:15 pm.
No. There is one person in the group.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 ticket for a departure on March 4th.
Yes. That's right.
Your reservation is a success.
Does it have any stops?
There is 1 stop.
Which is the return airport and arrival time of that flight.
The departing flight arrives at 4:19 pm from SFO International Airport.
Thanks. Can you find me a hotel there?
The Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco has a 3.5 rating.
Where is it located and is it pet friendly?
The hotel is not pet friendly and is located at 749 Taylor Street.
Perfect. I need to book three room checking out on March 12th.
Will you be checking in on March 4th?
Checking in next Wednesday.
Please confirm you want me to book 3 rooms at the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco checking in on March 6th and checking out on March 12th.
Yes. What's their phone number?
Their phone number is +1 415-673-3277. Your reservation was a success.
I'm looking for some attractions there?
Alcatraz is a historical landmark in the area.
Okay. Sounds good.
Is there anything else?
No. Thanks. That's all.
Please enjoy your day.
I would like to search round trip flights.
What is your date of return and the place of boarding?
I will be leaving from LAX and will return on March 13th.
What is your destination?
I will be going to Phoenix, AZ.
What would be your date of departure?
My date of departure would be the 2nd.
I found an American Airlines flight leaving at 7:50 am and the return flight departs at 7:35 am. The ticket costs $105.
Can you confirm whether the ticket is refundable?
Sorry, The ticket is non-refundable.
Can you look for premium Economy tickets in any other flight?
There are 1 flight suitable to you. It is a Southwest Airlines flight which leaves at 11:50 pm and the return flight departs at 7:05 am and the ticket costs $148.
That sounds good to me. Would you help in booking 3 tickets in that flight?
Please confirm: You want me to book 3 premium Economy tickets in Southwest Airlines which leaves from Los Angeles at 11:50 pm on March 2nd to Phoenix. The return flight departs at 7:05 am on March 13th.
No. Book it for four people.
Please confirm: You want me to book 4 tickets in a flight which leaves at 7:05 am.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked your ticket.
Thank you so much! Can you search for hotels there?
There are 10 hotels you might like. What do you think of Aloft Phoenix-Airport with 4.2 ratings?
Can you find me their contact number and the address?
The contact number is +1 602-275-6300 and the address is 4450 East Washington Street.
Are there any other hotels?
What do you think of Arizona Grand Resort & Spa with 4.3 ratings?
That sounds perfect to me.
Would you like me to continue booking the hotel?
Yes, Please reserve 1 room with the check in date as Wednesday next week and check out on 10th of March.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve 1 room at Arizona Grand Resort & Spa located in Phoenix. The check in and check out dates are March 6th and March 10th respectively.
Yes, That is correct.
Your reservation is successfully made.
Can you confirm the contact number and whether they allow pets?
The contact number is +1 602-426-2638 and it does not allow pets.
Thank you very much! Can you find me some child friendly museum there?
I found 6 attraction according to your choice. There is one museum called Arizona Science Center.
Okay, That sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice time.
Hey! Please can you help me to find a round trip in any flight for I've a travel?
Sure, when are you planning to leave and where are you heading to?
I'll be heading to Chicago and will be leaving on 1st of March.
So, when is your return?
I'll be returning on the 9th.
From where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from CDMX.
Okay! I've 3 flights at your convenience for your trip. The American Airlines outbound flight will leave at 8:05 am and the return flight will leave at 1:20 pm and the cost of the ticket price will be $305.
Looks like a good deal, but is the ticket a refundable or non-refundable one? When will the onward flight will arrive?
It will arrive at 8:12 pm, but sorry to say that the ticket is non-refundable.
Do you have any other tickets available? I wish to travel in United Airlines.
Yup, there is 1 convenient flight for your trip. The United Airlines outbound flight will leave at 0:20 am and the return flight will leave at 12:45 pm and the ticket price will be $283.
Sounds great. Please can you help me to book tickets in this flight?
Yup. Please can you confirm me that you wish to fly from Mexico City to Chicago in United Airlines on March 1st at 0:20 am and the return flight is on March 9th at 12:45 pm and you wish to book 1 ticket in Economy class, right?
Yup, sounds good to me?
Okay! Your ticket confirmation is successful.
Hello! Please can you find me some good hotels there which is pet-friendly?
Yup, do you have any idea of staying at Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown for its rating is around 4.3.
Sounds perfect.
So, do you want to continue booking at this hotel?
Yup, I wish to book two rooms at this hotel and I'll be checking at March 6th.
So, March 9th will be your check out date right?
Nope, I wish to check out on 8th of this month.
Okay! Please can you confirm me that you wish to make a reservation for 2 rooms at Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago on March 6th and your check out date will be on March 8th, right?
Yup, that would work for me.
Okay! your reservation is made successfully.
Please can I have their contact number?
Yup, you can reach them at +1 312-981-6600.
Thanks much. Please can you suggest me some attractions over there?
Sure, there is a tourist attraction at 360 Chicago and you must visit there.
Okay! looks great. That's all i need. bye.
Have a great fun at your trip!!!
I need a round trip flight to Sydney later today please.
Where would you like to depart from and when do you plan to return?
I'd like to leave from Seattle, WA and return on the 3rd.
How about a flight on Delta Airlines at 8:45 am with a 5:50 pm return for $360?
What number of stops does it have?
That has 1 stop.
Is it a refundable ticket and where does it leave from?
No, it's not refundable and it departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Sounds good, thanks.
Would you like to buy tickets?
Yes, I would.
Confirming a Delta Airlines flight from Seattle to Sydney. The flight leaves on March 1st at 8:45 am and returns March 3rd at 5:50 pm, for 1 economy passenger.
Yes, one person in my group.
Confirming 1 passenger for an economy ticket.
Thank you, yes. What is the arrival time of the onward flight?
It's 1:32 pm and the ticket has been booked.
What is the destination airport?
That's Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Thanks. I need a hotel, too.
I have 10 of them. How about 28 Hotel Sydney, which has a 4.2 rating?
Do they take pets and what is their address?
No, no pets are allowed. The hotel address is 28 Regent Street, Chippendale New South Wales 2008, Australia.
Okay, sounds good.
Would you like to reserve the room?
Yes, I would, for Saturday this week.
Is that for a March 3rd check in?
Yes, it is.
Confirminf a reservation for 1 room at 28 Hotel Sydney in Sydney from March 2nd until March 3rd.
Thank you very much.
The room has been reserved.
Thanks. May I also get some attraction recommendations?
How about ANZ Stadium, which is a sports venue?
Yes, that's all for now.
Thank you very much.
I'm leaving soon and I need a round trip flight.
Ok, I just need more info. Where will you depart from? Where do you intend to go? When were you thinking to be back?
The city I'm reaching is London and the departing city is chi-town, I was thinking about be back on march 13th
do you also know the date you want to leave?
Yes, it's the 2nd
you have 3 trips to chose from. There's this american airlines flight leaving at 4:30 am and the return flight is scheduled to leave at 2:05 pm. The ticket costs $338.
I need to know the number of the stops.
Just 1
Explore the other options
You can travel with delta airlines and take off at 9:15 am, the return flight is scheduled to start at 8 am. The price to pay for the ticket is $305
I need to know the number of stops and the departing airport
Stops are just 1 and it will depart from o'hare international airport
this one can meet my necessities
I have the skills to buy tickets for you
How cool, yes, buy economy tickets please
Before I proceed, let's verify that I understood perfectly your request. You want to book a flight from delta airlines from chicago to london. You'll leave on march 2nd at 9:15 am and will return on march 13th, the plane will take off at 8 am. You need 1 economy ticket.
Yes, it's what I want
tickets are bought
Great, one thing is done, I still need another favor, you have to look for a hotel room for me
There are 10 hotels, how do you feel about 45 park lane? It's rated 4.7
Tell me where exactly it is located
It's at 45 park lane
it can be a good choice, book it
just confirm me the check out date, is it march 13th?
No, it's on the 4th
When will you check in, March 2nd maybe?
Yes, exactly
confirm me the reservation before it's final. You want to book 1 room at 45 park lane in london. Check in is march 2nd and check out is march 4th
yes, I need that room
the operation is over, the room is yours
While there, I would like to do something fun and interesting.
I've found 10 attractions you may like. In particular, there is a historical landmark at 30 st mary axe (the gherkin)
What is the number to call?
it is 20 7071 5029
Okay, I noted it down
I can still do a lot for you
It won't be necessary, take care.
Have a great trip!
Summer vacation is finally here and I would like to find a round trip flight for our family vacation.
I'm happy to help. Where are you going and what is your return date?
I would like to travel to London, UK and return on the 6th if at all possible.
Okay just a few more details. When do you want to depart and from where?
I would like to leave Sunday this week from Chicago.
I am seeing 3 flights you may be interested in. The first is American Airlines leaving at 12:30 pm and returning at 2:05 pm for a total of $306.
Great, let's buy those.
Before I confirm those tickets let's make sure we have all the details correct. That will be 1 economy ticket with American Airlines, travelling from Chicago to London on March 3rd at 12:30 pm and boarding the return flight on March 6th at 2:05 pm. Is that right?
Yes but can you also tell me the name of the airport that the flight leaves from and how many stops the flight has.
I have confirmed that flight for you that leaves from O'Hare International Airport with only 1 stop.
Great, I will also need to find a hotel there.
There is a hotel at 45 Park Lane with a 4.7 star rating.
Can I have the contact information for that hotel?
Sure, their phone number is +44 20 7493 4545.
Can I have the street address as well and can you find out if they allow pets?
The hotel's address is 45 Park Lane and they do allow pets.
Great, that seems like just what I am looking for.
Would you like me to help you reserve that hotel?
Yes, let's go ahead and set up those reservations.
Would you like the check in date to be March 3rd and the check out date to be March 6th?
Yes, please.
Before I proceed please verify the information I have is correct. You would like to check in to 1 room at the hotel located at 45 Park Lane in London on March 3rd and check out on March 6th.
Yes, that is all correct but can you also give me a total price as well?
The room I have just reserved for you will cost $264.
I would also like to see some child-friendly, garden attractions while I am there visiting.
Of the 10 places I have found that match that criteria, the first is a park called Barbican Conservatory.
Awesome, that's all I need right now, thanks.
No problem, have fun!
I need to get a round trip flight.
Where are you headed to and when would you like to return.
I want to return from Seattle on the 5th.
When would you be leaving and from where?
I will be traveling to LA from Atlanta on the 3rd.
I have found 4 suitable flights.There is an outbound flight on american airlines that leaves at 2:30 pm. It would be returning at 5:25 pm and costs $192
When does the onward and return flights land?
The onward flight lands at 4:29 pm and the flight returns at 1:24 am.
That return flight is too early. Is there anything else? I would need economy tickets for 2.
There is an outbound flight on delta airlines that leaves at 5:40 pm. It would be returning at 9:20 am and costs $187.
That would be much better. Go ahead and book the tickets for me.
You would like an economy ticket for 2 on a delta airlines flight from atlanta to los angeles that leaves on march 3rd at 5:40 pm and returns on March 5th at 9:20 am?
Yes, that's correct. When does the return flight land and at which airport?
You would be landing at LAX international airport at 5:19 pm.
I will need a hotel when I get there. What do you recommend?
There are 10 suitable hotels. ac hotel by marriott beverly hills is a lovely hotel with a rating of 4.4..
I would like to reserve one room for the 3rd till the 5th.
You would like to book 1 room at ac hotel by marriott beverly hills in los angeles from march 3rd to March 5th?
Yes, that would be great.
I have made the reservation.
What fun places can I visit when I get there?
There is a historical landmark called angels flight railway.
Is there a entrance fee?
No, it is free to enter.
That sound excellent.
Would you be requiring any additional assistance?
No, thanks. You have assisted me well.
Enjoy your day.
I need a round trip flight out of San Diego with a return date of March 12th.
When are you departing and where are you going to?
I am departing on the 4th of this month and headed to SF.
Search revealed 4 results. Alaska Airlines departs at 11:10 am and then at 6:10 am respectively and the ticket is $113.
Are refunds available and what time does the first flight land?
The ticket cannot be refunded and the first flight lands at 12:50 pm.
That works for me. Get me some tickets.
You want 1 Economy class ticket on Alaska Airlines from San Diego to San Francisco. The first flight departs at 11:10 am on March 4th and the second flight departs at 6:10 am on March 12th. Is that correct?
That is correct.
Your flight is booked.
I need a hotel near there that allows pets.
Search revealed 10 results. Argonaut Hotel has a 4.4 rating and allows pets.
That works for me. Book me this hotel.
Will you be arriving March 4th?
No, I will be arriving on the 5th of March.
Will you be departing on March 12th.
I want 1 room and will be leaving on March 10th.
You want 1 room at the Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco from March 5th to March 10th. Is that right?
No, I will arrive on the 6th of this month and leave on the 8th.
You will arrive March 6th and leave on March 8th?
That is correct.
Your hotel is reserved.
What is there to do nearby?
Search revealed 10 results. Alcatraz is a Historical Landmark and is a cool attraction.
That works for me.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks for the help.
Have a great time.
Can you find me a flight for one leaving from Washington?
When will you be back?
I'm leaving on the 11th of March and returning on the 14th of this month.
Where do you wish to go?
To Los Angeles.
Okay. I found 3 flights for you. One of them is through American Airlines. It leaves at 9:55 pm, returns at 2:10 pm, and costs $289.
Sounds good. Can you get a ticket for me?
You want 1 economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Washington to Los Angeles that leaves at 9:55 pm at March 11th and returns at 2:10 pm on March 14th?
Correct. At what airport does the flight arrive?
I booked the ticket. You'll be headed to LAX International Airport.
I'll also need somewhere to stay while at LA. Can you get one hotel room for me?
Sure. Want AC Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills, which has a 4.4 rating?
Oh yes, that sounds great.
Want to keep reserving it?
Yes I do. I wish to stay from the 11th of March to the 14th of this month.
You want to book 1 room at AC Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles from March 11th to March 14th?
Yes. Can I also have a phone number and price?
I booked your room. You can call +1 323-852-7000, and will have to pay $972.
Thanks. Can you show me interesting events there?
I found 10 interesting occasions at Los Angeles, such as th Angels Flight Railway historical landmark.
Great. I'll keep that in mind.
Can I help you out with something else?
Not now. Thanks.
Have a great time at LA!
I want to go for a trip to Chi-town and for which I need to search for round trip flights. Can you search for the one which is leaving from Phoenix, AZ? I would like to prefer Delta Airlines.
What is your returning date?
I will return on the 11th. Make search accordingly.
Let me know, when do you want to leave?
I have planned to leave on the 4th and you can search for the tickets to the flight in any class for me.
Found 1 result. Hope the outbound flight with Delta Airlines which leaves at 11:55 am and the return flight leaves at 8:30 am under ticket price $290 is okay to you. How about your opinion?
That is the nice and okay for me. Thanks.
Do you want to book the tickets now?
Yes, Make it for two.
Please confirm to book 2 Economy class tickets in a Flight with Delta Airlines from Phoenix on March 4th at 11:55 am to Chicago and the return flight leaves at 8:30 am on March 11th.
That is confirmed to proceed.
Your tickets are booked successfully.
Let me know about destination Airport for my reference.
This flight will reach its destination at O'Hare International Airport.
Thanks for that information. I want one more favor from you. Can you search for some nice hotels there?
Yes, What about Ac Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown with rating at 4.3 which is the best one among the 10 hotels I found for you. Is that okay to you?
Yes, I want to proceed with booking of rooms in that hotel.
Shall I book it for the check-out date on March 11th?
No, please note that I want to check-out from that hotel on next Friday. So book it up to that date.
What about the check in date whether March 4th is okay for you?
Yes, that is the same.
Please confirm to book 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago from March 4th to March 8th.
Yes, that is confirmed to proceed. What about the cost for that reservation?
I have successfully booked the rooms and the cost for that reservation is $384 in total.
Get me their contact number for my reference.
You can contact them by the phone number +1 312-981-6600.
Thanks for that information. I want to find some attractive places there. Can you search for me?
What do you think about a Tourist Attraction at 360 Chicago. Is that okay to you?
Let me know their phone number.
It is 888-875-8439.
Okay, that is okay for me.
How can I help you further?
No, thanks. That's all I want from you.
Have a good day.
Can your find my round trip flights departing from Ciudad de Mexico?
Where are you planning to visit? When would you like to leave and return?
I am traveling to Las Vegas on the 10th and returning on March 13th.
I found 2 flights. There is an American Airlines fligh leaving at 8:05 am and retuning at 6:40 am. The ticket price is $242.
That sounds like a good flight. I want to buy tickets for 2 people.
Please confirm the travel details: 2 Economy class tickets on American Airlines for a flight from Mexico City to Las Vegas. The departing flight is on March 10th at 8:05 am and the return flight is March 13th at 6:40 am.
Yes, that is correct.
I have confirmed your tickets.
Thanks for the assistance. I need search for a hotel there.
How about the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West which has a rating of 4.3
That is great. I want to make a hotel reservation with a check in date on the 10th and a check out date on March 13th.
Please confirm the following: You want to book 1 room at the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West hotel in Las Vegas with a check-in date of March 10th and a check-out date is March 13th.
Great, that works for me.
The reservation has been made.
Can you find me some attractions there?
I found 9 attractions that may interest you. I found a Museum you should check out. It is DISCOVERY Children's Museum.
Fantastic. That is all I needed. Bye
Enjoy your day.
I need to find round trip flights, leaving March 6th.
When are you planning on returning?
I'd like to get back the 11th of this month. Leaving from Seattle, WA with 3 people in my group.
Where are you planning on going?
We are going to Atlanta, GA. Doesn't matter what class.
There is a $200 American Airlines flight leaving at 9:45 pm. The return flight leaves at 9:35 pm.
Yeah, that would work just fine. Can you go ahead and purchase tickets?
Please confirm the followingL You want 3 economy tickets on 9:45 pm American AIrlines flight from Seattle to Atlanta on March 6th and coming back March 11th ? The returning flight will be leaving at 9:35 pm.
Yes, that's right.
Your ticket has been booked.
Is it refundable?
No, it is not.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
I need a hotel as well.
I found 10 possible hotels. What about a 4.5 hotel called Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza?
Yes, that sounds just fine.
Is there anything else I can help with
Go ahead and make the hotel reservation, 2 rooms please.
Do you want to check in March 6th and check out March 11th?
Actually I want a check in of March 8th and a check out of the 9th of March.
Alright, please confirm the following details: You want 2 rooms in Atlanta from March 8th to March 9th at Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza ?
Yes, that's right. What is the phone number?
Your reservation is complete. Their phone number is +1 470-231-3030.
And what's the street address?
It's located at 3600 Wieuca Road Northeast.
Thanks! Can you show me what attractions are there as well?
THere are 10 possibilties I found. There is a park called Atlanta Botanical Garden.
What's their phone number?
The phone number is 404-876-5859.
Ok cool, that's all I needed, thank you.
Enjoy!
Can you assist me in looking for flights?
Where are you leaving from, where are you going and on what date?
I am going from San Fran to San Diego on 10th of March.
What date will you be flying back?
On March 12th.
There are 5 options for you. One flight with Alaska Airlines leaves at 6:10 am and returns a 11:10 am costing $111.
What are the other options?
American Airlines have a flight departing at 12:15 pm, returning at 9:20 pm and costing $130.
That would suit me fine.
What else can I assist you with?
Will you purchase 4 economy tickets.
To confirm then that is 4 economy tickets going from San Francisco to San Diego with American Airlines. The departing flight is at 12:15 pm on March 10th and the returning flight is at 9:20 pm on March 12th.
Yes that is great. What time does the outbound flight land at?
At 4:19 pm and your ticket is now booked.
Can you help me find a hotel now?
There are 10 options for you, one has a 4.3 rating and is called Bahia Resort Hotel.
What else is there?
The Best Western Mission Bay has a 3.8 rating.
What else is there, I need one room.
The best Western Plus Bayside Inn has a rating of 4.3.
That is great.
Will I reserve this for you?
Yes please do.
Will you check out on March 12th?
Yes that is right.
Are you arriving on March 10th?
No 11th of March please.
To confirm then that is 1 room from March 11th to March 12th at Best Western Plus Bayside Inn in San Diego.
Yes that is right. Are pets permitted and can you give me their contact details?
Pets are not permitted. Their telephone number is +1 619-233-7500 and you booking is now confirmed.
Thanks now I would like some free child friendly attrations to visit.
There is Balboa Theatre, it is a Performing Arts Venue.
fine that is good and this all the help I need. Goodbye.
Have a good trip.
I am thinking of a flight trip in Economy class, are there any round trip flights?
Yes, try to find it. Please inform you departure date, return date and departure location?
I will be leaving on March 6th and come back on the 9th. I will embark from Phoenix.
What about your destination?
I am flying to SD.
2 flights will be there. One is Southwest Airlines leaving at 9:35 pm and leaves for return at 1:20 pm with a ticket fare of $95.
Ok, will you ensure the seats now?
With pleasure. Please look at your details, you need 1 ticket in Economy class of Southwest Airlines which is leaving from Phoenix at 9:35 pm to San Diego on March 6th. It leaves for return at 1:20 pm on March 9th.
Good, details verified.
Your reservation is successful.
What is the departure time of onward flight?
It is arriving at 10:55 pm.
From which port will it depart? What is the time of arrival of return flight?
Destination airport is SAN International Airport. It arrives at 2:40 pm.
Great help, Now look for 2 rooms in a hotel where I can take my pets too.
Do you like to stay at Bahia Resort hotel with 4.3 rating.
Fine, make a booking there.
Shall I reserve it with Check-in date on March 6th and Check-out on March 9th.
Yes, go on.
Please confirm, you need 2 rooms in Bahia Resort Hotel in San Diego on March 6th. You will check out on March 9th
Good, its perfect.
The reservation is successful.
What is their contact number and address?
Address is 998 West Mission Bay Drive and phone number is +1 858-539-8666.
Are there any attractive places to visit?
10 attractions will enjoy you. Balboa Park is on among them. It is a park.
Thats good, any other attraction?
You can enjoy program at Balboa Theatre which is a Performing Arts Venue.
Fantastic, thank you.
Do you in need of any other favor?
No, thats all.
Great day.
I would like an economy round trip ticket leaving from Phoenix.
When would you like to leave, come back and where are you going?
I want to travel to SFO on March 4th and return on the 10th.
There are 4 option. The departure flight on American Airlines leaves at 6:15 am and returns at 8:10 am. The ticket price is $151.
When does it arrive?
The return flight arrives at 12:49 pm.
What are the airports for both legs?
The departure is Sky Harbor International Airport to SFO International Airport.
that sounds good.
Would you like to buy the tickets.
Yes, I do.
Confirming the American Airlines flight leaving Phoenix to San Francisco on March 4th and returning on March 10th. The departure time is 6:15 am and the return time is 8:10 am for 1 person in economy.
That is perfect.
The reservation is confirmed.
I need a hotel now.
How about Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco. It has a rating of 3.5.
What is the address?
749 Taylor Street
That is great.
Do you want to reserve a room?
Yes, I do.
Will you be checking in on March 4th and leaving on March 10th?
Yes, but checking out next Friday.
OJ, please confirm 1 room at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco from March 4th until March 8th.
Good, what is the cost and phone number?
The reservation is confirmed. The number is +1 415-673-3277 and the price is $1,188 in total.
Can you find some child friendly things to do nearby?
There are 10 options. A historical landmark is Alcatraz Island.
That sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a nice trip.
I need help finding an economy round trip flight?
Sure, where are you planning on going? And what days are you planning on going?
I am leaving from Portland, OR. I am traveling to LA to visit some friends. I need to be home by next Thursday.
Alright, what day do you want to leave?
I need to go on March 3rd because I have plans for the next morning.
OK, there are 5 flights that you may be interested in. An Alaska Airlines flight leaves at 10:10 am and costs $129. The return flight will be taking off at 5:15 am.
That flight will be work out great!
Would you like to reserve tickets now?
Yes, please. I will need 4 tickets.
Alright, so I will be reserving 4 economy tickets for the Alaska Airlines flight from Portland to Los Angeles on leaving on March 3rd at 10:10 am and returning on March 7th at 5:15 am.
Yes, that's right!
Alright, the tickets are reserved.
Thanks so much! Will you also help me find a hotel there?
Sure, the AC Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills is a very nice hotel. It has a rating of 4.4.
Wow, that is a high rating. That hotel will be perfect.
Shall I reserve the hotel for you?
Yes, I think I will make the reservation.
Alright, will you be checking in on March 3rd?
Yes, March 3rd.
And you will be checking out on March 7th?
Yes, that's right.
Will you please confirm the details of the reservation? You will be booking 1 room at the AC Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles beginning on March 3rd and ending on March 7th.
Yes, I can confirm that is correct. Could you also let me know the address and if the hotel allows pets. I might bring my dog if they do accept pets.q
It looks like this hotel does not allow pets. The reservation has been made and you will find the hotel at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
What attractions are near the hotel?
There is a historical landmark nearby, the Angels Flight Railway.
That sounds interesting, do you have the number?
Sure, it is 213-626-1901.
Ok, thanks for helping! I can't think of anything else that I need right now.
Ok, please enjoy the rest of the day!
I need to go on a short trip. Can you help me book round trip flights?
Where do you plan to visit and where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Washington to Philadelphia.
When do you plan to leave and when do you want to come back?
I want to leave on the 1st and get back on March 8th.
I found 2 flight you may like. There's a American Airlines one that leaves at 5:10 pm on the way there and returns at 9:45 am from the destination. The ticket costs $151.
Which airport does it flies from? Is the ticket refundable?
It will depart from Dulles International Airport but the ticket is not refundable.
Sounds good. Can you help me book the tickets?
Just to confirm: you will leave from Washington on March 1st at 5:10 pm in a American Airlines ticket in Economy class. The destination is Philadelphia, and you will return from there on March 8th at 9:45 am. It just 1 passenger.
Yes, that's correct.
Your ticket was successfully booked.
Great. Help me find a hotel there.
What about the Aka University City? They have a 4.6 rating.
Sounds real good. Please make a reservation.
Will you check in on March 1st?
I'll check in on the day after tomorrow. I want two rooms.
Will you check out on March 8th?
I want to check out on the 6th please.
Just to confirm: you want to book 2 rooms at the Aka University City in Philadelphia. Checking in on March 3rd and checking out on March 6th.
Yes, that's it. What's their number? Do they allow pets?
Your reservation was successful. Their number is +1 215-372-9000 but unfortunately they don't allow pets.
Can you show me some attractions there? I want something child friendly without an entry fee.
I found 10 attractions. The Art Museum Steps is a great tourist attraction you should definitely check out.
Any other? I'd love to see a Historical Landmark
I found 4 others. The Ben Franklin Bridge is an awesome Historical Landmark.
Okay, that's great. Goodbye!
Goodbye!
Would you look for round trip flights for me? I want to leave from Paris on economy.
When will you come back?
I want to come back Thursday next week.
When will you leave and where are you going?
I would like to go to NYC on the 4th.
I have 3 flights that should work for your trip. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:05 am. The return flight leaves at 7:35 am. This flight costs $243.
How many stops are there? When will the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 10:22 pm and it has 0 stops.
Do you have anything else for me? I want to leave from Phoenix and there are four in my group.
I have 2 good flights for you. There is a Southwest Airlines flight with the outbound flight leaving at 7:05 am. The return flight departs at 6:50 am. This flight costs $300.
Sounds good. Would you be able to find me flight tickets?
Please confirm that you want to go from Phoenix to New York on Southwest Airlines. The flight departs on March 4th at 7:05 am and the return flight departs on March 7th at 6:50 am. You need 4 economy tckets, right?
Sounds right.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Which airport does it arrive at? Could I get a refund if I need one?
It arrives at JFK International Airport. This ticket cannot be refunded.
Thank you for helping. Find me a hotel there.
I have 10 hotels. What do you think about 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge? It has a 4.5 rating.
Perfect. I would like to make a hotel reservation and want to check in on the 4th.
Would you like to check out on March 7th?
No, I will check out on March 5th.
Could you confirm that you want to make a reservation at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York? You need 1 room and will check in on March 4th and check out on March 5th.
That works for me.
You have made the reservtaion successfully.
Thank you. Would you show me some attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that should suit you. Check out 92nd Street Y. It's a performing arts venue.
Okay, good. That is it. Bye for now.
Enjoy your trip!
I need round trip flights on Delta Airlines to Atlanta, GA with a return date of the 14th of this month.
When and where are you departing?
I am departing Vancouver, BC on the 3rd.
Search revealed 1 flight which is Delta Airlines. The first flight departs at 2:50 am and the second flight departs at 12:50 pm with a total cost of $310.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets?
Yes, book me plane tickets.
You want 1 Economy class ticket on Delta Airlines from Vancouver to Atlanta. The first flight departs at 2:50 am on March 3rd and the second flight departs at 12:50 pm on March 14th. Is that right?
That is all right.
Your flight is booked.
Can I get a refund on the ticket and what is the departing airport?
The ticket is not refundable and you are departing out of YVR International Airport.
Thanks. Can you get me a hotel for there too?
Search revealed 10 results. Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead AT Phipps Plaza has a 4.5 rating.
What is the hotel's location?
It is located at 3600 Wieuca Road Northeast.
That works for me. Get me a reservation.
Are you arriving March 3rd and departing March 14th?
I will be arriving March 12th and the check out date is right.
You want 1 room at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza in Atlanta from March 12th to March 14th. Is that right?
Yes, that is right? What is their contact info and the final price?
Your booking is successful. The total bill is $432 and you can contact them at +1 470-231-3030.
What attractions are around there?
Atlanta Botanical Garden is a Park.
Does this place have free entry?
No, there is charged admission.
Would children like this place and what is their contact information?
Children like the place and you can contact the location at 404-876-5859.
What other attractions are there?
Atlanta History Center is a Museum.
Thanks. I see.
Do you need more help?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good trip!
I need to search for some round trip flights.
Where are you departing from?
I am traveling from Atlanta.
What are your travel dates and destination?
I am traveling to SF on 4th of March and getting back on the 13th
I found 4 flights for you. How about one American airlines flight at 11:40 am flight that costs $226? the return flight leaves at 3:50 pm
What is the arrival time of onward flight?
It is 2:06 pm
Are there other flights available?
There is also a delta airlines flight at 2:10 pm for $245. The return flight leaves at 5:25 pm
Show me some other options.
Show about the Southwest airlines flight at 6:30 am for $242? the return flight leaves at 7:10 am
This one sounds perfect.
Should I book the tickets?
Sure. book two economy tickets.
Booking 2 economy tickets on the southwest airlines flight from atlanta to san francisco on march 4th at 6:30 am with return flight on march 13th at 7:10 am
Cool. What is the airport of departure and is the ticket refundable?
Booking confirmed. The ticket is non refundable and the flight leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International airport.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help with?
Sure, I also need a hotel there.
How about the 3.5 rated Amsterdam hostel san francisco?
Perfect, make a reservation for me.
The check in would be on march 4th with checkout on march 13th right?
No the checkin would be on the 5th and check out on 12th of this month
Booking 1 room at the amsterdam hostel san francisco in san francisco from march 5th to march 12th.
I need three rooms actually
Booking 3 rooms march 5th onwards.
Sounds perfect to me.
Your booking is confirmed.
What is the address? is it per friendly?
It doesn't allow pets and its address is 749 taylor street.
Thanks, can you also show me some attractions there?
Sure, you can visit a historical landmark there- alcatraz.
Okay, how about something else that is child friendly?
Sure alcatraz island is child friendly historical landmark
Thanks. That would be all.
Have a great trip!
I want to find round trip flights leaving from NY for two people.
When are you leaving? Where are you going? And when are you coming back?
I'm going to Chi-town on the 4th of March. and returning on March 13th.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 10:55 pm. The ticket is $128.
The flight sounds good. Can you buy tickets? Any class is okay.
Pleas confirm: there is an American Airlines flight leaving from New York going to Chicago. The departure date is March 4th and the return date is March 13th. The departing flight leaves at 3:40 pm and the return flight leaves at 10:55 pm. The tickers are for 2 passengers in economy seating.
Yes, sounds good. When does the onward flight arrive and what airport does the flight depart from?
Your tickets have been confirmed. The onward flight arrives at 4:59 pm and leaves from JFK International Airport.
Thanks. I want to find a hotel.
I found 10 hotels. Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown is rated 4.3.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation.
Would you like to check out on March 13th?
I want to check out on the 8th. I need two rooms.
Do you want to check in March 4th?
No, I want to check in on the 6th of this month.
Please confirm: a reservation for 2 rooms at Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago checking in on March 6th and checking out on March 8th.
Now, I want 1 room. I want to check in on the 4th of March.
Please confirm: 1 room, check in on March 4th.
Yes, sounds good. What's the price?
Your reservation has been made. The price is $384.
What's the phone number and address?
The phone number is +1 312-981-6600 and the address is 630 North Rush Street.
Thank you. I want to find child-friendly attractions.
I found 10 attractions. 360 CHICAGO is a tourist attraction.
That sounds good.
Anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a great day!
Hello! Robert here! Please can you search a flight with a round trip for I've a short business trip coming up shortly?
Sure. Which is your start and reach of the journey? When is your return?
I will be flying from Chi-town to San Fran and return will be on next Tuesday. I would prefer to travel in Economy class.
So, when are you planning to start your journey?
Probably, on 2nd of March.
Okay! there are 3 flights with round trip. The American Airlines outbound flight will leave at 12:30 pm and the return flight will leave at 4:25 pm. The cost of the travel would be $295.
Which is the arrival airport?
The arrival will be at SFO International Airport.
Sounds good to me. Please can you help me to book tickets in this flight?
Sure. Please can you confirm me that you wish to fly from Chicago to San Francisco in American Airlines on March 2nd at 12:30 pm and the return flight will be on March 5th at 4:25 pm. You wish to book 1 ticket in Economy class for the travel, right?
Nope, I will need four tickets.
Okay! Please can you confirm me that you wish to return on March 5th and wish to book 4 tickets. Is that right?
Yup, sounds good to me.
Okay! your ticket is booked successfully.
Is it a refundable or a non-refundable ticket? At what time will the onward flight arrives?
It will arrive at 8:11 pm and sorry that the ticket is a non-refundable one.
Thanks much for your help. Please can you find me a hotel there?
Sure. Do you wish to stay at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco, for its rating is around 3.5?
Please can I have the street address?
Yup, the hotel is located at 749 Taylor Street.
Sounds perfect to me.
So, can I continue reserving the room for you?
Yup, please go forward and book one room for me.
Sure. so do you wish to check in on March 2nd?
Yup, you're correct.
So, when will be your check out? Is it on March 5th?
Yup, On 3rd of this month, I'll check out.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 1 room at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco on March 2nd located in San Francisco and you will check out on March 3rd, right?
Yup, that will work for me.
Okay! I've successfully reserved the room for you.
Please can you suggest some attractions, which is child-friendly there?
Sure, the Alcatraz Island is a Historical Landmark and you should visit this place atleast once in your life.
Is the ticket free or have to pay for the entrance?
Yup, you've to pay to visit this place.
Do you have any contact number?
Yup, you can call them at 415-561-4900.
Looks great. I'm done with. See you then.
Have fun over there !
I will be visiting a friend and I need to find a round trip flight. Find something to San Fran on today. Make the return flight on the 13th of March.
From where will you leave?
Look for something in Vancouver, BC.
There is a Delta Airlines flight. The departure takes off at 5:05 pm and the returning flight takes off at 5:45 pm. It has a price of $131.
That sounds great. Can you book a ticket?
Please confirm: Booking 1 Economy class ticket from Delta Airlines. Leaving from Vancouver with destination San Francisco. Departing flight takes off at 5:05 pm on March 1st and returning flight takes off at 5:45 pm on March 13th.
Yes, that is correct.
The ticket has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I also need a place to stay. Please find a hotel.
There are 10 possible hotels for you. There is Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco with a 3.5 rating.
What other options are there?
There is Argonaut Hotel and it has a 4.4 rating.
Does the hotel allows pets? How can I contact the hotel?
Their phone number is +1 415-563-0800 and they do allow pets.
That is great. Book a hotel room and I want to check out on the 13th of March.
Do you want to check in on March 1st?
No, I want to check in next Thursday.
Please confirm: Booking 1 room at Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco. The reservation is from March 7th until March 13th.
That is correct. What is the price of the hotel? And where is it?
The reservation has been done. It has a total cost of $480 and the address is 495 Jefferson Street.
What interesting attractions are there?
There are 10 attractions you might like. There is Alcatraz, it is an Historical Landmark.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
Can you please find a round-trip flight for me?
Sure, but first please tell me your departure location and date as well as your destination.
I'm flying out of LAX towards NY on the 1st of March.
When do you plan on returning?
I'd like to return next Thursday.
Perfect, there's 4 flights meeting your criteria. I'd recommend an American Airlines flight taking of at 6:20 pm with the return flight taking of at 3:40 pm. Tickets are priced at $268 each.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to buy tickets for you?
Yes, please do.
Can you please confirm that you want 1 Economy ticket for the American Airlines flight taking of at 6:20 pm from Los Angeles to New York on March 1st, with the return flight taking of at 3:40 pm on March 7th? Tickets are priced at $268 each.
Yes, that's correct. Please tell me if the flight is a 0 stops one.
The flight has 1 stop and your ticket is confirmed.
Please tell me when does the return flight land?
The return flight lands at 7:57 pm.
Thanks for everything. Now lets find a hotel at destination.
There are 10 meeting your criteria out of which I recommend 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge rated at 4.5.
Perfect. Let's place a reservation?
Are you planning on staying from March 1st to March 7th.
I will be checking in this Saturday and I plan to check out the day after tomorrow.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book 1 room for you at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York from March 2nd until March 3rd?
On second thought, please book 2 rooms.
OK, please confirm that you need 2 rooms on March 2nd!
Please modify the check in to 1st of March. I'll be staying until the 4th.
Perfect. Can you please confirm that you'll be staying from March 1st to March 4th?
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
Thanks. Now let's find some child-friendly free attractions in the area, maybe a Museum, if possible.
There's a very interesting Museum you should check out, namely the American Museum of Natural History.
Nice. Can you please tell me their phone number?
Sure, you can reach them at (212) 769-5100.
Prefect, any other attractions, maybe a performance venue?
There 2 which meet your criteria out of which I recommend an awesome Performing Arts Venue, the Apollo Theater.
Perfect. Thanks. That will be all for now.
Have a nice day!
Can you find me a round trip flight?
Where are leaving from and on what date?
Id like to travel from London to Philadelphia. Ill be leaving on the 2nd of March and returning next Tuesday.
There are 2 flights that may work for you. The first option is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 8 am and returns at 2:20 pm for $361 per ticket.
When will the return flight arrive and does it have 0 stops?
It has 1 stop and will return at 10:14 am.
What else is available?
The other option is a United Airlines flight leaving at 0:25 am and returning at 11:30 am for the price of $320.
That one will be better for me.
Do you need further assistance?
Yes, I'd like to buy Economy tickets for the flight.
Please confirm the details: You would like 1 Economy ticket on the United Airlines flight leaving London on March 2nd at 0:25 am bound for Philadelphia. It is scheduled to return on March 5th at 11:30 am.
Perfect. Can you tell me when the return flight is set to arrive and where it will depart from?
Your ticket has been purchased. Your flight leaves from Heathrow International Airport and will return at 3:14 am.
Great. Can you help me find three rooms at a pet-friendly hotel there?
There are 10 hotels that match your needs. Aloft Philadelphia Airport has a rating of 4.0 and accepts pets.
Where is the hotel located?
It is located at 4301 Island Avenue.
What is the contact number for the hotel?
You may reach them at +1 267-298-1700.
Perfect. Can you make the reservation for a check out date of the 4th of this month?
Will you be checking in on March 2nd?
I'll be checking in on Sunday this week.
You'd like 3 rooms at Aloft Philadelphia Airport in Philadelphia for a check in date of March 3rd and a departure date of March 4th. Is that correct?
Yes, that works for me.
Your hotel reservation is successful.
Great. Can you tell me some attractions nearby?
The Art Museum Steps is a popular Tourist Attraction.
That's pretty neat. Can you tell me some more?
If you'd like to visit a Museum, you might like Barnes Foundation.
Is this a free attraction? What's their number?
It is not free. The contact number is 215-278-7000.
Perfect. Thanks for the help.
You're welcome. Enjoy your trip.
Hi, could you help me search for some round trips to San Francisco? I do not have a preference on the class type.
Sure, where do you intend to depart and when is your intended period of travel?
I will be travelling from the 6th of this month till next Friday from Phoenix.
Sure, there are 4 available flights, one of which is an American Airlines flight which departs at 7:35 am and returns at 8:10 am which will cost you $203.
May I know which airport will I be departing from?
You will depart from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Are there zero layovers for this flight?
This flight has 1 layover.
Are there any available flights then?
There is also a Delta Airlines flight which departs at 11:55 am and returns at 5:50 am costing $126.
I see, this sounds good to me!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes please do so.
Please confirm your purchase of 1 return tickets on the Economy Delta Airlines flight from Phoenix to San Francisco, departing on March 6th at 11:55 am and returning on March 8th at 5:50 am.
That sounds great! Is this a refundabe ticket?
Your reservation has been made. Unfortunately, this is a non-refundable flight.
I see, which airport will I depart from and arrive at?
You will be travelling from Sky Harbor International Airport to SFO international Airport
I see, thank you so much! Could you help me search for 1 hotel room please?
Sure, how about the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco with a 3.5 rating?
Are there any alternatives? Would prefer 2 rooms in a place which allows pets.
Would you like Argonaut Hotel with a 4.4 rating then?
That is perfect! Could you help me make a reservation please?
Sure, will you be staying from March 6th to March 8th?
Yes I will.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 rooms at Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco from March 6th to March 8th.
Sure, that is fine with me. How much will this cost me?
Your reservation has been made, which will cost you $912 in total.
I see, thanks so much!
Do you require further assistance?
Could you also find some attractions which I can visit there?
There are 10 interesting attractions, one of which is a Historical Landmark called Alcatraz.
Is this a child-friendly location and may I have their contact number please?
Sure, you can contact them at 415-561-4900 and unfortunately, this is not a good place to bring your kids too.
Sure, are there any alternatives then?
How about a historical landmark called Alcatraz Island?
Sure, that is great!
Would you need any further assistance?
No, that is all I need, thank you!
No worries, enjoy your trip!
I would like to search for round trip flight on 6th of this month.
What is your destination, date of return and the place of boarding?
I would like to leave from LA on the 9th to Chicago.
There are 3 flights suitable to you. One is an American Airlines flight which departs at 5:20 am and the return flight departs at 4:30 am. The ticket costs $226
Can you look for Economy tickets in any other flight?
I found a Delta Airlines flight which leaves at 1:40 pm and the time of departure for the return flight is 5:25 pm. The ticket costs $191.
Okay, That sounds good to me. Can you buy three tickets for me?
Please confirm: You want me to buy 3 economy tickets for Delta Airlines leaving from Los Angeles at 1:40 pm on March 6th to Chicago. The return flight departs at 5:25 pm on March 9th.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked the tickets.
Can you help me in searching for a hotel there?
There are 10 hotels. What do you think about Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown with 4.3 ratings?
Can you find me the contact number and the street address of the hotel?
The contact number is +1 312-981-6600 and the address is 630 North Rush Street.
That sounds perfect. Can you make a reservation for one room at the hotel with the check in and check out date as the 6th of this month and March 8th respectively.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown located in Chicago with the check in date as March 6th and the check out date as March 8th.
No. Please change the check out date to the 9th.
Please confirm again: You want to check out the hotel located in Chicago on March 9th.
Yes, That is correct.
Your room has been booked successfully.
can you tell me the total price?
The total cost for the reservation is $336.
Thank you very much! Can you find me some attractions there?
I found 10 attraction. How about a tourist attraction called 360 CHICAGO?
Great, Can you look for any other attraction which does not charge any entry fee?
There is a park called Burnham Park.
Okay, That sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I'm leaving NY soon/ Can you find a round trip for three people?
You're leaving New York when? Where will you be going?
I leave later today to visit ATL.
When will you be back?
On the 11th of this month.
Okay. There's a $130 American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:45 am and returns at 3:25 pm. How's that sound?
Sounds great to me!
Want to buy tickets for it?
Yes. Economy tickets, please.
Okay. I will purchase 3 economy tickets for your group to go on an American Airlines flight from New York to Atlanta. It will depart at 11:45 am on March 1st and return at 3:25 pm on March 11th.
Sounds good. If my plans change, can I get a refund?
I got the tickets. Unfortunately, a refund will not be possible.
At what airport does the flight go to, and at what time will the return flight appear?
The flight travels to Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, and the return flight arrives at 5:47 pm.
Thanks. Can you find a hotel there for me?
How about AC Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza? It has a 4.5 rating.
Sounds fantastic to me.
Want to reserve that hotel?
Yes, I do.
Want to leave March 11th?
No. I want to book three rooms until the 9th of this month.
Want to check in on March 1st?
I'd rather check into 1 room next Friday.
You'll book 1 room at AC Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza in Atlanta from March 8th until March 9th?
Yes. What's the street address and phone number?
I booked the hotel. You can reach them at 3600 Wieuca Road Northeast, and the phone number is +1 470-231-3030.
Great. What are some child-friendly attractions in the area?
There's a lovely park called Atlanta Botanical Garden.
Nice. What else?
There's also the Atlanta History Center museum.
Great to know.
Can I help out with anything else?
No. That was a great help. Thanks!
Enjoy your time there!
I would lke to find a round trip flight.
What are your travel plans as far as when you are leaving and where are starting and ending your travels?
I would like to travel from Seattle, WA on the 4th and return on the 7th.
Where will you be visiting?
I am visiting Los Angeles.
I found 5 flights that meet your citeria. Alaska Airlines has a flight departing at 3:45 pm and returning at 7:10 pm for a ticket price of $152.
That flight is perfect.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, please purchase two economy tickets.
Please confirm 2 economy tickets on Alaska Airlines flight leaving Seattle on March 4th at 3:45 pm, and returning from Los Angeles March 7th at 7:10 pm.
Yes, that is right. Which airport do I fly out from?
Your ticket is confirmed. You will be departing from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Is this a refundable ticket?
Yes, this ticket is refundable.
Thanks! Now, I would l ike to find a hotel nearby.
The AC Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills has a 4.4 rating.
What else is listed?
The Airtel Plaza Hotel has a 3.9 rating.
What else is listed. I will need two rooms.
I have 8 hotels that you may like. The Banana Bungalow - Hollywood Hostel has a 4.1 rating.
What is their phone number and address?
You may reach them at +1 323-469-2500 and they are located at 5920 Hollywood Boulevard, Hollywood CA 90028, USA.
That one works for me.
Would you like to make reservations?
Yes, please reserve a room checking in on the 4th and leaving on the March 5th.
Please confirm 2 rooms at the the Banana Bungalow - Hollywood Hostel in Los Angeles arriving on March 4th and leaving on March 5th.
Correct. Is this a pet friendly hotel? What is the price?
Your reservations have been confirmed and the cost will be $300. They sadly do not allow pets.
Thank you. Please tell if there is a kid-firendly tourist attraction close by.
I found 7 attractions you may like. One tourist attraction is the Hollywood Walk of Fame.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else I can assist you with right now?
No, that is it right now. Thanks!
Enjoy the day!
Could you help me look for a round trip flight for my sake?
What place will you depart from?
I am departing from Paris.
What place do you intend to go to, and what time do you intend to depart?
I am going to LAX, and will depart on this Sunday.
What time will you return?
Ii'd like to return on the 10th.
There is a ticket costing $388 for an outbound American Airlines flight that departs at 4:05 am. The feturn flight departs at 9:40 am.
That flight is perfect for me.
Do you want me to purchase tickets for it?
Yeah, I'd like toe reserve the ticket.
Please verify the following information: an economy seat for 1 for an outbound American Airlines flight that departs from Paris to Los Angeles. The flight departs on March 3rd at 4:05 am, and has a return flight leaving at 9:40 am on MArch 10th.
Yeah, that's perfect.
Your ticket is verified.
Thank you for your assistance. I'd like to look a hotel there.
I discovered 10 hotels. What do you think about Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills, which has a 4.4 rating?
What is its location, and does it offer pets?
It doesn't permit pets, and the location is 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
That's wonderful. I'd like to book 1 room at the hotel, and I'd like to check out on March 9th.
Would you like to check in on March 3rd?
I'd like to reserve two rooms, and check in on next Friday.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 2 rooms at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles. The check-in date is MArch 8th, and the check-out date is March 9th.
I'd like to check out on next Friday, and want to check in on March 4th.
Please verify the following information: the check-in date is March 4th, and the check-out day is March 8th.
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Your booking is successful.
Thank you for your help. Can you tell me about several attractions there? I'd like something that is friendly for children, and I'm searching for stadium.
I recommend you go to the Dodger Stadium, which is a sports venue.
Alright, wonderful. That's all; see ya.
Have fun at the event!
I need a round trip flight.
When would you like to leave?
I want to leave this saturday.
Where would you like to go and when would you like to return? Where are you leaving from?
I will be leaving from Philadelphia to los angeles and I want to return on the 6th of march.
There are 2 suitable flights. There is an outbound flight on delta airlines that leaves at 2:20 pm. The flight returns at 1:40 pm and it costs $311
That would be fine. I want tickets for 2.
You would like economy tickets for 2 on a delta airlines flight from Philadelphia to Los Angeles that leaves on March 2nd at 2:20 pm and returns on March 6th at 1:40 pm?
That would be fine.
I have reserved your tickets.
I would need 2 rooms at a hotel when I get there.
There is ac hotel by marriott beverly hills that has a rating of 4.4.
That would be ideal.
Would you like me to make the reservation?
Yes, go head.
You would like to check in on March 2nd and check out on March 6th?
Yes, that could work.
You would like to book 2 rooms at ac hotel by marriott beverly hills in los angeles from march 2nd to March 6th?
That would be ok. Are pets allowed and what is their phone number?
I have made the reservation. The number is +1 323-852-7000 and pets are not allowed.
What fun place is there to visit there?
There are 10 suitable attractions. There is a historical landmark called angels flight railway.
Great. I will check it out.
Is there anything else you would need?
No. You have been helpful. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Hello, I'm looking for a round trip flights. Please can you find me one?
Sure, when is your return date?
I'll be returning most probably on 13th of March.
Okay! When is your start date of journey? From where are you flying and where are you heading to?
I'll be travelling from Chicago to LA on 7th of this month. Only 1, that's me will be travelling and I would prefer an Economy ticket.
Okay! I can find 3 flights suitable for your trip. The American Airlines outbound flight will leave at 4:30 am and the return flight will start at 8:30 am. The cost for the journey will be $195.
Looks to be a good deal. Is it a refundable ticket? Which is the departure airport?
Sorry, the ticket is non-refundable and from O'Hare International Airport, the flight will depart.
Do you have any other flights available with round-trip? If Southwest Airlines is available, that would be great.
Okay, lemme check... Here you go! there is 1 Southwest airlines flight available and the outbound flight starts at 9:10 am and it will return by starting at 6:45 pm. The journey cost will be $233.
Sounds good to me.
Can I reserve for you in this flight?
Yup, Please book a refundable ticket, for my plans might change later on.
Sure. Please confirm me that you wish to book 1 refundable ticket to fly from Chicago to Los Angeles in Southwest Airlines on March 7th at 9:10 am in Economy class and the return flight will leave on March 13th at 6:45 pm, right?
Yup, perfect. thanks.
Okay! your ticket confirmation is successful.
Please can you find some good hotels there and book two rooms?
sure. Do you wish to stay at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills for its rating is nearly 4.4?
sounds perfect to me.
Do you want me to book the room at this hotel?
Yup, please make the reservation?
So do you wish to check in on March 7th and check out on March 13th?
Yup, you're right. A slight change. I'll be checking out on the 12th.
Okay! Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 2 rooms at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles on March 7th till March 12th, right?
Yup, you're correct.
Okay! I've successfully booked the room to you.
Thanks. Where is the hotel exactly located?
It's located at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
Is it pet-friendly? What's the cost of stay per night?
It would cost $1,860 in total including tax and sorry that they do not allow pets.
Thanks much for the information.
Do you need any other help?
Please can you suggest some attractions there which is child-friendly. It would be good if you can suggest in the place of interest I have.
Sure! What about the Tourist Attraction, Hollywood Walk of Fame?
Sounds good to me. That's all I need.
Have a nice time and a nice day.
I am looking for an economy round trip flight from Atlanta, GA to San Fran.
When do you want to leave and return?
I am leaving on the 6th of this month and returning on the 12th of March.
There are 4 flights including an American Airlines flight that costs $260. The outbound flight is at 11:40 am and the return flight leaves at 2:15 pm.
What times do the two flights arrive?
The outbound flight arrives at 2:06 pm and the return flight arrives at 1:27 am.
That flight is perfect.
Do you want to purchase the tickets?
Please buy the ticket.
Please confirm you want 1 economy ticket on the round trip American Airlines flight from Atlanta to San Francisco. The outbound flight is on March 6th at 11:40 am and the return flight is on March 12th at 2:15 pm.
That is perfect.
The ticket has been purchased.
Which airport does it fly out of?
The flight leaves Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Are there any stops? Which airport does the flight arrive at?
There is 1 stop and the arrival is at SFO International Airport.
Thank you. I also need a hotel to stay at.
There is a 3.5 rated hotel called Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco.
That is good.
Do you want to make the reservation?
I want one room from the 10th of March to March 11th.
Please confirm you want to book 1 room at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco from March 10th to March 11th.
That sounds good.
The reservation is successful.
Is there a child-friendly park there?
There are 5 attractions including a park called Fort Funston.
That will be all for now.
See you soon!
I need a roundtrip flight please.
When are you leaving?
The 12th of this month.
Where are you leaving from and what is your destination? Also when will you be returning?
I'm going to San Fran from Atlanta, GA and want to return on the 14th of this month.
I have a 2:30 PM American Airlines flight which comes back at 3:50 PM for $263.
What is the arrival time of the onward flight and is it a 1 stop flight?
Yes, it is 1 stop and arrives at 6:15 PM.
Sounds good. I'd like an economy ticket.
Confirming an American Airlines flight from Atlanta to San Francisco on March 12th at 2:30 PM and returning March 14th at 3:50 PM for 1 economy ticket.
Sounds perfect, thanks.
The reservation is complete.
I appreciate it.
How else may I help you?
I also need two books two hotel rooms.
I have 10 possible hotels for you. Are you interested in Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco, which is rated 3.5?
Sure, let's make a reservation.
Checking out March 14th?
Yes that's right.
Checking in March 12th?
Now, checking in on the 13th.
Confirming 2 rooms at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco on March 13th for a March 14th check out.
Correct, thank you.
The reservation is complete.
Could you look for some child friendly attractions for me as well? A museum maybe?
The Cable Car Museum is a good museum.
Is it free admission?
No it's not.
Thank you, I'm all set for now.
You're very welcome.
Would you search round trip flights for me?
When are you leaving?
I am leaving to LA on MArch 10th.
Where are you departing from?
I am departing Portland, OR.
When are you arriving back?
I'm getting back the 13th of this month.
An American Airlines flight leaves 6 am and returns 5:20 am for $206.
Would there be any other flights?
Delta Airlines has an outbound flight leaving 9:35 am and returning 6:50 am for $195.
Will it be refundable?
No, it's not refundable.
The flight sounds good. I'd like Economy.
Please confirm a flight from Portland to Los Angeles from Delta Airlines departing March 10th and returning March 13th leaving 9:35 am and returning 6:50 am for 1 passenger Economy.
Yes, that is great. When does the flight arrive and which airport does it leave from?
The ticket is confirmed arriving 12:08 pm and departing from PDX international Airport.
I would like to search a hotel there.
What about the AC hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills rated 4.4?
That is great.
Would you like to continue to reserve the hotel?
Yes, I'd like to reserve the hotel.
Would you like check out on March 13th and check in March 10th?
Yes, I'd like to check out March 12th.
Please confirm a Reservation for the Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills Los Angeles with a check-in date March 10th and March 12th booking 1 rooms.
Yes, that will work for me.
You have successfully made a reservation.
Thanks a lot. Show me some attractions there and a museum.
Check out the Autry Museum of the American west a museum.
Okay that is good.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No that will be all.
Enjoy that so much.
I need to search for a round trip flight
Where are you traveling from?
I leave from ATL
And what is the destination and travel date?
I am visiting New York City on 8th of this month
When would you be coming back?
I get back on the 12th
There is a American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:25 pm and costs $158. The return flight leaves at 11:45 am
Is it refundable? which is the destination airport?
The flight is non refundable and arrives at JFK international airport.
Sounds good to me.
Should I book your ticket?
yes, do that.
Booking 1 economy ticket on the american airlines flight from Atlanta to New York on March 8th 3:25 pm with return flight on March 12th at 11:45 am
Sounds perfect to me.
Your ticket is booked successfully
Thanks a lot. I also need to search for a hotel there.
How about the 4.5 star rated 1 hotel brooklyn bridge?
Sounds good. book one room from the 11th to the 12th.
Booking 1 room at 1 hotel brooklyn bridge in New York from March 11th to March 12th.
sounds perfect to me.
Your booking is confirmed.
Thanks, can you also help me find some attractions there?
Sure, there is a performing arts venue at 92nd Street Y
Okay, anything else you can recommend?
If you like museum, there is American folk art museum there.
can you suggest some other performance venue?
I found 5 performing arts venue. How about apollo theater?
What's their number? Is it child friendly?
Yes it is. The number is 212-531-5300
Okay, thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that would be all. Thanks again.
Have a great trip!
I want to find round trip flights.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from San Diego going to Delhi.
When are you coming back and when are you leaving?
I'm leaving on the 10th of this month and returning on March 13th.
I found 2 flights. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:50 am. The return flight departs at 3 pm. The ticket is $373.
Yes sounds good.
Should I buy tickets?
Yes I want to buy tickets.
Please confirm: an American Airlines flight for 1 person in economy seating. The flight leaves from San Diego to Delhi on March 10th at 9:50 am. The return flight is March 13th at 3 pm.
Yes, sounds good. How many stops? Is it refundable?
Your ticket has been confirmed. There is 1 stop. The ticket is refundable.
Thank you. I want to find a hotel where pets are allowed.
I found 5 hotels. Andaz Delhi - A Concept By Hyatt is rated 4.6.
What's the address?
The address is Asset, Street Number 1, New Delhi.
Is there anything else? I want to book 1 room.
Ibis New Delhi Aerocity has a rating of 4.1.
That sounds perfect.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes I want to make a reservation. I want to check in on the 10th of this month and check out on 11th of March.
Please confirm: a reservation at Ibis New Delhi Aerocity in Delhi for 1 room on March 10th until March 11th.
Yes, sounds good. What's the address?
Your reservation has been made. The address is Asset no 9 Indira Gandhi International Airport Aerocity Hospitality District.
I want to find some attractions.
I found 10 attractions you might like. Adventure Island is a theme park.
Any other attractions?
Akshardham is a place of worship.
Okay, that's all. Bye.
Have a good day.
Can you find me a round trip airline tickets from Philadelphia. I will be returning next Friday.
When did you want to leave and to where?
The day after tomorrow from San Francisco.
I found 1 ticket for $297. It's on United Airlines leaving at 11:30 am and the return flight leaves at 5:50 am.
Is it refundable? What airport would it arrive in.
SFO International Airport. The ticket isn't refundable.
Okay, that will do. I'll need 4 tickets.
To confirm: You want 4 economy tickets on the United Airlines flight from Philadelphia to San Francisco leaving at 11:30 am on March 3rd with a return flight leaving at 5:50 am on March 8th.
Correct. When does each flight arrive?
Your flight to San Francisco arrives at 4:57 pm. and the return flight arrives at 4:36 pm. Your tickets are confirmed.
I'll also need a hotel.
I found 10 possibilities. There's the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco rated 3.5.
What's their contact number? Do they allow pets?
It's +1 415-673-3277. They don't allow pets.
What else is there? I just need 1 room.
There's the Argonaut Hotel with a 4.4 rating.
That sounds good.
Shall I reserve the room?
Yes please. I plan to check out next Friday.
Did you want to check in March 3rd?
No, not until the 6th of March.
To verify: You want 1 room at the Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco from March 6th to March 8th.
You got it.
Your reservation is confirmed.
What are some child-friendly attractions there?
There's Alcatraz Island. It's a great Historical Landmark.
Sounds good. What else is there. I'd like to go to a museum.
There are 10 choices for a museum. You might like the Cable Car Museum.
That sounds good too.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thanks. That's all I needed.
Have a great trip!
Can you find a round trip flight for my upcoming trip?
Sure thing. Where do you plan on going to?
I will be visiting Chi-town.
And when do you plan on leaving?
On the 1st of March.
When shall you return? What's the departing city?
I leave from Portland and will be back on Wednesday next week.
I found 2 flights that meet your needs. There's a $296 Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 3:15 pm and returns at 4:35 am.
Can I get a refund should something change in my plans? When will the return flight arrive?
It arrives at 9:58 am, but you cannot get a refund.
Sounds good to me.
Want me to get you your tickets?
Yes. Get economy tickets for me, please.
You want 1 economy ticket for the Southwest Airlines flight from Portland to Chicago that leaves on March 1st at 3:15 pm and returns on March 6th at 4:35 am?
Yes, that's correct.
I confirmed your ticket.
Thanks. I'd also like to find a hotel to stay in while I'm in Chicago.
I found 10 hotels for you. Would you like a room at AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown? It has a rating of 4.3.
No. Can you find something else I can book 1 room at?
Yeah. There's 9 hotels, including Ace Hotel Chicago, which has a 4.6 rating.
What's the phone number? Is it pet friendly?
You can call +1 312-764-1919, and you can bring pets there.
Great to know. Thanks.
Want to book a room there?
Yes. I'd like to stay there from tomorrow until Monday next week.
Okay, you want to book 1 room at Ace Hotel Chicago in Chicago from March 2nd to March 4th?
Yes, that's right.
You booked the room.
Thanks. Can you find me child-friendly attractions there?
There's 10 attractions that suit your needs, such as the tourist attraction 360 CHICAGO.
What's the phone number? Is entry free?
Their phone number is 888-875-8439. Entry is indeed free.
Great. Thanks. That'll be all for now.
Enjoy the sights Chicago has to offer!
I need to find 4 round trip tickets for a flight leaving Monday next week.
Sure, I just need to know the cities you will be traveling between and what date you would like to return.
I want to go from Los Angeles to Chi-town and return on the 7th of this month.
There are 3 flights available. American Airlines has a flight leaving at 8:30 am for $192. The return flight would depart at 4:30 am.
What time will I get home and will my purchase price be refunded if my plans change?
Sorry, but the ticket would not be refundable. You would arrive back home at 7:02 am.
I would like to buy economy class tickets for that flight.
Please confirm you would like to purchase 4 economy tickets for the American Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Chicago, leaving on March 4th at 8:30 am with a return flight that leaves at 4:30 am on March 7th.
Yes, those are the tickets I want to buy.
Alright, your tickets have been purchased successfully.
What airport does the fight leave from and when will I land at my destination?
You will leave from LAX International Airport and land at your destination at 3:02 pm.
Perfect! I need help finding a hotel there now.
I recommend staying at the Ac Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown. It is a nice hotel with a 4.3 star rating.
What other hotels have 1 room available?
I found a nice 4.6 star hotel called Ace Hotel Chicago you may like.
What other hotels do you suggest?
How about the Acme Hotel Company Chicago? Customers have given it 4.5 stars.
That hotel sounds good. Please book me a room begining on the 5th of March. I need it through the 7th of this month.
You would like to reserve 1 room in Chicago at the Acme Hotel Company Chicago from March 5th to March 7th, is that correct?
Yes, reserve it please.
Your hotel room reservation has been made.
What type of attractions at in the area?
A poopular tourist attraction is 360 CHICAGO.
Is that a free attraction?
Yes, there is no entry fee.
Do you recommend that place for kids?
Yes, it is a child friendly attraction.
That's all I needed. Goodbye.
Have a wonderful trip!
I'm going to be heading out of town soon. I need help searching for round trip flights. Assistant, can you help?
Where will you be departing from and what will be your return date?
The 3 of us will be traveling to Mexico City from Seattle next Thursday for this trip.
Okay. Got it. What is your departure date?
My group will be departing on the 12th of March to SFO and then return on the 14th.
Do you like flying with Alaska Airlines? There is an outbound flight that leaves at 12 pm. The return flight will depart at 2:55 pm. Lastly, the cost of the ticket is $125
I need more details. When does my return flight arrive and what airport does the flight arrive at?
The flight will arrive at the SFO International Airport with a return time of 5:06 pm.
I'm not sure that works well for my plans. There must be other flights available right?
Perhaps you prefer to ride on American Airlines. The $160 ticket will be leaving at 10:25 pm and return at 7:40 pm for the return flight.
Still not quite what I am looking for. Try finding Economy class tickets.
After searching. I have found 3 flights that are suitable for your criteria. Delta Airlines has a round trip flight that leaves at 6:10 am and returns at 8 am. The cost of the ticket is $130
Oh finally! That flight should be just what I am looking for.
Do you want me to purchase the tickets for you now?
Yes you sure can. Please process that order.
Confirm the following plane tickets: Purchasing 3 Economy Round Trip Delta Airlines flight tickets. The plane is departing from Seattle to San Francisco with a departure date of March 12th at 6:10 am and a return date of March 14th at 8 am.
Please continue with the transaction Assistant. Oh one more thing concerning that. What is the name of the airport the flight departs from?
I have confirmed the purchase of your 3 Delta Airline tickets. This flight will be leaving from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
What airport will the plane be landing at? Oh and is there at least one stop the plane has to make?
The destination will be the SFO International Airport. To answer your quest, no, there are 0 stops along the way.
Thanks for your help booking my flight. Now, I need your help booking a hotel at my destination city.
I have found 10 possible hotels for you. The best of the group is the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco. It has a rating of 3.5 from customers
That's exactly what I was looking for. If possible, go ahead and make the reservation for me.
Will your check date be on March 14th?
That's the same date as my return flight. Yeah that should work fine actually.
Does this mean your check in date will be March 12th?
Yeah please book that as my check-in date for the hotel.
Making reservation at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco. You are booking 1 room from March 12th until March 14th. Please confirm if you wish me to book this room.
Please confirm this reservation for me.
Done. I have booked your room at the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco.
Thanks again. You are a big help. I still need your help however. This time, I need to find some attractions there. Preferably without an entry.
The Aquarium of the Bay is a Nature Preserve that does not have a cost of entry.
Is this place considered child-friendly? Please give me the phone number of this attraction.
Data says that this is a very nice place to take kids to. If you wish to ask the staff directly, please call 415-623-5300.
Are there any better options for attractions in that area?
I have found a Historical Landmark that may be suitable. It is called the Coit Tower and is a popular attraction.
Okay! Thank you for the suggestions.
You are welcome. Do you require assistance on anything else? Please let me know.
That's all for now. Thank you for providing me with the help I needed.
Anytime. Please enjoy your trip!
Can you find me some round trip flights?
Sure, but first please tell me where are you departing from and when do you plan on getting back.
I'd like to fly Southwest Airlines out of Seattle, WA and I plan on getting back on the 14th of this month.
Now please tell me where are you flying to and when?
I'm flying to NY on Tuesday next week.
I found a Southwest Airlines flight for you, with the outbound flight taking off at 5:25 am and the return flight taking off at 5:15 pm. Tickets are priced at $303.
Do you know if they're refundable?
No, they are not.
Please tell me if the flight has 1 stops as well as the departure airport.
The flight takes off from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and it indeed has 1 stops.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to get you tickets for it?
Yes, please get me 1 Economy ticket for this flight.
Can you please confirm that you need 1 Economy ticket for the Southwest Airlines flight taking off from Seattle to New York on March 5th at 5:25 am, with the return flight on March 14th at 5:15 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your ticket.
Can you please help me find a hotel there?
I recommend 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge which is rated at 4.5.
Can you please give me its address?
Sure, they're located at 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn.
Perfect. Let's book 1 room there from the 11th of March to March 13th.
Can you please confirm that you want 1 room at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York from March 11th to March 13th?
Yes, that's correct. Do you know if they're pet friendly.
I've successfully booked your room and yes, they are pet friendly.
Nice. Please tell me the price for the room as well as the hotel's phone number.
You can reach them at +1 833-625-6111. The room costs $576.
Thanks. Can you find me some free attractions there?
There's 10 which meet your criteria. I'd recommend a Museum, namely the American Museum of Natural History.
Are they child friendly. Oh, and please tell me their phone number.
Yes, they're child friendly and you can reach them at (212) 769-5100.
OK, sounds perfect.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a nice day!
I'm going on this trip with some friends and still need to finish planning for it. Can you book me round trip Premium Economy plane tickets on Southwest Airlines for four people?
Sure, where are you going and what are your travel dates?
I'll be going to Atlanta from March 2nd to the 8th.
Ok, and where will you be flying out from?
I'll be flying out from Phoenix, AZ.
Ok, I found 1 flight available on Southwest Airlines for $265 that departs at 10:55 pm on the way there, and 12:05 pm on the way back. How about that?
Which airport does it go to and when does the plane arrive there?
It would arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport at 6:07 am.
Ok, that sounds good to me.
Do you want to buy tickets?
Yes, can you do that for me?
Sure. To confirm, you want 4 Premium Economy tickets on Southwest Airlines from Phoenix to Atlanta, departing March 2nd at 10:55 pm and returning March 8th at 12:05 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Ok, I've purchased your tickets.
Great, thanks. Can you also look up hotels there for me?
Sure, I found 10 available in the area. How about Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza? It has a 4.5 rating.
What's their phone number and is it pet-friendly?
Their number is +1 470-231-3030. No pets allowed unfortunately.
Ok, what else is there?
There's also Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Downtown, which has a 4.3 rating.
Ok, that one sounds good.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, can you book 1 room from the 3rd through Thursday next week?
Sure. To confirm, you want 1 room at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Downtown in Atlanta from March 3rd to March 7th. Is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, your reservation has been made.
Great, thanks. Can you also see what attractions are there? I'd like to see a performance venue if there is one.
Sure, I found 1 Performing Arts Venue you might like, The Fox Theatre.
Ok, great. Thanks for your help! That's all for now.
Ok, enjoy your trip.
Please help me find a round trip flights for 4 people.
Where you are coming from and when do you plan to leave? Where you are going?
I plan to go to Los Angeles from Las Vegas on March 10th.
Until when?
Until March 12th.
I got 4 flights and one is American Airlines for only $88 with outbound flight leaves at 9:30 am and return flight leaves at 8:25 pm.
Which airport the flight will arrive>
At LAX International Airport.
Good. Please help me buy a tickets.
Okay, you want 4 Economy seat at American Airlines goint to Los Angeles from Las Vegas on March 10th until March 12th with an onward flight leaves at 9:30 am and return flight leaves at 8:25 pm. Please confirm.
That's good.
Ticket confirmed!
Which airport does the flight depart from and is the ticket refundable?
no, it's not and flight departs from McCarran International Airport.
Thanks. Please help me find a hotel there.
I got 10 and one is Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills with 4.4 rating.
What's the phone number and street address of the hotel?
Phone number is +1 323-852-7000 and it is located at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
That's good!
Will I reserve you the hotel now?
Yes please, I am planning to check in on March 10th and check out on March 12th.
Okay, you want 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles on March 10th until March 12th. Please confirm.
That's perfect!
Reservation has been successfully made!
Please find me some attractions there.
I got 10 and you can check out Angels Flight Railway, it's a Historical Landmark.
Okay, thanks.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
You are welcome!
I'm going on a vacation soon. Can you find me a round flight at Delta Airlines?
Where are you planning on going to?
To Chi-town.
Where will you leave and when shall you return?
I'm headed out from Seattle, WA, and want to be back on the 13th of March.
When are you planning on going?
On the 4th of this month.
I found a $244 Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 11:50 pm and returns at 11:55 am. Want that one?
Sure thing. Can you get the tickets for me?
I'll get you 1 economy ticket for the Delta Airlines flight from Seattle to Chicago, which leaves at 11:50 pm on March 4th and returns at 11:55 am on March 13th, if that's okay with you.
That's fine with me.
I booked your ticket.
I also want to find a hotel there to stay at.
I found 10 hotels in the area, including AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown, with a rating of 4.3.
Nice! I'd like to book a room there.
Want to stay from March 4th to March 13th?
Actually, I want to stay until the 8th of this month.
Okay, then. I will book 1 room at AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago for you, for a stay from March 4th to March 8th. Does that sound good?
It does. And the price?
I booked the room, which costs $384.
Can you show me something interesting there?
There's the tourist attraction 360 Chicago.
Great! I need nothing more at the moment. Bye.
Enjoy your time at Chicago!
I need help looking for round trip flights.
When is your departure and where will you be departing from?
I want to leave on the 1st of March from Phoenix, AZ.
Where will you be going and when is your return?
I'm going to Las Vegas and I want to return on the 5th.
There's an American Airlines flight for $100 per ticket. The departure flight leaves at 7 pm. The return flight leaves at 4:40 pm.
I like the sound of that.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Yes, please book 3 Economy tickets.
I'll book you 3 Economy tickets for Phoenix to Las Vegas on American Airlines. Departure is on March 1st at 7 pm. Return is on March 5th at 4:40 pm. Is everything the way you want it?
Yes, that's the way I want it.
The tickets have been booked.
What's the departure airport?
The departure airport is Sky Harbor International Airport.
Thanks for the help. Now I need to get a hotel.
The Best Western Plus Las Vegas West has a 4.3 rating.
Are pets allowed. Also, what's the address?
Pets are allowed. The address is 8669 West Sahara Avenue.
That works.
Shall I reserve a room?
Yes please. And make check out the 4th of this month.
Will you be checking in on March 1st?
No, I want to check in on the 3rd.
I'll reserve you 1 room at Best Western Plus Las Vegas West in Las Vegas with check in on March 3rd and check out on March 4th. Does everything sound good to you?
Yeah, please book it.
I've made you the room reservation.
What are some attractions I can visit there?
There are 9 attractions you might like. You can go to DISCOVERY Children's Museum, it's a Museum.
Okay, cool. That's all for now, take car.
Have fun there!
I need a ticket on an airplane.
Give me the details and I'll see what I can do.
I'm heading to Chicago on Monday next week. That'll be from Paris, France.
Are you coming back.
Yes on the 14th.
I got 2 flights for you. There's a 4:05 am American Airlines flight that returns starting at 4:30 am. $452.
When does it arrive back. Can I get my money back too?
7:58 am. But no refunds.
Ok. Get me an economy seat.
1 economy seat on an American Airlines flight to Paris on March 4th at 4:05 am. Returns back to Chicago on March 14th beginning at 4:30 am. Is that what you want?
That is what I want.
And that's what you got. Ticket confirmed.
Great. When does it land in Chicago? Any stops?
1 stop. Arrives at 8:22 pm.
Nice. How about a hotel?
I see 10. There's AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown. It scored a 4.3.
Can I bring my rabbit? Whats their number?
+1 312-981-6600. Pets are good there.
Nice. Get me a room.
On MArch 4th?
No, March 6th.
Until March 14th.
No, the 13th.
Ok. 1 room at AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago from MArch 6th to March 13th. Correct?
Yes. Where they at, exactly? And what will this run me?
You have a room at 630 North Rush Street. $3,108 is the price tag.
Excellent. Anything to see there?
Yes, go see 360 Chicago. Great tourist attraction.
Sounds good. I got to run now.
Take care then.
Can you get me a round trip plane ticket?
Sure what is you itinerary?
I'm going from Seattle to Atlanta, GA.
Do you have your travel dates?
I'm leaving March 5th and returning March 13th. I need American Airlines, economy please.
I have 1 flight. It's American Airlines and it leaves at 9:45 pm and the flight back leaves at 9:35 pm. It Costs $190.
Which airport do I land in?
You'll go to Hartsfield-jackson International Airport.
That's great. Get my tickets.
Sure: 1 economy seat for American Airlines flight departing at 9:45 pm on March 5th from Seattle and going to Atlanta. You'll return, boarding the 9:35 pm flight on March 13th?
Yes, do it.
You are set.
Great. Get me a hotel.
There are at least 10 options. What about 4.5 star Ac Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At PHipps Plaza
Nope try again.
We have a 4.3 star hotel. Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Downtown.
Ugh, hate that.
I can get you in at the 4.0 rated Aloft Atlanta Downtown.
What is its address and does it allow pets?
Does Ted Turner love Buffalo, sure. It's on 300 Ted Turner Drive Northwest.
Perfect, love that one.
How about a reservation?
Surely, do that.
Do you want to check out on March 13th?
No, on the 12th of this month.
How about a check in on March 5th?
no, two rooms on March 11th though.
Here's what I have: 2 rooms at Aloft Atlanta Downtown in Atlanta on March 11th, checking out the next morning on March 12th.
You got it.
You're set up.
Thanks, give me a historical spot. I'm looking for stuff to see.
There are 3. What about King Jr Martin Luther- Birth home? It's a historical landmark.
It it a freebie?
Yes, no charge.
Great, thanks a lot.
Safe travels to you.
Hi, could you help me search for some round trip flights?
Where are you departing from?
I will be travelling from Philly?
Where do you plan to visit and what is your intended period of travel?
I will be travelling to Atlanta GA from today till the 12th.
Would you like an American Airlines flight which departs at 10:10 am and returns at 3:25 pm which will cost you $216?
Sure, this is fine with me.
Would you like me to purchase tickets for the flight?
Yes, could you book the ticket for 1 person please?
Sure, please confirm your economy class ticket reservation for 1 on the American airlines flight from Philadelphia to Atlanta, which departs on March 1st at 10:10 am and returns on March 12th at 3:25 pm.
That sounds great to me! May I know when does my return flight arrive and is the ticket refundable?
Your reservation has been made. Your return flight arrives at 7:46 pm and unfortunately, this is a non-refundable flight ticket.
I see, could you help me search for a hotel there too?
Would you like to stay at Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza with a 4.5 rating?
Do you have any alternatives, preferably one which allows pets.
How about the Aloft Atlanta Downtown with a 4.0 rating?
That is fine with me.
Would you like me to make a hotel reservation for you?
Yes please, could you help me do so please?
Would you like me to check you in on March 1st?
No thanks, could you check me on March 10th instead?
And will you be checking out on March 12th?
Yes, that is fine with me.
Please confirm your reservation for 1 room at Aloft Atlanta Downtown in Atlanta from March 10th to March 12th.
Yes, I am fine with that. Can I have their contact number please?
Sure, you can contact them at +1 678-515-0300 and your reservation has been made!
Also, are there attractions which I can visit there?
There is a park called Atlanta Botanical Garden.
I see, that is great!
Do you need further assistance?
No, you have been very helpful, thanks!
Sure, enjoy your trip!
Can you find me a round trip flight from Seattle?
When will you leave and return?
I want to leave on Friday next week and return on the 12th.
Where will you be going?
I want to travel to Toronto, Canada via Delta Airlines.
I found a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 8:45 am. The return flight will leave at 7:15 am. The total cost is $312.
Which airports does it travel between?
The flight will depart from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and arrive at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
Okay, that one sounds good to me.
Should I get you a ticket?
Yes, please book it.
Please confirm: you want 1 economy ticket from Seattle to Toronto via Delta Airlines. The flight will depart on March 8th at 8:45 am, and the return flight will depart on March 12th at 7:15 am.
Yes, that sounds correct.
I've confirmed the ticket.
Thanks for the assistance. Can you find me a nearby hotel in Toronto?
How about the 3.9 rated Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites?
What's their street address?
It's located at 50 Norfinch Drive.
Are they pet friendly?
Unfortunately, they are not.
Can you find something else then? I need 3 rooms.
How about the 4.0 rated Best Western Premier Toronto Airport Carlingview Hotel?
That sounds perfect. Can you reserve it from March 11th through the 12th?
Please confirm: reserve 3 rooms at the Best Western Premier Toronto Airport Carlingview Hotel in Toronto from March 11th through March 12th.
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservation is successful.
Thanks! Can you find me some attractions there? I'd like a good wildlife spot.
I found a nice nature preserve for you. It's Ripley's Aquarium of Canada.
Okay, that sounds great.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that'll be all. Thanks!
Enjoy your trip!
Find round trip flights the 3rd of this month.
Where to and from? Dates?
14th of March from San Fran to Chi-town.
American Airlines flies at 3:20 pm returning 7:05 am for $193.
Arriving?
10:07 pm.
Something else, for 2.
Delta Airlines leaves 10:05 pm and returns 10:40 am for $214.
What else?
Southwest Airlines leaves 5:50 pm and returns 11:35 am for $180.
Food.
Do you want seats?
Yeah.
Please confirm: San Francisco to Chicago on Southwest Airlines from March 3rd to March 14th, leave 5:50 pm return 11:35 am, for 2 in economy.
Yep.
You're set.
Thanks, look at pet friendly hotels.
Ac Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown is rated 4.3.
Address and number?
630 North Rush Street at +1 312-981-6600.
Good. Book 1 room the 11th of March to the 12th.
Please confirm: 1 room at Ac Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago March 11th to March 12th.
Good. Price?
You're set. It's $232.
Local attractions?
360 Chicago is a tourist attraction.
Kid friendly?
Yes.
Number and price?
It's free and at 888-875-8439.
Good, ok bye.
Bye!
I need a round trip flight from Phoenix with Southwest Airlines.
What is your destination? What are your departure and return dates?
I want to leave for SF on the 4th of March and get back on the 6th of this month.
I found 1 flight for you. There is a Southwest Airlines flight for $136 that leaves at 6 am. The return flight leaves at 11:10 pm.
That sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets for it?
Yes, I would.
So, to confirm: You want 1 Economy ticket for the Southwest Airlines flight from Phoenix to San Francisco leaving March 4th at 6 am. The Return flight leaves on March 6th at 11:10 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. When does the return flight arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. The ETA is 1:17 am.
What airport does it leave from, and how many stops does it make?
The flight departs from Sky Harbor International Airport and makes 0 stops.
Thanks. Can you find me a hotel there?
I found 10 hotels. How about Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco? It has a 3.5 rating.
Are pets allowed? What's the address?
No, pets are not allowed. It is located at 749 Taylor Street.
Any other hotels?
The Argonaut Hotel has a 4.4 rating.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, I need two rooms from the 4th of March to the 5th of March.
So you want to reserve 2 rooms at the Argonaut Hotel in San Francisco from March 4th to March 5th. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your rooms have been reserved.
Is there anything cool to see there?
I found 10 attractions you might like. Alcatraz is a popular historical landmark.
Okay, cool.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me search for a round trip flight?
Where do you plan on going?
I'm traveling to LA.
When and where will you be leaving from and when do you plan to come back?
I'm planning on leaving from Portland, OR on the 2nd of this month and I'd like to return on the 14th of this month.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 10:10 am with a return flight at 5:40 pm. The ticket price is $162.
Are there any other matching flights?
There is also an American Airlines flight departing at 7:20 am with a return flight at 11:15 pm. The ticket price is $183.
I like how that one sounds.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can you help me purchase tickets for that flight?
Sure, please confirm the following. 1 economy ticket for American Airlines from Portland to Los Angeles departing March 2nd at 7:20 am with a return flight March 14th at 11:15 pm.
Yes thats correct.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks, I'd also like to find a hotel there.
There are 10 hotels. What do you think about Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills it has a 4.4 rating.
That sounds perfect.
Would you like to make a reservation at this hotel?
Yes, I'd like to check in on March 10th and check out on March 12th.
Okay, You'd like to reserve 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles from March 10th to March 12th. Is this correct?
Yes that works for me. Does that hotel allow pets by the way?
Your room has been reserved. Sorry but that hotel doesn't allow pets.
Ok can you show me some attractions nearby I'd like to find a child-friendly museum.
There is a Museum you should check out called the Autry Museum of the American West.
Can you provide me their phone number?
Sure, their phone number is 323-667-2000.
Awesome thanks thats all I need.
You're welcome.
I'd like to find some round trip flights from Toronto, Canada. I need 3 tickets and prefer to fly on American Airlines.
What is your destination, when will you be departing, and when will you return?
I need to leave for Chicago later today. I want to return on March 9th.
I have a flight on American Airlines that departs at 5:55 am. The return flight departs at 4:20 pm. The ticket costs $103.
Sounds good. Can you get me tickets on any class?
Can you confirm the following: I am booking 3 Economy class tickets to Chicago on American Airlines. The flight departs from Toronto on March 1st at 5:55 am. The return flight departs on March 9th at 4:20 pm. Is this correct?
Yep.
Your reservation is successful.
What is the departure airport? What time does my return flight arrive?
Your flight departs from Toronto Pearson International Airport and your return flight arrives at 6:58 pm.
Thanks. I also need to find a hotel nearby. Only need one room.
I have found 10 hotels. The Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown has a rating of 4.3.
Perfect. I want a reservation.
Confirming that your check in and check out dates are March 1st and March 9th?
No. I want to check in on the 4th of this month and check out on the 6th.
Confirming that you need 1 room at the Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown in Chicago from March 4th until March 6th?
Yes, that works.
Your reservation is successful.
Is the hotel pet friendly?
Yes, the hotel welcomes pets.
How much does it cost?
The total will be $312.
Thank you. Can you find me some free attractions?
You might want to check out 360 CHICAGO, a local Tourist Attraction.
Great.
Is there anything else?
No, you were helpful. Thanks.
You're welcome. Enjoy!
find me round trip flight
where are you leaving from?
Leaving from Paris
when are you leaving?
on March 2nd
where are you leaving for?
going to Portland, OR
whats the return date?
Return on March 9th
There is a Delta Airlines leaving at 11:20 am and the returns ta 8 pm and costs $408
Is a 0 stop flight?
no, it has 1 stop
ok, book me 3 economy tickets
Please confirm: Booking 3 economy tickets for a Delta Airlines leaving at 11:20 am on march 2nd from Paris to portland and the return is at 8 pm on march 9th
yes, thats right
Your booking is done
what is the departing airport?
Its Charles De Gaulle International Airport
what is the departing airport? is it refundable ticket?
The arrival is at PDX International Airport. The tickets are not refundable
ok, get me a hotel there
How about Aloft Portland airport at Cascade station, its 4.3 rated
ok, please book it with check out on the 6th
the check in is on March 2nd?
yes, thats right
Please confirm: Booking 1 room at the Aloft Portland airport at Cascade station in portland for a check in on march 2nd and march 6th check out
correct. what the address?
its 9920 Northeast Cascades parkway
thanks. Find me interesting thing to do there
There is a park, the Crystal Springs Rhododendron garden
ok, good
any thing else?
no, thats it
have a good day!
I need to find round trip flights.
What are your departure and return dates?
Leaving on March 8th and returning the 13th of this month.
What is your destination?
Going to Las Vegas.
What is your departure location?
Leaving from SFO.
There is a flight on American Airlines leaving at 5:30 pm and returning at 5:30 am for a total cost of $114 per ticket.
What is the departure airport and the arrival of that flight?
The departure flight arrives at 7:05 pm from SFO International Airport.
Are there other options?
There is a flight on Delta Airlines leaving at 10:50 am and returning at 10:50 pm for a total of $120.
That flight sounds good.
Should I book tickets?
Yes. Please book.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy ticket on the flight on Delta Airlines leaving from San Francisco on March 8th at 10:50 am and returning from Las Vegas on March 13th at 10:50 pm.
Yes. That's right.
Your flight has been confirmed.
Is it a refundable flight and what is the arrival airport?
It is a non refundable flight going to McCarran International Airport.
Thanks. I also need a rental.
Is your pick date March 13th and what time are you picking up?
Picking up at 6 in the evening until the 12th.
Will you be picking up the car on March 8th?
Actually, I need the car from the 11th of March.
There are 2 options. There is a standard Civic available at Union Plaza on March 11th.
Sounds good. Please reserve.
Please confirm you want me to book a standard car from Union Plaza to be picked up on March 11th at 6 pm and dropped off on March 12th.
Yes. That's right.
Your car has been booked.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else?
No. Thanks. That's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Hi, I need a help, I am planning for a trip, Could you find me round trip flights for me?
Okay, i will help you, please me, when do you plan to leave?
i am going on 4th of this month.
okay, where are you going and when are you coming back?
i am going to atlanta, GA and i need to get back on March 6th
okay, from where are you leaving?
I am leaving from Seattle, WA and four people in my group, i like traveling in Economy.
Okay, I have found a flight for you, The flight is American Airlines, The flight leaves at 9:45 pm and return flight leaves at 9:35 pm, the ticket price is $215
It seems good for me, I need to book the tickets?
please confirm the following details: The flight is American Airlines from Seattle and the flight goes to Atlanta.The departure date is March 4th and return date is march 6th. The onward flight leaves at 9:45 pm and the return flight leaves at 9:35 pm, The seating class is Economy and number of passengers is 4.
Yes, you are right.
Congrats, your ticket booking has been made.
Thanks, i need a rental car there, i want a intermediate car from the 5th.I will be picked up the car around 1 in the afternoon.
okay, Do you need to use the car until March 6th.
Yes, you are right.
I have found 4 cars for you, One of the best car is available at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, for pickup on March 5th, It is a Camry Standard car.
Okay, What is the total cost of the car?
total cost for reservation is $33.
okay, could find another car?
I have found another nice car available at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport for pickup on March 5th, It is a Cruze Standard car.
It seems good for me. i want to reserve the car.
please confirm the following details: The car you will be picked up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 5th at 1 pm, the drop off date is march 6th and it is a cruze standard car.
Yes, that's right.
Congrats, Reservation for the car is succesfull
Thank you very much for your great help
you are welcomee, Shall i help you with anything more?
No, Thanks, bye
Have a great day, bye
I need help finding round trip flights.
Where will you be traveling from and to, and what date will you return?
I'll be going from Los Angeles to Paris and I want to return on March 11th.
And what date will you be leaving?
I want to leave later today.
There's a Delta Airlines flight with an outbound flight that leaves at 8:25 am and a return flight that leaves at 5:35 pm. $363 is the ticket price.
Okay,t hat works.
Would you like to book tickets?
Yes, please buy the tickets. I'll need 4 tickets in Economy.
I'll get you 4 Economy ticket for Los Angeles to Paris on Delta Airlines. Departure is on March 1st at 8:25 am. Return is on March 11th at 5:35 pm. Is everything correct?
Everything is correct, please book the tickets.
I have booked the tickets.
I'll need to rent a car while I'm there. I want to rent it until the 9th.
Will you be renting it on March 1st? And what time will you need it?
I want to rent it on the 6th of this month and I'll need it at three pm.
There are 4 cars that match you. There's a nice Standard Accord available for pick up at Charles de Gaulle International Airport on March 6th.
Okay, that works.
Do you need me to do anything else.
I'd like you to reserve this car.
I'll reserve the Standard car at Charles De Gaulle International Airport for pick up on March 6th at 3 pm and return on March 9th. Is everything correct?
Yeah, that's correct. How much is that in total?
I've reserved the car. The total is $114.
Okay, thanks so much.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing else, thanks a lot for the help.
Have a terrific day!
I am looking for a round trip flight returning on the 9th of March.
When do you want to leave? Where are you flying from and where are you going?
There are two of us. We want to fly out of Vegas to San Fran on the 3rd.
There are 4 flights including an American Airlines flight that costs $108 per person. The outbound flight leaves at 6:40 am and the return flight leaves at 5:30 pm.
That flight sounds good.
Do you want to purchase the tickets?
I do want to buy the tickets.
Please confirm you want to reserve 2 economy tickets on the round trip American Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco. The outbound flight leaves at 6:40 am on March 3rd and the return flight leaves at 5:30 pm on March 9th.
That is perfect. What airport does it fly out of?
The reservation has been successfully purchased. The flight leaves McCarran International Airport.
Thank you. Is there a rental car available there?
What time do you want the car?
I want to pick up the car at 5 o"clock in the evening.
Do you want to rent the car from March 3rd to March 9th?
I need the car on March 8th.
I have 6 cars available at SFO International Airport on March 8th including a standard Altima.
How much does it cost?
The car rental costs $30.
That is perfect, please confirm the reservation.
Please confirm you are picking up the standard car on March 8th at 5 pm from SFO International Airport and returning it on March 9th.
That is perfect.
The reservation is successful.
That will be all.
See you soon!
I would need a round trip flight to ATL. I want an economy ticket and will be returning on march 8th.
Where would you be leaving from and when would you be leaving?
I will be leaving from chi-town wednesday next week.
There is an american airlines flight that leaves at 5:20 pm. It returns at 9:15 pm and the tickets cost $135.
When does the flight return. I might change my mind about going so I need to know if the ticket is refundable.
The flight returns at 10:16 pm. I am sorry, but the ticket is non-refundable.
Would I be able to get an earlier flight?
There is an delta airlines flight that leaves at 8:30 am. It returns at 3:40 pm and the tickets cost $188.
That is what I am looking for.
Is there anything else you need?
I need 1 ticket.
You would like 1 economy ticket on a delta airlines flight from chicago to atlanta that leaves at March 6th at 8:30 am and returning on March 8th at 3:40 pm.
That would be fine. How many stops are there?
I have confirmed your ticket. There would be 1 stop.
Thanks a lot. I would need a rental car.
Would you like it till March 8th? And for what time?
That date would be fine. I want the car for 1:30 in the afternoon.
You would like the car from March 6th?
From the 7th.
There is a lovely standard camry car that is available for pick up at hartsfield-jackson international airport on March 7th.
How much would that be in all?
That would be $27 in all.
I want to get that car.
You would like to pick up a standard car at hartsfield-jackson international airport on march 7th at 1:30 pm and drop it off on March 8th?
That would be fine.
The car has been reserved.
Thanks. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
Please find a round trip flights for me.
Where are you coming from and where do you plan to go? When are you leaving?
I am planning to go to San Fran from Phoenix on March 5th.
When do you plan to come back?
On the 11th.
How about flying with AMerican Airlines for only $191 with outbound flight leaves at 7:35 am and return flight leaves at 8:10 am.
That's good.Please help me buy tickets.
Okay, you want 1 Economy seat at American Airlines going to San Francisco from Phoenix on March 5th until March 11th with an onward flight leaves at 7:35 am and return flight leaves at 8:10 am. Please confirm.
That's perfect.
Ticket confirmed!
Thank you. Please help me find a n intermediate rental car there on next Thursday until 10th of this month.
What time you will need it?
I need at around afternoon 3:30 until 9th of this month.
I got a Standard car available at SFO International Airport on March 7th and it's a Altima.
How much will that cost me?
$62 in total.
Any other option? I need it from 6th of March.
I got 5 cars and one is a standard car available at Salesforce Transit Center on March 6th and it's a Civic.
How much will that cost me?
$84 in total.
That's great.
Will I reserve you the car now?
Yes please.
Okay, you want a standard car and you will pick it up at Salesforce Transit Center on March 6th at 3:30 pm until March 9th. Please confirm.
Yes, that's good.
Car reserved!
Thank you for your help.
You are welcome.
Could you look up round trip flights for my sake?
What time do you intend to depart?
I am departing on the 3rd. There are 3 people in my cohort.
What location do you intend to go to? What place will you depart from? When will you return?
I am going to Vancouver, BC. I'd like to return on March 10th. I am departing from New York City.
I discovered 1 suitable flight for your travel. There is a ticket costing $301 for an outbound Delta Airlines flight that departs at 6 am and has a return flight departing at 2:50 am.
That flight sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to purchase tickets for it?
Yeah, I'd like to reserve the ticket.
Please verify the following information: 3 economy seats for a Delta Airlines flight departing from New York to Vancouver. The flight will depart on March 3rd at 6 am and has a return date of March 10th from a flight leaving at 2:50 am.
Than sounds wonderful. Does the flight have zero stops? When does the return flight come?
Your ticket is verified. The return flight comes at 6:34 pm, and there is 1 stop.
Thank you for your assistance. Could you also assist me in finding a rental vehicle there?
Would you like to have the vehicle from March 3rd?
I require the vehicle from next Wednesday.
Do you wish to use your vehicle until March 10th? When will you require it?
Yeah, that sounds wonderful. I'd like to pick up the vehicle around 3:30 pm.
I possess 7 vehicles you may enjoy. There is a lovely standard Accord vehicle available at YVR International Airport for pickup on MArch 6th.
Do you have any alternatives available?
There is a lovely standard Altima vehicle available at YVR International Airport for pickup on MArch 6th.
That sounds wonderful. I'd like to book this vehicle.
Please verify the following information you are picking up a standard vehicle from YVR International Airport on March 6th at 3:30 pm. The drop-off date is MArch 10th
Yeah, that's perfect.
Your vehicle has been booked.
Thank you so much for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
No, thank you so much for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Can you help me find return flights for my trip?
Absolutely. When and where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving Philadelphia Monday next week and I'm going to Washington. There's 3 of us so can you look for 3 tickets?
Sure. When are you coming back?
March 9th
Okay, I've found an American Airlines flight for $148. It leaves at 9:45 am and returns at 5:10 pm. How does that sound?
Which airport does it leave from?
It leaves from PHL International Airport
Cool. when does the return flight arrive, and do you know if the ticket is refundable?
Unfortunately it's a non refundable ticket. I've checked the return flight and it arrives at 7:46 pm.
Okay, cool, can you book the tickets for me?
Absolutely. Can you just confirm that you want me to book 3 economy tickets for the American Airlines flight from Philadelphia to Washington? You'll be leaving on March 4th at 9:45 am and returning on March 9th at 5:10 pm.
Yes please, sounds great
Excellent - tickets booked for you!
How many stops are there? Hopefully zero... and what airport does the plane get in to?
Unfortunately there's 1 stop and it arrives at Dulles International Airport.
Okay thanks. Can you look for a hire car there also? A compact car would be ideal... I need to pick it up around twelve pm next Wednesday.
Sure, do you need it until March 9th?
Only until the 8th of this month
Okay, I've found 4 for you. There's a compact Bolt you can pick up on March 6th at Dulles International Airport. How does that sound?
Hmmm, how much does it cost?
It'll be $56 in total.
Can you see if there's anything else?
Sure, there's a compact Fit you can pick up from Dulles International Airport on March 6th. Is that any better?
How much does that one cost?
That'll be $58
Cool, that one sounds better
Do you want me to book it for you?
Yes please
Okay. Can you confirm you want me to book the compact car to pick up from Dulles International Airport? You'll pick it up at 12 pm on March 6th and drop it back on March 8th.
Yes, perfect
No problem - I've booked the car for you.
Thank you so much!
No problem! Anything else I can do for you?
No thanks, that's all
Okay, have a lovely day.
I'd like some help finding round trip flights.
When will you be leving and when are you planning to come back?
I'll be leaving on March 4th and plan to be back on the 9th. Check if there is anything available in Economy class on United Airlines.
Where are you going to and from where will you be departing?
I'm flying from Los Angeles to Atlanta, GA.
There is 1 flight that you might find convenient. It is a United Airlines flight that departs at 8:40 pm, with the return flight scheduled to leave at 12:15 pm. The ticket costs $260.
That flight seems to be a good option. Thank you.
Shall I get you tickets on the flight?
Yes, please go ahead.
Please confirm that you want 1 Economy class ticket from Los Angeles to Atlanta on the United Airlines flight that departs at 8:40 pm on March 4th and returns at 12:15 pm on March 9th.
That sounds like a perfect plan. Which airport does the flight depart from and at what time does the onward flight arrive at Atlanta?
The flight departs from LAX International Airport and reaches Atlanta by 4:39 am. You ticket is confirmed.
Can you help me find a rental car there?
Are you planning to use it till March 9th?
I need it till next Friday.
At what time will you be picking it up?
I'll pick up the car at half past 4 in the evening.
Do you need the car from March 4th?
No. I'll only need it from the 7th of March.
There are 4 cars based on your requirements. There is a nice Standard Camry available for pick up at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 7th.
How much does it cost in all?
It will cost $27 for your reservation.
That sounds like a deal. Please reserve the car for me.
Please confirm that you want to reserve a Standard car for pickup from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport at 4:30 pm on March 7th with return date as March 8th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your car has been reserved successfully.
Thank you for the assistance. That'll be all for now.
Have a great day!
Can you find me a round trip flight for the 10th of this month?
Where are you leaving from and when are you planning to return?
Chicago, I will return on the 12th.
Where are you going?
New York, make it the 3rd of March, I'd like to fly Delta Airlines.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines for $135. It leaves at 9:15 am and the return flight leaves at 6 am.
That sounds good.
Shall I book tickets?
Yes please. I just need 1 economy ticket.
To confirm: You would like 1 economy ticket on Delta Airlines from Chicago to New York leaving at 9:15 am March 3rd with the return flight leaving at 6 am on March 12th.
That is correct.
I've received confirmation on your ticket.
I'd also like a rental car.
Will you want to return it March 12th?
No I only need it til the 9th of this month.
What time do you want to pick it up?
About evening 4:30.
Do you want to pick it up March 3rd?
I want it Tuesday next week.
There's a standard Accord at Grand Central Station you can pick up March 5th.
How much is it?
It will total $116.
Sounds good, go ahead and reserve it.
To confirm: You would like to pick up the standard car from Grand Central Station at 4:30 pm March 5th and return it March 9th.
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day!
I'm looking for some round trip flights.
Where do you want to go?
I'd like to fly to London on American Airlines, and I need to get back on the 8th.
Where are you departing from, and when would you like to leave?
I am leaving from Atlanta, GA, and want to leave the day after tomorrow.
I found 1 flight that might work for you. How about an American Airlines flight that departs at 3:30 pm with a return flight that departs at 8:35 pm? The ticket costs $386.
Yeah that works. Can you help me buy those? I need 4 tickets in any class. I also need them to be refundable in case my plans change.
Okay, so you would like to buy 4 economy tickets on the American Airlines flight from Atlanta to London, departing at 3:30 pm on March 3rd, with a return flight leaving at 8:35 pm on March 8th. Is that correct?
Yeah that all sounds good. Does the flight have any stops? Where does it arrive at?
Your reservation was successful. It has 1 stop and you will arrive at Heathrow International Airport.
I also need to rent a car there. I want something full-size.
Would you like the car from March 3rd until March 8th?
I'll need it from the 6th of March.
When do you want to pick it up?
I'd like to get it around 8 pm.
I found a full-size Ford Escape available for pickup at Gatwick International Airport on March 6th.
What would that cost?
It would be $96 total.
Okay, I'd like to reserve that car.
Alright, so you would like to rent the full-size car from Gatwick International Airport, picking it up March 6th at 8 pm, and returning it on March 8th. Is that correct?
Yeah that's all good.
Your reservation was successful.
That's all I needed, thanks for the help.
Sure! Have a nice day.
I need to find some roundtrip flights.
When would you like to go and when would you like to come back? And what is your destination?
I'm planning to leave on the 5th to go to Paris and come back on the 8th of March. It will be for 2 people.
Leaving from where?
From Chicago please.
American Airlines as a flight leaving at 5:10 AM and returning at 4:05 AM for $333.
What do you have for a March 6th departure?
Delta Airlines has 1 flight leaving at 6:40 PM and returning at 11:20 PM, which costs $260.
Great, I'd like to buy tickets.
Confirming a Delta Airlines flight from Chicago to Paris on March 6th at 6:40 PM which returns March 8th at 11:20 PM for 2 economy seats.
Sounds perfect. Thank you.
The reservation is complete.
Thank you very much.
Do you need anything else today?
A rental car please.
Will you need that until March 8th?
Yes, and I'd like a medium-sized car please.
Is that for a March 6th pickup? And at what time would you like to pick it up?
I'd like the car next Thursday at 13:30 or so.
I have a nice standard Accord which can be picked up from Charles De Gaulle International Airport on March 7th.
What's the price?
It's $29 total.
Okay, that works.
Would you like to reserve the car?
Yes I would.
Confirming rental of a standard vehicle from Charles De Gaulle International Airport on March 7th at 1:30 PM for a March 8th drop-off.
Perfect, thank you.
The reservation is complete.
Thank you very much.
Will there be anything else today?
No, I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
Hello! I'm looking for 4 tickets in a round-trip flight. please can you help me to reserve the ticket?
Yup. Where are you heading to? When is your return?
We are travelling to New York and will return by 14th of this month.
When are you planning to leave?
I would be leaving by 9th of this month.
From where are you planning to leave?
I'm planning to leave from Atlanta, GA. I would like to travel in Economy class.
Okay! There is an American Airlines and the outbound flight will take off at 6:25 am and the return flight will take off at 11:20 am. The cost of the travel will be $138.
Which is the departure airport?
Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport is the departing airport.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want me to assist with anything else?
Yup! Please can you help me to find a refundable ticket, for there might be change in my plan.
Sure. Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 4 economy tickets in American Airlines that flies from Atlanta to New York on March 9th at 6:25 am and the return flight will leave at 11:20 am on March 14th, right?
Yup, sounds good to me.
Okay! your ticket confirmation is successful.
How many stops does the flight have? 0 or 1 or 2 stops?
It has 0 stops.
Which is the arrival airport and when the return flight would arrive?
JFK International Airport is the destination airport and the return flight will arrive at 1:42 pm.
thanks much for your help. Please can you help me to find a rental car?
Sure! do you wish to rent a car till March 14th? At what time will you be able to pick up the car?
I'll be able to pick up the car at around afternoon 12.
Okay! Do you wish to have the car from March 9th or from any other dates?
Nope, I will need the car only from the 12th.
Okay, I can find 7 cars for you. The Accord, a Standard car is available for pick up at Grand Central Station on March 12th. Do you wish to rent this car?
Sounds good to me.
so, do you want me to book this car for you?
Yup, please book this car.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book the Standard Car and wish to pick it up from Grand Central Station on March 12th at 12 pm and will drop the car at March 14th, right?
Yup, sounds good.
Okay! your car rental reservation is successful.
How much is the total rental cost?
It would come around $58 in total.
Thanks much for the help. I'm done with.
Have a wonderful day.
I would like to find a round trip flight.
Where are you traveling and when are you leaving?
I'm traveling to Seattle on the 8th of March.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from NY.
When are you returning?
I will be returning on the 12th.
There are 4 flights. There is American Airlines that leaves at 6:05 am and the return is at 4 pm for $294.
When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 2:14 am.
That flight is perfect.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yes, book a ticket for that flight.
1 economy ticket from New York to Seattle with American Airlines on March 8th leaving at 6:05 am and returning on March 12th at 4 pm.
Yes, that is good. How many stops does the fight have and is the ticket refundable?
Your ticket is confirmed. The ticket is not refundable is there is 1 stop.
Can you find me a car rental till the 11th?
At what time do you need the car?
I will need to pick up the car around 12 pm.
Do you need the car until March 12th?
Yes, that is correct.
There is a Civic Standard available at King Street Station on March 11th.
Yes, that is good.
Would you like to rent the car?
Yes, I would like to rent the car.
Renting a Civic Standard available at King Street Station on March 11th 12 pm and return March 12th.
Yes, what is the cost?
Your car is rented and the cost is $26.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I need to go visit my family on short notice. Can you find a round trip flight for me that leaves on the 3rd and returns Thursday next week?
Sure, where are you going?
I'm going from New York to Atlanta, GA.
Ok, I found 4 flights that look pretty good. There's an American Airlines flight for $134 that departs at 11:20 am on the way there, and 6:25 am on the way back. How about that one?
That sounds good. Can you buy me a ticket?
Sure. To confirm, you want 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines from New York to Atlanta that departs at 11:20 am on March 3rd and returns at 6:25 am on March 7th. Is that right?
No, can you upgrade that to Premium Economy?
No problem. To confirm, you want to book one ticket in Premium Economy to Atlanta, is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Ok, I've booked your ticket.
Great, which airport does it fly out from?
It departs from JFK International Airport.
Ok, and when does it arrive at the destination? Also, is it refundable?
Your ticket is refundable, and it arrives at 1:42 pm.
Cool, thanks. Can you also book me a rental car there? I need it starting Monday next week, and prefer an intermediate car.
What time do you need it?
I want to pick it up around 1:30 in the afternoon.
Ok, and will you be using it until March 7th?
No, only until the 6th of March.
Ok, I found 4 possible options. There's a standard Camry available for pickup at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 4th. How about that?
That sounds good. Can you make a reservation?
Sure. To confirm, you want to book a standard car from March 4th to March 6th to be picked up from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport at 1:30 pm. Is that right?
Yeah, that's right. What's the total cost?
I've made your reservation. It'll be $60 total.
Great, thanks for your help. That's all for now.
Ok, have a good day!
I am planning a last minute trip and need to find a round trip flight.
Sure, I can help you with that. What days are going?
I need to leave the day after tomorrow and I'll be returning Thursday next week.
Alright, what city will you be traveling to?
I'm heading to Los Angeles! I am so excited.
What city will you flying out of?
I will be flying from Phoenix.
I do see one American Airlines flight leaving at 7:35 am for $99. The return flight takes off at 7:50 am.
That might work, what airport does the flight leave from. Also, do you happen to know what time the onward flight will arrive?
I have that information. The onward flight arrives at 9:03 am and departs from Sky Harbor International Airport.
Well, I think that flight will be perfect. I can't imagine finding another flight that will work so good with my plans. Let's go ahead and book it.
Alright, will you please confirm that you would like to book 1 economy ticket on the American Airlines flight from Phoenix to Los Angeles leaving March 3rd at 7:35 am and returning March 7th at 7:50 am?
That's right, book it!
Alright, the ticket is confirmed.
Thanks so much! Can you also help me with a rental car?
Yes, will you need the car for your entire trip, March 3rd thru March 7th?
Yeah, I will need the car from next Wednesday.
What time will you be picking up the car.
I will be there to get the car at 10:30 am. Could you see if they have a small car?
Sure, there are 2 compact cars available at Union Station on March 6th. Oh wow, they have a Fit. Would you be interested in that?
Sure, what will the total cost be?
The reservations cost $26.
That sounds good. Can I reserve the car now?
Yes, please confirm that you would like to rent one compact car on March 6th at 10:30 am. You will pick the car up from Union Station and drop it off on March 7th.
Yes, that sounds perfect.
OK, the reservation for the car has been made.
Thanks so much!
Do you need any help with anything else.
No, thanks for all the help.
No problem, enjoy the day!
Would you find round trip flights for me? I will leave tomorrow and get back on the 14th from Phoenix.
Where will you visit?
I prefer United Airlines and will travel to Portland, OR. There are three people in my party.
I have 1 good flight for you. There's a United Airlines flight. This outbound flight leaves at 11:10 am and the return flight leaves at 9:30 am. This costs $179.
What airport does the flight leave from? Does the flight have 1 stop?
The flight leaves from Sky Harbor International Airport and there is 1 stop.
That flight sounds great.
Shall I buy tickets for it?
Yes, please book me the ticket.
Could you confirm that you want to take a economy class on a flight from Phoenix to Portland on United Airlines on March 2nd and return on March 14th? This flight leaves at 11:10 am and the return leaves at 9:30 am. There are 3 people in my party.
Sounds good to me.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for helping. Would you search for a rental car there?
Would you like to leave on March 2nd?
I would like the car from the 11th.
Do you want to drop the car back off on March 14th? What time do you want to pick up the car?
I'd like to pick up the car around 6:30 in the evening and need it till 13th of this month.
I have 6 cars that you may like. There is a good car available at PDX International Airport for you to pick up on March 11th. It's a standard Accord.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to reserve that car?
Yes, rent this vehicle for me.
Could you confirm that you want to pick it up at PDX International Airport on March 11th. Pickup is at 6:30 pm and the drop off is March 13th. It's a standard car.
Sounds good to me.
Your car was reserved.
Thank you for helping.
Could I help with something else?
No, but thank you for helping.
Have a good day.
can you find me a round trip flight
where are you traveling to
i am going to la
where are you leaving from and when are you leaving and coming back
i am leaving from seattle, wa on the 9th and be back on march 11th
i found 5 flights for you. what about alaska airlines depart at 3:45 pm and return at 7:10 pm for $153
what else can you find
what about american airlines depart at 8:15 am and return at 11:45 pm for $145
yes please
should i book a ticket
yes please
please confirm your booking for 1 economy flight from seattle to los angeles on american airlines depart on march 9th at 8:15 am and return on march 11th at 11:45 pm
yes please
your ticket is booked
what airport is this leaving from and what time does it arrive
you will be departing from seattle-tacoma international airport arrive at 11:02 am
thank you. can you also find me a rental car
what time do you need it? are you renting it to march 9th
no i need it from the 10th and pick up around 2 pm
are you using this until march 11th
yes please
there is a standard camry available at lax international airport pick up on march 10th
ok perfect
please confirm your booking for a standard car from lax international airport picking up on march 10th at 2 pm return on march 11th
yes please
your car is booked
thank you
what else can i do for you
no that's it
have a nice day
I need you to find me a round trip flight.
Can you tell me when you will return, and when you plan to leave?
I want to leave Friday next week, and I will return on the 10th.
Can you tell me where you want to go, and from where you will leave from for your trip?
I want to arrive to Washington, and I want to leave from CDMX.
There are 2 flights which match what you want. One is an American Airlines flight leaving at 2:35 am, and when it returns it flies at 10:15 am. The cost for the ticket of this flight is $323.
Can you tell me when the onward flight arrives, and from which airport will it arrive?
The onward flight should arrive at 12:45 pm, and the destination is Dulles International Airport.
Are there some other flight you can suggest? I want to have Economy tickets.
There is 1 flight which you might like. One of the flights is with Delta Airlines, with the outbound flight flying at 3 pm, and when it returns taking off at 10 am. The ticket for this flight costs $313.
This flight seems good. Can you buy me the tickets for this flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy flight ticket for 1 person for the flight of Delta Airlines which leaves from Mexico City on March 8th at 3 pm to arrive in Washington, and when it returns it flies on March 10th at 10 am.
That is good.
Your requested ticked has been booked.
Can you tell me the arrival time of my returning flight?
The return flight is expected to arrive at 8:05 pm.
I appreciate your help. Can you also help me rent a car there?
Can you tell me the time for when you need the rented car?
I will be available to pick up the car at 3 o"clock in the afternoon.
Do you want to rent the car from March 8th, and will need it rented till March 10th?
That is nice. I will need the car from 9th of this month.
There are 4 cars which suits your request. One of the cars is an Accord Standard car, which can be picked up at Union Station on March 9th.
That seems nice. I want to book this car.
Can you please confirm that you want to rent a Standard car which you will pick up from Union Station on March 9th at 3 pm, and will need it till March 10th?
That is what I want.
Your requested car has been booked.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me!
Have a good time!
Please find me a round trip flight.
Sure, where are you departing from, what day will you be back and when do you want to leave?
I'll be leaving seattle the 2nd of this month and want to get back on the 7th of this month
Where are you going?
atlanta.
There are 4 flights. How about a 9:45 pm american airlines flight that returns at 9:35 pm for $198?
Perfect, there are 4 people and we want to fly economy.
Please confirm the flight details: 4 american airlines economy seats departing from seattle to atlanta at 9:45 pm on march 2nd and returning at 9:35 pm on march 7th
Perfect.
This ticket is confirmed
Awesome thanks.
Is there anything you need help with?
Yes, I'll need a intermediate rental car.
What time and will this be until march 7th?
I'd like to have the car by 2 pm and will need it until march 5th
Would you like it for march 2nd?
the 4th of this month
There are 4 cars. How about a standard camry available at hartsfield-jackson international airport on march 4th?
What else is available on the 3rd?
There are 3 cars. How about a standard cruze available at hartsfield-jackson international airport on march 3rd?
Perfect, please reserve this car.
Please confirm: A standard car will be picked up at hartsfield-jackson international airport on march 3rd at 2 pm and dropped off on march 5th
Perfect, how much will this cost?
This reservation is complete. It will cost $60
Thanks for everything, I really appreciate it.
Enjoy your day.
I'm planning on going on a trip soon, can you help me find some round trip flights?
Sure, where do you plan on traveling to?
There are 3 people in my group and we're leaving on the 3rd of March to go to New York.
Which city will you be leaving from?
I'm leaving from out of Chicago.
What day do you plan on coming back?
Can you find any Delta Airlines flights that leave today and return on the 13th of this month?
Sure, I found 1 flight that fits what you're needing. There's a $145 ticket for a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 9:15 am and the return flight leaves at 6 am.
Does the flight have any stops and when does the outbound flight land?
The outbound flight lands at the airport at 12:34 pm and has 0 stops.
That sounds great, can you help me buy Economy class tickets?
Okay, please confirm that you'd like to book an Economy class ticket for 3 people through Delta Airlines for the flight that is from Chicago to New York. The flight leaves on March 1st at 9:15 am and the return flight leaves at 6 am on March 13th.
Yup, that sounds right.
Great, your ticket has been booked, enjoy your flight!
Thanks, can you find me a rental car to use around there?
What time will you need it and do you want to pick it up on March 1st?
No, I need to get it on the 3rd of March at around 18:30.
Do you need it until March 13th?
No, I only need it until March 10th.
Okay, there's a nice Standard Civic car available for pickup on March 3rd at JFK International Airport.
Cool, that sounds great, I'd like to reserve it.
Okay, please confirm that you are picking up a Standard car from JFK International Airport on March 3rd at 6:30 pm and dropping it back off on March 10th.
Yeah, that's right.
Okay, your rental car has been reserved for you!
Great, thanks for your help with this!
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
Nope, that's all I needed, thanks again!
Sure, have a nice day!
Could you help me find a round trip flight?
Sure, where are you planning on visiting?
I'd like to go to Sydney?
When do you plan to leave? Also, where do you want to depart from? Also when do you want to come back?
Well I need to leave on the 5th. I'll be coming back on the 13th of March. I'm leaving out of SFO and I'm not particular about the airline.
Well I did actually find 1 flight that sounds perfect for you. It's leaving at 1:25 pm out of United Airlines and the return flight departs at 5:25 am. The ticket costs $220.
Which airport does that flight arrive at? And which one is it departing from?
You'll leave from SFO International Airport and arrive at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Sounds fine to me.
Should I buy the tickets, then?
Yes, perfect, please book those.
Cool, so you want to fly out of San Francisco on March 5th at 1:25 pm, on an economy flight with United Airlines, and return on March 13th at 5:25 am leaving from Sydney. If that sounds right I'll book 1 ticket for you.
Sounds perfect to me.
Great, then your ticket is confirmed.
Does the flight have 0 stops?
Yes, it has 0 stops.
And can I get a refund if I need one?
Unfortunately no, the ticket isn't refundable.
Thanks for the help, then. Oh, could you help me to find a car rental there, too, please? I'd like to pick it up next Wednesday at 4:30 in the evening.
Do you need that car until March 13th then?
Till next Friday, actually.
Okay, there are 4 options that I think would suit you. There's a standard Corolla available for pickup on March 6th at Kingsford Smith International Airport.
That sounds perfect, can you help me reserve it?
Sure, so to confirm you want to pick up the standard car at Kingsford Smith International airport on March 6th at 4:30 pm and you'll drop it off on March 8th?
Yep, sounds good! What will that cost?
I confirmed the booking. That'll be $70 total.
Thanks for the help!
Have a good day then!
Could you help me in finding a round trip?
Where do you want to leave?
I wan to leave from Atlanta.
When will you back?
I will be back on the 13th.
Where do you want to go and when will you leave?
I will leave on 10th of March to New York. There is 1 person in my group.
An American Airlines flight leaves at 6:25 am and the return place starts at 11:20 am. The cost of the ticket is $129.
What is the arriving time of the return flight?
The return flight will arrive at 1:42 pm.
What is the arriving time of the onward flight?
The onward flight will arrive at 8:47 am.
What about the availability of other flights on the 5th?
I searched and found 3 flights for you. There is a Delta Airlines flight leaves at 9:20 am and the return flight will leave at 11:25 am. The cost of the ticket is $133.
It is good for me. Could you help me in buying flight tickets?
Kindly ensure that, On March 5th, one Economy ticket has been booked for 1 passenger in Delta Airlines flight from Atlanta to New York leaves at 9:20 am and the return flight will leave at 11:25 am. The return date is March 13th.
It is good.
Your ticket has been booked.
What is the name of the airport in which the flight arrive and start from?
The flight starts from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and the reaching destination is JFK International Airport
Thank you so much. Please help me to find a rental car there?
When will you need it? Do you need the car from March 5th to March 13th?
Yes. it is good. The car has to pick up me around 12:30. I want the car from 10th of March.
A nice Standard Accord car is available at Grand Central Station and it has to pickup on March 10th.
Any other options available? I need a small car.
I searched and found 6 cars for you. A nice Compact Bolt car is available at Port Authority Station and it has to pickup on March 10th.
Any other options available? I need a car from 7th of March.
I searched and found 5 cars for you. A nice Compact Cooper car is available at JFK International Airport and it has to pickup on March 7th.
It is good. I need to book this car.
Kindly ensure that, A nice Compact Cooper car is available at JFK International Airport and it has to pickup on March 7th at 12:30 pm. The drop off date is March 13th.
Yes. it is good. What will be the total cost?
Your car has been booked. The cost is $180 in total.
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other help?
No. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
search round trips
when will you leave?
leaving 3rd of march
when will you be back?
I wanna get back 6th of march to san diego
where are you going to?
I am going to san fran and get back march 14th in economy
alaska airlines leaves 5:10 pm and returns 6:10 am and is $111
the flight is good
confirm san diego to san francisco alaska airlines and leaving march 3rd and returns march 14th and onward leaves 5:10 pm and returns 6:10 am with 1 person in economy
yes that works
the ticket is ready
I want car march 11th
wanna use car until march 14th?
I want car around 8 o"clock in the night
4 car sfo international airport pickup standard car altima march 11th
That is godo
confirm sfo international airport march 11th at 8 pm and drop off is march 14th standard car
yes that works
car is $81 dollars
thanks a lot
anything else for you?
no thank you
Have a good one
Hi, could you help me search for some round trip flights please?
When do you intend to return?
I would most likely return next Thursday.
And when do you plan to depart?
I will be leaving on the 5th of March.
Where will you be travelling to?
I will be travelling to SFO for a short getaway, and would prefer an Economy class seat.
Do you know where will you be departing from?
Yes, I will be travelling from Las Vegas.
There are 3 available flights, one of which is an American Airlines flight which departs at 5:30 am and returns at 5:30 pm which will cost you $113.
Sure, that sounds great to me!
Would you like me to purchase tickets for you?
Yes, please do so, thanks!
Please confirm your purchase for 1 economy flight ticket for the American Airlines flight from Las Vegas to San Francisco, departing on March 5th at 5:30 am and returning on March 7th at 5:30 pm.
That sounds great! Does this flight have one layover?
Your reservation has been made, and there are 0 layovers for this flight.
Thank you. Could you help me find a rental car for pickup at 13:30 at Wednesday next week, for use till next Thursday?
Sure, there are 6 cars available, one of which is a Standard Altima available for your pickup from SFO International Airport on March 6th.
I see, how much will this cost me?
This will cost you $29 in total.
Are there any alternatives?
How about a Standard Civic available for your pickup from Salesforce Transit Center on March 6th?
That sounds good to me! Could you make a reservation for me please?
Please confirm your reservation for a standard car from Salesforce Transit Center from March 6th at 1:30 pm to March 7th.
Sure, I am fine with that!
Your reservation has been made!
Thank you for your kind assistance.
Do you require further assistance?
No, that is all. Thank you!
Sure, have a safe trip!
Could you look up round trip flights for my sake? I'm headed to NY.
What time do you intend to depart, and what location will you depart from?
I am departing from San Fran on the 3rd of this month.
What time will you return at?
I'd like to return on the 13th of this month.
I discovered 4 convenient flights for your trip. There is an American Airlines flight costing $223 that departs at 8:30 pm and has a return flight departing at 4:45 pm.
What airport does the flight go to?
The airport is JFK International Airport.
What time does the onward flight come?
The onward flight will come at 5:56 am.
That's perfect for me. Could you assist me in purchasing flight tickets? There's one person in my cohort, and I prefer to travel in economy.
Please verify the following information: an economy seat for 1 on a American Airlines flight departing from San Francisco to New York. The flight will leave on March 3rd at 8:30 pm and the return flight departs at 4:45 pm before arriving on March 13th.
That's perfect for me. Can I get my money back on the ticket, and does it have zero stops?
Your flight is verified. sadly, the ticket cannot be refunded, but there are 0 stops.
Thank you for your assistance. Can you also help me look for a rental vehicle there? I'd like to pick up the vehicle near 12 in the afternoon, and I don't mind the type.
Do you wish to have the vehicle from March 3rd?
I require the vehicle from the 4th.
Do you wish to use your vehicle until March 13th?
I require it until the 5th.
There is a lovely standard Accord vehicle available at Grand Central Station for pickup on MArch 4th.
How much does it cost?
Your booking price is $24.
That's perfect. I'd like to book this vehicle.
Please verify the following information: you are picking up a standard vehicle from Grand Central Station on March 4th at 12 pm, and drop it off on March 5th.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Your vehicle has been booked.
Thank you for your assistance; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Would you look for round trip flights leaving on Friday next week? I like Delta Airlines the best.
Where are you going and where are you leaving from? When will you come back?
I will go to Washington and will return on 12th of March from Vancouver, BC.
I have 1 good flight for you. How about this Delta Airlines flight? The outbound leaves at 2:50 am and the return flight leaves at 10 am. It costs $314.
What airport does the fligh arrive at? When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 7:49 pm at Dulles International Airport.
That flight sounds great. Would you help me find tickets? There are two in my group.
Could you confirm that you want 2 tickets leaving from Vancouver and go to Washington on Delta Airlines? The flight departs at March 8th at 2:50 am and returns on March 12th at 10 am. This flight will be an economy class ticket.
Sounds good to me. When does the outbound flight touch down? How many stops does it have?
Your ticket was confirmed. The outbound flight get s there at 5:48 pm and it has 1 stop.
Thank you for helping. Would you be able to find me a large rental car? I would like to pick up the car around 7:30 pm on the 9th.
Do you want to return the car on March 12th?
Sounds good to me.
I have 2 cars that may be of interest. What about this nice car at Union Station for pick up on March 9th? It's a full-size Forester.
What will the total cost be?
It costs $123 in total.
Sounds good. I would like to reserve the cara.
Could you confirm that you want to pick up a Full-Size car at Union Station on March 9th at 7:30 pm and that you want to drop it off on March 12th?
Sounds good to me.
Your car was reserved.
Thank you for helping.
Would I be able to assist with something else?
No, thank you for helping.
Have a good day.
Would you look for round trip flights for me?
Where will you visit and when are you leaving?
I will leave the 4th of this month and want to go to Vancouver.
What airport will you leave from?
I will leave from NYC.
When will you come back?
I want to return Friday next week.
I have 2 flights for your trip. There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 6 am. The return flight departs at 2:50 am and costs $304.
Sounds perfect.
Shall I buy tickets for it?
Yes, please do. There is one person in the group.
Could you confirm that you want to leave from New York and go to Vancouver on Delta Airlines? This flight leaves on March 4th at 6 am and returns on March 8th. The return flight leaves at 2:50 am. This is an economy flight and you need 1 ticket. Is this all correct?
Sounds good. How many stops does the flight have?
Your ticket was confirmed. It has 1 stop.
When does my return flight get there? Can I get a refund?
The return flight gets there at 6:34 pm. Sorry, but the ticket is not refundable.
Thank you for helping. Would you find me a compact rental car there?
Would you like pick up on March 4th and return the car on March 8th?
I need the car from next Wednesday and until Thursday next week?
What time do you want to pick it up?
I would like to pick it up around 18:00
I have 5 cars that you should like. There is a nice car available at YVR International Airport on March 6th. It's a compact Bolt.
How much is the cost in total?
The reservation is $26 in total.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to reserve this car?
Yes, rent this car.
I'd like to confirm that you want to pick up the compact car from YVR International Airport on March 6th at 6 pm and drop off on March 7th.
Sounds good to me.
I have reserved your car.
Thank you for helping. That is what I needed.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
Could you find me round trip flights?
Where will you leave from and where will you come back?
I want to leave from Seattle, WA and will get back on March 7th.
When will you leave?
I want to leave on 4th of March.
Where do you want to visit?
I want to go to San Diego.
I have 2 good flights for your trip. How about this American Airlines flight? It leaves at 8:15 am and the return flight leaves at 4:10 am. This ticket costs $199.
Sounds great. Could you help me buy flight tickets? I like traveling economy class.
Okay, please confirm this. You would like to leave from Seattle and go to San Diego on American Airlines. You will depart on March 4th at 8:15 am. Your return flight departs March 7th and 4:10 am. You need 1 economy ticket. Is this correct?
Sounds good to me.
Your ticket was confirmed.
I also need a rental car. I would like to pick up the car around 12:30 and need it from Wednesday next week. I will return it on March 7th.
I have 6 cars that you may like. How about this nice Standard car available at SAN International Airport to pick up on March 6th? It is a Camry.
How much will it be in total?
It costs $41 in total.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to make the reservation?
Yes, please.
So you would like to pick up the Standard car at SAN International Airport on March 6th at 12:30 pm. You will return it on March 7th. Is this correct?
Yes, sounds good to me.
The car was reserved.
Thank you for helping.
Would I be able to help with anything else?
No, thank you for helping.
Have a good day.
I'd like a round trip flight where I get back on the 3rd.
Sure, where are you going, where are you located and what day?
I'm in San Fran and want to go to phoenix on march 1st
There's an 5:50 am delta airlines flight that returns at 11:55 am for $121
When does my return flight get back?
2:02 pm
Perfect, please purchase my ticket
Please confirm: 1 economy delta airlines flight depart from san francisco on march 1st at 5:50 am and arriving at phoenix on march 3rd with a returning flight leaving at 11:55 am
Perfect
Confirmed
Please find me a rental car for 2 o"clock in the afternoon
Will this car be from march 1st to march 3rd?
Yes, that's perfect and I'll need to book a car for this saturday
There are 3 cars. How about a standard accord available at sky harbor international airport on march 2nd?
How much?
$27
Perfect, thanks
Shall I reserve this car?
Yes please
Please confirm: a standard car to be picked up from Sky harbor international airport on march 2nd at 2 pm and dropped off march 3rd
Perfect, thanks.
This car reservation is complete
I really appreciate all your help
Enjoy your day
I need a round trip flight.
When would you like to leave?
On March 6th.
Where would you be leaving from?
I would be leaving form paris, France. There would be two of us and I want to return on the 12th.
Where are you heading?
I am heading LAX.
There are 2 suitable flights. There is an american airlines flight that leaves at 4:05 am and returns at 9:40 am. The ticket costs $383.
That would be fine.
You would like tickets?
Yes, book the tickets for me.
You would like economy tickets for 2 on an american airlines flight from paris to los angeles that departs on March 6th at 4:05 am and returns on March 12th at 9:40 am?
That would be excellent.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks a lot. Now I need a rental car.
You would like it until March 12th? For what time?
I would need it on March 11th at 6 o"clock in the evening.
You would like the car from march 6th?
I need it from the 8th of this month.
You would like to pick up a lovely standard camry at LAX international airport on March 8th?
That would be fine.
You would like to reserve the car?
Yes, I want it.
You would like to pick up a standard care at LAX international airport on March 8th at 6 pm and drop it off on March 11th?
Yes, that's it. How much would that be?
I have reserved the car for you. The total cost would be $102.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. Thanks though.
Enjoy your day.
Can you find me a round trip flight? I'm going somewhere soon.
Where do you plan to visit?
I'm going to Washington.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving Atlanta.
When do you intend on returning?
I hope to come back on the 12th.
As for when you'll leave?
Hopefully on the 10th.
There's a $111 American Airlines flight that could do the job. It leaves at 11:40 am and returns at 4:10 pm.
What airport can I find it at? When will the onward flight appear?
The onward flight, which departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, arrives at 1:31 pm.
Sounds good to me.
Want to get tickets now?
Yes I do.
Okay, you want to get 1 economy ticket for the American Airlines flight from Atlanta to Washington that departs at 11:40 am on March 10th and returns at 4:10 pm on March 12th?
I do. When will the return flight arrive? Can I get a refund if circumstances change?
I got the ticket. The return flight arrives at 6:01 pm. You can get a refund if you so desire.
Great. Can you find me a rental car also? I want to pick it up at about half past 7 in the evening, and keep it until the 12th.
Want to get it on March 10th?
No. The 11th of this month.
There's a standard Accord at Union Station you can pick up on March 11th.
What'll it cost me?
A total of $29.
Sounds good.
Want to reserve it?
Yes I do.
You want to pick up a standard Accord from Union Station at 7:30 pm on March 11th, and keep it until March 12th?
Yes, that's correct.
I booked the car.
Thanks for the help.
Can I help you out further?
Not now. Thank you for everything you've done.
Have a nice day!
There are two people in my group and would you look for round trip flights for me?
When are you planning to depart?
I will be moving on 1st of this month
When are you intending to be back and which place you are departing from?
I will be starting from LAX and will be coming back on 4th of this month
Which place are you going to?
I will be moving to Atlanta, GA
There is a American Airlines which leaves at 5:25 pm with 0 stops and returns back at 2:30 pm and the ticket cost is $200
Are there any other flights available as i need to move to Paris, France
There is a Delta Airlines which leaves at 8:25 am with 0 stops and returns back at 5:35 pm and the ticket cost is $359
This is fine
Can i proceed with buying ticket?
Yes, i need to buy ticket
Please give confirmation details: Booking 2 Economy class tickets for Delta Airlines at 8:25 am from Los Angeles to Paris on March 1st and will be returning at 5:35 pm on March 4th
That is fine and which is the arrival airport and when does the return flight arrive?
Your booking is confirmed. The return flight arrives at 0:32 am and reaching flight is Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
Thanks for the help. Can you search rental standard car for me on 3rd of march around 6:30 pm.
Are you like to have the car from march 1st?
I want the car from the 2nd.
I have searched 4 cars of your choice. There is a nice Standard car Accord available at Charles de Gaulle International Airport for pick up on March 2nd
Can you find anything else?
I found one nice standard cruze car which is available at Charles de Gaulle International Airport for pick up on march 2nd.
Can i know the total fare?
$36 is the total reservation fare.
Can you tell me anything else?
I found one nice standard prius car which is available at Charles de Gaulle International Airport for pick up on march 2nd.
It is good. I want to book the car.
Please give confirmation details: Your pick up from Charles de Gaulle International Airport on march 2nd at 6:30 pm in a standard car and the droff-off date is march 3rd.
This is cool.
Your car has been booked.
Thank you so much.
Do you need any other help?
No thanks a lot.
Have a good day.
Can you find a round trip flight for my upcoming travel?
You're leaving from what city on what date?
I leave NYC on the 7th.
And where do you wish to go?
I'm headed to Chicago.
When will you return?
On the 11th.
I found 4 flights that can do the job for you. How about the $143 American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 am and returns at 12:30 pm?
What other flights are there? Note that I leave next Friday.
Want this $147 Delta Airlines flight? It leaves at 6 am and reutrns at 10 pm.
At what airport will it head to?
To O'Hare International Airport.
And at what airport will it leave from?
From JFK International Airport.
Sounds good to me.
Want me to get tickets?
Yes, I do.
You want 1 economy ticket for the Delta Airlines flight that goes from New York to Chicago starting at 6 am on March 8th and returning at 10 pm on March 11th?
Yes. Is a refund possible, just in case? Does it have zero stops?
I got the ticket. Have a good flight. You can't get a refund, and there's indeed 0 stops.
Thanks. Can you get a rental car for me as well? I'll need that to get around while in Chicago.
When do you want it, exactly? Want to pick it up on March 8th?
I want to pick it up around evening 4:30 on March 9th.
Want to use it until March 11th?
Yes, that's correct.
I found 5 cars for you, including a standard Accord you can pick up at O'Hare International Airport on March 9th.
What would that cost me?
A total of $66.
Sounds good to me.
Want to rent it?
Yes, I do.
You want to rent a standard Accord from O'Hare International Airport at 4:30 pm on March 9th, and keep it until March 11th?
Sounds good to me!
I rented the car.
Thanks a lot for helping me out, there. I need nothing else.
Have a great time at Chicago!
Could you please find round trip flights?
Where do you want to go?
I want to go to Chicago.
When will you back?
I will be back on 10th of March.
From which place will you leave?
I am moving from Seattle, WA.
When will you leave?
I am starting on Monday next week.
An American Airlines starts at 8:15 am and the return flight starts at 2:50 pm. The cost of the ticket is $321.
What is the name of the arriving airport?
The arriving airport is O'Hare International Airport.
It is good for me. Could you please book tickets?
Kindly ensure that, on March 4th, a Economy ticket flight from American Airlines has been booked for 1 person from Seattle to Chicago at 8:15 am. The return flight will be on March 10th at 2:50 pm.
It is good.
Your ticket is booked.
What is the arriving time of the return flight? From which airport the flight depart from?
The return flight reaches at 10:03 pm from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Thank you so much. Please help me in finding a rental car there.
Are you willing to use the car up to March 10th?
I want it up to the 8th.
When will you need it? Do you need it from March 4th?
I need it from March 7th and it has to pick up me around 20:15.
On March 7th, a Standard Accord car is available at O'Hare International Airport.
What is the total price?
Your booking cost is $33.
Is there any other option available? I need to large car around 7:30 in the evening.
I searched and found 2 cars for you. On March 7th, a Full-size CR-V car is available at O'Hare International Airport.
What is the total price?
Your booking cost is $41.
It is good.
Shall I reserve the car?
Yes. I need a rental car.
Kindly ensure that, On March 7th, a Full-size CR-V car is available at O'Hare International Airport at 7:30 pm. The drop off date is March 8th.
It is nice.
Your car has been booked.
Thank you so much for your help. That is what I want.
Have a fantastic day.
I need to look for flights.
What date will you be flying back?
On the 13th for two people.
Where are you leaving from and where to?
From Las Vegas to San Fran.
What date will you be departing?
I want to go tomorrow.
There are 3 flights, one is an American Airlines flight leaving at 5:30 am and returning at 5:30 pm, costing $116 altogether.
Can i refund this ticket?
Unfortunately no you cannot.
What time would the outbound flight arrive at?
At 7:05 am.
Are there any other economy options?
There are 2 other options. One is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 10:50 pm and returning at 10:50 am, costing $102 in total.
I prefer that one, will you get me some tickets for it?
To confirm then you want 2 economy tickets from Las Vegas to San Francisco with Delta airlines. You will depart on March 2nd at 10:50 pm and return on March 13th at 10:50 am.
Yes that all sounds right.
Your tickets are now booked.
To which airport will I arrive and what time will my return flight get back?
Ther return flight will touch down at 12:25 pm and the airport your outbound flight goes to is SFO International Airport.
Thanks for that, now can you help me to get a rental vehicle?
What time do you want to pick the car up and will you be keeping it until March 13th?
I will collect it at 6 pm and will return it on the 12th.
Will you need the car from March 2nd?
I would like a compact car and i need it at 10:30 am from 10th of this month.
There are 4 options for you. There is a compact Cooper available for collection on March 10th at SFO International Airport.
How much will that be?
It will cost $56.
Sounds like a good idea.
Will I book this car for you?
Yes please I would like that.
To confirm then you want a Compact car from March 10th at 10:30 am until March 12th and you will collect it from SFO International Airport.
Yes that is right.
Your car has been successfully booked.
Thanks so much.
Now what else can I do for you?
No nothing thanks again.
Have a lovely day.
I'd like to find round trip flights.
When are you leaving and where from? When would you like to return?
I'd like to leave this Sunday from Chi-town and will be returning on the 13th.
What is your destination?
I'm going to Seattle, WA.
I have found an American Airlines flight leaving at 7:50 am and returning at 4 pm. The price of a ticket on this plane is $258.
When does the return flight arrive?
It arrives at 10:30 pm.
Okay, I like the sound of this flight. I'd like to buy tickets.
Okay so to confirm: You would like 1 Economy class ticket on an American Airlines flight from Chicago to Seattle on March 3rd at 7:50 am. You will be returning on March 13th at 4 pm.
There is only 1 person in my group.
Okay so that's 1 person travelling on March 3rd.
Yes that's correct. How many stops are there on this flight.
Your booking has been made successfully. There is 1 stop on this flight.
Thanks for your help. I'll also need to rent a car while I'm there.
Do you need the car between March 3rd and March 13th. What time do you need it from?
I need to collect the car at around 5 o"clock in the evening. I'll need the car from the 6th to the 8th of March.
There are 5 cars available. How about a standard Civic available at Seattle-tacoma International Airport which is free on March 6th.
That sounds great. I'd like to go ahead and book this car.
Okay sure. So you'd like to collect a standard car from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport on March 6th at 5 pm. You will be returning the car on March 8th.
Yes that's correct.
Your car reservation has been successful.
Thanks for your help. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
I need a round trip flight that would be returning on March 14th.
Where would you be leaving from?
From Phoenix, AZ.
When would you be leaving?
On the 11th of this month.
Where are you heading?
To ciudad de mexico.
There is 1 flight available on american airlines that leaves at 3:55 pm. It would be returning at 8:05 am and costs $279.
What time does the onward flight land?
It lands at 0:44 am.
That would be fine.
Would you like to purchase the tickets?
Yes, three economy tickets.
You would like economy tickets for 3 on an american airlines flight leaving from Phoenix to mexico city on March 11th at 3:55 pm and returning on March 14th at 8:05 am?
That's correct. Which airport would it be leaving from?
I have bought the tickets. The flight leaves from Sky harbor international airport.
I would need a rental car from the 13th of this month till March 14th.
You would need it from what time?
I want to pick it up at 6:30 pm.
There is a lovely standard corolla that is available for pick up at benito juarez international airport on March 13th?
That would be fine.
Would you like to reserve the car?
Yes, I do.
You would like to pick up a standard car at benito juarez international airport on march 13th at 6:30 pm and drop it off on March 14th?
Yes, that would be great.
I have reserved the car.
How much would that cost in all?
That would be $21 in all.
Thanks very much for your assistance.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. Thanks for your assistance.
Enjoy your day.
Search round trip flights from Atlanta.
When do you leave and where are you going?
I'm going to New York on the 5th of this month.
When do you want to return?
On the 8th of this month.
I've found 3 flights. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves from Atlanta at 6:25 am and will leave from New York at 11:20 am for $141.
That sounds good.
Shall I book the flight?
Yes please. I'd like 4 refundable tickets.
To confirm, you would like 4 refundable economy seats for the American Airlines flight from Atlanta on March 5th at 6:25 am and a return flight from New York on March 8th at 11:20 am?
Perfect. When does my flight home arrive?
I've purchased your ticket. Your return flight will arrive at JFK International Airport at 1:42 pm.
Find me a rental car.
For what date? March 5th? March 8th?
I'll need the car next Wednesday.
For what time?
I can pick it up at 6:30 pm.
I've found 5 cars. How about a standard car like an Accord? There's one available at Grand Central Station on March 6th.
For how much?
It will cost $54
Do you have any others?
There's a standard Camry available at JFK International Airport on March 6th.
That will work
Would you like to reserve it now?
Yes please
So you would like a standard car from JFK International Airport from 6:30 pm on March 6th until March 8th?
Yes that will work. How much is it?
It will be $66. I've reserved your car.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can help with?
Nope. Thanks again.
Have a good day.
I need to find round trip flights on Delta Airlines from Nairobi on March 9th.
When and where are you going?
Leaving on the 1st of March to NY.
There is a flight on Delta Airlines leaving at 9:50 pm and returning at 5:50 pm for $317 per ticket.
Sounds good. Please buy tickets.
Please confirm you want 1 economy seat on the flight on Delta Airlines leaving from Nairobi on March 1st at 9:50 pm and returing from New York on March 9th at 5:50 pm.
That one sounds good.
Your flight reservation has been confirmed.
Thanks. Can you get me a car rental?
Will you be renting from March 1st until March 9th or other dates?
Yes. Picking up Thursday next week at 10:30 am.
There are 6 options. There is a standard Altima available at Port Authority Station on March 7th.
What's the total?
The total is $60.
Are there other options?
There is a standard Camry available for pick up at JFK International Airport on March 7th.
Is there a full-size car available for pick up around 12:00?
There are 5 options. There is a Full-size Cherokee available for pick up at Grand Central Station on March 7th.
Sounds good. Please book.
Please confirm you want me to book a full-size car to be picked up at Grand Central Station on March 7th at 12 pm until March 9th.
Yes. Sounds great.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm going on vacation. Can you find me a nice round trip flight?
No problem. Can you tell me what city you are leaving from, where you are planning to visit and when you'll be coming back.
I'm taking a trip to Paris. I'll be flying out of Seattle, WA and i want to get back by March 10th.
Okay great. When are you planning to leave?
This is kind of last minute so i am planning to leave tomorrow.
There is an outbound Delta Airlines flight leaving at 8:45 am tomorrow. Your return flight will be leaving at 11:20 am. The ticket will be $432.
Thank you. Can you tell me which airport the flight will be landing in?
Your flight's destination is Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
That flight sounds good to me. Can you help me buy tickets?
No problem. Just confirm the following for me: Purchasing 1 Economy class ticket for the Delta Airlines flight from Seattle to Paris. Your departure date is March 2nd at 8:45 am. Your return flight leaves on March 10th at 11:20 am. Correct?
Yes, that all sounds good. Thank you. When will my return flight arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. Your return flight will arrive at 10:56 pm.
Okay, thanks. When will the onward flight arrive?
Your onward flight will arrive at 11:18 am.
Great. Thanks for you help.
Anything else I can help you with?
Yes please. Could you also find me a rental car out there? I'd like to pick up a car next Monday at twelve pm. I'll need it until the 7th. I plan on doing a lot of traveling.
There is a nice car available at Charles de Gaulle International Airport ready to pick up on March 4th. It is a Standard size Accord.
Okay, that sounds good. I'd like to go ahead and reserve the car now.
Alright, please confirm the following details: You are picking up a Standard size Accord from Charles de Gaulle International Airport on March 4th at 12 pm. You will be dropping the car off on March 7th. Correct?
Yes, that all sounds good. What's it going to cost me?
Alright, your car is now reserved. Your total will be $99.
Thanks for the help! That's all for now.
I am happy to assist. Have a great day!
I need a round trip flight.
When would you like to leave and where would you be leaving from?
I want to leave seattle this saturday.
When would you be returning?
On the 10th of March. I will be leaving SFO.
Where are you heading?
To phoenix, AZ.
There are 4 suitable flights. There is an american airlines flight that would be leaving at 8:10 am and returns at 6:15 am. The cost of the ticket is $169.
How many stops will there be?
Just 1 stop.
Is there anything else?
You can have a delta airlines flight that leaves at 5:50 am and returns at 11:55 am. The cost of the ticket is $131.
That would be fine. Go ahead and order the tickets.
You would like 1 economy ticket on a delta airlines flight from san francisco to phoenix that leaves on march 2nd at 5:50 am and returns on march 10th at 11:55 am?
That would be fine. What airport would it be landing in and how many stops would there be?
I have confirmed your ticket. The flight lands at sky harbor international airport and there are 0 stops.
Thanks a lot. I would need a rental car for 3 o"clock in the afternoon.
You would like it for March 10th?
Till the 6th of this month.
You would like a car from March 2nd?
I would need it from the 4th of this month.
There is a lovely standard accord available for pick up at sky harbor international airport on March 4th.
That would be good. I want to reserve that car.
You would like to pick up a standard car at sky harbor international airport at 3 pm on March 4th and drop it off on march 6th?
That would be fine.
I have reserved the car for you.
How much would that be in all?
$72 in all.
Thanks for your assistance.
Is there anything else?
No, thank you.
Enjoy your day.
I want you to find me a round trip flight.
From where will you be leaving for your flight, and when are you going to return?
I will be leaving for my flight from NY, and I want to return on the 13th.
Can you tell me the destination you want to arrive at, and at what time you plan to depart?
I want to go to Vancouver, BC, and I want to fly off on March 4th.
I have found a Delta Airlines flight which has an outbound flight that leaves at 6 am, and when it returns it takes off at 3:20 am. The ticket for this flight costs $332.
Is there some other flight you can suggest?
There is another flight with United Airlines, with the outbound flight departing at 8:20 am, and the return flight taking off at 3:15 am. Buying this ticket will cost you $351.
This flight seems nice to me. Can you buy me the tickets for this flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class flight ticket for 1 person for the flight of United Airlines which departs from New York on March 4th at 8:20 am to go to Vancouver, and it returns on March 13th at 3:15 am?
That is what I want. Can you tell me the time when the onward flight should arrive at the destination? Can you also check if the flight has 0 stops?
This flight has 1 stop, and the onward flight is expected to arrive at 6:01 pm. Your requested ticket has been booked.
I appreciate your help. Can you also help me find a car which I can rent there?
Can you tell me the time when you need the car?
I will be available to pick up the car around evening 6:30.
Will you be renting the car from March 4th till March 13th?
I actually need to rent the car from 6th of this month till the 10th.
A nice car I can recommend is Accord which is a Standard car, and it can be picked up at YVR International Airport on March 6th.
That seems nice. I want to book this car.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a Standard car which you will pick up from YVR International Airport on March 6th at 6:30 pm, and will need to rent it till March 10th?
That suits me well.
Your requested car has been booked.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a good time!
Shall I get a round trip flight from Seattle?
Tell me about your destination and departure time?
Departing today to LAX.
When are you planning to return?
It will be on 4th of March.
5 flights will be there for your choice. Alaska Airlines leaving at 3:45 pm may be the right one. It leaves for the return journey at 7:10 pm. Your ticket will cost $146.
Show me the next option.
You can travel by American Airlines. It leaves at 8:15 am and returns at 11:45 pm. Its flight charge is $133.
What is the name of arrival airport
it arrives at LAX International Airport.
Ok, thats perfect. Please book ticket in that.
Please verify, you need 1 seat in American Airlines leaving from Seattle on March 1st to Los Angeles at 8:15 am. It will take you back on March 4th at 11:45 pm in Economy class.
Please mention the departure airport and return arrival time?
On return it arrives at 2:32 am . It depart from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. Your seats are fixed.
I also need a rental car there?
Do you pick it up on March 1st?
No, From 2nd of March.
Drop-off date is March 4th, isn't it?
No, only until March 3rd.
When will you pick it up?
Around 6 pm.
You have a Standard Camry car at LAX International Airport available on March 2nd.
good. that will be fine.
Do you wish to make it fixed?
Yes, do it now.
Please confirm, you need a Standard car from Lax International Airport on March 2nd at 6 pm. You will drop-off it on March 3rd.
yeah, thats right.
Congrats. your car is booked.
Great help.
Do you need any other help?
No, that's all I wanted.
Good, keep safe, have a memorable day.
I'd like to look at some round trip flight tickets.
I'd be happy to help. Let's get some details first. Where are you leaving from and traveling to? When will you begin your travels?
I will be traveling from Mexico City to San Fran on March 3rd.
When do you plan to return?
I will be coming back on the 12th.
Ther are 2 flights that meet your criteria. The first is an American Airlines flight for $156 that leaves at 2:55 pm and returns at 1:20 pm.
Can I return the ticket if I need to?
No, the ticket in nonrefundable.
Does it have any layovers?
No, there are 0 stops.
That will work. Can you see if there is an Economy ticket available for the flight?
You'd like 1 Economy ticket on the American Airlines flight that leaves Mexico City on March 3rd at 2:55 pm bound for San Francisco. It is set to return on March 12th at 1:20 pm. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your ticket has been purchased.
Great. Can you help me reserve a rental car? I'd need to pick it up at 6 pm and I will keep it until the 9th.
Would you be picking up on March 3rd?
I will need it starting Thursday next week.
If you'd like a Standard car, there is an Altima available at SFO International Airport on March 7th.
Can you tell me how much it will be?
The total will be $62.
Perfect. Can you make the reservation for me?
Let me confirm the following details: You'd like to pick up a Standard car on March 7th at 6 pm from SFO International Airport and return it on March 9th.
That is correct.
Your reservation has been successful.
Thank you for all your help. That's everything for right now.
You're welcome. Enjoy the rest of your day!
I need a round trip planet ticket.
Where are you going and what dates are you departing and returning?
I am departing Mexico City on March 5th and returning from Phoenix on the 12th of March.
Search found 2 results. American Airlines has a flight that departs at 2:35 am and then at 7:35 am respectively with a total cost of $251.
What time does the return flight land?
Your second flight lands at 8:05 pm.
What else can you find?
United Airlines has a flight that departs at 8:45 pm and 11:05 am respectively with a total cost of $274.
That works for me. I need 2 plane tickets.
You want 2 Economy tickets on United Airlines from Mexico City to Phoenix. That first flight departs at 8:45 pm on March 5th and second flight departs at 11:05 am on March 12th. Is that right?
That is right. Does this flight offer refunds and when does the second flight land?
Your ticket is booked. The second flight lands at 7:03 pm and the ticket can't be refunded.
Thanks a bunch. I need to rent a Compact car there on the 7th of this month.
What time do you want to pick it up and will you return it on March 12th?
I need to pick it up at 3:30 in the afternoon and will be returning it on March 12th.
Search revealed 3 results. A Compact Cooper can be picked up at Sky Harbor International Airport on March 7th.
That works for me. Book me this car.
You want a Compact car from Sky Harbor International Airport at 3:30 pm on March 7th and will return it March 12th. Is that right?
That is right.
Your booking is complete.
How much will this cost me?
It will cost you $150.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a round flights for me?
From where do you want to leave ?
I'm from Chi-town.
When is the date you want to leave ? Would you be coming back ? Where's your destination ?
The day after tomorrow. I will be back next Friday. I am going to Seattle, WA.
American Airlines' flight outbound is 7:50 am and return at 4 pm. The ticket costs $261.
Can you guarantee a 0 stops flight ? Where did the plane will be departing ?
1 stop only. It departs at O'Hare International Airport.
Any other available flights?
Delta Airlines flight outbound is at 3:35 pm and return at 8:45 am. The ticket costs $250.
That one is good.
Should i reserve you a ticket ?
Yeah reserve 3 Economy tickets for me.
These are your details: The flight is from Chicago to Seattle on March 3rd 3:35 pm and will return on March 8th at 8:45 am by Delta Airlines. 3 Economy seating class.
Yeah ok
Your tickets are approved and confirmed.
Can you find me any kind of rental car there ?
Do you want the car on March 3rd when you arrived there until you leave on March 8th?
I want the car to be picked up at around 6:30 in the evening. I'm gonna needing it till Wednesday next week. I only need it till 4th of March.
I found a car at King Street Station ready for pick up on March 4th. It's a Civic and a Standard car for you.
Anything else aside this one ?
I also found a Elantra at King Street Station ready for pickup on March 4th. It is standard also.
How much does it cost?
Reservation is $60 in total.
That's okay for me. Reserve that car for me.
Here's your reservation details: You'll gonna pick up the Standard Elentra car at King Street Station a March 4th at exactly 6:30 pm. And drop-off date is on March 6th.
Yeah that's fine
They approved your reservation
Thank you very much
Is there anything else ?
No that's all
Have a nice day ahead.
I would like to find a round-trip flight.
Where are you departing from and when are you returning?
I'm departing from Atlanta and returning on the 4th.
When do you want to leave and where are you traveling?
I would like to leave on the 2nd of this month and I'm traveling to Vancouver, BC.
There are 2 flights. There is Delta Airlines that leaves at 7:50 am and returns at 3:20 am for the price of $318.
That fight sounds good to me.
Do you want to purchase a ticket?
Yes I would like three economy tickets.
Booking 3 economy seats from Atlanta to Vancouver with Delta Airlines on March 2nd leaving at 7:50 am and returning March 4th at 3:20 am.
Yes, that is perfect. Which airport does the flight arrive at and how many stops does the flight have?
Your ticket is purchased. The destination is YVR International Airport and there is 1 stop.
Can you find me a rental car?
Do you want the car from March 2nd to March 4th?
I would like to pick up the car on the 3rd of March around 17:00.
There are 7 cars. There is a Standard Accord at YVR International Airport available on March 3rd.
That is perfect.
Do you want to reserve the car?
Yes, I would like to rent the car.
Renting a Standard Accord, pick up at YVR International Airport at 5 pm on March 3rd and drop-off on March 4th.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your car is rented!
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
Hello! Can you help me find a round trip flight for two to Atlanta, GA?
I'd be happy to. When do you plan to return?
I will be leaving tomorrow and returning on the 13th of March.
Where are you departing from?
We will be departing from Vegas.
If you like Southwest Airlines, there is a flight leaving 2:35 pm and returning at 12:05 pm for $265.
Can you tell me the airport of origin and the destination?
Your flight would leave McCarran International Airport and arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
That one sounds good.
Can I do anything else for you?
Yes, I'd like to purchase Economy flight tickets.
Can you confirm the following for me? You'd like 2 Economy tickets for the Southwest Airlines flight leaving Las Vegas on March 2nd at 2:35 pm and arriving in Atlanta. You will be returning on March 13th at 12:05 pm.
That is correct. Can you tell me if the ticket is refundable?
Your ticket has been confirmed but the ticket is non refundable.
Great! Can you find me a rental car now?
Would you be picking up the car on March 2nd? Would you be returning it on March 13th?
I'd like to pick it up at 3 in the afternoon on the 10th of this month and return it on March 11th.
If you'd like a Standard car, there is a Camry available for pickup on March 10th at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Are there any other options?
There is another Standard car, this time a Cruze, also available on March 10th at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Can you tell me what the total would be?
It would be $34.
What is available for pickup on the 6th?
There is a Standard car, a Sentra, available on March 6th at Peachtree Station.
That one works for me.
Would you like to make the reservation?
I would like to make the reservation.
You'd like to pickup a Standard car on March 6th at 3 pm from the Peachtree Station and you will be returning it on March 11th. Is this correct?
That is correct.
Your reservation was successful.
Thanks for all your help.
You're welcome. Enjoy your day.
I need to travel soon. Search a round trip flight from American Airlines?
Where do you plan to depart and return?
Search for flights from tomorrow until the 10th of this month.
Where will you go? And from where will you depart?
Look for something from San Fran to London.
There is an American Airlines flight available. The departing flight takes off at 7:05 am and the returning flight takes off at 3:05 pm. It has a total cost of $406.
That sounds great. I want to book a ticket.
Please confirm: Booking 1 Economy class ticket for American Airlines. Flight departs from San Francisco on March 2nd at 7:05 am with destination London. Returning flight takes off at 3:05 pm on March 10th.
Yes, that is correct. Is it a refundable ticket? From which airport does it departs?
The ticket has been booked. It is not a refundable ticket and it departs from SFO International Airport.
I will also need to rent a car in there. Is there anything to pick up at around 13:30 the day after tomorrow?
Until when will you want the car? Until March 10th?
No, I will need it until March 7th.
There is a Standard Accord car available for pickup on March 3rd at Gatwick International Airport.
Is there anything else I would like for a compact car and make it until the 4th.
There is a Compact Fit car available for pickup at Heathrow International Airport on March 3rd.
That sounds great.
Do you want to book it?
Yes, please book it.
Please confirm: Booking a compact car from March 3rd until March 4th. Available for Heathrow International Airport at 1:30 pm.
Yes, that is correct.
The car has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for 1 seat on a round trip flight.
Ok. Details? Where? When?
From Portland, OR on March 12th.
Ok. But to where? And when will you be returning?
To Phoenix. I'd like to be back by the 14th of March. See if you can get an economy seat on Delta Airlines.
I see 1. An 8 pm Delta Airlines flight for $192. It takes off for the return at 10:15 pm.
When does it arrive back? And can I get my money back?
It lands back in Portland at 1:10 am but it is not refundable.
I like it anyway.
So should I pick up the tics?
Yes. Book 'em.
OK. 1 Economy Delta Airlines seat to Phoenix from Portland on March 12th at 8 pm. The return flight is at 10:15 pm on March 14th. Is this what you want?
Thats what I want. Are there any stops? When does it arrive in Phoenix?
It arrives in Phoenix at 1:17 am with 1 stop.
I think I'm gonna need some wheels there.
From March 12th to March 14th?
No. From the 13th.
At what time.
Around the afternoon 12.
Ok. I see 3 cars. You got a standard accord available ot be picked up on March 13th from Sky Harbor International Airport.
What that going to run me?
You're looking at $28 total.
Sounds like a bargain. Get me it.
OK. I standard car from March 13th to March 14th to be picked up at Sky Harbor International Airport at 12 pm. Correct?
Yes. That's good.
Done. You have a car.
Nice job buddy.
I can do more.
No thanks. I'm all set.
Good day then.
Can you find me a round trip flight from Philadelphia
When are you leaving?
I want to leave on the 6th of this month
OK, where are you going?
I'm travelling to NYC
When are you coming back
I want one ticket with a return on the 12th of March
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:45 pm and has a 9:35 pm return flight for $64
That sounds awesome
OK, shall I book it?
Yes, book me economy class
Confirming 1 economy ticket via American Airlines from Philadelphia to New York on March 6th at 4:45 pm with a March 12th 9:35 pm
Yes that's great
Your ticket is booked
What time does the departing flight arrive, and how many stops does it have?
The flight arrives at 5:36 pm and has 0 stops
Thanks for your help, now help me find a rental car please
At what time do you need it? And do you need it from March 6th onwards?
I want a medium-sized car that I can get around 18:00 next Thursday
Do you need it until March 12th?
I only need it till the 10th
I have 7 cars including a standard Accord that you can get on March 7th from Grand Central Station
What's that gonna cost?
It'll cost you $102
That sounds great, I want to reserve that car
You can pick up your standard car from Grand Central Station on March 7th at 6 pm and drop it off on March 10th
Yes, that's perfect
Your car is booked
Thanks so much for that
Can I do anything else?
No, that's it for now
Sure thing, take care!
united airlines chicago economy please
when will you leave?
on the 1st
when will you be back?
back on the 14th
where are you leaving?
NYC leaving
united airlines leaves 2:40 pm and leaves 9 pm and is $125
4 people in group
new york to chicago united airlines leaves march 1st and comes back march 14th and leaves 2:40 pm and leaves 9 pm with 4 people in economy
what airport does the flight leave from?
jfk international airport
pick car up 20:00 til the 11th of this month
car march 1st
7th of march
3 cars at o'hare international airport pickup march 7th and is a standard car accord
tell me the cost
reservation is $140
that is good
wanna reserve this car?
yes I want it
pick up o'hare international airport on march 7th and time is 8 pm and rop off is march 11th for standard
yes that works
car has been reserved
thank you very much
have a nice one
I will be travelling soon with some friend soon. Can you find some round trip flights?
From where will you leave? And when do you want to come back?
Look for an Economy class flight from Vancouver to LA on the 12th of this month.
When do you want to leave?
I will leave on the 1st.
There is an American Airlines flight that takes off at 11 pm and the return flight takes off at 4:50 pm. It has a cost of $178.
That flight sounds good. Please book three tickets.
Please confirm: Booking 3 Economy tickets for an American Airlines flight. Departing on Vancouver at 11 pm on March 1st with destination Los Angeles. The return flight takes off at 4:50 pm on March 12th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your ticket has been booked.
To which airport will it arrive?
It will arrive to LAX International Airport.
Thanks a lot. I will also need to get a rental car from the 7th of this month until the 12th of this month.
At what time do you want to pick it up?
I want to pick it up at one in the afternoon.
There are 4 cars you might like. There is a Standard Camry car available for pick up at LAX International Airport on March 7th.
That is correct.
Do you want to book it?
Please book it.
Please confirm: Booking a Standard card from March 7th until March 12th. Available for pickup at LAX International Airport at 1 pm.
That is correct.
The car has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
Find a round trip flight from NYC.
Departure date?
The 1st of this month.
Destination and return date?
Chicago and next Thursday.
I found 4 flights. American Airlines has a ticket for $139 leaving 5:25 am and returning 12:30 pm.
Ok.
Do you want tickets?
Yes.
Please confirm: 1 economy ticket on American Airlines from New York to Chicago on March 1st at 5:25 am and returning March 7th at 12:30 pm.
Yes. When does it get in?
Your seat is booked. You'll arrive 6:44 am.
Find a rental car too.
Using from March 1st until March 7th?
The day after tomorrow until next Tuesday, picking up around afternoon 3.
There's a standard Accord at O'Hare International Airport available March 3rd.
Good, reserve it.
Please confirm: standard car reservation at O'Hare International Airport, picking up March 3rd at 3 pm and returning March 5th.
Yep.
Your reservation is complete.
Thanks for the help.
Anything else I can do?
Nope, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me search for some round trip flights?
Sure thing. Where are you planning to visit?
I'm headed out to Chicago.
Okay, when do you plan to leave?
I really need a flight for later today.
Okay, no problem. Can you tell me where you are leaving from and when you'll be coming back?
I need 3 tickets from Paris, France to Chicago and I plan on returning this Sunday.
Okay, I found 1 convient flight for you. There is an outbound Delta Airlines flight leaving at 11:20 pm with a return flight leaving at 6:40 pm. Your total ticket cost will be $251.
That flight sounds good to me. I'd like to go ahead and purchase the tickets now if I can.
No problem. Please confirm the following details: You need 3 Economy class tickets for the Delta Airlines flight from Paris to Chicago departing on March 1st at 11:20 pm. Your return flight leaves on March 3rd at 6:40 pm. Is this correct?
Yes, that all sounds good to me.
Alright, your ticket has been confirmed. Enjoy your flight. Anything else?
Thanks for the help. Can you find a rental car for me as well? I need to rent a car this Sunday at half past 3 in the afternoon. I will need it until the 2nd of this month.
Okay, I have 5 cars that you may like. There is a very nice Honda Accord available for pickup on March 2nd from O'Hare International Airport. This is a Standard car.
Okay, that sounds good. Go ahead and make the reservation now.
Alright, please confirm the following for me: You are picking up a Standard Accord from O'hare International Airport on March 2nd at 3:30 pm. Your drop-off date is March 3rd. Correct?
Yes, that sounds good. What will it cost me?
Your car has been reserved. Your total cost will be $33 total.
Great! Thanks a lot for the help, that's all I need.
My pleasure, have a great day!
I need a round trip flight.
When will you be back? Where are you coming from?
I'm coming back on the 3rd, and I'm coming from London.
When are you leaving?
On March 1st.
Where are you going?
To Atlanta, GA.
An American Airlines flight leaves at 8:35 pm and costs $388. The return flight would leave at 3:30 pm.
Would it have one stops? What airport would I go to?
The flight is at Heathrow International Airport and has 1 stop.
I'd like tickets. I also need them to be refundable. I'm fine traveling in economy.
An American Airlines flight for 1 to Atlanta from London on March 1st at 8:35 pm. The return flight is on March 3rd at 3:30 pm. It's an economy seat. Is this correct?
Yes. When would the onward flight be there? What airport do the plane go to?
Your ticket has been booked. The flight will be there at 2:39 am. The airport destination is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Okay. I'd also like a rental car for the 2nd of March.
When will you need it?
Around 4:30 pm.
Will you need it until March 3rd?
Yes I will.
I found 4 cars. A Camry is available at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 2nd. It'll be a standard car.
What would it cost?
It would cost $37.
That's fine. I'd like to reserve it.
Picking up a car from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 2nd at 4:30 pm, and you'll drop it off on March 3rd. It's a standard car. Is this it?
Yes, that's it.
Your car is reserved.
Thanks. That is all.
Have a nice day.
I need a round trip for my travel. I will be leaving Philadelphia and there are 3 of us in all.
Where are you going and when will you be back and what day are you leaving?
I am going on day after tomorrow to Los Angeles and will come back next thursday.
You can pick one of these 2 flights. How about Delta Airlines outbound leaving at 10:45 am and return flight leaves at 1:40 pm. They will charge you $298.
Can I ask for refund on ticket in case and when does the onward flight arrive?
3:17 pm is when the onward flight will arrive and they don't refund the ticket.
That flight will be great.
Can I get you tickets?
Yeah I will want the tickets.
Let me make sure I got it right. You want a flight from Philadelphia to Los Angeles. Delta Airlines will leave on March 3rd and return on March 7th. The onward flight departs at 10:45 am and return flight departs at 1:40 pm. You want 3 Economy tickets.
All correct. I confirm.
I have confirmed your tickets.
Thank you for everything. Do you have a rental car for me there. A small one will do and I will want it till next Tuesday.
Shall I book it from March 3rd and what time do you want it?
I will pick it up at 6 pm and I need the car from next Monday to be exact.
There are 4 cars I found. One will be available at LAX International Airport from March 4th. It is compact and it is a Bolt.
How much is the cost?
It will cost you $26 in all.
That is fine. Reserve the car.
So you want a Compact car from March 4th till March 5th and you will pick it up at LAX International Airport at 6 pm.
Yes that is fine.
I have reserved your car
Thanks for everything
Do you want anything else.
Nope, That is all.
Have a nice day!
I will be traveling with a friend soon. Can you find flights on the 6th to London, UK.
When do you want to leave?
Search for something on the 3rd of this month for two people. Any class ticket is fine.
From where will you leave?
Look for something from ATL on the 9th of this month.
There is an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight takes off at 3:30 pm and the return flight takes off at 8:35 pm. It has a cost of $366.
At what time does the departing flight arrives? And from which airport does it departs?
The flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and it arrives at 6:14 pm.
That sounds great.
Do you want to buy some tickets?
Yes, please. Look for a refundable ticket, my plans might change.
Please confirm: Booking 2 Economy class tickets for an American Airlines flight. Departing from Atlanta on March 3rd at 3:30 pm with destination London. Return flight takes of at 8:35 pm on March 9th.
That is correct. At what time does does the return flight arrives?
The tickets have been booked. The return flight arrives at 2:39 am.
I will also need a rental car. Is there anything available?
Do you want to rent it from March 3rd until March 9th? When do you want ti pick it up?
I will need it from the 8th of this month until the 5th. And I want to pick it up at 6 in the evening.
There is an Standard Accord car available for pickup at Gatwick International Airport on March 5th.
What is the cost of the car?
It has a total cost of $81.
That sounds great, please book it.
Please confirm: Renting a Standard car available from March 5th until March 8th. Available for pick up at Gatwick International Airport at 6 pm.
Yes, that is correct.
The car has been booked.
Thanks a lot, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I need to find round trip tickets for next Wednesday.
What is your departure date and destination?
I'm going to London, England on the 1st.
Where are you departing from?
Leaving from San Francisco.
There are 2 options. There is a flight on American Airlines leaving at 7:05 am and returning at 3:05 pm for a total of $399 per ticket.
What is the arrival airport and is the ticket refundable?
It is a non refundable flight going to Heathrow International Airport.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to book tickets?
Yes. please book.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy flight on American Airlines departing from San Francisco on March 1st at 7:05 am and dreturning from London on March 6th at 3:05 pm.
No. There is 1 person in the group.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 passenger on the flight from San Francisco.
Yes. That is correct.
Your ticket reservation is confirmed.
What is the departure airport?
The flight departs from SFO International Airport.
Thanks. I also need a car rental from this Saturday until the 4th of March at half past 12 in the afternoon.
There is a standard accord available at Gatwick International Airport on March 2nd.
What's the total?
The total is $54.
Sounds great. Please book it.
Please confirm you want me to book a standard car to be picked up at Gatwick International Airport on March 2nd at 12:30 pm and dropped off on March 4th
Yes. That's right.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That was it.
Please enjoy your day.
I will be needing round trip flights for my travel soon.
What place are you going to?
I need to be in ATL and I am going from Delhi, India.
What day are you getting back and when are you leaving?
I go on the 1st of March and come back on Monday next week.
There are 2 good flights. One is the American Airlines which is outbound at 9:20 am. Your return flight will fly at 2:30 pm and it will cost you $421 for the ticket.
What time is my return flight arriving and is this plane having 0 stops?
The place arrives at 8:39 pm and it has 1 stop.
That plane will do for me.
Do you want to buy the tickets?
Sure go for the ticket booking.
So you want the American Airlines flight from Delhi to Atlanta. The plane departs on March 1st and returns on March 4th. The flight is onward at 9:20 am and return flight flies at 2:30 pm. You are just 1 person travelling on Economy class. Correct?
That is right. What time is the onward flight coming here? What airport is it where it arrives?
I confirmed your ticket and the onward flight arrives at 2:56 pm. You will reach the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thanks a lot. Do you have a rental car for me to go there?
Will you be using your car till March 4th?
Yeah that is right.
Shall I get you the car from March 1st?
I will be needing the ride from the 2nd.
What is the time you want it?
I will take the car at around 3:30 pm.
So you can pick from 4 cars. How about a Standard Camry located at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport that will be available on March 2nd for pick up?
Do you have anything else?
How would you like a Standard Cruze that you can take from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 2nd?
I want something else. Look for a compact car that I will use till 3rd of March.
There are 6 such cars. Do you mind a Compact Bolt which you will pick up at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 2nd?
I would love it.
Shall I get you anything else?
Book this car please.
So you want a Compact car which you will use from March 2nd till March 3rd. You will pick it up at 3:30 pm from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. Is that all good?
Yep, that is perfect.
I have your car reserved for you.
Thank you for all the help.
Shall I help you with something else?
Nope. That is it. Thanks.
I wish you a good day!
I need a round trip ticket for the 9th of this month on Economy.
Where are you going?
Going to London, England.
What is your return date?
Returning from Atlanta on the 14th of March.
There is a flight on American Airlines leaving at 8:40 pm and returning at 2:05 pm for a total cost of $318.
Is it a refundable ticket?
It is non refundable.
What are the departing and arrival airports?
The flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport aned arrives at Heathrow International Airport.
Please book me tickets on that flight.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy ticket on the flight on American Airlines leaving from Atlanta on March 9th at 8:40 pm and returning fron London on March 14th at 2:05 pm.
Actually, there are 4 in my group.
Please confirm you want me to book 4 tickets on the 8:40 pm flight.
Sorry, make that 2 people.
Please confirm you want me to book a flight for 2 passengers on American Airlines.
Yes. That's correct.
Your flight reservation has been booked.
Are there any stops?
There is 1 stop.
Thanks. Can you help me find a car rental as well.
Will you be picking up on March 9th and dropping off on March 14th.
Yes but I need the car from the 12th.
At what time?
For pick up at 15:30.
There is a standard Accord available at Gatwick International Airport on March 12th.
What's the total?
The total cost is $64.
Sounds great. I need to reserve a rental.
Please confirm you want me to reserve a standard car from Gatwick International Airport for pick up on March 12th at 3:30 pm and drop off on March 14th.
Yep. Sounds good.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks. That will be all.
Take care and have a wonderful day.
I need a round trip flight on Delta Airlines, if possible. I'll need to treturn on the 14th of this month.
What is your city of departure, where will you be going, and when will you wnat to travel?
I need to fly from Paris, France to LAX on the 2nd of this month.
I found 1 flight. Delta Airlines has a flight that leaves at 5:35 PM and a return flight that leaves at 8:25 am. The fare is $348
Is this a refundable ticket?
The ticket is nonrefundable.
Ok. That sounds good anyway. Can you book that flight for me?
You want 1 Economy fare seat on Delta Airline's flight from Paris, France to Los Angeles on March 2nd at 5:35 pm, and the return flight on March 14th at 8:25 am. Is this correct?
Yes. That works for me. Which airport does it arrive at?
Yourticket has been booked. LAX International Airport is the destination airport.
When does the outbound flight arrive at LAX?
The flight arrives at 0:32 am after 1 stop.
Thanks. I also need a rental car while I'm there.
Do you want the car on March 2nd?
I won't need the car until the 7th of this month.
Will you need the car until March 14th? What time would you like to pick it up?
I should pick it up by 4:30 in the evening. I'll only need it until the 10th of March.
I have 6 cars available. There is a Standard size car, a Toyota Camry available for pickup on March 7th at LAX International Airport.
Yes. Reserve that one for me.
You want to rent a Standard size car to be picked up at 4:30 PM on March 7th at LAX International Airport that you will return on March 10th. Is this correct?
Yes. That is correct. What is the total cost?
You car is reserved. The total cost of the rental will be $93.
Great. That's all for now.
Let me know if you require any further assistance.
Could you find me a roundtrip flight? I want to leave from the 11th of this month and return march 13th, and I prefer delta airlines.
Where are you leaving from, and where are yo uheading?
I'd like to go to SFO from New York City.
There's a delta airlines flight leaving at 7:30 am, returning at 10:55 am, and costs $256.
Sounds good, could you buy tickets?
Please confirm: YOu want a flight from new york to san francisco on delta airlines leaving march 11th at 7:30 am returning march 13th at 10:55 am, and want 1 economy seat.
Sounds good, does it have 0 stops?
It has 1 stop.
Where does it depart from, and when does it arrive?
It arrives at 12:50 pm and departs from JFK international airport.
Could you find me a spacious car for rent from the 12th of this month?
When will you need it, and do you want it until march 13th?
Sounds good, I want to pick it up at 6 in the evening.
i have 3 options; One's in SFO International airport for pickup march 12th, it's a full-size car and is an escape.
What's the cost?
It costs $46 total.
Sounds good.
Do you want to reserve it?
Yes please.
Please confirm: You want it from SFO International airport with a pickup time of march 12th at 6 pm, and a drop off date of march 13th, and it's full-size.
Sounds good to me.
Your car is reserved.
Thank you, i'm all set.
Have a great day!
I need a round trip flight.
Where are you heading to?
To Atlanta, GA.
Where would you be leaving from?
I would be leaving from SFO.
When would you like to go?
On the 3rd of March.
When would you like to return?
On the 7th. I want a ticket for one on United airlines.
There is 1 suitable flight on united airlines that leaves on 6:10 pm. The flight would be returning on 9:40 am and costs $261
That would be agreeable.
You would like tickets?
Yes, I do.
You would like an economy ticket for 1 on a united airlines flight that leaves from san francisco to atlanta on March 3rd at 6:10 pm and returns on March 7th at 9:40 am?
Yes, that would be fine.
I have reserved your ticket.
Great. I would need a rental car till the 5th of March.
For what time? Would you need it from March 3rd?
I want to pick up the car on the 4th of this month at half past 1 in the afternoon.
You can pick up a lovely standard camry on march 4th at hartsfield-Jackson international airport.
I do not like that car. Is there anything else?
There is a lovely standard cruze available for pick up at hartsfield-jackson international airport for march 4th.
How much would that cost in all?
It would cost $36 in all.
That would be all. I want that car.
You would like to pick up a standard car at Hartsfield-jackson international airport at 1:30 pm on March 4th and drop it off on March 5th?
That would be fine.
I want that car.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else you need?
No. Thanks for your assistance.
Enjoy your day.
I want to search for round trip flight.
What will be your date of return?
I would like to return on 4th of this month.
What is your destination, place of boarding and date of departure?
I will be taking the flight later today from Atlanta to San Fran.
I found an American Airlines flight which departs at 11:40 am and the return flight departs at 3:50 pm. The ticket costs $226.
can you find me which time my onward and return flight arrive?
The arrival time of Onward and return flight is 2:06 pm and 1:24 am respectively.
That sounds good to me.I would like to buy the tickets for the flight.
Please confirm: You want me to buy 1 Economy ticket in American Airlines which takes off at 11:40 am from Atlanta on March 1st to San Francisco. And the return flight departs at 3:50 pm on March 4th.
Yes, That is correct. Can you check whether the flight has 0 stops?
The ticket is confirmed and the flight has 1 stop.
I would like to find a rental car there.
Would you like me to find the car on March 1st and book it till March 4th.
Yes, That sounds great. I would like to pick up the car on March 3rd.
What time should I put for pick up?
I would like to pick up the car around 3 in the afternoon.
There are 6 cars that might interest you. How about a standard Altima car for pick up on March 3rd from SFO International Airport?
Can you tell me the total cost?
The total cost for the reservation is $30.
That sounds good to me. Please reserve the car for me.
Please confirm: You want me to book a Standard car for pick up at 3 pm on March 3rd from SFO International Airport and the drop off date is March 4th.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully reserved the car.
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I am going to atlanta
when will you leave?
I am going 1st of this month
when are you back?
7th of march seattle, wa
I will leave american airlines and leave 9:45 pm and return 9:35 pm and the price is $205
that is good and help me
confirm seattle to atlanta american airlined on march 1st american airlines march 7th economy 1 at 9:45 pm and 9:35 pm
when does flight arrive?
ticket from seattle-tacoma international airport to hartsfield-jackson international airport
thanks a lot
anything else for you?
find rental car
wanna use it till march 7th?
two in the afternoon till 5th of march
want the car march 1st?
small car tomorrow
nice car at hartsfield-jackson international airport march 2nd compact car bolt.
I want car evening 4:30 and sunday this week
peachtree station march 3rd compact car cooper
total cost please
$54 in total
medium-sized car till next monday
4 cars hartsfield-jackson international airport march 3rd standard camry car
that is good
confirm hartsfield-jackson international airport pickup march 3rd 4:30 pm march 4th standard car
yes that works
car is reserved $31
thanks a lot
have a good day
I'm looking for a round trip flight.
Where are you leaving from and where are you going?
Leaving from San Diego and going to Portland.
What is your return date?
I need to be back by next Friday.
What is your departure date?
Leaving the 3rd of this month.
There are 4 options. There is a flight on Alaska Airlines leaving at 1:20 pm and returning at 5:40 pm for a total of $141 per ticket.
Sounds good. I would like to book an economy flight.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy ticket on the flight on Alaska Airlines leaving from San Diego on march 3rd at 1:20 pm and returning from Portland on march 8th at 5:40 pm.
Sounds good. What is the arrival time of the departure flight?
The departure flight arrives at 4:04 pm. Your ticket has been confirmed.
What is the return flight arrival time?
The return flight arrives at 8:24 pm.
Thanks. Can you also help me find a rental until the 7th of March.
Will you be picking up the rental on March 3rd.
No. On the 6th of this month.
At what time?
Picking up a standard car at half past 4 in the evening.
There is a standard Accord available at PDX International Airport on March 6th.
That one is good.
Should I book it.
Yes. Please book it.
Please confirm you want me to book a standard car on March 7th to be picked up from PDX International Airport on March 6th at 4:30 pm.
Great. What's the total?
Your total is $28. Your reservation was a success.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else?
Nope. That's it.
Okay. Have a wonderful day.
I need a round trip flight.
Where're you going?
I'm visiting Chicago.
Where from and when are you leaving, and when do you plan on heading back?
I'll be leaving from Vancouver Saturday this week and will head back on March 13th.
There's a $315 United Airlines flight leaving at 3:15 am and returning at 12:45 pm.
Sounds good. I want to buy them.
Just to make sure, you want 1 Economy United Airlines ticket from Vancouver to Chicago leaving March 2nd at 3:15 am and heading back on March 13th at 12:45 pm.
Works for me.
You're all set.
Thanks. I'll also need to pick up a rental car around 18:30 until the 10th of this month.
Want the car from March 2nd?
No, on the 7th.
There're 3 cars you might fancy. How about a Standard Accord at O'Hare International Airport on March 7th?
Works for me.
Want to reserve it?
Let's do it.
Just to make sure, you want a Standard car for pick up at O'Hare International Airport on March March 7th at 6:30 pm with a drop off on March 10th.
Sounds good. How much is it?
Your $93 rental is all set.
Thanks, that'll do it.
Have a good one.
I need to find a round trip flight.
What is your departure date and location and what is your destination?
I'm going to Portland from SD on the 9th of March.
What is your return date?
Returning on the 12th of March.
There is a flight on Alaska Airlines leaving at 1:20 pm and arriving at 5:40 pm for a total of $138 per ticket.
I would like to book a ticket on that flight.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 economy seat on the Alaska Airlines flight leaving from San Diego on March 9th at 1:20 pm and returning from Portland on March 12th at 5:40 pm.
What is the departing airport and the arrival time of that flight?
The return flight departs from San International Airport and arrives at 8:24 pm. Your flight has been confirmed.
I also need a rental in the area to be picked up at 6:30 in the evening.
Will you be booking your rental from March 9th until March 12th?
Actually I need the car from the 11th.
There is a standard Accord available at PDX International Airport for pickup on March 11th.
Please book the rental.
Please confirm you want me to book a standard car from PDX International Airport on March 11th at 6:30 pm and dropping off on March 12th.
Yes. That's perfect.
Your car rental reservation was a success.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Thanks. That will be all.
Okay. Please enjoy your day.
Can you find me a round trip flight?
What places and dates does your trip go between?
I'm leaving Atlanta next Wednesday to get to LAX. I'm heading back on the 9th of this month.
I found 4 reasonable flights, including a $234 American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:15 pm and returns at 5:25 pm.
From what airport does it leave?
It leaves Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Sounds great. Can you get me 1 flight ticket?
You want 1 economy American Airlines ticket for a trip between Atlanta and Los Angeles that leaves at 9:15 pm on March 6th, and returns at 5:25 pm on March 9th?
Sounds good. When does the first flight head to me? Can I get a refund, just in case?
I got the ticket. The flight comes to you at 1:47 am. You can't get a refund, though.
Can you also get a rental car for me?
Sure. You want the car on March 6th? And what specific time?
At six in the evening on the 8th of this month.
Will you need it until March 9th?
That is correct.
I found you 6 cars, including a standard Camry you can pick up at LAX International Airport on March 8th.
Sounds good. I want to reserve it.
You want to pick up a standard Camry from LAX International Airport at 6 pm on March 8th, and keep it until March 9th?
Yeah, that's good with me.
I reserved the car.
Thanks a ton.
Can I help you out with something else?
Not now. Thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
I need you to find me round trip flights.
Where are you leaving from? When will you leave and return?
I want to leave from Sydney on 4th of March and return on 8th of March.
Where will you leave from?
I want to leave from Chi-town. Any class is okay.
There is a United Airlines flight which has an outbound flight that leaves at 10:35 am and the return leaves at 10:05 pm. This ticket costs $374.
That flight sounds great.
Could I buy the tickets?
Yes, I would love to buy a ticket.
Would you confirm that you want to leave on United Airlines from Chicago and go to Sydney on United irlines? The departure date is March 4th and the return is March 8th. This outbound flight leaves at 10:35 am and the return leaves at 10:05 pm. You need 1 economy ticket. Is this correct?
Sounds good to me. Could I get a refund on the ticket? When will my return flight arrive?
Your ticket has been confirmed. The return flight gets there at 8:12 pm. This ticket cannot be refunded.
Would you find me a rencal cara there too?
Would you like the car from March 4th? Do you want to use the car until March 8th? What time do you need it?
Sounds good. I would like to pick up the car around five pm and I need the car next Thursday.
I hae 4 cars that you may be interested in. There's a nice car that you can pick up at Kingsford Smith International Airport on March 7th. It's a Standard Corolla.
How much is the cost in total?
It costs $33 in total.
Sounds good to me. I would like to reserve this car.
Could you confirm that you will pick up from Kingsford Smith International Airport on March 7th at 5 pm and dropping it off on March 8th? It's a Standard car.
Sounds great.
Your car was reserved.
Thank you for helping.
Would I be able to assist with something else?
No, but thanks for helping.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a round trip flight.
Where are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Chi-town.
What date are you leaving on and where are you traveling to?
I'm leaving on next Friday to CDMX.
What date are you returning?
I'm returning on March 14th and I prefer Delta Airlines.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 5:25 pm with the return flight departing at 3 pm for $306.
What time does the departing flight arrive and how many stops are there?
The flight arrives at 2:05 am and it has 1 stop.
That flight works for me.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Yes, I'd like to purchase two economy tickets.
Okay, confirm the details: 2 economy tickets for a Delta Airlines departing from Chicago on March 8th at 5:25 pm traveling to Mexico City. The return flight departs on March 14th at 3 pm.
Yes, that is correct.
I have purchased the tickets.
Is the ticket refundable?
No, the ticket is not refundable.
Thank you. I'd also like to pick up a standard rental car at around 6:30 pm.
Okay, are you returning the car on March 14th?
No, I need it until March 13th.
Are you picking up the car on March 8th?
No, I'm getting it on the 12th of this month.
There is a standard corolla available for pickup on March 12th from Benito Juarez International Airport.
How much does it cost?
The total cost is $23.
That sounds good, I'd like to reserve the car.
Okay, confirm the reservation details: picking up a standard rental car from Benito Juarez International Airport on March 12th at 6:30 pm and dropping off on March 13th.
Yes, that sounds good.
I have confirmed the reservation.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a great day.
I need a round trip flights in economy.
What's the departure city?
The departure city is SFO
What is the day of return?
I want to come back on the 6th
What's your destination? When do you want to travel?
My destination is Atlanta. I want to travel on tomorrow
There are 4 flights. American Airlines flight leaves at 3:50 pm, with return at 11:40 am. It costs $234
Yes, It's fine for me! I want to buy tickets for four people
4 tickets in Economy class, with American Airlines, from San Francisco to Atlanta, on March 2nd at 3:50 pm. Return flight on March 6th at 11:40 am. Is it correct?
No, I need tickets for 3 people.
3 passengers from San Francisco. Is it correct?
Yes, It is. When does the return plane land?
It land at 2:06 pm. Your ticket is booked!
Thanks. Now I need a car to rent there, around 2:30 pm
Do you need it from March 2nd?
No, I need it from 5th of March
Do you want the car until March 6th?
Yes, till March 6th, please
There's a Standard car, a Camry, available at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 5th
How much does the rental cost?
It costs $33 in total
I prefer a Compact car around five in the evening
There are 6 cars. There's a Compact car, a Bolt, at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 5th
Yes, It's fine! I want to book this
A Compact car at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 5th at 5 pm, till March 6th. Is it correct?
Yes, It is correct. Thanks
Your car is booked!
How much does the rental cost in total?
The rent costs $28 in total
Thanks a lot for helping
Can I do anything else for you?
No, It's all for now
Have a nice day
Will you find round trip flights to Portland, OR?
Departure date and time? Return date?
Departing from Los Angeles on 7th of this month and returning on the 13th.
I found 5. Alaska Airlines offers outbound flight that departs at 7:25 am and returns at 1:55 pm for $185.
Origin airport?
LAX International Airport.
One stop?
Yes, 1.
Great. Reserve tickets.
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket on Alaska Airlines from Los Angeles to Portland that departs on March 7th at 7:25 am and returns on March 13th at 1:55 pm.
Terrific.
I've completed your purchase.
Will you find a rental car there?
Pickup time?
6 in the evening.
From March 7th through March 13th?
March 11th 'til March 12th.
Accord, a Standard car, is available at PDX International Airport on March 11th.
Anything else? Pick up around eight pm.
Camry, a Standard car, is available at Portland Bus Station on March 11th.
Total cost?
$24.
Terrific. Reserve this car.
Please confirm s Standard car from Portland Bus Station for pick up on March 11th at 8 pm and returned on March 12th.
Nice.
I've reserved your car.
Thanks.
Have a fabulous day.
Please help me find a round trip flights.
Where do you plan to go and where you are coming from? When you will come back?
I want to go to Mexico City from NYC until March 11th.I want traveling in Economy please.
When do you plan to leave?
On 2nd of March.
How about flying with American Airlines for only $201 with an outbound flight leaves at 11:20 am and return flight leaves at 12:05 pm?
How many stops does it have?
1 stops.
That's good.
Will I buy you tickets now?
Yes, please.
Okay, you want 1 Economy seat at American Airlines going to Mexico City from New York on March 2nd until March 11th with an outbound flight leaves at 11:20 am and return flight leaves at 12:05 pm. Please confirm.
Yes. Which airport does it depart from and when does my return flight arrive?
it departs from JFK International Airport and return flight arrives at 4:36 pm. Your ticket is now confirmed!
Thanks, please help me find a rental car there.
Do you need it until March 11th?
No, until 10th of March.
DO you need it on March 2nd and what time do you need it?
I need the car on March 4th at five in the evening.
I got 6 cars and one is a standard car available for pick up at Estacion Buenavista on MArch 4th. It's a Camry.
How much would that cost?
$126 in total.
Any other option? Any type will be fine.
How about a Full-size car available for pick up at Benito Juarez International Airport on March 4th? It's a CR-V.
Any other else? I need a Compact car on Wednesday next week.
I got 4 cars and one is a Compact car available at Benito Juarez International Airport on March 6th. It is a Cooper.
That one is good.
Will I reserve you the car now?
Yes, please.
Okay, you want to reserve the compact car and you will pick it up from Benito Juarez International Airport on March 6th 5 pm until March 10th. Please confirm.
Yes, how much is the total cost?
$68 in total and your car is now reserved!
Thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Enjoy your day!
Find me round economy round trip flights to Portland, OR.
Whats the city of departure?
Leaving from Los Angeles
when are you leaving and coming back?
leaving on this saturday and coming back on wednesday next week
I have 5 flights. The alaska airlines flight leave at 7:25 am and has return on 1:55 pm and costs $172
that is good
Should i book it?
yes please book it as refundable tickets for four people.
please confirm: booking 4 tickets of an economy flight on alaska airlines to Portland from Los Angeles leaving on March 2nd at 7:25 am and has return on march 6th 1:55 pm and costs $172
that is good
your ticket is done
How many stops it has and whats the departing airport?
leaving from LAX international airport and it has 1 stop
thanks, now get me a intermediate car for rental.
what time will you pick it up and do you want it from March 2nd?
Pick up at 8 o"clock in the night next monday
Do you want it till March 6th?
No, till 5th of this month
I have 4 of them. You can pick up a standard Accord from Portland bus station on march 4th
what will be the cost?
It will be $35
please book it
Please confirm: Booking a standard Accord from Portland bus station on march 4th at 8 pm and drop off on march 5th
that is right
your car is booked
thanks for the help
any thing else?
no, thats it
have a good day!
Can you help me find a round trip flight?
Where are you going? Where are you leaving from? When are you coming back?
I am traveling from Philadelphia to London, UK. I would like to get back on the 9th of March.
When do you plan to leave?
I will be leaving on the 6th of this month.
American Airlines has a flight that leaves at 10:10 am for $354. The return flight will leave at 2:05 pm.
What other flights are available?
Delta Airlines has one leaving at 2:20 pm for $393. The return flight leaves at 8 am.
That one sounds good.
Would you like to buy the tickets now?
Yes, please book a ticket.
Please confirm: You are reserving 1 economy seat on a Delta Airlines flight from Philadelphia to London. You will leave on March 6th at 2:20 pm. Your return flight takes off on March 9th at 8 am.
Yes, that's right. When does my return flight arrive? Also, when does the outbound flight arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. The outbound flight arrives at 10:14 am. The return flight arrives at 9:06 pm.
Could you also find a rental car for me? I want to pick up the car on the 7th around 6 in the evening. I will need it till 8th of March.
I have 5 cars you may like. There is an Accord available at Gatwick International Airport for pickup on March 7th. That's a standard car.
Okay, sounds good.
Do you want to reserve that car now?
Yes, please do that.
Please confirm: You are reserving a standard car for pickup on March 7th at 6 pm. You will be picking it up from Gatwick International Airport. The return date is March 8th.
Yes, that's right.
Your car has been reserved.
Thanks, that was all.
Have a great day.
I need to find round trip flights, can you help me.
Where are you going to go? When are you planning to leave?
I plan to leave 2nd of this month. I am going to Phoenix and like to travel in economy.
When do you plan to return?
I would like to come back on the 13th of this month.
What is your point of departure?
I want to leave from ATL.
I have found a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 6:50 am and the return flight will depart at 11:55 am. This ticket costs $248.
Is this a refundable ticket? Are there zero stops on this flight?
Sorry, but the ticket is not refundable. It has 1 stop.
That flight sounds fine with me.
Should I buy you the tickets for it?
Yes, please book the ticket for me.
Okay, confirm these details for me: the flight departs from Atlanta and goes to Phoenix on Delta Airlines. The flight leaves on March 2nd at 6:50 am and comes back on March 13th at 11:55 am with 1 passenger in economy.
No, I have three people in my group.
Please confirm these details for me: there are 3 passengers in economy seating class.
Yes, that sounds fine.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
What airport is the flight leaving from?
The flight leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
What time does the onward flight arrive?
The onward flight will get there at 8:02 am.
Thanks very much for your help. Can you also find a rental car for me there?
Would you like to have the car starting on March 2nd?
I want the car beginning on 8th of March.
Do you wish to use the car until March 13th?
I would like it until 12th of March.
What time will you be needing it?
I would like to pick the car up around morning 11.
There is a good car available that you can pickup on March 8th at Sky Harbor International Airport. The car is a standard, it is an Accord.
What is the cost in total?
Your reservation will cost $136 total.
Is there anything that you find available?
There is a nice car that you can pickup on March 8th at Sky Harbor International Airport. This car is a standard car, it is a Camry.
Is there anything else that's available? I would like a compact car until the 9th of this month.
I have 5 cars that you might like. One is a car that is available at Phoenix Union Station and you can pick it up on March 8th. the car is a compact car, it is a Bolt.
That sounds very good to me.
Is there anything else you need help with?
I would like to make a reservation for this car.
Please confirm these details if you would: You are picking up a compact car from Phoenix Union Station on March 8th at 11 am and dropping it off on March 9th.
Yes that sounds fine.
The car has been reserved for you and it will cost $30 total.
Thanks very much for your help. That was all I needed.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you find a round trip flight for me?
Where would you like to go?
To Portland, OR.
From where? When would you like to return?
I'm travelling from Seattle and need to be back by the 14th of this month.
When do you want to leave?
On the 4th of this month.
I've found 3 flights. There's an American Airlines flight at 8:05 am with a return flight leaving at 6 am for $78.
Is there any other flights available? I just need 1 seat.
I've found 2 flights. There's a Delta Airlines flight for $71. The outbound flight leaves at 7:55 am and the return flight leaves at 9:35 am.
What time will I get home? Is it refundable?
It will return at 10:33 am and is not refundable.
That flight will work for me.
Shall I reserve tickets?
Yes place. I'd like an economy ticket.
To confirm, you would like 1 economy ticket from Seattle to Portland flying Delta Airlines? The flight will leave March 4th at 7:55 am and will return on March 14th on a flight leaving at 9:35 am.
Sure. When will the onward flight arrive? What airport does it depart from?
Your ticket is reserved. The onward flight arrives at 8:53 am and departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Can you find a rental car for 1:30 pm? I'll need it until the 12th.
So you would like it on March 4th?
No, I need it on March 8th.
There's a nice standard car like an Accord available at PDX International Airport on March 8th.
That will work.
Anything else I can help you with?
Can you reserve that car?
To confirm, you would like the standard car from PDX International Airport from March 8th at 1:30 pm until March 12th?
Yes please. That will work.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thanks so much
Anything else I can help with?
Nope, thanks again.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
I'm looking for a round trip plane ticket on Tuesday next week for two people going to San Fran.
What is your return date?
The 14th please.
What is your destination?
Going to New York City.
I have 3 flights for you. American Airlines has an 8:30 pm flight which returns at 4:45 pm for $216.
What's the departure airport?
That is SFO International Airport.
Anything else? How about something on March 6th on United Airlines?
United Airlines has a 5:50 am flight with a 6:05 am return which costs $206.
When's the arrival time of the onward flight and how many stops are there?
The flight has 0 stops and the onward flight gets in at 3:16 pm.
Sounds good, thank you.
Would you like to make reservations?
Yes, I sure would.
Confirming 2 economy tickets on United Airlines from San Francisco to New York on March 6th at 5:50 am and coming back March 14th at 6:05 am.
Sounds fine. Where does it leave from?
From SFO International Airport. Your reservation is complete.
Thanks. I also need a car to rent until the 9th.
Starting on March 6th?
No, I need it until March 8th.
What time would you like it?
At 17:00 and I think I'll need it until the 13th of March. Could I get a standard car?
I have 5 standard cars. There's an Accord at Grand Central Station on March 8th.
Okay, that's good.
Would you like to book the car?
Yes, I would.
Confirming a standard vehicle rental on March 8th until March 13th at Grand Central Station at 5 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
The car has been booked.
What's that going to cost?
It will be a total of $180.
Thank you very much.
Would you like anything else?
No, thank you.
It's my pleasure.
I need a round trip flight on United Airlines leaving the 10th of March returning the 14th of March.
What is the starting point?
San Fran.
Where are you flying to?
Chicago.
United Airlines has one for $254 leaving at 9:20 pm and the return flight at 1:50 pm.
Is it refundable? Are there zero stops?
You can get a refund but there is 1 stop.
That's perfect.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
One Economy ticket please.
I will book a flight on United Airlines going to Chicago from San Francisco this March 10th at 9:20 pm with a return flight March 14th at 1:50 pm for 1 Economy traveler if you agree.
I agree.
The ticket is yours.
Super. I also need a Standard car rental there around 1:45 pm.
Will the car be needed from March 10th until March 14th?
I need the rental from the 12th around half past 4 in the evening.
O'Hare International Airport has 5 Standard choices, one is an Accord, available March 12th
How much money is it?
$70 is the cost.
What are Compact vehicle choices?
One of 5 choices is a Bolt Compact available March 12th at Chicago Union Station.
That's perfect.
I will reserve the Compact from March 12th at 4:30 pm until March 14th available at Chicago Union Station with your permission.
Permission granted. What's the total charge?
You spent $50 all together on your reservation.
Great. I'm done for now.
Enjoy the day.
Find me a round trip flight
when are you leaving and from where?
Leaving form Toronto, Ontario on next tuesday
where are you going to?
Traveling to ATL, i like Delta airlines and economy seats
when is the return date?
Its march 7th
There is a delta airlines flight that leaves at 7:15 am and returns 7:50 am and costs $238
Thats is good
should i get the tickets?
yes, make it for 1 person
Please confirm: Booking an economy ticket for 1 on delta airlines flight that leaves at 7:15 am on march 5th from Toronto to Atlanta and returns 7:50 am on march 7th and costs $238
that is right
your booking is done
whats the landing time for my return flight?
It is 5:08 pm
is the ticket refundable and when does the onward flight arrive?
The ticket is non refundable and the onward flight arrives at 11:31 am
Thanks. Now find me a small rental car till march 7th
do you want it form March 5th? and at what time do you need it?
I will pick it up at five pm form 6th of march
I have 6 cars. There is a Bolt, a compact car which you can pick up from Hartsfield-jackson international airport on march 6th
what the total cost?
its $30 only
that is good
Should i book the car
yes, please do
Please confirm: Booking a compact car for pick up from Hartsfield-jackson international airport at 5 pm on march 6th and drop off march 7th
yes, thats right
your booking is done
thanks a lot
have a good day
Would you find round trip flights for me?
When will you come back and when are you leaving? Where will you visit?
I will leave on the 5th of this month and am going to Portland, OR. I'd like to get back on March 12th.
Where will you leave from?
I want to leave Chi-town.
I have 1 flight that is convenient. It's a United Airlines flight that leaves at 12:45 pm and return leaves at 10:45 pm. It costs $280.
How many stops does the flight have and when does my return flight get there?
The return flight arrives at 6:20 am and there is 1 stop.
This flight sounds good to me.
Should I purchase tickets for it?
Yes, please book me a ticket.
Could you confirm that you want to book 1 economy ticket flight from Chicago to Portland on United Airlines on March 5th and return on March 12th? The outbound flight leaves at 12:45 pm and the returnleaves at 10:45 pm.
No, there is one person in my group.
Could you confirm that you want to book 1 ticket on United Airlines?
That sounds great.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Would you find me a rental car there?
Would you like to have the car from March 5th to March 12th?
I need it until 10th of this month from next Friday.
What time do you need it?
I want to pickup the car around 8 o"clock in the night.
There is a nice car at Portland Bus Station that you can pick up on March 8th. It's a standard accord.
Sounds perfect. Reserve this car for me.
I want to confirm that you are picking up the car from Portland Bus Station on March 8th at 8 pm and dropping it of March 10th. It's a standard car.
Sounds good. What is the cost in total?
Your car was reserved and it costs $62 in total.
Thank you for helping. That is what I needed.
Have a good day.
Hello. Can you find me a round trip flight?
Sure thing. When are you planning on leaving?
On the 3rd of March.
Where are you going, and when are you returning?
I'm visiting Atlanta and plan to stay until the 13th of this month.
Where are you leaving from?
From Philly.
There is an American Airlines flight you could take that leaves at 10:10 am, returns at 3:25 pm, and costs $213.
What airport does it leave from?
From PHL International Airport.
When will the return flight arrive?
At 8:31 pm.
Sounds good. Can you buy me some flight tickets, regardless of class?
I will purchase 1 economy ticket for the American Airlines flight that goes between Philadelphia and Atlanta at 10:10 am on March 3rd and returns at 3:25 pm on March 13th.
Actually, make the ticket premium economy.
You'd rather have 1 premium economy ticket?
That is correct.
I got the ticket.
When will the onward flight be here? How many stops?
It arrives at 2:56 pm and has 1 stop.
Thanks. I also need a rental car. I'd like to pick it up at about 3:30 pm and keep it until the 9th of this month.
Want to get it on March 3rd?
No, on Tuesday next week.
You could pick up a standard Camry from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 5th.
I'm not sure. What's another car I can get?
Also available at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 5th is a standard Cruze.
Sounds good to me. I want to rent it.
You want to pick up the standard Cruze from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport at 3:30 pm on March 5th, and return it on March 9th?
That is correct.
I reserved the car.
Thanks for the help.
Can I aid you any further?
Not now. Thank you very much!
Have yourself a wonderful day!
Can you help me find flights for my trip?
Absolutely. Where are you flying from and when are you flying back?
I need to fly from Phoenix and come back on March 14th.
Thanks, and when do you want to fly out?
On the 5th of this month please.
Great, and lastly, where do you want to fly to?
SFO please.
Lovely. I've found an American Airlines flight for $188, it leaves at 7:35 am and returns at 8:10 am. How does that sound?
Can you tell me when both flights arrive?
Sure, the outgoing flight arrives at 11:55 am and the return arrives at 12:49 pm.
Yeah that sounds perfect.
Do you want me to book you tickets?
Yes please. Can you book 3 economy tickets?
Sure. Can you just confirm that you're happy for me to book 3 economy tickets for the American Airlines flight from Phoenix to San Francisco? The flight leaves at 7:35 am on March 5th and returns at 8:10 am on March 14th.
Yes, perfect
Great, all booked for you!
Thank you very much
Can I do anything else for you?
Yeah, can you book me a hire car?
Sure, do you want to pick it up on March 5th?
No, I don't need it until March 9th, and I only need it until March 11th.
Okay, what time do you want to pick it up?
Probably around five in the evening
There's a standard Altima you can pick up from SFO International Airport on March 9th. Does that sound any good?
Possibly, how much will it cost?
$64 in total
Yeah ok, can you reserve it please?
Sure. Can you just confirm you want me to book the standard car at SFO International Airport, to pick up at 5 pm on March 9th and drop off on March 11th?
Yes please
Excellent - all booked for you
Thank you!
No problem. Can I help with anything else?
No thanks, that was all
Okay, have a lovely day.
I need help looking for round trip flights. I would like a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves on March 9th for 2 people.
Where are you departing from? And what's your return date?
I'm departing from Chi-town and I want to return on the 14th of this month.
Where will you be going?
I'm going to Philadelphia.
I've found a Southwest Airlines flight. The outbound portion leaves at 9:05 pm. The return portion leaves at 8:35 pm. It's $141 per ticket.
I like the sound of that. Please purchase for me Economy tickets.
I'll purchase you 2 Economy ticket for Chicago to Philadelphia on Southwest Airlines. Outbound is on March 9th at 9:05 pm. Return is on March 14th at 8:35 pm. Is everything correct?
Everything sounds good.
I've purchased the tickets.
I also need to rent a car there, preferable a Standard car.
Will you need the car until March 14th?
I'll need it until the 13th of this month. And I want to pick it up around three pm.
Will you be picking up the car on March 9th?
I'll pick it up on the 10th.
There'a nice Standard Altima available for pick up at 30th Street Station on March 10th.
How much is that in total?
It is $90 in total.
Okay, that works. Please reserve me the car.
I'll reserve you a Standard car for pick up at 30th Street Station on March 10th at 3 pm with a return on March 13th. Is everything correct?
Yeah, that's what I want.
I've reserved the car for you.
Thanks for all the help.
Do you need me for anything else?
Nope, your help is greatly appreciated.
Have a wonderful day!
Hi, I need a round trip flight.
When are you leaving?
On March 2nd.
Leaving from where and going where?
I'm going from NYC to Paris, France and I'd like to travel in economy.
Returning when please?
The 9th of this month.
I have a 3:40 pm American Airlines flight for $319 which returns at 4:05 am.
Sounds like a good one.
Do you want to make reservations?
I do, yes.
Confirming an American Airlines flight from New York to Paris at 3:40 pm on March 2nd and returning March 9th at 4:05 am for 1 economy passenger.
Great, thank you.
The ticket has been booked.
Is that refundable ticket?
No, I'm sorry.
When does the return flight get in and where does it leave from?
Its departure is from JFK International Airport at 6:52 am.
Thank you. I need a rental car too please.
When would you like it?
At 6:30 pm.
Planning to keep it until March 9th?
Until Friday next week.
Starting on March 2nd?
On the 6th of this month please.
There are 4 cars I can recommend. There is a standard Accord on March 6th which can be retrieved from Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
What else is there?
I also have a standard Cruze on March 6th at Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
For how much please?
It's $74 total.
Sounds like that would work.
Would you like to book that one?
Yes, please do.
Confirming a standard rental from Charles de Gaulle International Airport on March 6th at 6:30 pm and returning it on March 8th.
Sounds good, thanks.
The car has been booked.
Thank you for your help.
Anything else today?
No, that's all I need.
Thank you very much.
I will be traveling soon to visit a friend. Is there any economy class flight going to SD from San Fran?
When do you want to come back?
Look for return flights on the 13th.
When do you want to leave?
On the 11th of March.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight. Departing flight takes off at 6:10 am and returning flight takes off at 5:10 pm. The cost is $110.
That one sounds great.
Do you want to book tickets?
Yes, book a ticket for 1 person.
Please confirm: Booking 1 Economy class ticket from Alaska Airlines. Departing from San Francisco on March 11th at 6:10 am with destination San Diego. Returning flight on March 13th at 5:10 pm.
That is correct. Is the ticket refundable? Does the flight have any stop?
The ticket has been booked. It is not a refundable ticket and it has 0 stops.
I will also need to get a rental car. Is there anything medium-sized from the 12th until the 13th?
At what time do you want to pick it up?
I want ti pick it up at 6 in the evening.
There are 6 cars you might like. There is a Standard Accord car available for pick up at Santa Fe Depot on March 12th.
That sounds great.
Do you want to book it?
Yes, please book it.
Please confirm: Booking a standard card from March 12th until March 13th. Available for pickup at Santa Fe Depot at 6 pm.
That is correct.
The car has been booked.
What is the cost of it?
It has a total cost of $30.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
Can you look up round trip flights for me?
What date are you planning to return?
the 13th of this month.
When did you want to leave and from where?
Philadelphia on the 10th of this month.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Chicago.
I found 3 possible flights for you. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am with a return flight at 6:40 pm. The ticket is $120.
How many stops
There are 0 stops.
That sounds good. Can you book three economy tickets for me?
You want 3 economy tickets from Philadelphia to Chicago on American Airlines leaving at 10:10 am on March 10th with a return flight departure at 6:40 pm on March 13th. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets are confirmed.
Which airport does it leave from?
PHL International Airport.
And when does it arrive in Chicago?
You will arrive at 11:21 am.
Great, thanks. I'd also like to get a rental car.
Did you want to keep it until March 13th? What time do you want to pick it up?
Yes, I want it until the 13th. A 12:30 pm pick up would be great.
Did you want to pick it up on March 10th?
No, I want to get it on the 12th.
There are 5 possibilities. There's a standard Accord available at O'Hare International Airport on March 12th.
That works for me.
Shall I reserve the car?
Yes, please do.
To confirm: You want to get the standard car from O'Hare International Airport at 12:30 pm on March 12th and return it March 13th.
Correct. What will that cost?
The total will be $31. Your reservation is confirmed.
Thanks so much. That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I need round trip flights.
When is your return date?
The 13th of March.
Where is your starting point?
The trip begins in Las Vegas.
Where are you going?
I'm going to SF.
When is the departure date?
March 2nd.
One choice of 3 is on American Airlines. The flight leaves at 5:30 am with a return flight leaving at 5:30 pm for $116.
That flight will work. I need tickets for three.
I will reserve 3 Economy tickets on American Airlines from Las Vegas to San Francisco leaving March 2nd at 5:30 am returning March 13th at 5:30 pm with your permission.
Permission granted.
The reservation is set.
You're the best.
Do you need further assistance?
A rental car there from the 5th of this month until the 12th of March.
What time do you prefer?
Half past 12 in the afternoon is good.
One of 2 available is Standard car called the Altima available on March 5th from the SFO International Airport.
How much does it cost?
It would cost $266.
Reserve that car please.
I will reserve the Standard car from the SFO International Airport with a pick up March 5th at 12:30 pm and a drop off of March 12th with your permission.
Permission granted.
The car is in your name.
You're the best.
Do you need something else?
That's all, thanks.
Have a good one.
I'm trying to find a round trip economy flight.
Where are you leaving from?
From LAX and it's for four people. I want to return March 12th.
When do you want to depart and where are you going?
I'm going to San Fran on the 3rd and I'd like something on American Airlines.
I have 1 American Airlines flight leaving at 6:30 AM and returning at 3:50 PM for $102.
Great, I'd like to buy tickets.
Confirming 4 economy tickets on American Airlines from Los Angeles to San Francisco on March 3rd at 6:30 AM and returning March 12th at 3:50 PM.
Thank you. Where does it fly into?
The destination Airport is SFO International Airport and the reservation is complete.
Thanks. I also need a car to rent.
On March 3rd?
No, on the 5th.
When would you like to pick up the car and are you planning to return it March 12th?
I'd like it at three in the afternoon on Thursday next week and I'll return it on the 11th.
I have a standard Altima at SFO International Airport on March 7th.
What else is there? I'm actually going to need it until the 8th of March.
I have 5 possible vehicles for you. There is a standard Civic available on March 7th at Salesforce Transit Center.
That will work.
How else may I help you?
I'd like to reserve the car.
Confirming a standard rental for a March 7th pick up at 3 PM from Salesforce Transit Center and a March 8th return.
Okay, thank you.
The reservation was successful.
How much is that?
It's $31 total.
Thank you very much.
Anything else today?
No, I'm good.
Thank you very much.
I'd like a round trip flight.
Where are you going? Where will you be coming from?
I'm going to London, UK from Atlanta.
When will you be back?
I wanna be back March 13th. I'm fine with any class.
When do you want to leave?
On the 6th.
An American Airlines flight leaves at 8:40 pm and costs $294. The return flight will leave at 2:05 pm.
That's a good one.
Would you like tickets?
Yes. I'll need 3 tickets.
You need 3 economy class tickets to go to London from Atlanta through American Airlines on March 6th. You'll return on March 13th. The flight leaves at 8:40 pm, and the return flight will leave at 2:05 pm. Is this right?
Yes, that's all.
Your tickets have been booked.
I'd also like a rental car for the 11th, and I'll need it until March 12th. I'll pick it up half past 3 in the afternoon.
An Accord is available at Gatwick International Airport for pickup on March 11th. It's a standard car.
What does it cost?
It costs $32.
That's fine then.
Would you like to reserve it?
Yes I would.
Picking up a car from Gatwick International Airport on March 11th at 3:30 pm until March 12th. It's a standard car. Is this right?
Yes, it's right.
Your car is reserved.
Thanks for the help.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
search round trips
where are you headed?
I am going to la to new york
when will you be back?
14th of march 4 people
when will you leave>
8th of march
american airlines 4 flights for 7:45 pm and comes back 6:20 pm and is $258
that is good
should I get tickets?
yes I do
New york to los angeles on american airlines on march 8th to march 14th and 6:20 pm and 7:45 pm and 4 people on economy
yes that works
ticket is ready for 1 stop flight
can I get a refund?
No you cannot
I want the car around 14:00
march 8th and march 14th
I need till march 11th and need it march 10th
6 cars and car at lax international airport on march 10th and standard camry
thanks I want it
pick it up lax international airport on march 10th and march 11th at 2 pm and standard
yes that works
it is done
thanks a lot
anything else then?
no thank you
have a nice day
Will you find round trip flights?
Departure date and time?
Departing from LAX on 4th of this month.
Destination? Return date?
Portland, OR. Return on 12th of March.
Alaska Airlines offers outbound flight that departs at 5:15 am and return flight at 10:10 am for $120.
Great.
Buy tickets?
Yes, for one.
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket on Alaska Airlines from Los Angeles to Portland on March 4th at 5:15 am and return on March 12th at 10:10 am.
Terrific.
I've reserved your ticket.
Return flight arrival time? Refundable ticket?
12:40 pm. Nonrefundable ticket.
Thanks. Will you find a rental car there?
From March 4th through March 12th? Pickup time?
Pick up at 11 am next Wednesday. I'll keep it 'til March 7th.
I found 6. Accord, a Standard car, is available at PDX International Airport on March 6th.
Total cost?
$28.
Great. Reserve it.
Please confirm s Standard car from PDX International Airport to be picked up on March 6th at 11 am and dropped off on March 7th.
Fantastic.
I've reserved your car.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a wonderful day.
I need help looking for round trip flights.
What are your departure and return dates?
I want to depart on Sunday this week and return on March 11th.
Where will you be going?
I'm going to NY.
And where will you be traveling from?
I'm traveling from Atlanta, GA.
There are 4 flights that match. There's an American Airlines flight for $150 per ticket. The departure is at 3:25 pm and the return is at 11:45 am.
Is it a refundable ticket? Also what's the departure airport?
It is not a refundable ticket. The departure airport is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
What other flights are there? How about for a return on the 13th with 3 people?
There's a Delta Airlines flight for $133 per ticket. The departure is at 3:40 pm. The return is at 11:25 am.
I like that one. Please buy me Economy tickets.
I'll get you 3 Economy tickets for Atlanta to New York on Delta Airlines. The departure is March 3rd at 3:40 pm. The return is March 13th at 11:25 am. Is everything correct?
Yeah, everything is correct. What's the departure airport? And what time does the return flight arrive?
The tickets have been purchased. The departure airport is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. The return flight has an arrival at 1:47 pm.
Thanks for that help. I'll also need a rental car when I'm there.
Will you be renting the car on March 3rd?
I'll be renting it on the 4th of this month.
What time would you like to pick it up? And will the return be on March 13th?
Pick up should be around 6:30 pm. I'll need the car until the 7th. Any car is fine.
There are 10 matches. There's a nice Standard Accord available at Grand Central Station for pick up on March 4th.
How much will that cost?
It will cost $69.
Okay, that's good. Please get me that car.
I'll reserve you a Standard car at Grand Central Station for pick up on March 4th 6:30 pm and a return on March 7th. Is everything correct?
Yeah, that's all correct.
The car has been reserved.
Thanks so much.
Do you need any more help?
No. Your help has been great.
Have a terrific day!
I would like to find a round trip leaving on March 10th and returning on the 12th of march.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from ATL.
Where are you traveling?
I am traveling to LA.
There is a flight with American Airlines that is leaving on 9:15 pm and returns at 9:05 am for $237.
I would like to purchase tickets.
Booking 1 economy ticket from Atlanta to Los Angeles with American Airlines on March 10th leaving at 9:15 pm and returns at March 12th at 9:05 am.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your ticket has been purchased.
Can you find a car from the 11th of March at 16:30?
Do you need the car until March 12th?
Yes, that would be perfect.
There is a Standard Camry at LAX International Airport on March 11th.
What is the total cost?
Your reservation cost is $31.
That is perfect thank you.
Do you want to reserve the car?
Yes, I would like to rent the car.
1 standard car from lax international airport on March 11th at 4:30 pm and drop-off date is March 12th.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your car has been reserved.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all thank you.
Have a good day.
Hi, could you help me book some round trip flights please?
Sure, when do you intend to return?
I will likely come back on March 8th.
Sure, and where will you be departing from and travelling to?
I will be travelling from New York City to Chi-town.
I see, and when do you plan to depart?
I will be departing of 5th of March to Portland, OR instead, and this will be for 1 passenger only.
Sure, there are 2 available flights, one of which is an American Airlines flight departing at 4:45 pm and returning at 7:20 am which costs $323.
This sounds great to me!
Would you like e to purchase the tickets for you?
Sure, could you purchase economy class tickets for me?
Sure, please confirm your purchase of 1 economy class tickets for the American airlines flight from New York to Portland from March 5th at 4:45 pm to March 8th at 7:20 am.
That sounds great! May I know if this is a refundable ticket and which airport will I be arriving at?
Your ticket has been purchased. Your tickets is unfortunately un-refundable and you will be travelling to PDX International Airport.
Thank you, could you also help me search for a rental car in that area?
What time will you be picking up the car?
Around morning 9:30, I suppose.
Sure, and will you be using the car till March 8th.
No, I will only be using it till the 7th of March.
Will you be using the car from March 5th?
No, I will only need it from the 6th of March.
I see, would you like a Standard Accord available for your pickup at PDX International Airport on March 6th?
Are there any alternatives?
How about a Standard Civic available for your pickup at PDX International Airport on March 6th?
That sounds fine with me.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Sure, could you help me do so please>
Sure, please confirm your reservation for a Standard car available for your pickup at PDX International Airport on March 6th at 9:30 am and for use till March 7th.
Sure, how much will this cost me?
Your reservation has been made! This will set you back $37 in total.
Thank you so much for your help!
Can I further assist you?
No, that is all the help I need, thank you!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
I will be traveling with some friends. Can you find available round trip flights?
When do you plan to leave? When do you plan to return?
Look for three tickets from the 11th to the 14th of this month.
From where are you leaving? And where do you want to fly to?
Look for something from Atlanta, GA to SD.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight. The departing flight takes off at 12:05 pm and the returning flight takes off at 1:20 pm. It has a cost of $258.
That sounds great. I want to book some tickets.
Please confirm: Booking 3 Economy class tickets from Southwest Airlines. Departing from Atlanta on March 11th at 12:05 pm with destination San Diego. Returning flight takes off at 1:20 pm on March 14th.
That is correct. Is the ticket refundable?
The ticket has been booked. No, it is not refundable.
I will also need a car in there. Is there any large car available?
Until when do you want the car? Until March 14th?
Yes, it is okay that date. I want to pick it up at half past 4 in the evening?
Do you want to pick it up on March 11th?
No, I want it from March 12th.
There are 6 possible cars for you. There is a Full-size Cherokee available for pickup on March 12th at Santa Fe Depot.
What is the cost of it?
It has a total cost of $68.
That sounds great, I want to book it.
Please confirm: Booking a full-size car from March 12th until March 14th. Available for pick up at Santa Fe Depot at 4:30 pm.
That is correct.
The car has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I need to find round trip flights.
Alright, where from and to?
Leave from San Fran, going to Atlanta, GA. I'd like to travel American Airlines and leave on the 5th of this month.
And when are you planning on returning?
Come back on the 14th of this month.
I found a $230 American Airlines ticking leaving at 3:50 pm. The return flight leaves at 11:40 am.
Alright, that would work.
Would you like me to purchase tickets?
Yes, I need three Economy tickets.
Alright, please confirm the following: You want to book 3 Economy American Airlines tickets round trip from San Francisco to Atlanta, with a departure date of March 5th at 3:50 pm and a return date of March 14th. The outgoing flight leaves at 11:40 am. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets have been confirmed.
I also need a rental car.
What time would you like to pick up the rental car? Do you want it through March 14th ?
I want to pick up the car at 15:30 and return the 13th of this month.
Do you want the first day of the car rental to be March 5th ?
Actually I need a start date of the 9th of this month.
I found 4 possible cars. There is a Standard Camry available at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, pick up March 9th.
And how much would that be?
It would be $152 in total.
Yeah, that works, go ahead and reserve the car.
Please confirm the following: You want to rent a Standard car with a pick up at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport starting March 9th at 3:30 pm and a return date of March 13th. Is this correct?
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservation is complete.
Thanks for the help, that's all I needed.
Enjoy your day!
I'd like you to search round trip flights for me.
What is your destination and origin?
I'm going to be traveling to Chi-town from London, UK.
What date do you plan on leaving and when will you be coming back?
I'm leaving Tuesday next week and I'd like to return on the 12th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 0:10 am with a return flight at 12:30 PM. The ticket price is $422.
That flight sounds good can you help me buy 3 economy tickets?
Sure, please confirm the following details. You'd like to purchase 3 economy tickets for American Airlines from London going to Chicago departing March 5th at 0:10 am with a return flight March 12th at 12:30 pm.
Yes thats correct. Are the tickets refundable? Which Airport will the flight be departing from?
Your tickets have been confirmed, they are not refundable. The flight will be departing from Heathrow International Airport.
Thanks, Can you help me find a rental car there? I'd like to pick it up at three in the afternoon.
Would you like to have the car from March 5th?
No, I'd like to pick it up on the 8th of March.
Will you be using the vehicle until March 12th?
I only need it until March 11th.
Okay, there is a car available at O'Hare International Airport on March 8th. It is a standard car, It is an Accord.
That sounds fine to me.
Would you like to reserve this vehicle?
Yes, I'd like to rent it.
Please confirm the following is correct. You'd are reserving a standard car from O'Hare International Airport Picking up at 3 pm March 8th and returning it March 11th.
Yeah that is all correct. How much will it cost?
The car has been reserved. The total cost will be $84.
Thank you for the help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No thats it, thanks.
You're welcome, have a good day.
I'll be traveling for work soon. Could you help me find round trip flights?
Please let me know when you wish to leave.
I intend to leave on Sunday this week.
What's your destination?
Please make the search for 1 person leaving for SFO, and returning on the 13th.
What's your origin city?
I'll head out from Seattle, WA.
Okay. How does a 12 pm outbound and 2:55 pm inbound flight on Alaska Airlines at $138 per ticket, sound?
That flight works for me. Could you help me purchase the flight tickets?
Sure. Please confirm that you'd like to purchase 1 Economy class ticket on the Alaska Airlines flight from Seattle to San Francisco that departs March 3rd at 12 pm and returns on March 13th at 2:55 pm.
That is correct. Please find out how many stops the flight has, and whether the ticket is refundable.
I have confirmed your ticket, which has 0 stops. I'm sorry, but the ticket is non refundable.
Okay thanks. Please find me any type of rental car there.
Would you like to keep the car until March 13th?
No, I wish to keep it until 10th of March.
What time do you wish to pick it up?
I'd like to pick up the car around 16:00.
Do you want to pick up the car on March 3rd?
I wish to have the car starting next Tuesday.
I found 10 cars that might interest you. One is a nice, Standard Altima, available for pickup on March 5th from SFO International Airport.
There's been a slight change of plans. Please find out whether there's any car available for pick up around 16:30 from the 6th.
I found 9 cars that might interest you. One is a nice, Compact Bolt available for pickup on March 6th from Salesforce Transit Center.
How much does it cost in total?
The total cost of your reservation is $112.
Please tell me the next available car.
The other is a nice Standard Civic, available for pickup on March 6th from Salesforce Transit Center.
How much does it cost in total?
The total cost of your reservation is $136.
I like that car and wish to reserve it.
Please confirm that you'll be picking a Standard car from Salesforce Transit Center on March 6th at 4:30 pm, and dropping it off on March 10th.
That is correct.
I have successfully booked your car.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you, and do have yourself a lovely day!
I need help finding roundtrip flights please.
Returning when please?
On the 12th of this month.
Where are you going and when would you like to leave?
Going to LAX on the 5th please.
Leaving from where?
From NY please.
I have an 7:45 pm American Airlines flight with a 6:20 pm return for $268.
Anything else please?
I also have a Delta Airlines flight at 7:30 am for $226, which comes back at 10:55 pm.
With how many stops?
With 0 stops.
Sounds great, thank you.
Anything else today?
I'd like to buy tickets.
Confirming a flight on Delta Airlines from New York to Los Angeles on March 5th at 7:30 am, returning March 12th at 10:55 pm for 1 economy fare.
Great. What's the arrival time of the onward flight?
That's 10:40 am. The ticket has been purchased.
Is it refundable?
No, it's not.
Thank you. I also need a rental car on March 9th until the 12th of this month. I'd like to have the car by half past 6 in the evening.
I have a standard Civic available at Union Station on March 9th.
For how much?
It's $102 total.
That will work.
Would you like to book the car?
Yes, I would.
Confirming a standard rental on March 9th for a 6:30 pm pickup from Union Station and a March 12th return.
Perfect, thank you.
The reservation is complete.
Thanks for you help.
Happy to help, thank you.
I'd like to find a roundtrip flight to San Francisco.
When are you planning to leave and return? And where would you like to fly out of?
I need to leave on the 8th from Seattle and return on the 14th.
I have 5 options for you. There is an Alaska Airlines flight which leaves at 12 PM and returns at 2:55 PM and the ticket price is $125.
What else is there?
There is also an American Airlines flight with a 10:25 PM departure and a 7:40 PM return for $154.
What's the arrival time of the return?
That is 11:43 PM.
Where does the flight leaves from?
The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
That will work. I'd like to buy tickets.
Confirming 1 economy ticket on an American Airlines flight from Seattle to San Francisco on March 8th at 10:25 PM and returning March 14th at 7:40 PM.
That's all correct.
The reservation is complete.
Thank you. I also need a car to rent.
On March 8th?
On the 11th of March and I'll need it until the 14th.
What time would you like to get the car?
In the afternoon 12:30.
I have 6 possible cars for you. There is a standard Altima available on March 11th for pickup from SFO International Airport.
That will work.
Would you like to book the car?
Yes I would.
Confirming a standard vehicle rental on March 11th for a 12:30 PM pick up from SFO International Airport and a return on March 14th.
Great. How much is that?
The total price is $81 and the reservation is complete.
Thank you for helping me.
Anything else today?
No I'm good.
Thank you very much.
Find a round trip flights on any airline to ATL.
What day are you returning?
I am returning on the 13th of this month.
What is your departure date?
I am departing next Friday?
What is your departure city?
I am departing out of New York.
There is an American Airlines flight with departure times of 11:20 am and then at 6:25 am respectively with a total price of $122.
What time does the two flights land?
The first flight lands at 1:42 pm and the second flight lands at 8:47 am.
That works for me.
Shall I get you tickets?
Yes, book me 3 tickets in any class.
You want 3 Economy class tickets on American Airlines flying from New York to Atlanta. The first flight departs at 11:20 am on March 8th and the second flight departs at 6:25 am on March 13th. Is all that correct?
That is correct. What is the departing airport and how many transfers are there?
Your tickets are booked. You are flying out of JFK International Airport and there are 0 transfers.
Thanks. I need a Standard rental car when I get there.
Will you be returning it on March 13th?
No, I will return it on the 12th of this month.
Will you pick up the car March 8th and at what time?
I will pick the car up at 3 o"clock in the afternoon on the 10th of this month.
There is a Standard Camry at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 10th that is 1 of 4 cars available.
That works for me. Book this car.
You want a Standard car from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 10th at 3 pm and will return it March 12th. Is that right?
That is right.
Your car is booked.
How much does it cost?
The total cost is $76.
Thanks for everything. That is all.
Have a good day.
Will you find a round trip flight?
Departing from?
San Diego.
Destination? Departure and return date?
Depart on March 1st to Portland and return on the 3rd.
I found 4. Alaska Airlines offers outbound flight that departs at 1:20 pm and return flight at 5:40 pm for $148.
Refundable ticket?
No.
Origin and destination airports?
Departs SAN International Airport and arrives at PDX International Airport.
Anything else?
American Airlines offers outbound flight that leaves at 7:30 am and return flight at 7:20 am for $182.
Amazing.
Buy tickets?
Yes.
Please confirm 1 Economy ticket on American Airlines from San Diego to Portland that leaves on March 1st at 7:30 am and returns March 3rd at 7:20 am.
Great.
I've reserved your ticket.
Will you find a rental car there from March 2nd 'til the 3rd?
Pick up time?
7:30 in the evening.
I found 4. Accord, a Standard car, is available at Portland Bus Station for pickup on March 2nd.
Total cost?
$27.
Terrific. Reserve this car.
Please confirm a Standard car from Portland Bus Station for pick up on March 2nd at 7:30 pm and drop off on March 3rd.
Cool.
I've reserved your car.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Search round trip flights.
When are you leaving? Where are you leaving from?
I'd like to leave on the 5th of this month from Los Angeles.
Where are you going and when will you return?
To SF. I'd like to return on the 7th of March.
I've found 3 flights. Alaska Airlines leaves at 5:50 pm and returns at 7:10 pm for $102.
Which airport will it arrive at?
SFO International Airport.
Sounds good. I'd like to buy tickets.
To confirm, you would like 1 economy seat for the Alaska Airlines flight from Los Angeles to San Francisco leaving on March 5th at 5:50 pm and returning on March 7th at 7:10 pm?
Sounds good. When does the initial flight arrive?
At 7:15 pm.
Can you search rental cars?
For what time. Would you like it from March 5th until March 7th?
Yes, I'd like to pick it up around 8 o"clock in the night on the 6th of March.
There's a standard car like an Altima available on March 6th at SFO International Airport.
Sounds good. I'd like to reserve it.
To confirm, you'd like a standard car to pick up from SFO International Airport on March 6th at 8 pm until March 7th?
Perfect. How much will it cost?
I've booked your car. It will be $29.
Thanks so much. That will be all.
Have a good day.
Can you find me some round trip flights on the 10th.
Sure, please tell me your return date as well as your departure location.
I'm flying out of Seattle, WA and I plan to return on the 12th of March.
Where are you flying to?
I'm flying to San Francisco.
There are 5 flights meeting your criteria. How about Alaska Airlines flight taking off at 12 pm with the return flight taking off at 2:55 pm. Tickets are $120 per person.
Sounds perfect for me.
I there anything else I could do for you?
You could help me buy Economy tickets for this flight.
Can you please confirm that you want 1 Economy ticket for the Alaska Airlines flight from Seattle to San Francisco taking off at 12 pm on March 10th with the return flight taking off at 2:55 pm on March 12th.
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully booked your tickets.
Perfect. Now please find me a rental car at destination which I can pick up around 18:30 on March 11th.
Do you plan on keeping it until March 12th?
Yes, that's correct.
There's a nice standard class Altima at SFO International Airport which is available for pick up on March 11th.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you?
Yes, please do.
Can you please confirm that you want to reserve a Standard car to pick up from SFO International Airport from March 11th at 6:30 pm to March 12th.
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me the total cost?
I've successfully booked your car. Total reservation cost is $34.
Thanks for everything.
Is there anything else I could do for you>
Not at the moment, thanks again.
Have a nice day!
Could you look for a round trip flight for my sake?
What place will you depart from, and when do you intend to return?
I am departing from Chi-town, and will return on March 8th.
What time do you plan to depart?
I am departing on next Tuesday.
What place do you intend to go to?
I am visiting NY.
There is a ticket costing $131 for an American Airlines flight that departs at 12:30 pm, with the return flight leaving at 5:25 am.
That flight is perfect for me. Could you assist me in purchasing tickets? There's 3 people in my cohort, and I prefer to travel in Economy.
Please verify the following information: Economy seats for 3 people on an American Airlines flight from Chicago to New York. The plane will depart on March 5th at 12:30 pm, and return flight departs on 5:25 am on March 8th.
Yeah, that's perfect.
I verified your ticket.
Could you also look for a rental vehicle at that place? I'd like a large vehicle that I could pick up on 6:30 pm and use until March 8th.
Would you like to have the vehicle from March 5th?
I require the vehicle from the 7th of this month.
I got 5 vehicles you may enjoy. There's a wonderful full-size Cherokee vehicle available at Grand Central Station for pickup on March 7th.
That sounds perfect for me; I'd like to book the vehicle.
Please verify the following information: you are picking up a full-size vehicle from Grand Central Station on March 7th at 6:30 pm, and will drop it off on March 8th.
Yeah, that's perfect. How much does it cost?
Your vehicle has been booked, and the price is $34.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I need a round trip flight.
What is departure and arrival cities?
I want to go to Vegas Premium Economy and deparing Sydney.
When do you come back?
I come back on the 14th of this month.
When do you depart?
I depart on the 7th.
I found 1 United Airlines leaving at 10:05 pm and returning at 12:05 pm for $487.
That works for me.
Did you want to reserve?
Yes, book it for one.
Confirm 1 premium economy United Airlines leaving Sydney to Las Vegas on March 7th 10:05 pm and returning March 14th departing 12:05 pm.
I confirm and how many stops?
You are confirmed with 1 stop.
I also need a full-size car rental on the 10th at 3 o"clock in the afternoon.
Are you keeping until March 14th?
Yes that is correct.
I have a full-size Escape at McCarran International Airport for March 10th.
How much is it?
It is $164 total.
I need it only to the 11th.
I have 1 full-size Rogue at Union Plaza for March 10th.
How much is it?
It is $41 total.
That works for me.
Is there anything else?
Go ahead and reserve.
Confirm full-size car at Union Plaza pick up March 10th at 3 pm and drop off March 11th.
That works for me.
You are now confirmed.
That is all I need today.
Have a great day.
Can you find me some round trip flights on the 1st of March?
Sure, what date do you return?
I'm coming back on the 10th of March.
Where will you be going?
Vegas, baby! Sorry, it's my first time going, I'm excited.
Great! Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Chicago, can you get 4 tickets?
I've got 2 options here, one is with American Airlines at 4:30 am, the return flight leaves at 10:55 am, for $259.
Where does it leave from? Can I get a refund?
This is not refundable, and leaves from O'Hare International Airport.
Great, sounds good.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yeah, Economy is fine.
So you'd like 4 economy tickets with American Airlines leaving from Chicago March 1st at 4:30 am and going to Las Vegas, returning March 10th at 10:55 am?
Yes, great.
Alright, those tickets have been purchased.
Can you help me get a rental car too? I need to pick up a car around the afternoon 12.
You'd like it until March 10th?
Yeah and picking it up on March 6th.
How about a standard? A Civic is available at McCarran International Airport on March 6th.
Great, let's get that.
Okay, so you'd like a standard car for pick up from McCarran International Airport on March 6th at 12 pm, for drop off March 10th?
Yeah, great.
Alright, that reservation has been made.
Awesome, thanks.
Can I do anything else for you?
That's it.
Have a great time in Vegas.
Find me a round trip flight.
What day are you returning?
I am returning on March 8th.
Where and when are you departing and where are you going?
I am departing LA Tuesday next week and headed to New York City.
Search found 4 results. American Airlines departs at 6:20 pm and then at 7:45 pm respectively and the flight costs $237.
What else do you have? I need three Economy tickets.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 10:55 pm and then at 7:30 am respectively and the flight costs $215.
What is the destination airport and can I get refunds on the tickets?
The destination airport is JFK International Airport and the tickets are not refundable.
That works for me. Get me some tickets.
You want 3 Economy tickets on Delta Airlines from New York to Los Angeles with the first flight departing at 10:55 pm on March 5th and the second flight departing 7:30 am on March 8th. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your tickets are booked.
Now can you get me a rental car for there?
What time will you pick it up and will you get it on March 5th?
I will pick the car up on the 6th at two in the afternoon.
Will you return the car March 8th?
Yes, I will.
Search found 7 results for you. There is a Standard Accord at Grand Central Station on March 6th.
What else do you have?
There is a Standard Altima at Port Authority Station on March 6th?
What else can you find?
There is a Standard Camry at JFK International Airport on March 6th.
That works for me.
Shall I book you a reservation?
Yes, get me this car.
You want a Standard car for pick up at 2 pm on March 6th at JFK International Airport and will return it March 8th. Is that right?
That is right. What is the bill for this?
Your car is booked and it cost $66.
Thanks a bunch. That is all.
Have a good day.
I am looking to search round trip flights on March 10th and any class would be fine.
From which place will you be leaving? Also when will you be leaving and where are you planning to visit?
I am leaving from Vancouver to NYC on 8th of March.
There are 2 flights available. Delta airlines outbound flight leaves at 6 am and return flight leaves at 2:50 am. It will cost you $306.
This sounds good to me.
Should the bookings be made for the same?
Yes. I would like to do the booking for four people.
Please confirm the folllowing details: Delta Airlines from New York to Vancouver leaves on March 8th and return on March 10th. The outbound flight leaves at 6 am and return flight leaves at 2:50 am. It is an economy class for 4 number of passengers.
Yes. That's good. Does flight has any stop? Also is the ticket refundable?
The ticket is now confirmed. Unfortunately, it is not refundable. There is 1 stop.
Thanks. Can you also help me finding a rental car there?
Do you need the car from March 8th to March 10th? Also from which time do you need it?
I need to pick the car at six pm on 9th of this month.
YVR International Airport has a standard Accord with pickup on March 9th.
How much will it cost in total?
It will cost you $31.
That's good.
Do you want to reserve this car?
Yes. I want to rent this vehicle.
Please confirm the details: Picking standard car up from YVR International airport at 6 pm on March 9th and dropping on March 10th.
Yes. That looks good.
The reservation has now been done.
Thanks for the help. That's all I needed for now.
Have a nice day.
I need to search for some round trip flights
What date are you planning on returning?
I need to come back by next friday
what is your destination
I am visiting SF
what date do you travel?
I plan to leave this Saturday
Where would your departure be from?
I leave from Portland, OR
Okay. I have found a alaska airlines flight that leaves at 7:55 am. Its return flight leaves at 12:20 pm and costs $124
That sounds okay
Should I buy the tickets?
Yes, book one economy ticket
Booking 1 economy ticket for alaska airlines plight from Portland to San francisco on march 2nd 7:55 am with return flight on march 8th 12:20 pm
Yes, that is okay
Ticket is successfully booked.
What is the arrival time of the return and onward flight?
The onward flight's arrival time is 9:48 am and return flight's arrival is at 2:13 pm
okay. I also need help finding a rental car there/
Should I find cars till march 8th? what time?
I need it till the 7th and need to pick it around five in the evening
Should I book from march 2nd?
No, find me a compact car from the 5th
I have a compact car, bolt available from the salesforce transit center on march 5th
find me something else till 6th of this month.
I have another compact car, a cooper available from SFO international airport from March 5th
What would it cost?
It costs $30
Okay, that works
Should I reserve this car?
Yes, make the booking
Booking a compact car from SFO international airport from march 5th 5 pm to march 6th
okay, that sounds good.
Your booking is confirmed.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day!
Will you find round trip flights?
Departure date and place? Return date?
Depart on 7th of this month from Atlanta, GA and return on 13th of this month.
Destination?
LA.
I found 3. Delta Airlines offers outbound flight that departs at 7:50 am and return flight at 9:20 am for $263.
How many stops? Return flight arrival time?
1 stop. Return flights arrival is at 5:19 pm.
Great.
Buy tickets?
Sure, for 4 in Economy.
Please confirm 4 Economy tickets on Delta Airlines from Atlanta to Los Angeles that leaves on March 7th at 7:50 am and returns on March 13th at 9:20 am.
Great.
I've completed your reservation.
Refundable ticket? Origin airport?
Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. Nonrefundable ticket.
Thanks. Will you find a rental car to be picked up around evening 5 with a return date of 10th of March?
Pick up on March 7th?
I want it Friday next week through March 9th.
Bolt, a Compact car, is available for pick up at LAX International Airport on March 8th.
Total cost?
$29.
Great.
Reserve it?
Sure.
Please confirm a Compact car to be picked up from LAX International Airport on March 8th at 5 pm and dropped off on March 9th.
Terrific.
I've reserved your car.
Thanks.
Have a fantastic day.
can you look for some roundtrip flights for me?
when do you want to leave?
i'm gonna hea dout on the 9th of march.
when are you coming back? what's your departure location and your desired location to visit?
i want to leave from american airlines to san fran on march 12th from ciudad de mexico.
there's 1 flight for you from american airlines that leaves at 2:55 pm and the returning flight leaves at 1:20 pm for $181.
what airport do i arrive in?
you'll arrive at sfo international airport.
that'll work.
do you want to buy tickets for it?
yes
so you want 1 economy ticket from american airlines that leaves from mexico city and lands in san francisco on march 9th at 2:55 pm and returns on march 12th at 1:20 pm?
no, there's 1 person in my group.
ok, 1 passenger to mexico city?
yeah that's perfect.
it's been booked.
thanks, can you get me a rental car while i'm there too?
do you need it from march 9th until march 12th?
yeah, i want to pick it up at 6:30 in the evening on the 11th of this month.
there's a standard altima available on march 11th at sfo international airport.
what will it cost me?
it'ss be $34 in total.
that's fine.
ok so you want to book the standard car from sfo international airport on march 11th from 6:30 pm until march 12th?
yeah that sounds right.
it's been reserved.
thanks, that's everything.
have a great day!
I want to find a round trip flight returning on the 14th please
When are you planning to leave?
I'm heading out on the 6th of March
OK, where are you going?
I'm headed to Seattle
Where are you leaving from?
From Atlanta, GA
There's an American Airlines flight at 9:35 pm and a return at 9:45 pm that'll cost you $213
Are there any other flights on the 11th? I want United Airlines
United Airlines has a 10:55 am flight and a 4:55 pm return for $198
That flight is good
Should I book you tickets?
Yes I'd like to book it for four
Confirming 4 economy tickets from Atlanta to Seattle via United Airlines from March 6th, 10:55 am with a return on March 11th at 4:55 pm yes?
Yes that's right, also does it have zero stops?
It's confirmed, and it is 0 stops
When does the departing flight arrive?
It arrives at 1:27 pm
Thanks for that, could you find me a rental car, any type is good
Do you want the car from March 6th? And at what time? Also do you need it till March 11th
I want to pick it up in the afternoon 3:30 pm till the 10th and I'll get it from the 7th?
There's a nice compact Bolt available on March 7th from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport
What's it gonna cost?
It'll be $72
That sounds great.
Can I do something else?
I want to reserve the car
So you want to book a compact car on March 7th at 3:30 pm and drop off at March 10th at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport?
Yes that's perfect
Your car is booked now
Thanks, that's all for now
Great, enjoy your day
Would you find me round trip flights for the 9th of this month and returning on the 12th?
Where will you leave from and where are you visiting?
I am gong to SF from Los Angeles.
I have 4 flights that should work for you. There is an Alaska Airlines flight. This flight leaves at 5:50 pm and the return leaves at 7:10 pm. This costs $102.
Do you have anything else available? There are two in my group.
I have an American Airlines flight. The outbound flight leaves at 6:30 am and the return leaves at 3:50 pm. This ticket costs $102.
That sounds good to me.
Should I purchase the tickets?
Yes, I want to book the ticket and want to go in economy clas.
Please confirm the following: You want to leave on American Airlines from Los Angeles on March 9th at 6:30 am to San Francisco? The return flight leaves March 12th at 3:50 pm. You need 2 seats on economy class. Is that right?
That sounds good to me.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thank you for helping. Would you be able to find me a rental car there?
Would you like to have the car from March 9th until March 12th?
Sounds good to me. I would like a compact car from the 10th.
What time do you need to pick up the car?
I would like to get the car around afternoon 12:30 and any type is fine.
I have 10 cars that you will like. There is a nice Standard car at SFO INternational Airport. You can pick it up on March 10th. It's a Standard Altima.
Sounds good to me. I would like to reserve the car.
Could you confirm that you want to pick up the car from SFO International Airport on March 10th at 12:30 pm and that you will drop it off on March 12th? It is a Standard Car.
Sounds good to me.
I have reserved your car.
Thank you for helping.
Could I assist with something else?
No, that is all.
Enjoy your day.
I'd like to take an overseas trip during my vacation. Please help me find round trip flights.
Please tell me your origin city as well as your departure and return dates.
I'll be leaving from Philadelphia later today, and would like to return on Friday next week.
What's your destination?
I'm going to London, UK.
American Airlines has a 4:45 pm outbound flight, with a 2:05 pm inbound flight, at $317 per ticket. Will this flight work for you?
That flight works for me.
Should I go ahead and purchase tickets for it?
Yes, but please purchase 4 Economy class tickets because my 3 siblings have decided to tag along.
Please confirm that you'd like 4 Economy class seats on the American Airlines Philadelphia to London flight departing March 1st and returning March 8th. The outbound flight leaves at 4:45 pm and the inbound flight leaves at 2:05 pm.
That is correct.
I've confirmed your tickets.
Please find out the origin airport and whether the flight has zero stops.
The flight leaves from PHL International Airport and has 1 stop.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Will you be needing my help with anything else?
Please help me find a rental car there.
Would you like the car for the duration of your stay, from March 1st to March 8th?
I need the car the day after tomorrow and want to keep it till the 4th.
What time will you be needing it?
I wish to pick up the car at around 10:30 am.
I found 5 cars that might interest you. One is a nice, Standard Accord, available for pickup on March 3rd from Gatwick International Airport
What else is available?
How about a nice, Standard Altima, available for pickup on March 3rd from Heathrow International Airport?
Please find out whether there's a Compact car available from Saturday this week.
I found 3 cars that might interest you. One is a nice, Compact Fit, available for pickup on March 2nd from Heathrow International Airport
How much will it cost in total?
The total cost of your reservation is $56.
That works for me.
Should I go ahead and reserve this car?
Yes, please rent the car.
Please confirm that you'd like to pick a Compact car from Heathrow International Airport on March 2nd at 10:30 am, and drop it off on March 4th.
That is correct.
I have successfully booked your car.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you, and do have yourself a wonderful day!
Could you look up round trip flights for me? Id like to return on next Monday, and I prefer to travel in premium economy.
What time do you intend to depart?
I intend to depart on 2nd of March.
What place do you intend to go, and what location will you depart from?
I am going to LA and I will depart from Vegas.
I discovered 3 convenient flights for your travel. There is a ticket $139 for an outbound American Airlines flight that will leave at 9:30 am, with a return flight departing at 7:50 pm.
What airport does the flight leave from, and can I get my money back from the ticket?
The flight will leave from McCarran International Airport. Sadly, the ticket cannot be refunded.
That is perfect for me. Could you assist me in purchasing flight ticket? there are three people in my cohort.
Please verify the following information: a reservation for 3 people on premium economy seats for a American Airlines flight departing from Las Vegas to Los Angeles. The flight will depart on MArch 2nd at 9:30 am, and will return on March 4th on a flight leaving at 7:50 pm.
Yeah, that's perfect for me. What airport does the flight go to?
Your ticket is verified. The airport is LAX International Airport.
Thank you for your assistance. Can you also look up a rental vehicle there?
Would you like to use your vehicle until March 4th? When will you require it, and do you wish have the car from MArch 2nd?
That sounds perfect. I'd like to pick up the vehicle near 4:30 in the evening, and I require the vehicle from March 3rd.
There is a lovely standard Camry car available at LAX International Airport for pickup on March 3rd.
How much does it cost?
Your booking price is $38.
That's perfect for me.
Would you like to book the vehicle?
Yeah, I'd like to book a car.
Please verify the following information: you are picking up a standard vehicle from LAX International Airport on March 3rd at 4:30 pm. The drop-off date is MArch 4th.
Yeah, that's perfect.
Your vehicle is booked.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
Nope, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon!
I need you to find round trip flights for 2 people.
Can you tell me the date when you want to start your trip, and when are going to return? What is the destination where you want to arrive to?
I will leave for my trip on March 1st, to go to Phoenix, and I want to have the return flight on the 4th.
Can you tell me the location from where you will depart?
I will depart for my trip from Atlanta, GA.
I have found an American Airlines flight which has an outbound flind that leaves at 11:40 am, and when it returns it flies at 11:25 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $237.
This flight suits me well. Can you buy Economy flight tickets for this flight?
Can you please confirm that you want to buy Economy class flight tickets for 2 people for the flight of American Airlines which leaves from Atlanta on March 1st at 11:40 am to go to Phoenix, and when it returns it flies on March 4th at 11:25 pm.
Alright, that is good. Can you tell me the airport from where the flight leaves, and the time when my return flight will arrive at destination?
Your requested ticket has been booked. The return flight is expected to arrive at 6:37 am, and the location of the departure of this flight is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
I appreciate your help. I also need you to find me a rental car there. I will need to rent the car till the 4th, and I want to rent the car from 2nd of this month.
Can you tell me the time when you need the car?
The time which suits me to pick up the car is around 17:00.
There are 3 cars which match what you want. A good Standard car called Accord is available to be picked up on March 2nd at Sky Harbor International Airport.
This seems nice. I want to make a booking for this car.
Can you please confirm that you want to rent a Standard car, which you will pick up from Sky Harbor International Airport on March 2nd at 5 pm, and will need to rent it till March 4th?
Yes, that is what I want.
Your requested car has been booked.
I am thankful for the help you provided to me!
Is there something else I can do to help you?
Nothing. You have my gratitude for the help you provided.
Have a wonderful time!
I need to find a roundtrip flight please.
When are you leaving and coming back and what is your destination?
Leaving on the 3rd for London, England and returning the 6th of this month.
Leaving from where?
I'll be going from Chicago.
I have 3 flights for you. American Airlines has a 12:30 PM departure which returns at 2:05 PM for $306.
When does it return and what is the arrival time of the onward flight?
That's at 6:37 AM and the arrival is 6:34 PM.
Sounds good, thank you.
Would you like to make a reservation?
I sure would.
Confirming an American Airlines flight from Chicago to London on March 3rd at 12:30 PM and returning March 6th at 2:05 PM for 1 economy seat.
Make that for one person.
Confirming 1 seat on American Airlines.
Perfect, thank you.
The ticket has been purchased.
Is that a refundable ticket?
No, I'm afraid it's not.
What are the airports involved?
The flight leaves from O'Hare International Airport and flies to Heathrow International Airport.
Thank you. I'd like to find a rental car as well.
On March 3rd?
On the 4th of this month.
At what time? And would you like a March 6th return?
No, March 5th. I'd like the car at half past 1 in the afternoon.
I have 5 possible rentals for you. There is a standard Accord available March 4th at Gatwick International Airport.
Okay, that works.
Would you like to go ahead with that one?
Yes I would.
Confirming a standard rental from Gatwick International Airport on March 4th at 1:30 PM and returning March 5th.
Thanks. How much is that?
It's $30 total and the rental has been confirmed.
Thanks, that'll do it.
Thank you very much.
Can you look for some round trip flights for me? I would like to fly Delta Airlines in economy.
Where are you going to go and when do you want to leave?
I would like leave on Thursday next week, going to Seattle.
Where will you be departing from and when are you coming back?
I would like to come back on the 10th departing from Toronto, Ontario.
I have located 1 convenient flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 7:15 am. The return flight departs at 7:40 am. The ticket costs $314.
That flight sounds fine with me.
Should I help you with anything else?
Can you help me to purchase flight tickets? I have 3 people in my group.
Confirm these details for me: the flight leaves from Toronto, heading to Seattle on Delta Airlines. The flight leaves on March 7th at 7:15 am and the return flight is March 10th at 7:40 am with 3 passengers in economy.
Yes that sounds fine.
Your ticket has been confirmed.
Does this flight have one stop?
This flight has 1 stop.
Thank you very much for your help. Can you also locate a rental car for me there?
Would you like to have the car from March 7th? What time will you be needing it? And would you be needing the car until March 10th?
Yes that sounds fine. I would like to pick up this car at around 13:00. I need to have the car from the 8th of March.
I have found 5 cars that you might like. One is a nice car, a standard car that you can get at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport on March 8th. The car is a Civic.
That sounds fine, I would like to reserve this car.
Confirm these details for me please: you will pick up the standard car on March 8th at 1 pm at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and drop it off on March 10th.
Yes that sounds fine. How much is the total cost?
Your reservation has been made, it costs $68 in total.
Thanks a lot for all your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all. I appreciate the help.
Have a wonderful day!
I need a round trip flight to LAX on Delta Airlines.
Where will the trip begin? When will you return?
The trip starts in Vancouver, BC with a return date preference of the 11th.
What day are you leaving?
I'm going to Washington the 5th of March preferably traveling Economy class.
Delta Airlines has 1 flight for $348. It is scheduled to leave 12:20 pm with the return flight scheduled to leave at 10 am.
That's perfect.
I can get the tickets for you.
Thanks, I would like that.
I will purchase 1 Economy class ticket leaving Vancouver at 12:20 pm March 5th to Washington on Delta Airlines. The return flight leaves at 10 am March 11th if this informATION IS CORRECT.
Just 1 person in the group.
I understand 1 person needs the flight from Vancouver.
Exactly. What time will the flight land.
You own the ticket with an arrival time of 7:49 pm.
Do you know the onward flight arrival time and the name of the airport?
The onward flight lands at Dulles International Airport at 2:55 am.
Awesome. I'll also need a rental car while I'm there.
Will the car rental be from March 5th until March 11th? When is the best time for you?
Two pm works best but the dates are from the 6th until Thursday next week.
One of 4 choices is a Standard Accord available March 6th at Union Station.
How much money is it?
It costs $24.
Great. Please reserve that car.
I will reserve a Standard car that can be picked up 2 pm on March 6th from Union Station and returned March 7th with your permission.
Permission granted.
You have reserved the car.
Nice. I'm going to take a break.
Relax and enjoy.
Could you help me search for a one way flight?
Where and when do you intend to depart?
I will be departing from Vancouver on the 3rd of March.
Where do you plan to travel to?
I will be flying to Seattle.
I managed to find 4 flights for you, one of which is an Air Canada flight with 1 layover and will depart at 4:20 am which will set you back $322.
That sounds great.
Could I further assist you?
No need, thank you.
Sure, have a great day ahead!
I'm looking for one way flights out of Mexico City.
Departure date and destination?
Leaving the 7th of this month to San Diego.
I found 3 flights. There's an American Airlines flight with 1 layover leaving at 11:40 am for $273.
Thanks, that's all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
I want to find a flight, I have zero bags to check in.
Where are you traveling and what city are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Seattle on the 6th.
What city are you traveling to?
I'm traveling to the city of Atlanta.
I found 5 flights. There is Alaska Airlines departs at 6:35 am and has 0 layover. The ticket is $181.
Find me another flight in Economy class please.
There is a flight with American Airlines departs a 10:35 am and has 0 layover. The ticket is $184.
When does the flight arrive to the destination?
The flight arrives at 7:07 pm local time the same day.
Find me something to New York.
There is 3 flights. Do you like Delta Airlines departs 8:05 am and has 1 layover. The ticket is $298.
That is all I need.
Have a good day.
I am searching for a one way flight.
Which city do you want to depart from and where are you heading? On which date would you like to travel?
I am leaving from Phoenix and going to Las Vegas on the 12th. I have 0 checked bags.
I have 4 flights. What do you think about American Airlines? This flight leaves at 10:10 am and has 0 layovers. This ticket is $80 per passenger.
Search for something else.
How about Delta Airlines? This flight leaves at 2:25 pm and has 0 layovers. It costs $85 per person.
When will the flight arrive in Las Vegas?
The flight will arrive at 3:39 pm local time.
What airport does the flight leave from and land?
The flight leaves Sky Harbor International Airport and will arrive at McCarran International Airport.
Search for something else. I want to go on United Airlines.
I have 1 flight that you may like. What about United Airlines? This flight leaves at 9:35 pm local time with 0 layovers. The ticket is $84 per person.
Okay.
Do you need something else?
No, that is it but I appreciate the help.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a one way flight, preferably on Delta Airlines.
Where are you heading to?
I'm going to Atlanta, and I have 0 bags I need to check.
And on what date will you be traveling?
I want to leave on next Tuesday.
And where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from Washington.
There's 1 flight I found. It leaves at 6:25 pm, has 0 layovers and is on Delta Airlines. It will be $109 per passenger.
Okay.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
Have a good rest of your day.
I'm looking for a one way flight with Alaska Airlines.
When will you be travelling and what city will you be departing from?
I want to fly from San Francisco on the 11th of March.
What is your destination?
I want to go to New York.
So for confirmation: You would like to fly with Alaska Airlines, the flight leaves at 10:20 pm and there are 0 layovers. The total cost for this flight is $216.
That's great thanks for your help.
Enjoy your day.
Hi I'm travelling and I need a one way flight for 1.
What city are you departing from and on what day? Where are you going?
I'd like to go to Seattle on the 11th from London.
I found 3 flights that might work for you. How does American Airlines sound? The flight will leave at 6:55 am and has 1 layover. The cost is $402 per person.
Is there anything else? I'd like to fly out on the 3rd of March in Economy class.
I found 2 flights that might work. How does Delta Airlines sound? The flight leaves at 11:50 am and the cost is $413 per person. There is 1 layover.
That works.
Do you need anything else?
That's all, thank you.
Enjoy your day!
There is a meeting for me where I want reach by flight. Can you search an Economy class for one way?
Which place you wish to go to? The date and departing port also please.
To Washington on the 8th from Atlanta.
4 flights are for you. You may choose American Airlines at 9:40 am with 0 stops and ticket fare is $119.
Ok, Search for any other flights.
Do you like Delta Airlines takes off at 5:55 pm with 0 layovers and cost is $106?
No, look for some other?
Southwest Airlines, takes off at 4:35 am with 0 stops and fare is $101. Do you prefer it?
What is the reaching time? How many checked bags can I take?
You can take 0 checked bags. It will take you to the destination 6:26 am local time.
Great , thank you.
Do you need any other help?
No, that's all.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a one way flight from Phoenix to Portland.
What day are you leaving?
I need to leave next Monday.
I found a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 9:30 am with 1 layover. The ticket price is $260.
How many passengers is the reservation for? Is the ticket in Premium Economy.
The ticket is an Economy seat for 1 passenger.
Ok, that is fine.
Is there anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a great day.
Book me a flight. Make it one-way on Delta Airlines
Departing from where? When would you like to go?
Leaving from Chicago on the 7th of March
And flying where?
I need to go to Washington
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines. It has 0 stops and departs at 2:30 pm for $109 per passenger
Thanks. That's helpful
Take care
Can you help me find a one way flight?
Where are you leaving from, and when? What is your destination?
I'd like to fly from London to Chicago on March 3rd.
I've found 4 possible flights. How about American Airlines? The flight is at 2:25 am and has 0 connections. The ticket costs $235.
Do you have other options?
How about British Airways? The flight is at 11 pm and has 0 connections. The ticket costs $243.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I need to attend a business meeting and i wish to travel . Will you find a one way flight?
In which city you wish to depart from and on which date you wish to travel ? To which place are you planning to go?
i wish to travel from city washington to London , on date the 1st.
there are 4 flights according to your interest. Whether you like to fly with American airlines? Flight takes off at 1 pm local time and itinerary has 1 layovers and its costs $303 per passsenger.
All right . Thanks a lot for your immense help.
take care have a great day.
I'd like to find a one way flight.
Where would you like to leave from and where do you want to go? What date would you like to travel?
I want to fly to Mexico City from Seattle on the 11th of March.
Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines at for $306? The flight takes off at 6:25 pm and has 1 layover.
I'd rather fly with United Airlines.
I found a flight with United Airlines for $284. The flight takes off at 3:05 pm and has 1 layover.
Can you find me a flight with American Airlines instead?
I found a flight with American Airlines for $287. The flight takes off at 1:40 pm and has 1 layover.
Are two checked bags allowed?
0 checked bags are allowed.
How many passengers did you get this for?
This is for 1 passanger.
All right. Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a great day!
I will be having a flight trip, and I am in need of a ticket for a one way flight to San Diego.
Can you tell me the date when you will take the flight, and from where will you depart for the flight?
I will be departing on Thursday next week and the location from where I will start my trip is Mexico City.
I see that 3 flights match your request. How would you consider having a flight which leaves at 11:40 am with 1 layover and is with American Airlines? The ticket for this flight will be costing $273 per passenger.
That suits me well.
Is there something else I could help you with?
Nothing. I appreciate your help.
Have a wonderful day!
I'm going to travel pretty soon. I'd like to find a one-way flight.
On what date will you travel?
I will be departing on March 13th.
Where you be flying from and to?
My flight should go from Atlanta to Chicago.
How about an American Airlines flight? It takes off at 6:05 am, has 0 layovers, and a ticket costs $116 per passenger.
I'd rather find another flight. Make sure it has economy class tickets.
Does Delta Airlines sound good to you? It takes off at 11:20 am, has 0 layovers, and a ticket for it costs $106 per passenger.
It doesn't sound that great. I want to have another option.
United Airlines might appeal to you. Its flight takes off at 7:50 pm, it has 0 layovers, and a ticket will cost you $120.
7:50 pm is kind of late. Will the flight arrive the next day? How many passengers is this for?
Actually, the flight will still arrive on the same day. This will be for 1 passenger.
Okay. Got it.
Is there any other matter where I can help you?
Not at the moment. Thanks.
Hope you enjoy your time at Chicago!
Hi, could you help me search for a one-way Alaska Airlines flight?
Where would you like to depart from?
I would like to depart from San Diego.
Where is your preferred date and location of travel?
I would like to travel to Phoenix on March 7th with 0 check in bags.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight costing $97 per passenger, which takes off at 10:55 pm with 0 layovers.
I see, that's all I need, thanks!
No worries, have a great day ahead.
I'm planning a trip, can you help find me a flight?
Sure, when are you going? And where are you flying from and to?
I'm going next Monday and I want to go to Paris! Can you look at flights from Chicago?
Of course. There's an American Airlines flight for $402, it only has 1 stop and leaves at 2:40 pm
Does it leave from Chicago? And when does it arrive?
It leaves from O'Hare International Airport and arrives in Paris the next day
Cool, thank you. That was all, I don't need anything else.
No problem, have a lovely day!
I need a one way flight on any airline. I have 0 bags for check in.
What date do you want to travel and where will you be going? What city do you want to leave from?
I am going to Vancouver from Phoenix, on the 3rd.
I have 3 flights that should work. How about American Airlines? The flight leaves at 9:30 am local time and has 1 layover. The ticket costs $246 per person.
Look for something else.
How about a 9:55 am flight with Southwest Airlines? This flight has 1 layover and costs $251 per person.
Look for something else.
WOuld you like a flight on United Airlines that leaves at 9:40 am local time? It has 1 layover and costs $235.
Where will the flight land and where does the flight leave from?
The flight leaves from Sky Harbor International Airport and goes to YVR International Airport.
Great.
Do you need any other assistance?
No, that is all but thank you.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you help me search for one-way flights with Alaska Airlines?
What is your intended date and location of departure?
I will be departing from San Francisco on 13th of this month.
Any preference on your destination?
Phoenix would be great.
Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines which will depart at 4:10 pm with 0 layovers and will cost you $131 per passenger.
May I know where does the flight land?
The flight will land a Sky Harbor International Airport
What is the flight arrival time at the destination and how many check bags am I allowed to bring up?
You are allowed to bring up 0 checked bags, and you will arrive at 6:17 pm local time.
I see, thank you.
Do you require further assistance?
Nope, thanks for your help though.
No worries, have a great day!
I have a plan for a short trip and I want to search for Economy class tickets in an one way flight. Please search for some flights.
From where and to which place your are planning for a visit?
I want the flights from Washington to San Francisco.
Let me know the date of your trip.
on next Tuesday, please search accordingly.
Found 4 results. A flight with American Airlines which takes off at 4:10 am local time is okay for you? the itinerary has 1 layovers and the ticket cost is $300 per person. What about your opinion?
Will the flight allow zero checked bags?
Yes, they allow 0 checked bags.
That is fine, that's all for now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I need help booking a one way flight to Seattle.
What date are you traveling?
I'm departing on the 11th.
What city are you departing from?
I need a flight from Vancouver.
There are 4 flights that would work. Air Canada has a flight that departs at 4:20 am and has 1 layover. The price is $277 per person.
Will it arrive the day after or the same day?
The flight arrives on the same day.
Let's find something else.
American Airlines has a flight leaving at 1:30 am local time with 1 layover. The cost is $287 per person.
Can I check two bags?
No, 0 checked bags are allowed.
Okay.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No that's all, thank you.
Have a great day!
I'm looking for one way flights with 0 bags checked in.
Departure city?
New York.
Destination and dates of travel?
Going to Seattle next Thursday.
There's an American Airlines flight with 1 layover leaving 6:50 pm for $296.
That sounds good. That's all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to find Economy class tickets for a one way flight.
Okay, what date are you departing?
I'd like to fly out on the 13th of this month.
What city are you departing from?
Find me flights leaving out of Atlanta.
Okay, what is your destination?
I'll be flying to Washington.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight leaves at 9:40 am local time and has 0 layovers. The ticket will cost $110 per passenger.
Yes that's fine, thanks. That will be all
Thank you, have a good day.
I would like to book a flight one way, just 1 seat.
What date are you traveling and where are you going?
I'm flying to Seattle on March 7th.
Which city are you departing from?
I'm looking for flight from Toronto.
There is a flight with Air Canada that departs at 5:35 pm and has 1 layover. The cost is $283.
That is all the information I needed.
Have a good day.
I need four seats for a one way flight on March 3rd.
Which city are you leaving and where are you going?
I am leaving San Francisco and going to New York.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 stops that leaves at 10:20 pm and costs $189 per person.
I am actually flying to Chicago.
There is an American Airlines flight with 1 stop that leaves at 9:30 am and costs $317 per person.
I need an economy class ticket and have zero bags.
I found 3 flights including a Delta Airlines flight with 0 stops leaving at 10:30 am and the cost is $182 per person.
Which airport does the flight leave? Does it arrive the next day?
The flight leaves SFO International Airport and arrives the same day.
That's fine.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I need a one way flight.
What date would you like to leave? Where will you be traveling too?
I need to got to Paris on March 4th with 0 bags.
What airport would you like to depart from?
Las Vegas please.
I ahve 3 options for you. There is an American Airlines flight departing at 1:55 pm with 1 layover for $407 per person.
I want sonthing elese.
How about a Delta Airlines flight departing at 2:25 pm with 1 layover for $404 per person.
What does United Airlines have with Economy seating?
United Airlines has a flight departing at 11 am with 1 layover for $346 per person.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No that will be all.
Have a marvelous day!
I have a travel plan on Friday next week for which I need to search for an one way flight, can you find one?
What is your origin and destination cities?
I like to travel to Paris from San Francisco.
Found 4 results. How about a flight with Alaska Airlines which has 0 layovers and it takes off at 4:45 pm? The ticket price is $240 per person.
That was an useful information and thank you.
Have a nice day.
I am searching for a one way flight.
On which date would you like to travel? Which city do you want to leave from and where are you going?
I would like to go on United Airlines from Las Vegas to San Francisco. I want to fly out on March 2nd.
I have 1 flight for you. How about this United Airlines flight? This flight leaves at 4:20 pm local time and has 0 layovers. The ticket costs $86 per person.
When will the flight get to my destination? Will it arrive the day after?
The flight arrives at 5:55 pm local time on the same day.
Okay.
Could I assist with anything else?
No, that is it. Thank you for helping.
Have a great day.
Hi i need a help, i am planning for a trip, I want to find a one way flight
Sure, I will help you, Where are you going to and where do you want depart from?
I am going to Las Vegas and looking for flights from Toronto
Could you tell me which date would you like to travel?
I am going on the 6th
Ok, I found a result for you, Are you ok to fly with Delta Airlines? the flight takes off local time at 6:45 pm and the itinerary has 1 layovers, ticket cost is $254 per person
No, i am not interested, Find another flights, i am interested fly with United Airlines, i am going from Seattle
Ok, I found United Airlines for you, the flight takes off at 4:10 pm local time and the itinerary has 1 layovers, Ticket price is $315 per person. Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thank you very much for your help, That's all i need.
you are welcome, hope i was able to help you, Have a wonderful day.
Hi, could you help me find a one way flight?
Where and what date would you like to depart from?
I would like to depart at Atlanta on the 1st of March.
Any preference on your destination?
I will be travelling to San Diego.
Would you like to fly with Southwest Airlines? This flight has 1 layovers and will take off at 6:35 pm local time, which will set you back at $242 per passenger.
Sure, that's all I need.
No problem, see you soon!
Can you find a one way flight for me?
Travel date?
Leaving the 11th of March.
Departure city?
Philadelphia.
Destination city?
Nairobi.
I found 2 flights. There's an American Airlines flight with 1 layover leaving at 8:45 am, for $370.
Sounds good.
Can I do anything else?
No, that's it for now.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for a one way flight.
Where do you want to go?
I want to go to Las Vegas.
When would you like to go?
I'm planning on heading out the 7th of this month.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from New York. Look for those flights.
I've found 3 that will work. Do you mind American Airlines? There's a flight that leaves at 6:50 pm and has 1 stop. It costs $251 per seat.
Which airport does that depart from?
It leaves JFK International Airport.
Cool. That will be it. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me 2 seats on a one-way flight to San Diego?
Of course - what date are you traveling, and where are you leaving from?
I'd be leaving from Seattle on the 12th.
I've got 4 options here so far: Alaska Airlines has a flight leaving at 11:10 am with 1 layover for $207 per ticket.
Okay, yeah.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that'll be all I need right now.
Alright, have a great day.
There is a business tour for me, can you fine a one way flight.
Your destination and date please.
I wish to fly to Portland on 9th of March.
Where will you depart from?
I will embark from New York.
Are you interested in flying with American Airlines with 1 layovers taking off at 9:15 am? Per head cost is $308.
Are there any other flights?
You can take Delta Airlines with 1 layover and taking off at 6:40 pm . The ticket fare is $316 per person.
Great, I think I can choose that.
Ok, have a good journey.
I need a one way flight.
What day are you leaving? Where are you going?
I am leaving on the 1st of March going to San Francisco.
Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Philadelphia.
I found 3 flights with American Airlines. The flight leaves at 2:35 pm, has 1 layover, and the ticket price is $308.
That is all, thanks!
Have a nice day.
I need to travel by plane for my next trip, look for tickets from Delta Airlines.
When is your trip? Where are you going to? Where are you leaving from?
I'm going to Sydney leaving from San Diego on March 14th.
There's 1 flight good for you if you're sure about Delta Airlines. It takes off at 10 pm and there's also 1 layovers. One single tickets cost $307
What about the landing airport?
It's the Kingsford Smith International Airport.
It works for me.
Can I do more for you to help you in organizing your trip?
No thank you.
Goodbye sir.
I have a plan to travel on March 14th with 0 bags for which I need to search for an one way flight, do you help me?
Yes, what is your starting and ending place of this trip?
I am travelling from Paris to Seattle. Please search for flight based on this detail.
A flight with American Airlines takes off at 5:05 am whose itinerary has 1 layovers and the ticket cost is $444 per person. Please confirm to proceed further.
Okay, tell me that this result is for how many persons?
I searched it for 1 person only.
That's okay. Fine.
Anything else you want me to do?
That's all I want for now and thanks.
Have a great day.
I've got a business trip coming up. I'm not sure how long I'll be there for, so can you look for a one-way flight for me?
Sure. What city are you leaving from?
I'm departing from Phoenix,
And what day are you leaving?
My trip is on the 10th.
What city are you going to?
I'm headed to New York.
There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 5 am but has 1 layover. It costs $301. Do you want a ticket for this flight?
Yeah, that sounds good.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
I need a ticket, whatever's best will do.
Where do you want to go?
Seattle is my goal.
What date do you want to get there?
How about a departure of the 6th?
From where will you fly?
I'm taking off from Mexico City.
I have 3 options. How about American Airlines? You can board at 11:40 am. You'll have 1 stop though and it costs $431 each.
You got it toots.
What else is needed?
That's the whole thing thanks.
Cool, I appreciate you.
pull up one way flights. Also note I will have zero bags.
Sure, Where are you planning a trip to? I will also need to know when you would like to leave and from which airport city.
check flights leaving Phoenix to Mexico City on March 11th please.
Sure thing. Delta Airlines has some flights available. One flight is departing at 6:25 pm local time and has 1 layover. This ticket would be $258. How does this sound?
Sounds good. that was all I needed.
Ok, great! Have a wonderful day
I want to find a one way flight.
When do you plan to leave? Where you want to depart from? What date would you like to travel?
Lool for flights from Phoenix to Vancouver on March 12th.
I found 4 flights. American Airlines takes off at 11 am has 1 layovers. The ticket cost $237.
Ok. Thank you
Can i help you with anything else?
No. Thanks a lot
Have a good day.
I'll leave soon and I need to book a one way flight for 1 passenger.
When would you like to leave?
The date is March 11th.
Where will you leave from?
Nairobi is the departure city.
Where are you going to?
I need to be in Atlanta.
You have 1 option. Is Delta Airlines a company that you would like to travel with? Take off is scheduled at 9:50 am local time. There's 1 layovers. Ticket is $431 pro capite.
Are you looking for Business tickets? Is the arrival scheduled to be for the day after?
No, I'm looking for Economy seat. The plane will reach its destination the next day.
Fine, you can go now.
Thank you and good bye.
Hello! I need assistance finding a one way flight.
I'd be happy to help. Let's get some details down. Where are you going and where will you be leaving from? What day will you be going?
I'd like to find a Premium Economy ticket from Washington to New York on the 8th of this month.
There are 4 flights that meet your needs. If you like American Airlines, there is a flight that leaves at 4:10 am local time. It has 0 stops and tickets are $115 each.
That will work for me.
Is there anything else I can do for you? Would you like to book the ticket?
No, that will be all for right now. Thank you for your assistance.
You are very welcome. Enjoy your day!
I'd like to search for a one-way flight.
What location do you intend to travel to?
I'm going to London.
What day do you wish to travel?
I'd like to travel on Friday next week.
What metropolis would you like to leave from?
Search for flights from Washington.
I discovered 4 flights for you. There is a ticket costing $300 for an American Airlines that departs at 4:10 am with 1 layover.
Okay, thank you; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I need a one way flight to Seattle.
Departing from what city?
I am departing from Sydney on the 11th of March. I have zero bags to check in.
I found a flight on Delta Airlines that departs at 3:55 pm local time. There is 1 layover and the ticket costs $323 per passenger. Are you interested?
All right.
Do you need help with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me find a one way flight? I have zero bags to check, so I'll just be carrying on one.
Where are you leaving from and going to, and on what date?
I am leaving from Los Angeles on March 4th and I want to go to Atlanta.
I found 5 flights with Alaska Airlines. The first one takes off at 6:55 pm local time, has 0 layovers and costs $169 per ticket.
That sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
No thank you, that is all.
Ok, have a good day.
Hello! Can you help me find an Economy class ticket on a one way flight?
I'd be happy to help. Let's get some details to help narrow down the search. Where are you planning to travel to and where will you be leaving from? What day will you be travelling?
I'll be leaving Los Angeles this Saturday bound for New York.
There are 5 flights that might work for you. There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves Los Angeles at 4:55 am local time. It has 1 layover and tickets cost $297.
Can you tell me where and when that flight lands?
It is scheduled to arrive at 3:56 pm local time at JFK International Airport.
That will work for me.
Is there anything else I can assist you with today?
No, that will be everything. Thank you for your help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day!
Hello, could you help to search for some Premium Economy one way flights?
Where would you like to depart from?
I would prefer to depart from Vancouver.
What is your preferred destination>
I will be flying to Seattle with zero check in bags.
When would you like to travel?
I will be flying on the 14th of March.
Would you like to travel with Air Canada with 1 layover? The flight will depart at 12:15 pm local time and cost you $455 per passenger.
I see, that's all I need. Thank you.
No problem, have a great day!
I need a one way flight and I have 0 bags that need to be checked in.
On which date would you like to travel and to where?
I want to fly to Seattle on the 6th of March.
What city do you want to leave from?
Look for flights departing Atlanta.
I have 4 flights for you. How about American Airlines? There is one flight that takes off at 4:20 pm local time with 0 layovers. This ticket costs $187 per passenger.
I need something else. Could you find economy tickets?
I have 3 flights for you. Do you want to fly Delta Airlines? The flight takes off at 2:30 pm local time with 0 layovers and costs $194 per person.
I want four seats but find me other options.
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 7:15 pm local time. It has 1 layover and costs $334.
Would it arrive the day after? At which airport does it land?
It will land at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport the following day.
Okay, I need round trip flights that return on 8th of this month.
I have 1 flight that I think you would like. How about Southwest Airlines? This flight leaves at 7:15 pm mand returns at 6:55 pm local time. It costs $485 per person.
Oky. Thank you for your assistance.
Have an awesome day.
Can you find me a one way flight? I have 0 bags so no need to check any in
Where do you want to depart from?
Let's look for flights from Philadelphia
Where are you going to and what date are you travelling?
I'm flying to Atlanta and want to leave on the 3rd
How's this American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:45 pm and has 1 layover. It costs $196 total
Can you book four seats but with Southwest Airlines.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that takes off at 3:30 pm and has 1 layover and costs $208 a head
Does it arrive the next day? And which airport does that flight leave from?
The flight leaves from PHL International Airport and it arrives on the same day
Alright, help me find round trip flights
What day do you want your return to be?
Let's make the return on March 5th
I found 1 flight via Southwest Airlines that leaves at 3:30 pm and the return flight takes off at 6:40 am and will cost you $385
Where does that land?
It will arrive at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport
Alright that sounds good
Can I do anything else for you?
Nope, that's all thanks
Great, have a good one
I will be having a flight so I need a ticket for a one way flight, though keep in mind that I have zero bags to check in. I will start my journey on the 11th.
Can you tell me your destination, and the city from where you will depart?
I will be flying from London, and my destination will be Seattle.
I see that 3 flights match what you want. One of the flights has 1 layover and it departs at 6:55 am, and it is with American Airlines. The ticket would be costing you $402 per passenger.
That seems good. I actually need to find a round trip flight.
Can you tell me the day when you will be returning?
My returning date will be 13th of this month.
How would you consider flying with the flight of American Airlines that leaves at 6:55 am local time and returns at 1:40 pm local time.? The cost of the ticket will be $775 per passenger.
Can you tell me for how many passengers is this for? Which is the time, when my flight would arrive at the destination?
What I specified is for 1 passenger and the flight will be at destination at 8:42 pm local time.
That sounds good.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing for the moment. I am thankful for your help.
Have a good time!
I'm going on a trip. Can you get me a one-way flight?
Sure. Where are you going to, and where are you leaving from? Also, what day is your trip?
I need a flight from San Diego to Portland on the 6th.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight which leaves at 1:15 pm and has 0 layovers. It costs $135.
Are there any other flights available?
There is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 4:50 pm and has 0 layovers. It costs $122.
What time does this flight get to Portland? Is it the next day?
You would arrive at 7:34 pm local Portland time the same day.
Sounds good. Actually, maybe I should just be a round trip flight. Can you find me one which beings me back on the 9th of March?
Sure. That 1 American Airlines flight which leaves at 4:50 pm has a return flight which departs at 4:45 pm local Portland time. The total cost would be $338.
What station does this flight arrive at? And do they allow at least one checked bag?
It is PDX International Airport and 0 checked bags are allowed.
I see.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
No. Thank you very much.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'm looking for a one way flight
Where are you planning to go and from which city do you want to depart from?
I'm flying to New York from London
Which date do you prefer?
I wanted to fly tomorrow
There are 4 flights. How about flying with American Airlines which takes off at 2 am local time where itinerary has 0 layovers which costs $247 per head
Try some thing else
How about British Airways, which takes off at 11:05 am where itinerary has 1 layovers which costs $388 per head
Find some more
How about Delta Airlines which takes off at 11:50 am where itinerary has 1 layovers and costs $443 per person
Cool. I wanted to go find round trip flights with zero bags check in, planning to return on March 4th
There are 1 flights. How about flying with Delta Airlines which takes off at 11:50 am local time and return takes off at 5:30 pm local time which costs $628 per person?
All right fine.
Can I assist you with anything else?
Nope. Thanks a lot for the help
Have a wonderful day
Will you find me a one way flight on United Airlines?
Where are you going?
Seattle.
What date?
Thursday next week.
Which city are you leaving from?
Will you find me flights from Atlanta for 1 person?
I found a flight on United Airlines that takes off at 11:50 am with 0 layers for $190 per passenger.
Great.
Anything else?
Will you find some round trip flights? I need to check in 0 bags.
Which day is the return flight?
March 9th.
How about United Airlines at $462 per passenger that takes off at 11:50 am with returning flight that takes off at 10:35 am.
What's the destination airport? It arrives the day after right?
The flight arrives the same day at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Sounds great.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a one way flight.
Which city are you departing, what date would you like to leave and where are you planning to go?
Find flights in Los Angeles leaving on the 9th of March to Las Vegas.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight leaves at 5:05 am local time and has 0 layovers. The tickets are $80 per passenger.
How many passengers are included for that prices? Will the flight arrive by the next day?
The cost will be for 1 passenger and the flight will arrive at it's destination on the same day.
Ok, search for round trip flights.
What day will you be returning?
I want to be back on March 11th.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The flight leaves at 5:05 am local time. The return flight leaves at 4:50 am local time and the tick costs $154 per passenger.
All right that sounds good.
Is there anything else i can help you with today?
Nope, that's it. Thanks for the help.
Thank you and have a good day.
I need a one-way flight, preferably with American Airlines.
Where are you flying from, and what is the destination? What day will you be traveling?
I need a flight from London to Chicago for the 4th of March.
I've found 1 flight with American Airlines. The flight takes off at 2:25 am local time and has 0 layovers. It is $261 per passenger.
Okay. I round trip Economy flight. I have zero bags to check.
What day do you want to return?
I plan on returning on the 6th.
I found 1 American Airlines flight leaving at 2:25 am local time. The return flight leaves at 2:40 pm local time. It's $617 per ticket.
How many tickets did you get? Which airport does it leave from?
I got 1 ticket. The flight leaves from Heathrow International Airport.
Okay. Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I will be having a flight so I need a one way flight,
Can you tell me the date when you will be having the trip? From which city are you going to be leaving, and which is your destination?
I will be flying from Nairobi, with my destination being Chicago, and I will be having the trip on Tuesday next week.
I see that there are 2 flights which meet what you want. Do you like having American Airlines as your flight company? This flight will be leaving at 7:40 am local time, and it has 1 layover. This ticket will cost you an amount of $431 per passenger.
Can you tell me if the flight arrives the day after?
I can confirm that the flight arrives at the destination on the next day.
That's good. I am also in need of a round trip flight.
Can you tell me when you would want to return?
I think I will be returning on Thursday next week.
I see that there is 1 flight suiting what you might like, and it is with the American Airlines. Also the flight will leave at 7:40 am local time, and it will be returning at 9:40 am local time. The cost of this ticket will be $786 per passenger.
That seems nice.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Nothing for now. I appreciate your help.
Have a good time!
Can you search for one-way flights for me?
Of course, what day would you like to travel on?
I'd like to fly on the 10th of March.
What city are you leaving from, and where are you traveling to?
I'm leaving from London and going to Seattle, I have 0 bags to check in, I'm just bringing a carry-on, I hate traveling while loaded down.
Okay! I've got 3 matching flights here - American Airlines has a flight with 1 layover, taking off at 2:25 am for $410 per passenger.
What class would it be and when does it arrive?
The flight arrives on the same day - it's an Economy seat.
No, I think 2:25 am is too early to be flying Economy, tell me what else is available.
How about Delta Airlines? There's an 11:50 am take off with 1 layover for $411.
No. Okay, can you look up flights from Los Angeles?
I've got 3 more options here: Alaska Airlines has a flight taking off at 8:15 am with 0 layovers for $153 per passenger.
Can you find some round trip flights instead, I need 2 seats.
What day would you like to return?
I'd be coming back on the 12th of this month.
I've got 1 flight here: Alaska Airlines has a flight leaving 1:45 pm and returning 11:10 am for $249 per ticket.
Yeah, that works.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you search for one way flight?
What will be your destination?
My destination is San Francisco.
What will be the city and date of departure?
My city and date of departure is New York and on the 1st.
How about American Airlines which takes off at 9:15 am with 0 layovers and the ticket is priced at $217?
Can you find any other flight for 1 seat and zero bags to check in.
How about Delta Airlines which takes off at 6:40 pm with 0 layovers and the ticket is priced at $174?
Which airport does the flight depart from and what is class of ticket?
The ticket is Economy class and it is taking off from JFK International Airport.
Can you search for any other premium Economy ticket in United Airlines?
How about United Airlines which takes off at 11:15 am with 0 layovers and the ticket is priced at $293.
Okay, Find me round trip flights.
When do you want to get back?
I will be returning on the 3rd.
There is 1 United Airlines flight which leaves at 11:15 am and the returning flight is at 8:05 pm and the ticket is priced at $595.
That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Will you find a one way flight with 0 bags to check in?
Where are you departing from? Where are you going? What date are you traveling?
I want to fly from Vancouver to New York on 9th of March.
I found 4 flights. One of them is Air Canada at $338 per passenger with 1 layover that takes off at 1:40 am.
Which airport does it depart from? Where does it land?
It flies from YVR International Airport to JFK International Airport.
Will you find me something else?
I found American Airlines at $295 per passenger with take off at 5:15 am and 1 layovers.
Anything else?
How about Delta Airlines at $335 per passenger that takes off at 6:40 am and has 1 layover?
Sounds great. Will you find round trip flights?
Which day are you returning?
11th of March.
I found Delta Airlines at $624 per passenger that takes off at 10:15 am. Return flight takes off at 6:40 pm.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a one way flight.
Okay, where are you traveling from and traveling to? What date do you need to travel?
I'm traveling from San Francisco to Phoenix and I need to depart on the 11th of March.
I've found 5 flights that would work for you. There's an Alaska Airlines flight that has 0 layovers and departs 11 am. The ticket is $132 per person.
What else is available?
I found a flight on American Airlines that departs at 8:20 pm and has 0 layovers. It costs $121 per person.
Is there anything else?
I have a flight on Delta Airlines that departs at 11:45 am and has 1 layover. It's $195 per person.
Okay. Let's search for round trip flights.
What day do you want to return?
I want to fly back on March 13th.
I found 1 flight that will work on Delta Airlines. The outbound flight departs at 11:45 am local time and the return flight takes off at 7:55 pm local time. The price is $300 per person.
When and where does the return flight arrive?
The flight is into Sky Harbor International Airport and arrives at 10:02 pm.
Okay, that's all I need for now, thanks.
Have a great day!
I'm going on a trip. Can you search for a one-way flight?
Sure. Where are you going? And what city are you leaving from?
I want a flight from Delhi to Los Angeles.
What day is your trip?
I am leaving on the 8th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight available which leaves at 7 am and has 0 layovers. It costs $228.
Hmm, are there any other flights? There are 0 bags for me to check in.
There is a United Airlines flight available which leaves at 9:15 pm and has 1 layover. It costs $482.
What station does this flight take me to? And what time does it get there?
You would arrive at LAX International Airport at 1:50 am local LA time.
Sounds good, but I changed my mind. I want a round-trip flight for 2 people.
Sure. What day will you be returning?
Most likely on the 12th.
The United Airlines flight which leaves at 9:15 pm that we were discussing earlier has a return flight which departs at 5 am local LA time. It costs $835 per person.
Okay.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I want to search for an one way flight on 2nd of March, can you help me to find one?
What is the origin and destination cities of your trip?
I am planning to visit Chicago from Washington. Search flights as per this detail.
Found 4 results based on your requirement. What about an American Airlines flight which takes off at 6:40 pm local time with itinerary of 0 layovers and the ticket price at $120 per person?
No, please search for some other flights.
How about a flight with Delta Airlines? It will take off at 4:20 am and the cost will be $112 per person. Also it has itinerary of 0 layovers.?
Thanks for that information.
let me know to help further in this?
Yes, I need another help. Please search for round trip flights.
When do you want the return flight to be take off?
Return will be on 4th of this month.
Again please confirm whether Delta Airlines is okay for you. And the flight will take off at 4:20 am and the return flight takes off at 9:35 am under ticket cost $299 per person.
Thanks for all your information.
Have a nice day.
I want to find a one way flight.
What city are you departing from?
I am leaving from Atlanta.
Where are you going and what date are you looking to leave?
I am going to New York on the 11th of March and I would like seats in premium economy.
I found a flight on American Airlines that has 0 layovers and departs at 6:15 am. The cost is $222 per ticket.
Does it arrive the day after and how many passengers did you get this for?
This is for 1 passenger and the flight arrives at the destination on the same day.
Please find me another flight with Delta Airlines.
I found a flight on Delta Airlines that departs at 7:55 pm and has 0 layovers for a price of $197 per passenger.
Ok. Can you please find some round trip flights, with a return date of the 13th of March?
I located a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 7:55 pm and the return flight departs at 1:25 pm. The cost is $372 per ticket.
All right, thank you.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you for your help.
You're welcome. Have a nice day.
I need a one way flight.
What is the departure and arrival cities?
I depart New York and arrive San Diego and prefer Premium Economy.
What are you travel dates?
I depart on March 10th.
I have a Southwest Airlines flight at 6:25 am with 1 layover for $502.
How many bags can I check and I need 2 tickets.
I reserved 1 ticket and 0 bags are permitted.
I want round tickets for 2.
What day would you like to return?
I want to return March 13th.
I have a Southwest Airlines departure at 6:25 am with a return of 7:10 pm for $836.
Thanks that is all for today.
Have a great day.
Find me please one way flight.
Where you want to go?On witch city will be the depart and in what date?
From Phoenix to Sydney today.
You like American Airlines ?Because I found one at 9:30 am locat time with 1 layovers.The total cost is $345 per ticket.
Tell me on witch airport do the flight leave from and if will arrive the day after?
From Sky Harbor International Airport will live and will arrive on next day.
Find for me something else.
What about Delta Airlines ?The cost will be $337 per passenger and have 1 layovers.You can take it at 7:55 pm.
I understand.Find me round trip flight at Economy class .I have zero bags to check in.
In what day will be the return flight?
Will be on 3rd of March.
1 flight I have found with Delta Airlines at 7:55 pm and return at 3:55 pm local time.Cost will be $615.
I understand.The information is sufficient. Thank you very much.
Have a great day!
I need a one-way flight.
Where will you be leaving from, and what day?
I want to fly out of Atlanta on the 7th of this month.
Where to?
I want to go to Phoenix.
There's an American Airlines flight leaving at 9:30 am local time. It has 0 layovers and costs $146 per ticket.
No, find something else.
I have a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 9:35 am local time. It has 0 layovers, and is $179 per ticket.
No, something else.
I have a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 6:35 pm local time. It has 1 layover and costs $265 per ticket.
Where does it land?
The flight arrives at Sky Harbor International Airport.
Is this for one passenger?
Yes, it's for 1 passenger.
Let's look at round-trip flights.
What day do you want the return flight for?
I want to return on March 9th.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 6:35 pm local time. The return flight leaves at 9:15 am local time. Tickets are $396 each.
Okay, thanks, that's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I have just completed my overseas project and want go back home. Could you please find me a one way flight?
Where will you be travelling to?
My destination is Chicago.
Please tell me your departure city and your preferred date of travel.
Please find flights departing from Sydney. I'd like Economy class tickets on a flight leaving on 12th of this month.
I've found one 1 flight you may like. Would you consider taking a Delta Airlines flight with 1 layover, taking off at 3:55 pm local time, at a cost of $405 per passenger?
That sounds good, but I've just been informed that my team's expertise will be required on an extension of the just concluded project, and therefore I need to accompany 2 other team members to and from Sydney. Please find me three seats on a round trip flight.
When would you like to take the return flight?
I'm planning on returning on the 14th of this month.
How about a Delta Airlines flight taking off at 3:55 pm local time, with a return flight scheduled for 7:05 am, at a cost of $740 per passenger?
Please let me know the departure airport.
The flight departs from Kingsford Smith International Airport.
Sounds good. That will be all.
Have a lovely day.
Can you help me find 3 tickets for a one way flight for the 2nd of March?
What is the destination?
Washington and I want to fly with Delta Airlines.
What is departure city?
Departure city is Atlanta.
I have a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 5:55 pm with 0 layover and costs $107.
How about a round trip flight?
What is return date?
I want to return on March 4th
I found 1 flight. A Delta Airlines flight with a 5:55 pm departure and return at 6:25 pm that costs $228.
Thanks that is all for today.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a one way flight?
Which city do you want to depart from?
I would like 4 seats, departing from Phoenix.
What date would you like to travel?
I plan to fly out on the 2nd.
What is the planned destination?
I am flying to Seattle.
I found a flight on American Airlines with 1 layover that departs at 10:45 am and costs $224 per ticket.
Can you please find me another flight?
I have located a flight on Southwest Airlines with 1 layover that departs at 1:35 pm and costs $257 per ticket.
What is the class of the ticket and what airport does it land at?
It is an economy seat and arrives at the Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Please find me something else.
I have located a flight on United Airlines that has 1 layover that departs at 5:05 pm and costs $241 per ticket.
All right. Can you please find me a round trip flight, and I have 0 bags to check.
What day are you looking to return?
I plan to return next Monday, and can the flight be economy?
I have located 1 flight for you on United Airlines. The flight departs at 5:05 pm and the return flight departs at 10:45 am. The cost per ticket is $457.
What airport does the plane take off from and land at?
The flight departs from Sky Harbor International Airport and lands at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
All right, thank you. That is all I need for now.
Ok, have a good day.
Help me find a one way economy flight on the 6th of March
Where are you headed? And where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Phoenix and going to New York
How about flying on a Southwest Airlines flight at 4:10 am with 1 layover and costing $311
I want to find a round trip instead, make my return the 8th of March
OK, what about this Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 4:10 am and a return flight leaving at 6:25 am costing $609 a head.
When does that flight arrive and which airport will I leave from?
You'll arrive at 3 pm and leave from Sky Harbor International AIrport.
Alright that's it for now
Great, have a great day
Will you find me one way flights to Sydney?
What date?
11th of this month.
Which city?
Los Angeles.
I found 5 flights. One of them is Alaska Airlines that takes off at 11:30 am with 0 layovers. It costs $198 per passenger.
Anything else?
How about American Airlines for $233 per passenger that takes off 12:10 pm with 0 layovers?
Will you find something for four people?
I found Delta Airlines for $312 per passenger that takes off at 4:35 am with 1 layover.
I would like round trip flights.
Which day is your return flight?
13th of March.
I found 1 flight on Delta Airlines for $477 per passenger that takes off at 4:35 am. Return flight takes off at 2:50 am.
Does the flight arrive the day after?
Yes, it arrives at its destination the next day.
Great.
Anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me find a one way flight?
Sure. What date and what city are you coming from?
I'm looking for a flight from San Francisco with United Airlines leaving on the 4th of this month.
Where you planning to go?
I'm headed to Chicago
I found 1 flight via United Airlines that leaves at 11 pm and has 0 layovers that will cost $157
Alright, what about a round trip with a return Wednesday next week. Find me an economy class ticket.
I found 1 flight with United Airlines that leaves at 11 pm and a return flight at 7:45 am. It'll cost $426
Can I check in two bags? What airport does it leave from?
0 bags are allowed, and the flight leaves from SFO International Airport
Alright, that's it for now
Got it, take care
I need to attend a function in my cousin house. so i need to travel. Will you find a one way flight?
From which city you want to depart?
I need to depart from San Francisco. I wish to fly with American airlines to London.
In which date would you like to travel?
It should be on Wednesday next week
There is 1 flight that suits your needs. It is an American Airlines and flight depart at 6 pm local time and the itinerary has 1 layovers and its costs is $373 per passenger.
Ok thats great. Will you find round trip flights?
In which date do you want to take the return flight?
It should be on next Friday.
Ok You wisht to fly with American airlines and flight takes off at 6 pm local time and return flight takes off at 2 am local time. it costs is $742 per passenger.
Thanks, it sounds good to me
Take care have a great day
I'm going on vacation pretty soon. Can you find me a one seat one-way flight?
What is your planned date of departure, and what is your intended destination?
I plan on flying to Philadelphia on the 12th of March.
What city do you plan on departing from?
I will be leaving New York.
Do you want to take a flight from American Airlines? It leaves at 7:55 am local time, has 0 layovers, and a ticket costs you $64.
At what time will the flight arrive at Philadelphia?
It takes about an hour. Specifically, it will land at 8:46 am local time.
What airport will the flight go to?
It will land at PHL International Airport.
Got it. I'd like to find a round trip flight.
On what day do you plan on going back to New York?
I intend on returning on the 14th.
I found 1 flight that suits your needs, hosted by American Airlines. It takes off at 7:55 am local time, whereas the returning flight takes off at 8:45 pm local time. A ticket for the flight costs $123 per passenger.
Good to know.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Not now. Thanks.
Have yourself a wonderful day.
Can you help me find a one way flight?
Where are you planing to go? And which city are you leaving from and when do you want to travel?
I'm flying to Toronto from Chicago on the 11th
I found 3 flights. How about a American Airlines flight leaving at 3:50 pm with 0 layovers for $93
What about a round trip flight, with 0 bags to check in?
Which day do you want to take the flight back?
I want to go back on March 13th
How about flying on American airlines with a 3:50 pm take off and a 10:45 am return flight for $185?
Where does the flight land? And does it arrive on the next day?
The flight arrives same day at Toronto Pearson International Airport
Alright that is all I need
Have a good one
My long awaited vacation is coming up. I want 4 seats on a one way flight aboard Delta Airlines.
When would you like to make the trip? Where would you be heading and from which city would you be leaving?
I want to fly from New York to Seattle on the 3rd of March.
There is 1 flight available on Delta Airlines that leaves at 7:10 pm. There would be 1 layover and the price is $301.
What is the name of the airport that I would be departing from?
The flight leaves JFK International Airport at 1:17 am.
That would be fine. I would need a round trip flight.
When would you like to return?
On Tuesday next week.
There is 1 flight available on Delta Airlines. It leaves at 7:10 pm and returns at 8:05 am local time. The price of the ticket is $564.
That would be First Class seat?
It is an Economy ticket.
Ok. Thanks. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
I'm looking for a one way flight for an upcoming trip I have. Can you help?
Sure, I just need to know where you are departing and arriving at.
I am going to be traveling from Seattle to San Francisco.
Great, and what dates are you looking to travel on?
I need to leave on the 8th of this month.
I found a flight with Alaska Airlines, departing at 11:35 pm with 0 layovers, and the total price is $135. How does that sound?
That will not work. Can you find me something different?
I also have an American Airlines flight that departs at 7:50 pm has 0 layovers, and costs $121. Are you interested in that one?
Can you find me something else that is economy class. I have zero bags to check if that helps.
What about Delta Airlines? That flight departs at 8:25 pm, with 0 layovers, and the ticket costs $121.
How about round trip flights that return on the 10th?
There is 1 flight matching that criteria. It is Delta Airlines, the departure time is 8:25 pm, the return flight takes off at 2:30 pm, and the ticket price is $241 per per person.
What times do the two flights arrive at their destinations?
The destination flight arrives at 10:36 pm and the returning flight arrives at 4:41 pm.
Okay, thanks for your help. That will be all.
Have a good day and a safe trip!
Can you help me find a one way United Airlines flight
What date do you want to travel?
How about next Tuesday
What city do you want to leave from?
Let's find flights from Phoenix
Ok got it, and where are you headed?
I'm going to New York
I found 1 flight with United Airlines that leaves at 6:10 pm and has 1 layover. It'll cost $331, how does that sound?
Does it arrive the next day? And can I check in one bag?
You're allowed 0 bags unfortunately. And the flight does arrive the next day.
Great, now find me a round trip flight with a March 7th return date
Is this United Airlines flight that leaves at 6:10 pm and returns at 5:15 am and costs $560
When does that flight arrive? And how many passengers can you book?
This is for 1 passenger and it arrives at 6:20 am
Alright, that's all I need
Great, have a good one
I want an Economy one-way flight
Where are you going to and from
I want to go to Los Angeles from Delhi
When are you going?
I wan to fly with American Airlines on the 10th of March
There is an American Airlines flight at 7:40 am with 1 layover for $393 per person.
When does it arrive?
It gets in at 10:30 am local time.
Can you get this for one person?
Yes for 1 passenger
Ok, good
Do you need any other help?
I want a round trip that returns on the 14th of March
Do you want to fly with American Airlines, which takes off at 7:40 am and the return leaves at 11:35 am local time. It will cost $797 per person
Ok, thanks that's all
Ok, have a good day.
I have a plan for a short trip for which I need to search for an one way flight.
When and where are you leaving from and which city do you like to visit?
I am planning to visit Chicago from New York on next Wednesday and I need a flight from American Airlines.
I found 1 result that is a flight from American Airlines which leaves at 8:50 am local time with ticket cost $129 for single person and it has 0 layovers. Is that okay with you?
From which Airport the flight leaves and when it reaches the destination?
Origin Airport is JFK International Airport and the flight will reach the destination on the same day.
That is okay, can you search for a round trip flight?
When do you like to book the return flight?
returning date will be 8th of March.
What about a flight with American Airlines leaves at 8:50 am local time and the returning flight time is 9:40 am under ticket cost $232 per person? Is that convenient to you?
What is the time of arrival of return flight?
It is at 12:59 pm, Is that okay to you?
Thanks for your information.
Anything else you want?
No, that's all now.
Have a great day.
I have a plan for a short trip and I need to book flight for which I need your help, can you search for an one way flight?
Yes, I can search and let me know the start and end place of your trip.
Ya, need flight from San Francisco to Mexico City, Is that possible?
Yes, of course, and also let me know the date of visit, so that I can search?
trip will be on 11th of March, please search accordingly.
What about a flight with Alaska Airlines which leaves at 11:05 am local time and with itinerary has 0 layovers?. The ticket cost will be at $154 per person.
Please search for some other flights and I have zero bags to carry.
Found 3 results and one is a flight with American Airlines which takes off at 10:10 pm with itinerary 0 layovers for which the ticket price will be $175 per person. Is this information useful?
That is okay but I need to search for round trip flights for three persons.
When is the return date?
Return date will be 13th of this month.
1 American Airlines flight which leaves at 10:10 pm and the return flight takes off at 11:40 am local time which costs $317 per person. Is that okay?
Thanks and all are useful information to me.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to find a one way flight from San Francisco, can you help me out?
What is your destination?
I want to fly to Seattle?
When will you be traveling?
I want to travel on the 6th, on an economy flight.
Would you be interested in Alaska Airlines, it has 0 layovers and will depart at 9:55 am, only costing $138 per passenger?
Can you find me something else, I specifically want 2 seats for this flight?
How about a American Airlines from 4 flights, it costs $125 per person with 0 layovers, and will leaves at 9:30 am?
Where will the plane arrive?
The plane will arrive at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Will it arrive the day after?
The flight arrives at the destination on the same day it departs.
Can you find me something else?
How about Delta Airlines, it leaves at 2:30 pm, and it costs $133 per person with 0 layovers?
That sounds all right.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you find me round trip flights?
On what day are you planning on taking a return flight?
I want to return on the 8th.
There is 1 flight available on Delta Airlines, it will take off at 2:30 pm and its return flight will leave at 8:25 pm. Ticket prices are $239 per person, is that alright by you?
That sounds great, thanks.
Will that be all I can help you with?
Yes, that is all, thanks for your help.
Hope you have a good day.
I have some long over due vacation time approaching and would like to book a one way flight.
I'm happy to help you with that. Can you tell me the dates you are looking to travel, where you want o depart from, and the location of your destination do I can narrow down the search for you?
I would like to depart from Chicago on the 1st of this month and will be traveling to Washington. My preferred airline is Delta Airlines.
I was able to find 1 flight with Delta Airlines that has 0 layovers, is $109 per ticket, and departs at 2:30 pm. Has does that flight sound?
What date and time will the flight arrive at my destination?
That particular flight arrives at your destination on the same day as the departure at 5:28 pm.
Okay, now can you look into some round trip flights for me?
Sure, what day do you want to return?
For the return flight I will need a total of 3 economy class seats that returns on the 3rd of March.
Delta Airlines currently has a flight that leaves at 4:05 pm, the return flight departs at 4:20 am, and the total cost of the tickets are $309 each.
Okay
Can I find anything else for you?
Nope, that is all I needed for now. Thanks for the help.
You're welcome, I'm happy to help.
Can you get me some Premium Economy one-way tickets?
Okay, I'll need to ask you for a little more information to help you: Where will you be leaving from, where would you like to go, and what is your preferred date to travel on?
I'm leaving from Chicago and going to Phoenix - I'm leaving March 8th.
How about American Airlines? There's a flight leaving at 8:25 am with 1 layover for $442 per ticket.
Maybe. Can you look for some round-trip flights too?
What day would you like to return on?
I'd be returning on the 10th.
Okay, I have an American Airlines flight here that takes off at 8:25 am and returns at 9:30 am, it's $899 per ticket.
Alright, when does the return flight arrive at the airport? Where does it land?
The flight will land at Sky Harbor International Airport, it arrives at 7:22 pm.
Okay, good, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a one-way flight, please.
What date are you wanting to travel?
I want to fly this Saturday
Which city are you departing from and where are you going?
Look for flights from Chicago to Washington, please.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines or someone else? There is one here that takes of at 9:40 am with 1 layover and costs $194 per ticket.
Alright, scrap that. I want a round trip. I have zero bags and all I want is 1 seat.
Which day would you like to take this return flight?
I want to return next Monday.
I have 1 flight just for you. American Airlines, take off at 9:40 am local and return at 6:40 pm local. It will cost $293 per person.
All right that sounds like a plan.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, that is all I need.
Have a fantastic journey.
I will be traveling soon with some friends. I need four one way flight tickets from any airline.
What is your departure date and from where are you leaving? What is the destination?
We will be departing on the 10th of this month from Seattle with destination to Chicago.
Is Alaska Airlines alright for you? There is a flight that takes off at 11:10 am with a price of $322 per ticket. It has 1 layover.
Is there antyhing else? There are 0 bags to check in.
There are 4 flights that match your criteria Is American Airlines alright for you? There is a flight that takes off at 10:35 am with a price of $183 per ticket. It has 0 layovers.
Find something different and find two seats.
Is Delta Airlines alright for you? There is a flight that takes off at 8:05 am with a price of $156 per ticket. It has 0 layover.
Which airport does it depart from?
It departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
When does it arrive and is it a Business class ticket?
It is an Economy class ticket and the flight arrives the same day it departs.
Thinking about it, I need a round trip flight.
What is the return date?
I want a return date of March 12th.
Is Delta Airlines alright for you? There is a flight that takes off at 8:05 am and the return flight takes off 5:45 am with a price of $436 per ticket. It has 0 layover.
That sounds good.
Is there something else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a one way flight please
Where are you headed? And where are you leaving from?
I'm going from New York to Seattle.
What is your travel date?
I want to fly out on the weekend, this Sunday
I found 4 flights that work. How about this American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:10 pm and ha 1 layover. It costs $325
Find me another option
How about with Delta Airlines? Also has 1 layover that costs $301 and leaves at 7:10 pm
Where does it land? And is this ok for two passengers?
This is just for 1 passenger, and it's headed to Seattle-Tacoma International Airport
Find me an economy class ticket instead
I found 2 flights that work. How about Southwest airlines with 1 layover and a 6:25 am departure for $298
Yes that works, but find me a round trip flight
When do you want to return?
I'm coming back next Tuesday
I found 1 flight that works via Southwest Airlines and leaves at 6:25 am local time. The return flight leaves at 3:05 pm and will cost $592 per head.
All right then
Can I help with anything else?
No, that's it thanks
Have a good trip!
I am interested in finding a one way flight.
Where do you prefer to leave?
To Atlanta I will fly.
The departure will be made from what city?
From San Francisco on 8th of this month.American Airlines is perfect for me.
1 flight is available according to your preferences.With American Airlines at 7:15 am locat time with itinerary 0 layovers.Cost of the ticket is $174.
I understand.Find me round trip flights.
In witch day you want to take the return flight?
I want to be on March 10th.
I have 1 option with American Airlines at 7:15 am and return take off at 11 am local time.Cost per passenger is $459.
OK.I see!
Anything else I can do for you?
No is enough for now. Thanks!
Have a great day!
I need a one way flight leaving on the 12th of March.
What is your departure city and destination?
I'm leaving from San Francisco and going to Atlanta.
Alaska Airlines has a 3 pm flight with 0 layovers. The ticket costs $174 per passenger.
Can you find me something else? I need three Economy class tickets.
I found 4 flights. American Airlines has a 7:15 am flight with 0 layovers for $208 per passenger.
Anything else? I need two seats, preferably on Delta Airlines.
I found you 1 flight with 1 layover on Delta Airlines. It departs at 4:05 pm local time and costs $273 per passenger.
What are the departure and arrival airports?
The flight departs from SFO International Airport and arrives at the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Good. I want round trip flights.
What is your return date?
The 14th of March.
I found you 1 flight on Delta Airlines. It departs at 4:05 pm local time and the return flight departs at 7:55 pm local time. The ticket is $561 per passenger.
All right.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Your welcome. Have a nice day.
Please help me find 2 seats on a one way flight, with zero bags to check in.
When would you like to to fly out?
I'd like to depart on 7th of this month.
Please let me have you destination.
I'll be going to Philadelphia. The ticket class doesn't matter.
May I have your origin city?
Please search for flights from Vancouver.
Your search has yielded 2 flights. Do you like flying on Delta Airlines? They have seats costing $314 per passenger on a flight with 1 layover, leaving at 2:30 am local time.
That sounds good, but I've just been asked to attend a job interview in Vancouver on the 10th of March. Please find me round trip tickets.
Sure, no problem. When would you like to return?
I would like to return on March 9th so that I can make it to my interview.
Okay, I've found 1 flight that you may like. How does Delta Airlines sound? They have seats available on a flight taking off at 2:30 am local time,with a returning flight scheduled for 4:05 pm local time, at a cost of $876 per seat.
Sounds good.
Will there be anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Have a great day.
I want to find a one way economy ticket.
Where are you planning to go, and which city are you leaving from? Also what are your travel dates?
I want to fly out next Wednesday from Toronto to Atlanta
Would you like to fly on Air Canada at 4:30 am with 1 layover and wil cost $217 again.
When does the flight arrive at my destination?
It gets it at 12:37 pm local time
Find me another flight
How about a 1 layover. 2:20 am flight via American Airlines that costs $223
Sure, how many tickets?
I'm traveling solo, so just for 1
Great, now find me some round trip flights with a March 8th return. I have 0 bags to check
I found 1 flight on American Airlines that leaves at 2:20 am and has a return flight at 9:40 am. It'll cost $421
Sure, that's all I need at the moment.
Got it, have a good one
Find me please one way flight to San Francisco.
In which city you will depart and what will be the date?
I want to go from Philadelphia with 0 bags.The fly out will be on the 1st.
3 flights i found for you.American Airlines you can take at 2:35 pm local time and have 1 layovers.Price for one ticket is $308.
Good.Find me round trip flights please.
In which day you want to be the return?
On 3rd of March I plan to retun.
What about American Airlines ?You can take it at 5:50 pm and return at 5 am both will be at local time .Cost will be $573 per ticket.
I understand. Thanks for the information.
Have a great day!
Find me a one way flight.
Where are you going?
I am going to Las Vegas on March 7th.
Where are you departing from?
I have zero bags and want to depart from Seattle.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight with 1 layover that leaves at 7:30 am and costs $215 per person.
What else do you have?
I found an American Airlines flight with 1 layover that departs at 1:40 pm and it costs $253 per person.
What airport does it land at?
It lands at McCarran International Airport.
Did you say this was for 2 people?
This is for 1 person.
That works. Can you find round trip tickets?
When are you returning?
I want to get back on March 9th.
Search revealed 1 flight. It is an American Airlines flight that departs at 1:40 pm and the second flight departs at 1:55 pm. It costs $454 per person.
Does the flight land the next day?
It arrives on the same day.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a fantastic day.
Find a one way flight for me.
Departure date and city? Destination?
I'm going to Portland from Los Angeles on March 7th.
I found 5. There's an Alaska Airlines flight with 0 layovers leaving 11:45 am for $145.
Ok. Check my savings balance.
You have $14,774.69 in savings.
Transfer one thousand seven hundred and sixty bucks from checking to Li.
Please confirm: send $1,760 from savings to Li in their checking.
Yes.
Transfer started.
Thanks.
Anything else for today?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Get me a one way flight to Las Vegas.
What is your departing city and when are you going?
I want to depart San Francisco on the 11th and I have 0 bags to check.
Alaska Airlines has a flight with 0 layovers, a departure time of 10:25 am and a total cost of $93 per ticket.
How many passengers does the cost cover and does when does the flight land?
The ticket price is for 1 person and the flight lands that same day.
Find me an American Airlines flight.
American Airlines has a flight with 0 layovers, a departure time of 5:25 am and a cost of $106 per ticket.
That works. Check the balance of my savings account.
Your have $8,844.18 in your savings account.
That is good.
Do you want to transfer money?
Yes, transfer 900 dollars to someone's savings account.
Who will be receiving the money?
Jasbir will receive the money.
You want to transfer $900 from your savings account to the savings account of Jasbir, correct?
That is right.
Your money has been sent.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need more help?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I'd like to find a one way flight.
What is the date you'd like to travel, and where are you hoping to go?
I would like to fly Tuesday next week to Portland.
What city do you want to depart from?
I am looking for flights from Los Angeles.
I have 5 flights for you with Alaska Airlines at 11:45 am with 0 layovers for $125.
I need to check savings balances.
The balance from savings is $20,252.51.
Let me know the balance of the checking account.
The balance is $13,950.55 from the checking account.
I would like to make a transfer.
What amount of money do you want to transfer.
Transfer for me six hundred and ninety bucks.
Who do you wish to send money to?
I'd like to send it to Philip.
Please confirm checking account transfer $690 to Philip to his checking.
Yes, that is great.
The transfer is a success.
Thanks for the help.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing else to help.
Have a great day.
Would you help me find a one way flight please?
Certainly. On what date and where would you like to leave from?
On the 5th from Los Angeles please.
And your destination?
That would be Phoenix.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 10:20 pm with 0 layovers and that's a $90 ticket.
How about something from San Francisco?
There are 4 flights. American Airlines has a 12:25 pm flight for $101 with 0 layovers.
Where does it fly out of?
That leaves from SFO International Airport.
Does that flight get in on the dar after? When does it get to my destination city?
It has an arrival time of 2:32 pm and it's on the same day.
How about something else? And it's just for 1 passenger.
There is a flight on Delta Airlines at 7:10 pm, 1 layover, for a $235 fare.
Okay, thanks. Oh, I'd like to verify my bank balance please.
Checking or savings please?
My savings balance please.
Your savings account has a balance of $4,134.40.
Okay, thank you.
Do you need to do a transfer now?
Yes, I think I do.
For how much and to whom?
I'd like to transfer 1,170 dollars to Yumi please.
Confirming a transfer of funds from savings in the amount of $1,170 to the checking account of Yumi.
Yes, thank you.
The transfer is processing.
How long should that take to complete?
The transfer will complete in 3 business days.
Thank you very much.
You're very welcome.
12th of march philadelphia two seats
where are you going?
chicago I am flying
american airlines 4 flights 0 layovers $114 8:50 pm
go to savings
the savings is $22,666.15
I want a transfer
who to send money to?
give to jasbir
how much money?
send 1,400 bucks
savings $1,400 jasbir checking
how many days?
3 business days
thanks a lot
anything else to help with?
no thank you
have a good one
I am taking a trip, can you help me reserve my ticket please.
Sure, I would love to. Which city will you be visiting? Do you know what city and date you will be departing from?
Yes, I'm flying New York to Las Vegas on Monday next week. What can you find?
If you like American Airlines, they have a 6:50 pm with 1 layover for $287 per ticket.
Would I arrive the same day or the day after?
Your flight will depart and arrive on the same date.
If I go with this flight, where would I be flying out of and where will I arrive?
Your departure airport is JFK International Airport and arrival would be at McCarran International Airport.
I see. I would like to hear more options. What does Delta Airlines have for economy seating prices?
Delta Airlines has 1 flight departing at 3 pm with 1 layover for $328 per person.
Hold that thought, Let's go and check my savings account balance please.
Alright no problem. Your savings as a current balance of $16,313.89. Did you need to make any banking changes?
Thanks, I'm going to need to make a transfer now.
I can assist you with this. Who would you like to send money to?
Uncle Richard please.
ok, and how much are we sending Uncle Richard?
Let's send 310 bucks.
Sure, please confirm we are sending Uncle Richard $310 form your savings to his checking account. Is this correct?
Yes, How long does the transfer take?
Your transfer will take 3 business days and has been successfully been requested.
Great, thanks! Good bye.
your welcome. Good bye.
I would like to find a one way flight. The number of bags I have to check in is zero. I would like three seats on a flight out of Seattle.
Where do you want to go? What is the date you want to travel?
I would like to fly out on the 3rd going to Toronto.
I have located 5 flights for you. Do you want to fly on Alaska Airlines? The flight will leave at 11:10 am local time. It has 1 layover and the price of the ticket is $333 per passenger.
Find something else for me.
Do you want to fly with American Airlines? The flight will leave at 1:40 pm local time. There is 1 layover and this flight costs $328 per passenger.
Where will the flight land? At what time will the flight get to my destination?
The flight will arrive at 3:29 am at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
Okay. I would like to check the balance in my savings account.
The balance of your savings account is $7,807.23.
Okay, thank you for that.
Do you want to transfer some money?
Yes, I would like to make one transfer.
Who do you want to send your money to?
Send the money to Yumi.
What is the amount of money that you would like to transfer?
I would like to transfer one thousand two hundred and ninety dollars into their savings account.
Confirm these details for me: Transfer $1,290 from your savings account to the savings account of Yumi.
Yes, that is right.
The transfer is successfully begun.
Thanks very much for your help.
Is there anything else you need?
No, thanks a lot for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a one way flight in economy on March 8th from San Diego.
Where are you going?
Chicago.
Do you like Alaska Airlines? The flight leaves at 9:55 am and 1 layover. The cost is $237.
Find me another options.
What about Southwest Airlines? I found a flight leaving at 11:35 am with 1 layover. The ticket is $303.
Find something else. I need two tickets.
What about United Airlines? The flight leaves at 2:55 pm with 1 layover. The cost is $239.
Ok.
Anything else?
I need to check my bank balance.
Which account?
Checking account.
Your checking account balance is $5,137.56.
Ok.
Do you want to make a transfer?
I want to send Mahmoud money from my checking account.
How much?
470 bucks.
Please confirm, sending Mahmoud $470 to their checking account from your checking account.
Cool, How many days will it take?
The transfer was successful and will take 1 business day.
Thanks for you help.
Anything else?
No, not today.
Bye!
I want 12th of this month premium economy
where are you headed?
I am going to atlanta
what city then?
in new york
american airlines 1:20 pm $191 a passenger 0 layovers
check the balance
checking or savings
go to savings
savings balance is $497.32
$20 savings account
who are you sending it to?
send to dad please
savings $20 to dad from savings
how many days?
3 business hours
thanks a lot
anything else then?
no thank you
have a good one
I need a flight, a premium economy ticket with Alaska Airlines and I have zero luggage.
What date are you travelling and where is your destination?
To Los Angeles on 10th of March.
Which city will you be leaving from?
From San Diego.
There is 1 flight with 0 layovers flying with Alaska Airlines. It departs at 9:55 am and costs $106.
Which airport will it depart from and land at?
From SAN International Airport to LAX International Airport.
okay fine, now could you check the balance of my bank account?
checking or savings account?
my savings account please.
There is $18,149.68 in your savings account.
What about my checking account.
There is $6,335.80 in my checking account.
okay that is fine.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
yes, I need to make a bank transfer.
Who will the money be going to?
to Kagiso please.
How much money?
one thousand three hundred and eighty dollars.
To confirm then that is a transfer from your checking account to Kagiso checking account of $1,380.
yes that is correct.
Your transfer is complete.
thanks for that.
Can I assist you more?
No thank you.
have a lovely day.
Hi, I need help booking a one way flight.
Okay, where do you want to go on your trip?
I want a flight to Paris.
Sure, where are you departing from and on what day?
I want to leave from Seattle on March 1st.
Okay, there are 4 flights you could take. Alaska Airlines has a flight that takes off at 11:35 am and has 1 layover, costing $418 a ticket.
Yeah, that's fine for me.
Cool, can I help with anything more?
I want to check my banking balance.
What account do you want me to check?
I'd like to see the balance of my savings account, please.
Okay, your savings account has a balance of $6,628.55.
Alright, can I also see the balance of my checking account?
No problem, your checking account has $20,583.82 in it right now.
Okay, thank you.
Would you like to make a money transfer?
Yes please, I'd like to make a transfer now.
How much money are you transferring and to whom?
I want to send 50 bucks to Li.
Okay, confirming that you're sending $50 from your checking account into the checking account of Li.
Yes, that's what I want.
The transfer has been initiated and the money will be sent soon.
Thanks so much, that's all, goodbye!
Bye, have a lovely day.
zero bags to check in
what city then?
atlanta works for me 2 seats
what date and when?
delhi economy march 8th
american airlines 6:30 am 1 layover $463
when does it get there?
it gets there 2:19 pm
alright thank you
what account then?
go to checking
checking is $20,155.29
one thousand seven hundred and sixty bucks savings to grace
checking $1,760 grace savings
yes that works
it was sentq
thanks a lot
have a good one
Find for me a one way flight.
Where you plan to go and in which city do you want to depart?
I want to fly from London to Atlanta.I need four seats.
In what date you want to travel?
In 10th of this month .
I have for you 4 options.With American airlines is a flight that take off at 6:30 pm local time.Itinerary has 0 layovers and cost per ticket is $264.
This is a Economy ticket?
Yes is a Economy seat.
okay.Check my balance from my savings account.
In your savings account you have the balance $3,136.70.
From checking account check please.
In your checking account you have the balance $4,418.53.
I understand.Thanks.
You want to make a transfer?
Yes.Send from my checking account to Diego $850.
From checking account to checking account transfer $850 to Diego.Is that correct?
Yes is very good.
The transfer was initiated.
Thank you very much.
Anything else I can do for you?
No.Thank you for all.
Have a great day!
I need to find a one way flight.
Wheen do you want to travel and where too?
I want to go to Seattle later today.
What city will you depart from?
I will fly from Mexico City.
Do you want to fly with American Airlines? They have a flight that takes off at 11:40 am local time with 1 layover. The ticket price is $298
No, find me something else. I have 0 bags to check in.
Do you want to fly with Delta Airlines. They have a flight that takes off at 6:35 pm local time with 1 layover. The ticket price is $315.
Is this for one passenger? What is the destination arrival time?
This is for 1 passenger. The flight will arrive at 1:17 am local time.
Ok. I need to check my savings account balance.
Your savings account balance is $10,041.51.
Ok, I want to make a transfer.
How much do you want to transfer and who do you want to transfer the money to?
Transfer $350 to Yumi.
Please confirm: Transfer $350 from my savings account to Yumi checking account.
Yes.
The transfer was completed successfully.
How long will the transfer take?
It will take 3 business days.
Thanks for the help.
May I assist you with something else?
No thank you.
Enjoy your day.
I'm looking for a one way flight.
What date are you departing on?
I'm departing from Los Angeles on the 6th of this month and I just need one ticket.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm flying to Sydney and I have zero bags to check.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 11:30 am with 0 layovers for $159.
I want to fly on American Airlines.
There is an American Airlines flight departing at 12:10 pm with 0 layovers for $186.
What airport does the flight depart from? When does the flight arrive in Sydney?
The flight departs from LAX International Airport and arrives at 11:37 am.
Okay, thanks. I'd like to check my account balance now.
What account do you want to check?
Tell me my savings account balance.
You have a balance of $8,771.23 in your savings account.
Okay, thank you.
Do you want to make a transfer?
Yes, I'd like to transfer money to Jasbir.
How much money do you want to transfer?
Transfer one thousand three hundred and ten dollars to Philip.
Okay, confirm the details. You want to transfer $1,310 from your savings account to the checking account of Philip.
Yes, that is correct. How long will the transfer take?
I have initiated the transfer. It will take 3 business days to process.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you get me two seats on a Delta Airlines plane please?
Sure, where do you plan to depart from and travel to?
I will be travelling from Portland to New York.
And when will you be departing?
On thee March 14th, please.
Sure, there is 1 Delta Airlines flight with 1 layovers which will depart ay 7:30 pm and costs $339.
Sure, could you check my savings account balance please?
There is currently $23,377.57 in your savings account.
I see, thanks!
Would you like to make a transfer?
Could you sent 370 dollars to the savings account of Li?
Sure, please confirm your transfer of $370 from your savings account to the savings account of Li.
Sure!
Your transfer has been made.
Thank you so much!
Could I further assist you?
No, that is all, thanks!
No worries, enjoy!
I need to find a one way flight.
What is your destination?
I'm going to San Francisco and have zero bags to check.
What is your departure city and date?
I'm leaving Las Vegas on March 7th.
How about American Airlines? There is a flight leaving at 6:50 am that has 0 layovers. The ticket costs $104 per passenger.
Okay. I need to get my checking account balance.
Your checking account balance is $15,559.71.
I want to transfer one hundred and forty dollars to Philip.
Can you confirm the following? I am transferring $140 from your checking account into the checking account of Philip. Is this correct?
Yes. How long will the transfer take?
Your transfer has been successfully initiated and will take 1 business day.
Thank you.
Do you need anything else?
No. Thanks for your help.
You're welcome. Have a nice day.
I need a one way flight.
What date and city are you leaving from?
I would like to go with Air Canada from Vancouver to Los Angeles next Thursday.
Do you want to fly Air Canada taking off 4:20 am with 0 layovers at $151 per passenger?
What number of passengers did you get this for?
I have for 1 passenger.
Okay, I need to check the balance of my savings account.
The balance of your savings account is $21,133.64.
Okay that is good.
Do you wish to make a transfer?
I would like to make a transfer.
Who are you sending money to and how much do you wish to transfer?
Send Dad 160 dollars.
Please confirm $160 sent to Dad from savings to checking accounts.
Yes, that is correct.
The transfer has been a success.
What number of days does the transfer take?
The transfer takes 3 business days.
Thanks for the help and see you later.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a one way flight?
Where are you visiting? On which date would you like to leave?
I want to leave on the 4th of March and I'm going to Philadelphia.
Which city will you be departing from?
I need to find flights out of Toronto.
Would you like to fly Air Canada? They have a flight with 1 layover that leaves at 4:30 am and is $139 per passenger.
Okay that sounds good.
Can I do anything else for you?
I need to check my account balance.
Would you like to check your savings or checking?
My savings account pelase.
You have $2,238.63 in your savings.
How much is in my checking?
You have $22,602.19 in your checking.
Okay I need to transfer some money.
Where is it going and how much do you need to transfer?
Please send $570 to Justin.
You need to send $570 to Justin from your checking account to their checking, correct?
Yes that is correct. How long will it take?
Your transfer has been made and will take 1 business day.
Thank you for your help with everything.
You're welcome, have a great day.
I need a flight leaving Chicago, any class ticket, on 8th of this month.
Where is your destination?
To Sydney, Australia.
There is an American Airlines flight with 1 layover which departs at 7:20 pm. The price is $368 per ticket.
Any other options?
There is a Delta Airlines flight with 1 layover leaving a 7:05 am and costing $613.
okay, now could you tell me how much I have in my bank account?
Which account will I check?
My savings account please.
There is $21,117.84 in your savings.
That is okay.
Do you want a transfer?
Yes actually could you transfer from my savings account to Mom, one hundred and twenty bucks.
To confirm the that is a transfer of $120 from your savings account to Mom and their savings account.
Yes that info is correct.
You bank transfer is complete.
Thanks for that, goodbye.
Have a lovely day.
I'm looking for one way flights.
What date do you want to depart on?
I want to depart on the 12th of March.
And what city will you be departing from?
I want to depart from Phoenix.
Where are you going?
I want to go to Las Vegas?
There's an American Airlines flight that departs at 10:10 am with 0 layovers and costs $80 per ticket, what do you think?
Where is it leaving form? And are 0 checked bags permitted?
It departs from Sky Harbor International Airport. And 0 checked bags are allowed.
Okay, I need to look at my balance.
What account would you like to look at?
I need to look at my checking account.
You have $2,832.14 in your checking account.
Okay.
Do you want to make any transfers?
Yes, I have a transfer I'd like to make.
How much is the transfer for?
It's for 710 dollars.
Where will you be sending the money?
It's going to Jasbir.
I'll send $710 from your checking account to the checking account of Jasbir, is everything correct?
Yes, that's correct.
I've transferred the money.
Thanks for helping out.
Do you need me for anything else?
No, thanks again.
Have a fine day.
Hi there, could you help me search for a one way flight please.
Where do you intend to travel to and on which date?
I would be travelling to Las Vegas on the 13th of March.
Sure, and where will you be departing from?
Flights departing from Toronto will do.
There are 2 available flights, how about a flight with Air Canada departing at 5:35 pm with 1 layovers costing $260?
Are there any alternatives?
How about a delta airlines flight with 1 layovers departing at 6:45 pm costing $283 per ticket?
Does this flight arrive the day after and how many tickets will you help me to purchase?
This is for 1 passenger and the flight will arrive at the destination on the same day.
Sure, could you check the balance of my savings account please?
You currently have $18,657.31 in your savings account.
And how about my checking account?
You have $13,506.79 in your checking account.
I see, thanks!
Would you like mt to make a transfer?
Sure, thank you!
Who would you like to send to and for how much?
Can you send one thousand four hundred and forty bucks the checking account of Jasbir?
Sure, please confirm your transfer of $1,440 from your checking account to the checking account of Jasbir.
Yes please, how long will the transfer t ake?
Your transfer has been initiated, which will take 1 business day.
Sure, that is all I need. Thank you!
No worries, have a great day ahead!
I need a flight to Seattle, just 1 seat with zero luggage.
On what date and from where?
From San Francisco on 8th of this month.
There are 5 options for you. One is with Alaska Airlines with 0 layovers leaving at 9:55 am. The ticket costs $130.
fine, now could you check the balance of my savings account?
There is $16,950.67 in your savings account.
What about the balance of my checking account?
There is $20,612.43 in your checking account.
right that is fine.
Are you looking to make a bank transfer?
Yes please from my checking account to Kagiso.
How much money?
850 dollars to their savings account.
To confirm then that is $850 transferred from your checking account to Kagiso savings account.
yes that is correct.
Your transfer is complete.
How long will it take?
around 3 business days.
That is all thanks.
Have a lovely day.
I would like a one way flight. I have 0 bags for check in. Find me Economy class tickets.
What date would you like to travel? From which city would you like to depart from?
I would like to fly out on March 12th from Delhi.
Where would you like to go?
I am flying to Los Angeles.
There are 2 flights available for you. Would you like to fly with American Airlines? This flight takes off at 7 am local time.There are 0 layovers and the ticket will cost $266 per passenger.
Sounds good. I would like to check my balance.
Which account should I check?
Go with my checking account.
Your checking account balance is $21,836.31.
Alright sounds good.
Would you like to make a transfer?
Yes, I would like to make a transfer of 1670 dollars to Mahmoud savings account.
Please confirm these details: Transfer $1,670 from my checking account to Mahmoud savings account.
Yes. How many days will the transfer take?
Your transfer was successfully initiated. The transfer will take 3 business days.
Thank you for the help. Bye.
Have a great day!
I want you to find me a one way flight.
Can you tell me from which city you want to leave, and the date you want to travel?
I want to fly from Chicago on March 14th.
Can you tell me your destination?
I want to arrive in Philadelphia.
Would you like flying with a flight of American Airlines, which has 1 layover, and takes off at 2:40 pm? The ticket for this flight costs $204 per passenger.
Okay. Now I want to check my balance.
Do you want to check the balance in your checking account, or in your savings account?
I want to know the balance on my checking account.
The balance in your checking account is $13,216.83.
That is fine.
Do you want to make a transfer?
Yes, I want to make a transfer.
To whom do you want to send the money to?
I want the money to be sent to Grace.
Can you tell me the amount of money you want to transfer?
I would like to transfer one thousand one hundred and fifty bucks.
Can you please confirm that you want to transfer $1,150 from your checking account to the checking account of Grace?
Yes. Can you tell me the number of days it will take for the transfer to be completed?
Your requested transfer has been initiated without errors. This transfer will take 1 business day to be completed
I appreciate your help. Good bye!
Have a wonderful time!
I have to look for one way flight
Which is the place you are departing from and which city are you visiting?
I am moving to Phoenix from Los Angeles
Which is your preferred day of travel?
I have to depart on 2nd of March
What is your opinion on flying with Alaska Airlines leaving at 10:20 pm with 0 itinerary layovers and costing $88 per passanger
That is perfect
Is there any other help you need?
I have to check my balance
Which account you want me to use checking or savings ?
I need you to select checking account
There is a balance of $8,553.56 on your checking account
That is fine and i like to make a transfer of seventy dollars to their checking account and please send it to mom
Please give confirmation details: Transfer $70 from my checking account to Mom. send it to their checking account
How much time will it take to transfer?
transfer is done and it will take 1 business day for transfer
Thank you very much
Have a wonderful day
Hello, I need help booking a one way flight from Washington on the 11th of March.
Where would you like to fly to?
I want to end up in San Francisco.
Okay great, there are 4 flights you could take. There's an American Airlines flight taking off at 4:10 am, and it has 1 layover. The flight will be $330 per ticket.
Okay, that works.
Can I do something else for you?
Yeah, I'd like to check my bank account balance.
Sure, do you want to know the balance of your checking or savings account?
I want to see my checking out.
Okay, your checking account currently has a balance of $18,615.73.
Thanks, now can you tell me the balance of my savings account?
Of course, your savings account has $24,763.56 in it.
Okay, thank you.
Can I help with anything else?
Yes please, I want to make a money transfer.
How much would you like to transfer today?
I want to send $270.
Sure, who will you be sending it to?
Actually, transfer one thousand one hundred dollars to Mahmoud 's checking account.
Okay, please confirm: sending $1,100 from your savings account to the checking account of Mahmoud.
Great, how long will it take to reach his account?
The transfer has been initiated. It should get there in 3 business days.
Thanks so much, goodbye for now!
No worries, have a good day.
Hello! I'd like an economy one-way flight via Delta Airlines that leaves on Thursday next week.
From what city do you want to leave?
I want to leave Chicago.
And where are you headed to?
To Las Vegas.
Okay. I found 1 Delta Airlines flight for you. It leaves at 5:45 am, has 1 layover, and costs $266 a passenger.
Okay. Can you see how much is in my checking account? I want to be sure I could pay for that.
Your checking account has $15,914.54.
Okay, great. Can I find out what's in my savings, as well?
Sure. You have $17,894.32 in your savings account.
Okay, great. I want to send some money to my friend Li, who is a bit strapped for cash. The specific accounts do not matter.
How much money?
Send 1790 bucks their way.
Okay. I will transfer $1,790 from your savings account to the checking account of Li, if you approve.
I approve of that.
The money has been transferred.
Thanks for the help. Goodbye!
Have a great day.
Hi, could you get me a one way flight from Seattle on the 6th?
Where do you plan to visit?
I will be visiting Sydney for a short trip.
Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines with 1 layovers which departs at 7:30 am and costs $315?
Sure, could you check my savings account balance please?
There is currently $13,536.44 in your savings account.
I see, thanks!
Would you like to make a transfer?
Could you do so please?
Who would you like to transfer to, and how much?
Can you send 260 bucks to Diego?
Sure, please confirm your transfer of $260 to Diego from your savings account to their checking account
Sure, that is fine.
Your transfer has been initiated.
How long will this take me?
About 3 business days.
Sure, that is all. Thanks!
No problem, have a great day ahead!
I would like to book a one way flight.
On which date would you like to travel?
I would like to fly out on the 11th.
Where ewill you go and what city are you leaving from?
I want to go to Toronto from Philadelphia.
I have 3 flights that should be good. What about American Airlines? This flight takes off at 8:45 am local time and has 1 layover. It costs $145 per passenger.
Okay. I want to check my balance.
Which account do you want me to check?
Go to my checking account.
Your checking account has a balance of $24,198.26.
Cool.
Do you need to make a transfer?
Yes, I do.
Who are you sending money to?
Send money to Mahmoud.
How much money do I need to send?
Send one thousand six hundred and eighty dollars.
Could you confirm that you want to transfer $1,680 to Mahmoud 's checking account from your checking account?
That's right.
Your transfers has been started successfully.
Thank you for helping.
Could I assist you any further?
No, that is it.
Have a good one.
I would like to find a premium economy flight on Friday next week.
Where are you traveling and where are you departing from?
I'm traveling to Vancouver from Atlanta, I have zero bags and would like an economy ticket.
There are 2 flights, there is American Airlines leaving at 8:05 pm and has 0 layovers for $186.
Find something else and I would like 1 seat.
There is 1 flight, Southwest Airlines leaving at 4:10 pm and has 0 layovers for $159.
Which airport does it leave from and reaches?
It leaves from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and the destination is YVR International Airport.
I would like to check he balance in my checking account.
The balance of your checking account is $12,439.68.
Ok thank you for your help.
Can I help with something else?
I would like to send money from my savings account to uncle Richard.
How much would you like to transfer?
I would like to transfer 180 dollars.
Transfer $180 from checking account to uncle Richard savings account.
Yes, how many days does the transfer take?
The transfer will take 3 business days.
Thank you that is all for now.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a one way flight please.
Where are you going and on what date? And where would you like to leave from?
Going to Los Angeles from London next Tuesday. I'll have 0 bags.
American Airlines has a flight at 6:55 am with 0 layovers and that ticket costs $260.
Where does it fly into?
LAX International Airport.
Thank you. Would you mind checking my bank balance now?
For which account?
My savings balance please.
The balance in your savings is $6,062.88.
Thanks. I need to transfer some funds now.
To whom and for how much?
700 dollars to Aunt Jenny please.
Confirming a funds transfer of $700 from your savings account to the checking account of Aunt Jenny.
Thanks. How long does that take to go through?
It takes 3 business days and the transfer is underway.
Thank you very much.
My pleasure. Anything else today?
No, I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
Find me two seats on a one way flight.
What is your departure city and destination?
I'm traveling from Paris to San Francisco.
When is your departure date?
Monday next week.
How about Air France? There is a flight leaving at 5:15 pm. It has 1 layover and costs $417 per passenger.
All right. Can you check my checking account balance?
Your checking account balance is $12,949.69.
Alright.
Do you want to make a transfer?
Yes, please.
How much do you want to transfer?
Transfer 180 dollars to the checking account of Philip.
Please confirm the following: I will transfer $180 from your checking account to the checking account of Philip. Is this correct?
Yes. How many days will the transfer take?
It will take 1 business day. Your transfer is successfully initiated.
Thanks for your help. Goodbye!
Have a good day.
I need a one way flight.
Where and when are you leaving?
I would like to leave the 2nd of this month to Philadelphia from Nairobi.
I have 2 flights with American Airlines taking off 7:40 am with 1 layover at $406.
Have you gotten this for one passenger?
I have for 1 passenger.
Okay, I need to check my checking balance.
The checking balance is $17,789.89.
Okay, I'd like to make a transfer.
Who do you wish to send money to?
I would like to send to Uncle Richard.
How much do you wish to transfer?
I want to transfer one thousand two hundred dollars.
Please confirm a transfer from my checking to uncle Richard checking account $1200.
Yes how long will the transfer take?
The transfer is a success and will take 1 business day.
Thanks a lot.
Can I assist with anything else?
No, thanks so much.
Have a great day.
delta airlines works
what date do you wanna travel?
on the 12th san francisco to portland
delta airlines at 5:15 pm 0 layovers $110 a person
checking account works
checking is $1,679.63
that works for me
wanna make a transfer?
yes I do
who will you send to?
three hundred and twenty dollars to mahmoud
checking $320 to mahmoud checking
how many days?
it was sent 1 business day
thanks a lot
bye bye then
I'd like to book a one way flight.
When would you like to leave? Where are you leaving from?
I want to fly out of Toronto on March 1st.
Where do you want to go?
I'd like to find a premium economy ticket to San Francisco.
I found a flight with Air Canada that costs $472. It departs at 5:35 pm and has 1 layover.
Okay, can you check my balance for my checking account?
Your checking account has a balance of $1,623.37.
Thanks. I want to make a transfer to their checking account.
How much would you like to transfer, and who are you sending it to?
I want to send 1570 dollars to Grace.
Okay, so you would like to transfer $1,570 from your checking account to the checking account for Grace, correct?
Yeah, that's good.
The money transfer has been initiated.
Okay, thanks for the help.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's everything, thanks.
Okay, have a nice day!
one way flight
what city then?
10th of this month paris
where are you going?
delta airlines new york
delta airlines 1 flight 9:15 am $207 0 layovers
checking account please
checking has $10,960.26
okay thank you
wanna transfer anything?
one thousand three hundred and forty bucks checking to grace
checking $1,340 to grace checking
how many days?
it has been initiated 1 business day
thanks a lot
have a good one
Can you find me some one way flights?
Where do you want to go? Where are you leaving from?
I want to fly from New York to Phoenix.
When do you want to leave?
I want to depart next Tuesday.
I found an American Airlines flight for $344 that departs at 9:15 am and has 1 layover.
How many passengers is that for? Where does it arrive?
It is for 1 passenger. It arrives at Sky Harbor International Airport.
Okay, I'd need to check my balance first.
What account do you want to see?
Look at my checking account.
Your checking account has a balance of $15,034.68.
What about my savings account?
Your savings account has a balance of $8,675.83.
Okay, thank you.
Can I help with anything else?
Yeah I'd like to transfer some money.
Where are you transferring to, and how much do you want to transfer?
I'd like to transfer 1,420 dollars to Grace.
Alright, so you would like to transfer $1,420 from your savings account to the checking account for Grace. Is that right?
Yep, sounds good.
The transfer was initiated.
Okay, thanks for the help.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all thank you.
Alright, enjoy your day!
I'm looking for one way flights.
Where would you like to go to, and where are you planning on leaving from?
I want to go from San Francisco to Los Angeles with zero bags.
And when would you like this trip to be?
I want to fly out the 12th of March.
I found 5 possible flights. There is a $92 Alaska Airlines ticket with 0 layovers leaving at 4:55 am.
How about something else. What about 4 seats to Atlanta?
I found 4 possible flights. There is a $185 American Airlines ticket with 0 layovers leaving at 7:30 pm.
What airport is it leaving from?
Leaving from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Cool, thank you.
Can I be of any other assistance?
Can you look at the balance of my savings account?
The balance of your savings account is $3884.66.
Thanks for checking that.
Would you like to make a transfer?
Yes, please.
Where would you like to transfer to?
Send money to Svetlana.
How much would you like to transfer?
Transfer 460 dollars.
Please confirm: Transfer $460 from savings account to Svetlana 's checking account.
Yup, that's it. How long will the transfer take?
Your transfer is successful. It will take 3 business days.
Thanks for the help.
Is there anything else I can assist with?
No, that was it, thanks.
Enjoy!
one way flight please
what city and when?
london san diego
what date then?
6th of march
alaska airlines 6:10 am 1 layover $333
zero bags economy
american airlines 7:10 pm 2 flights 1 layover $357
where does it land?
san international airport heathrow international airport
11th of this month washington
southwest airlines 11:45 am 1 payover $249
alright then thanks
checking or savings
savings works for me
savings $2,958.74
go with checking
checking has $16,859.66
that works for me
wanna make a transfer?
yes I would
how much money then?
one thousand three hundred dollars to grace
$1,300 to grace checking account and checking
thow many days then?
it was initiated 1
thanks a lot
bye bye then
Get one way premium economy tickets.
Departure city?
Vancouver, get economy.
Departure date and destination?
14th of this month. Los Angeles.
There's an Air Canada with 0 layovers leaving 4:20 am for $125.
For how many? Where's it get in?
For 1 person. It arrives in LAX International Airport.
Ok. Check balance.
Which account?
Checking.
You have $3,242.52 in checking.
Ok. Transfer money.
Where to?
Philip.
Amount to transfer?
$1,120.
Please confirm: send $1,120 from checking to Philip in their checking.
Yep. How long is that gonna take?
Transfer started. It will be 1 business day.
Thanks, bye.
Goodbye.
I need you to reserve my flight please.
Sure, Where are you planning on flying to and on what date would you like to depart? Also, I will need to know your departure city.
Sure, I will need to go San Francisco to Las Vegas on the 9th of this month.
Ok, I've pulled up 4 flights for you. May I suggest Alaska Airlines fligt departing at 10:25 am with 0 layovers for a total of $92
All right, that works.
Great, can I located any other information for you at this time?
Please pull up my banking information and check my balance.
Ok, which account would you like to check?
Pull up savings please.
Ok, I show the current balance is $14,723.59 for your savings account.
Alright, thanks.
your welcome, did you want to make any banking transactions at this time?
Yes, I would like to make a transfer.
Ok, how much money would you like to transfer?
Let's transfer 610 dollars to their savings account please.
Sure, Who would you like to transfer to?
Let's send Mahmoud the money.
Please confirm we are sending Mahmoud $610 from your savings account to their savings account, is this correct?
Yeah, that's right.
Great, your transfer request is complete.
Great, how many days will this take to complete?
Transfers typically take 3 business days.
Thank you. Good bye!
your welcome, good bye.
Will you find a one way flight?
Departure date?
Departing 3rd of March.
Which city?
I'll leave from Los Angeles to Portland.
I found 5 flights. Alaska Airlines offers a $128 flight that departs at 11:45 am with 0 layovers.
Cool. Will you check the balance of my savings?
The balance in your savings is $7,060.62.
Perfect.
Make a transfer?
Sure.
How much?
990 bucks.
Who's the recipient?
Aunt Jenny.
Please confirm a transfer of $990 from my savings to the checking of aunt Jenny.
Perfect. How many days does it take?
3 business days. I've completed your transfer.
Thanks.
Have a great day.
I would like to find a one way flight to San Francisco.
What city and date are you leaving?
I would like to fly from London March 10th.
Do you wish to fly with American Airlines taking off 2 am local time with 1 layover at $434 a person?
What is the number of bags allowed and when will the flight arrive?
The flight comes at 12:41 pm local time with 0 checked bags allowed.
Okay, I need to find out my balance.
What account do you want to use?
I'd like to use my checking account.
The checking account balance is $3,261.87.
Let me know the savings account balance.
The savings account balance is $13,277.30.
Okay, I'd like to make a transfer of 370 dollars from checking to Khadija.
Please confirm from my savings account a transfer of $370 to Khadija to checking.
Okay I'll confirm.
The transfer has been a success.
Thanks for all the help.
What else can I assist you with?
No thanks for the help.
Have a great day.
I need an economy seat on a plane.
Where are you going? When are you leaving? What city are you leaving from?
I am leaving London for Phoenix on the 11th.
I found 3 options with American Airlines starting with a flight that leaves at 6:55 am with 1 layover. The ticket is $357.
Where does the flight land? What airport does it leave from?
The flight is going to Sky Harbor International Airport from Heathrow International Airport.
Ok, I also need a hotel.
Aloft Phoenix-Airport is a nice 3 star hotel.
Yes, that is good.
Are you ready to make a reservation?
No, that is all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
I need to get a one way flight.
Where do you plan on going?
I'll be heading to Los Angeles.
When do you plan on leaving?
I'd like to leave next Monday.
And from where will you be departing?
I want to see flights out of New York.
Do you like American Airlines? There's a flight that takes off at 6:50 pm and has 0 layovers. It only costs $193 per passenger.
Okay. I also need to find a hotel out there with wifi. A 1 star hotel would be fine.
AC Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills is a decent hotel out there with 1 star.
Okay, that sounds good. Thanks. That will be all.
Have a great day!
I would like to find a one way flight please.
From what city are you departing from?
I will be departing from Phoenix.
What date would you like to travel and where is your destination?
I would like to fly to Atlanta on the 6th.
There is an American Airlines flight with 0 layovers that takes off at 9:20 pm and costs $141 per passenger. Would that one interest you?
Is there a United Airlines flight that takes off on the 5th of this month?
There is a United Airlines flight with 0 layovers that takes off at 2 pm and costs $158.
Yes, sounds good! I also need to find a hotel there with 2 rooms and wifi.
There is a 4 star hotel called Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza. Would that one interest you?
Yes, that sounds great!
Do you want me to reserve the room for you now?
Not at this time, that is all I need for now thanks!
Have a great day then!
Hi there, could you get me a one way flight please?
Where will you be visiting?
I would like a Delta Airlines Economy flight to Phoenix please.
Where and when will you be departing?
I will be travelling from Mexico City on the 9th of this month.
I see, there is 1 Delta Airlines flight available which departs at 6:35 pm with 1 layovers, which will cost you $256.
Is this for one passenger and where will I land at?
Yes, this is for 1 and you will land at Sky Harbor International Airport.
I see, could you get me one room at a two star hotel with Wifi services?
Sure, how about a 2 star hotel called Aloft Phoenix-Airport?
May I have their address please?
They are located at 4450 East Washington Street.
I see, that is all I need. Thank you!
No problem, have a great day ahead!
Can you find me a one way flight?
Which day will you be leaving?
I want to leave next Thursday.
Which city will you leave from?
I need to leave from Seattle.
Where are you going?
I am traveling to Toronto.
I found 5 flight. How about Alaska Airlines? They have a flight departing at 11:10 am with 1 layover. The tickets at $333.
Okay that sounds good.
Can I help with anything else?
I need a room there also.
I found 10 rooms. How about the Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites which is a nice 3 star.
What is the address?
They are located at 50 NOrfinch Drive.
How much is it per night and do they have wifi?
It does not have wifi and costs $216 a nigh.
Yes that sounds good thanks. That is all for now.
Have a great day!
I want to go visit a friend soon. Please find a one way flight.
From where do you want to depart and when do you want to fly?
Look for flights on the 10th of this month leaving from Chicago.
Where do you want to go?
I am going to Las Vegas and I will be checking 0 bags.
There are 3 flights you might like. There is a flight from American Airlines. The flight takes off at 8:25 am and it has 1 layover. It has a cost of $287.
Sure, for now I just want to find a 2 star hotel in there.
There is the Best Western Plus Las Vegas West it has a 2 star rating.
What other hotels are there?
There is also Hampton Inn Las Vegas/Summerlin it also has a 2 star rating.
Sure, that one sounds great.
Do you want to book a room?
Not right now. Thanks a lot that, would be all for now
Have a great day.
Hi, could you help me search for a one way flight please?
Where will you be travelling from and to?
I will be travelling from San Francisco to Vancouver.
And when would you like to travel?
Possibly on the 5th of March.
I see, would you like to fly with American Airlines with 1 layovers departing at 12:45 pm which will cost you $222?
Could you find some economy class tickets instead?
Sure, how about a flight with Delta Airlines with 0 layovers at 1:20 pm which will cost you $121? There are only 3 available flights.
Are there any alternatives?
Sure, how about the Southwest Airlines flight departing at 4 am with 1 layover costing $243.
Does this flight land the day after?
No, it arrives on the same day at 8:54 am.
Sure, could you also get me a hotel room there?
There are 10 hotels in that area, how about a 3 star hotel in Atrium Inn Vancouver?
Sure, that is fine with me!
Would you like to make a reservation there then?
No, that is not needed.
Could I further assist you then?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
I'd like to look for a one way flight.
What location do you intend to visit?
I am traveling to Los Angeles.
What day do you wish to travel, and what metropolis do you intend to leave from?
Search for flights departing from San Diego; I'd like to leave out on next Friday.
I discovered 4 flights for you. What about a ticket costing $51 for an Alaska Airlines flight that departs at 9:55 am local time with 0 layovers?
Is the ticket business? How many checked bags does it permit?
It is an economy ticket, and 0 checked bags are allowed.
Okay, I understand.
Could I assist you with something else?
I'd like to look for a hotel room nearby.
I discovered 10 hotels suitable to your preferences. There is a lovely 2 star hotel called Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills.
Yeah, that's perfect. Thank you; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Hi there, could you help me search for a one way flight please?
Sure, where will you be travelling from and to and when would you like to travel?
I will be flying from New York to Philadelphia on the 5th of this month.
Sure, how about an American Airlines flight with 0 layovers and departs at 7:55 am local time costing $62?
Is this a reservation for four with two checked bags?
Sorry, this is only for 1 passenger with 0 checked bags.
I see, could you get me a hotel in that area too?
There are 10 hotels which you may like, how about a 3 star hotel called Aka University City?
Sure, that is all I need for now, thanks!
No worries, enjoy your day!
Hello! Please can you help me to get a one way flight?
When do you wish to travel?
I'll be travelling on 5th of this month?
So, where are you heading to?
I'm flying to Los Angeles.
Which is your departing city?
I'll be departing from Paris. So, please can you look for flights departing from here?
Sure, I can find 4 flights for you. There is an Air France flight that takes off at 5:15 pm local time and it has 1 layovers. Cost of the travel will be $403 per head.
Looks to be a good deal.
Do you want me to assist you with anything else?
Yup, Please can you help me to book a hotel room here which provides wifi connection?
Sure, there is a 2 start hotel, Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills. Do you wish to stay here?
Might be, for it sounds good.
So, do you wish to book a room at this hotel?
Not right now. Thanks. I'm done with.
Have a fantastic day.
Hi, could you help me search for a one way flight from Phoenix to San Diego? I have zero bags needed to check in.
Sure, when would you like to travel?
I will be flying off on the 12th of this month.
Sure, there are 3 available flights, would you like an American Airlines flight at 10:10 am with 0 layovers costing $81?
Could you find some alternatives instead for three?
Sure, how about a Delta Airlines flight with 0 layovers departing at 9:35 pm and costing $97 per ticket? There are 2 flights available.
May I know which airport will I arrive at?
You will arrive at SAN International Airport.
I see, and what time does the flight land?
About 10:55 pm local time.
I see, could you get me three rooms at a hotel there too?
There are 10 hotels in that area, how about a 3 star hotel called Bahia Resort Hotel?
I see, that is all I need for now. Thank you!
No worries, enjoy your day!
Hey, can you find me a one-way flight?
Sure, where are you going?
I'd like to go to New York.
Okay then, where from? And on what day?
From Chicago on March 9th.
I found an American Airlines flight with 0 layovers. It departs at 9:40 am and costs $136 per person.
Is there anything else?
How about a Delta Airlines flight with 0 layovers? It departs at 4:05 pm and costs $135 per person.
When does it arrive in New York?
It arrives at 7:24 pm local time.
On the same day? Where does it depart from?
Yes, it arrives on the same day. It departs from O'Hare International Airport.
Okay thanks. Can you find me a 4 star hotel there?
Sure, how about the 4 star 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge?
Sounds great. That's all, thanks.
Okay, see you.
Can you help me find a one way flight please?
When do you want to travel? And from what city are you coming and going to?
I want to find flights from London to Los Angeles leaving on the 12th of March
I found 3 flights. What about this 1 layover flight via American Airlines at 2:25 am for $418
Is it premium economy?
Not, it's just an economy seat
When does the flight arrive at the destination?
The flight arrives at 12:22 pm
Find me something else please
How about British Airways? They have a 11:05 am flight with 1 layover for $469
Alright, now find me a hotel room
I found 10 places including a 2 star place like the Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills
That's good, thanks for now, that's it!
Have a great one!
Hey, can you get me a one-way flight on Monday next week? Any airline is okay.
Sure, where are you going?
I'd like to go to Phoenix.
And where from?
From New York, please.
Okay, there's an American Airlines flight with 1 layover. It departs at 6:50 pm and costs $297 per person.
Is there anything else?
How about a Delta Airlines flight with 1 layover? It departs at 3 pm and costs $318 per person.
Sounds good. Can you get me a room there too?
Sure, Aloft Phoenix-Airport is a nice 3 star hotel.
Sounds great, thanks.
Is there anything else?
No that's all thanks.
Okay, see you.
Can you find me one way flight to from Seattle on the 12th?
What is your destination?
I will be going to Sydney.
There are 3 flights suitable to you. How about Alaska Airlines whose itinerary has 1 layover and departing at 11:10 am. The ticket costs $341.
Okay, That sounds good to me. Can you find a room in a hotel?
There are 10 hotels that you may like. How about a 4 star hotel called 28 Hotel Sydney?
Okay, that sounds good me. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I want to search for a one way flight.
What is the date that you want to travel and where do you want to go?
I would like to go on the 1st and fly to Chicago.
What is the city you will be leaving from?
I would like you to find flights out of San Francisco.
I have located 5 flights for you. Do you want to fly with Alaska Airlines? The flight will leave at 9:20 am local time and there are 0 layovers. The ticket price is $173 per passenger.
Find something else for me.
How about flying with American Airlines? The flight will leave at 9:30 am local time with 1 layover. The price of the ticket is $315 per passenger.
Okay. I would like to find a hotel room there. I am interested in a 1 star hotel.
I have located 10 hotels that fit your requirements. A nice 1 star hotel is Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown.
Yes that sounds fine.
Do you want to reserve a room in this hotel?
No I don't want to reserve one right now. That's all I need at the moment.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a premium economy seats.
Where are you leaving from? When are you leaving? Where are you going?
I am leaving from Paris to Portland on the 9th of this month. I need 3 seats.
I found 3 flight including American Airlines flight leaving at 5:05 am with 1 layover. The ticket is $648.
When does the flight arrive?
5:50 pm.
Ok, I also need a hotel room.
I found Aloft Portland Airport at Cascade Station is a 3 star hotel.
What is the cost per night? The address?
It is $114 per night and the address s 9920 Northeast Cascades Parkway.
Yes, that is cool.
Are you ready to reserve a room?
No, not yet. That is all I need.
Have a nice day.
I need a one way flight.
Where are you leaving from? When are you leaving? Where are you going?
I am leaving London for Atlanta on the 10th.
I found 4 flights including American Airlines. They have a flight leaving at 2 am with 1 layover. The ticket is $361.
Ok, I also need a hotel room there too.
Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza is a 4 star hotel.
That sounds good. That is all.
Have a nice day.
zero bags in economy
where are you going?
atlanta march 1st portland
american airlines 2:20 pm 3 flights $273 1 layover
one room there
aloft portland airport at cascade station 10 hotels 3 stars
yes that works
have a good one
I am in a plan to go for a trip and for which I need to search for one-way flights. Can you search for the one which is suitable to me?
From what date do you want me to book the flight and from which place you are planning to leave? I want to know this to short-list my searching process
Please search for the flight on 12th of this month from Portland. What else details you need to search?
To which place you are planning to visit?
I want to go to New York. Search for the one-way flight with Alaska Airlines and I need to book tickets under Economy class.
Got 1 result based on your requirements. What about a flight from Alaska Airlines with 1 layovers which leaves at 7:15 pm local time. The price of ticket for the same is $329 per passenger? Is that okay to you?
I want to know some more details. Can you check about the time of arrival of this flight at the destination and what is the destination port name?
This flight will reach its destination at 8:20 am local time to JFK International Airport.
That is okay and thanks. Now I need your help to find a hotel there to stay for a while. Please search for the one with 2 stars and also they should have wifi. I want to book three rooms there.
What about the hotel 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge with 2 stars?
That is okay for me. Thanks for your help.
Do you want to book the room now?
No, not now. Will decide later.
Anything else you want me to do now?
No. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I need to get a one way flight.
Where are you going and when do you plan to leave? Where are you departing from?
I want to look for flights out of Las Vegas on the 6th of March. I'll be going to San Francisco.
I've found 4 different flights you might be interested in. Do you like American Airlines? They have a flight leaving at 6:50 am that has 0 layovers. It costs only $116 per ticket.
Okay. I also need to find a room out there. I'm looking for 1 room with wifi.
There's 10 hotels which you might be interested in. The first is Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco. It's a decent hotel with a 1 star rating.
Alright. That sounds great. That's all I need for now.
Have a nice day!
I want a one way flight for the 8th of this month. I need three economy class tickets.
Where are you going? What city are you coming from?
I'm coming from Atlanta to Los Angeles.
An American Airlines flight leaves at 1:15 pm and has 0 layovers. A ticket costs $189.
Find something else.
A Delta Airlines flight leaves at 5:55 pm and has 1 layover. A ticket costs $310.
That's good. I want a hotel room there.
Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills is a 2 star hotel.
Where is it? Do they have Wi-Fi?
The address is 6399 Wilshire Boulevard. They have Wi-Fi.
That's good then. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I'd like a one way flight.
What day are you travelling?
I'm flying out Tuesday next week.
What city are you coming from? Where are you going?
I'm going from Seattle to Los Angeles.
I found 5 flights. An Alaska Airlines flight is leaving at 11:10 am and costs $152 per ticket with 0 layovers.
What airport does it leave from? Where does it land?
The flight is going from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport to LAX International Airport.
I'd also like a hotel there.
Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills is a 2 star hotel.
That's a good one.
Would you like a reservation at the hotel?
No I don't.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Can you find one way flight for me?
What is your preferred city and date of departure?
I will be leaving from Seattle on 3rd of March.
What is your destination?
I would like to book premium Economy tickets to Phoenix on the 13th of this month.
How about Alaska Airlines with 1 layovers departing at 11:35 am and the ticket costs $387.
Okay, That sounds good. Can you find a room in a hotel?
There is a 3 star hotel called Aloft Phoenix-Airport.
Okay, That sounds good to me.
Do you want me to reserve a room in a hotel?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Find me 3 seats on a one way flight
whats the travel date?
On March 3rd
where you going
Flying to Chicago
whats the city of departure?
From San Francisco
I found 5 flights and of which there is a 0 stop Alaska airlines flight at 9:20 am and costs $179 a passenger
ok, find me a hotel there, looking for 1 room at a 1 start hotel
i got 10 of them and AC hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown is a 1 star
yes good. Thanks
have a good day!
Can you check one way flights for next friday. I will only be needing one seat reserved.
Which city would you like to depart from?
Pull up flights from Mexico City.
Where are you planning a trip to?
I will be heading to Seattle.
If you would like American Airlines, they have a flight at 11:40 am with 1 layover. The ticket will run you $274 per ticket.
I see. Can you also pull up some hotels there as well?
I sure can. There is a great 2 star hotel called Ace Hotel Seattle I would like to recommend.
Yes that sounds wonderful.
Can I book you a hotel at this location?
No, not at this time.
I understand, Can I assist you with anything else?
Nope, that was all.
Alright, enjoy your day.
I will be visiting a friend and I need to find a one way flight to visit.
When do you want to fly?
Look for something on March 8th.
Where do you want to go?
I want to go to Phoenix.
From where do you want to leave?
Look for something in London.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that takes off at 11:50 am and has 1 layover. It has a cost of $352.
From which airport does it depart? Is it by any chance a Premium Economy ticket?
It departs from Heathrow International Airport and it is an Economy class seat.
That sounds good, for now look for a hotel in there.
There are 10 hotels you might like. There is Aloft Phoenix-Airport, it has a 3 star rating.
That sounds great! That would be all for now.
Have a great day.
I need a one way flight.
What city are you coming from? Where are you going? What day are you travelling?
I want flights from Portland. I'm leaving on the 10th of March to New York.
An Alaska Airlines flights leaves at 7:15 pm and has 1 layover. A ticket costs $335.
When does it arrive? What station does it go to?
The flight ends up at JFK International Airport. The flight arrives the next day.
I want something else.
An American Airlines flight leaves at 4:45 pm with 1 layover. A ticket costs $359.
Okay. I'd like a hotel room there.
1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge is a 4 star hotel.
What's their number?
Their contact number is +1 833-625-6111.
How much would it cost?
It costs $240 per night.
That's fine. That's all for now.
Have a nice day.
four seats next friday toronto
where are you going?
going to atlanta
air canada 4:30 am 1 layover $225
where does it land?
hartsfield-jackson international airport toronto pearson international airport
two rooms then
ac hotel by marriott atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza 10 hotels 4 stars
yes that works
have a good one
Hey, can you help me find a one way flight?
Sure, where are you going? When would you like to travel? And which city are you departing from?
I'd like to go from Washington to Delhi on March 10th.
Okay, how about American Airlines? There's a flight with 1 layover, departing 6:40 pm for $391 per person.
Sounds good. Can you get me one room at a one star hotel there too?
Sure, how about the 1 star Aloft New Delhi Aerocity?
Sounds great, that'll be all thanks.
Okay, see you.
one way flight
where are you headed?
san francisco 2nd of this month atlanta
alaska airlines 3 pm $181 0 layovers
where does it land?
hartsfield-jackson international airport
alright thank you
10 hotels ac hotel by marriott atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza 4 stars
yes that works
have a good one
I would like to find a one way flight please!
I need to know what city you are departing from and where your destination is.
I am flying from Los Angeles to London.
What date are you planning to travel?
I would like to leave on the 10th of March.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight that takes off at 6:45 am. It has 1 layover and costs $449 per passenger. Does that one interest you?
Sounds good, I would also like to find a hotel there please!
Ok, there are 10 hotels in the area. There is a 5 star hotel called 45 Park Lane. Would that one interest you?
Yes, that sounds perfect! Thank you, that will be all for now!
Have a great day then and enjoy your trip!
I would like to find a one way flight out of Vancouver.
What is the date that you want to travel? Where do you want to go?
I would like to fly on the 5th of this month to Atlanta.
Do you want to fly with Air Canada? They have a flight leaving at 12:15 pm local time with 1 layover. The price of this flight is $331 per passenger.
What is the flight class of this ticket?
This is an economy seat.
Okay. I would also like to find a hotel room there.
A nice 4 star hotel I found is Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza.
That sounds very good. Thank you, that is all I want at the moment.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a one way flight from Washington. I have zero bags to check and looking to go on the 1st.
Where are you going?
I'm going to London.
There's an American Airlines flight for $303. I takes off at 1 pm and has 1 layover.
Okay. Can you find me a 2 star hotel there?
I found 10 2 star hotels. There's 45 Park Lane that's suppose to be nice.
Do they have wifi? What's their number?
Its +44 20 7493 4545. They do not have wifi.
Can you look at another one. I'll need 2 rooms.
Abc Hyde Park Hotel is another nice 2 star.
Okay, sounds good. Thanks. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I'd like to look for a one way flight.
What place do you intend to visit?
I'm traveling to Nairobi.
What day do you want to leave?
I'd like to depart on 4th of March.
What metropolis do you wish to leave from?
Search for planes departing from New York.
I discovered 2 flights for you. What do you think about a ticket costing $292 for a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 8:35 pm with 0 layovers?
Okay. I'd like to look for 3 rooms in a 4 star hotel nearby.
I discovered 10 hotels catering to your criteria. There is a 4 star hotel named Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Do you wish to book a room at the hotel?
Nah, I do not wish to book a room. Thank you, that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I want to find a one way flight, please.
Where are you going and when? When are you leaving from?
I want to find flights from Phoenix to San Francisco on the 11th.
I found 4 flights. American Airlines has a flight with 0 layovers at 9:30 am for $119 per person.
Sounds good. I want to find a hotel room.
Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco is a 1 star hotel.
Any other hotels?
Argonaut Hotel is a 4 star hotel.
Sounds great. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
I need a one way flight for 1. I have zero bags.
When would you like to go? What city are you going to?
I'm coming from Las Vegas, and I'm leaving on the 6th of this month.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Sydney.
Is American Airlines okay? A flight takes off at 4:50 am and has 1 layover. One ticket costs $296.
What else is there? I'm leaving on the 12th. I want a United Airlines flight.
A United Airlines flight leaves at 4:20 pm and has 1 layover. One ticket costs $311.
Okay. I'd also like a hotel room there.
I found 10 hotels for you. 28 Hotel Sydney is a 4 star hotel.
That's a good one.
Would you like a reservation?
Not right now. That's all. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
I would like to find a one way flight. Any of the airlines you can find would work for me.
Which city will you be flying out of?
Find me a flight out of Las Vegas.
What is the date that you would like to travel?
I would like to fly out on the 7th of March.
Where do you want to go?
I want to fly to Phoenix.
Would you be okay with flying American Airlines? This flight will leave at 12 pm local time, with 0 layers. The price of the ticket is $78 per passenger.
Okay. I would like to find a hotel there as well. I want one room in a 3 star hotel.
A nice 3 star hotel is the Aloft Phoenix-Airport.
Yes that sounds very good.
Do you want to reserve a room at this hotel?
No, I don't want to reserve a room now. Thanks very much, that's all I need at the moment.
Have a great day.
I need a one way flight.
For which date?
I need two seats on a flight to seattle on March 8th.
Where would you be leaving from?
I would be leaving from Vancouver.
There are 4 flights available. You would like a flight on air canada that costs $310 It leaves at 4:20 am and there is 1 layover.
That would be fine. I would need a hotel room when I get there.
Ace hotel seattle is a lovely 2 star hotel.
Yes, that would work.
You would like to reserve the room?
No, I do not.
Would you be needing anything else?
No, thank you.
Enjoy your day.
I need to fly out next Monday. Could you get me one Premium Economy ticket.
Sure. From where?
I'll be taking off from Vancouver.
Vancouver to where?
Vancouver to Seattle.
I have 4 for you. There's a 1:40 am Air Canada with 1 layover that goes for $393.
When does it arrive? And what airport in Vancouver does it use?
It departs from YVR International Airport and arrives in Seattle the same day.
OK. I need a hotel there now.
Try Ace Hotel Seattle. Its a nice 2 star.
Great. That might do the job.
What else do you need?
Nothing. I'm good to go.
Great. Speak later.
3 seats 10th of this month
what city then?
san diego to los angeles
alaska airlines 9:55 am 0 layovers $64
want a hotel too
ac hotel by marriott beverly hills 2 stars
yes that workd
have a good one
I'm looking for a one way flight.
Where are you going and where from? What date are you going?
Looking for flights from Phoenix to San Diego next Thursday.
There's an American Airlines flight with 0 layovers that leavegs at 10:10 am for $92.
When does the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 11:30 am.
I want to find a hotel room, also.
Bahia Resort Hotel is a 3 star hotel.
Any other hotels?
Best Western Mission Bay is a 2 star hotel.
Is there wifi? What's the phone number?
The phone number is +1 619-275-5700. Yes, there's wifi.
Sounds great. That's all.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you get me a one way economy class flight with American Airlines to London?
Sure, where and when will you be departing from?
I will likely depart on the 7th from Phoenix, and would require three seats and 0 checked bags.
Sure, there is 1 American Airlines flight with 1 layovers departing at 5 am and costing $374.
I see, could you get me a one hotel room with a one star rating there too?
There are 10 available 1 star hotels, how about 45 Park Lane?
May I have their address and nightly cost please?
This will cost you $230 per night and you can visit them at 45 Park Lane.
Are there any alternative 2 star hotels instead?
Yes, there are 9 2 star hotels available, how about Abc Hyde Park Hotel?
Any alternatives? I will need 2 rooms now.
Sure, how about a 2 star hotel called Accommodation London Bridge?
That sounds fine to me.
Would you like a reservation there?
No, that is not required.
Sure, could I further assist you then?
No, that is all I need, Thank you!
Have a great day ahead!
I need a one way flight from Chicago.
When are you leaving?
Saturday this week.
Where are you going?
San Francisco.
I found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:20 pm with 0 layovers. The ticket is $169.
I also need a hotel there.
I found 10 hotels like Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco is a 1 star hotel.
Yes, that is perfect.
Are you ready to book a room?
No, not now.
Anything else?
No thanks.
Have a nice day.
I got to find a flight to catch.
Give me the details and I'll find one. Date? Destination? Yada, yada, yada.
Ok. A flight from Chicago to New York on the 14th.
There's an 8:50 am American Airlines flight with 0 layovers for $113.
Ok. Keep going.
There's an 11:05 pm Delta Airlines flight with 0 layovers for $151.
Ok. How about a hotel room there. I need to be able to access the internet.
Try AC Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown. Its a nice 3 star.
What will that set me back? Can you get me their digits?
Sure. Its $192 a night and you can reach them at +1 312-981-6600.
Sounds like a plan.
So book it?
Hold off for now. I got everything I need for the time being.
Ok. I'll be here.
I'm looking for a one way flight please.
On which date and from what city to what city?
I'll be going from Atlanta to San Diego on the 4th of March.
I have Southwest Airlines flight at 6:35 pm, 1 layover, for a $262 fare.
Leaving from what airport please?
That takes off from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Thank you. I also need 1 hotel room there.
How about Bahia Resort Hotel? That has a 3 star rating.
Any other hotels with wifi please?
The Best Western Mission Bay is a good option with 2 stars.
Sounds great, thanks.
Shall I reserve a room for you?
Not right now, no.
Anything else today?
No, thanks again.
It's my pleasure.
Hi, I will be travelling and need to find a one way flight for 1 person. I have 0 bags.
What city will you be leaving from?
Please search for flights in Philadelphia.
Where will you be travelling to?
I will be going to Chicago.
On what date will you be travelling?
I would like to leave on the 6th of this month.
How does American Airlines sound? The flight leaves at 8:50 pm local time. It has 0 layovers and the cost per passenger is $124.
That works. Please find me a hotel room there.
I found 10 hotels that you may like. I recommend Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown. It is a 3 star hotel.
That works for me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Not at this time. I appreciate your help.
Have a wonderful day!
I wish to find a one way Delta Airlines flight from Los Angeles to Portland.
When will you travel?
I will travel on 14th of this month.
I searched and found 1 Delta Airlines flight with 0 layovers and it will start at 6 am local time. The price is $135 per passenger.
Good. I wish to book a room in a hotel there.
I searched and found 10 hotels for you. Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station is a fantastic hotel with 3 star.
Please search for some other hotels what suits my interest. I want wifi connection in that hotel.
I searched and found 9 hotels for you. Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites is a fantastic hotel with 2 star.
Please search for some other hotels what suits my interest. I need three rooms in a two star hotel.
I searched and found 8 hotels for you. Canopy By Hilton Portland Pearl District s is a fantastic hotel with 2 star.
It is good. Thank you so much. That is what I want now.
Have a fantastic day.
Can you help me find a one way flight
Where are you going?
I'm headed to Los Angeles
What city are you leaving from?
I want to find flights in Chicago
OK, and on what date?
I want to fly out on the 2nd, any ticket class is good
I found 4 flights including a 0 layover American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:30 pm for $175
Alright, now find me a hotel room there too.
How about the 2 star Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills?
How much is it a night, and what's their number?
Their number is +1 323-852-7000 and it's $156 a night
Yes, that's good
Would you like to reserve a room?
No, not yet
Can I do something else then?
No, not right now
OK, take care
Can you help me search for a one way flight?
I'd be happy to. Where will you be traveling to?
I will be visiting Chicago.
When are you leaving and which city will you be leaving from?
I will be flying out of San Francisco on the 11th of this month.
There are 5 flights that you might like. The first is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 9:20 am. It has 0 layovers and the ticket price is $170.
No, I'd like to hear some other options.
American Airlines is offering a flight at 9:30 am with 1 layover for $325 per person.
Okay. Are there any available hotels there?
If you'd like a 3 star hotel, I can recommend Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown.
That will work. I think that's everything. Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me find a one-way flight?
Of course, what are your flight details?
I'm flying out on March 14th, going from Washington to Chicago.
I've got 4 options here: Do you like American Airlines? There's a flight with 0 stops for $126 per person, leaving at 6:40 pm.
I don't like that airline - can you find something else? I need 2 seats.
Alright, how about Delta Airlines taking off at 5:55 pm with 1 layover for $215 per ticket?
Can you look up hotels as well? Something with three stars.
I can do that - I have 10 options here, the Ac Hotel by Marriott Chicago Downtown is a 3 star hotel.
Okay, great.
Would you like to reserve a room here?
Not right now.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, that's all I need right now, thanks.
Have a great trip.
Hi, could you get me a one way flight to Las Vegas on the 10th of this month please?
Sure, where will you be departing from?
I will need one seat on a flight departing from Portland.
There are 3 available flights, how about an Alaska Airlines flight with 1 layover which departs at 7:15 pm costing $232?
Sure, could you get me a hotel reservation too?
Sure, would you like to stay at a 3 star hotel called Best Western Plus Las Vegas West? There are only 6 hotels which suits you.
Sure, that is fine with me!
Would you require a reservation at the hotel?
No, that is not needed. Thank you so much!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
las vegas economy southwest airlines
what date then?
the 10th to portland
southwest airlines 6:50 pm 1 layover $220
alright thank you
aloft Portland airport at cascade station 3 stars
yes that works
have a good one
I need a one way flight. I have zero bags that need to be checked.
Where are you leaving from?
Las Vegas.
Where are you going? And on what day?
I am flying to Portland on the 9th of this month.
Is American Airlines acceptable? I found a flight leaving at 4:50 am with 1 layover with a price of $220.
Can you make this for 3 people?
This is for 1 passenger.
Where does the plane land? What time does it arrive?
I arrives at 9 am at PDX International Airport.
Find me something else.
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 2:25 pm with 1 layover. The ticket price is $227.
Find another option.
Southwest Airlines has a flight leaving at 1:20 pm with 1 layover. The ticket is $222.
Ok, I also need two rooms in a two star hotel there.
Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station is a nice hotel with 2 stars.
What is the cost per night? What is the phone number?
It is $126 per night. The phone number is +1 503-200-5678.
Ok thanks, that is all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
I need to find a one way flight.
What date would you be leaving? Where would you be departing from? What is your desired destination?
I need a flight on the 11th of this month from SD to Ciudad de Mexico.
There is a flight with Alaska Airlines that costs $190 and departs at 1:05 pm.
Thanks, I am all set.
Have a great day.
I need to book a one way flight. I'm not sure when I'll be able to return.
Ok, which city are going to be flying out of and what city are you visiting?
I will be flying out of Los Angeles and I will going to SD.
Alright, which date will you be traveling?
I want to fly out on the 10th of this month.
I found 2 flights that you might be interested in. The first one is with Alaska Airlines. This is a direct flight that costs $58 and takes off at 12:15 pm.
Wow, that sounds great! That's a good price!
Do you need help with anything else?
No, that's all I need right now.
Glad I could help! Have a great day!
I would like to book a one way flight to Toronto, Ontario.
When do you want to travel and where are you departing from?
I will be departing from Atlanta on the 7th of March.
I found 4 different flights. There is American Airlines that leaves at 5:10 am for the cost of $197.
That is all the information I needed.
Have a good day.
I need a one way flight.
From which city would you like to depart?
I need flights from NYC.
On which date would you like to travel? What is your destination?
I need to travel on the 13th to Warsaw.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? There is a great flight option at 11:20 AM. This is a connecting flight. The ticket price is $360.
That sounds good, then. Thanks.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a flight, just one way from Seattle, it'll be for four people. And I want to go on American Airlines.
What's the date you want to fly on? And what's your destination?
I want to go on the 4th of this month. My destination is New York.
There's 1 flight that's available. It's with American Airlines. It departs at 4:15 pm. There is a connection. For one ticket it's $304.
Okay, I think I like that. Thank you, I no longer need any more help.
Have a fine day, take care.
i am looking to book a one way flight
From which place do you want to depart?
I am looking for flights from Vancouver, BC.
On which date are you planning to travel and where are you planning to travel?
I am planning to start my travel on 14th of this month and I am flyi ng to Atlanta.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines that takes off at 6:15 pm. It is a direct flight and will cost you $193.
Sounds good.
Is there anything I can help you with?
No. Thanks for all your help.
Have a nice day.
I need to get out of town and would need a one way flight.
When would you like to travel and where would you be leaving from? Which city are you heading to?
I want to leave SF and head to LA on March 4th.
There are 5 flights available. You can get a ticket for $97 on Alaska Airlines for a flight that leaves at 12:25 pm.
That time is not convenient to me. I would like four Premium Economy tickets.
There are 3 flights available. There is an American Airlines flight for $159 that leaves at 7:10 pm.
That would be fine.
Would you need anything else?
No, not at this time. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Get me a one way ticket to Seattle, WA please.
Easy enough, from which city please?
Get it out of Ciudad de Mexico.
Oh what date?
I need to do it on Friday next week.
What about using American Airlines: You can depart at 3:05 am It has a connecting flight and costs $283.
When will this flight arrive?
Arrival is at 9:21 am.
Fine, I like that.
What may I get next for you?
Nothing now, maybe later.
Have a safe trip.
I want to book a one way flight from LAX to Washington. I am not particular about the airline.
On which date would you like to travel?
I would like to start my travel on 4th of this month.
Would you like to fly from Alaska Airlines that takes off at 8:10 pm. It is a direct flight and will cost you $219.
That sounds good. That's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I need a one-way flight now please.
On which day would you like to book your travel, and what is your intended destination?
I want to start on the 8th and I want to visit Seattle, please.
From which city do you intend to leave?
I need a flight from Toronto, Ontario.
There are 3 flights matching your selection. Would you like to fly with Air Canada? The flight is set to depart at 4:35 PM. It is a connecting flight and the ticket price is $328.
I'm good with that!
Is there anything else I may help you with?
No, but thanks a lot.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
I want you to find me a one way flight with Southwest Airlines, and I am in need of having 3 tickets.
Can you tell me the date when you will take the trip?
I will be starting my trip on 5th of March.
From which city will you start your journey?
I will be departing from Las Vegas.
Can you please tell me the destination you want to arrive at?
I want to go to Portland.
How would you like flying with a connecting flight of Southwest Airlines, which takes off at 12:35 pm, and with a price of $195?
That seems good. I appreciate it, that would be all.
Have a nice day!
I need a one way flight, please.
On which date would you like to travel on?
I want to leave like on March 14th.
From which city would you like to depart from?
I need flights from Las Vegas on that day.
What is your desired destination?
I need two Economy tickets to the city of Sydney, Australia, please.
There are 3 flights matching your description. One is with American Airlines, and the flight is to take off at 7:35 AM. This is a connecting flight. The ticket price is $299. Okay?
Alright then, thanks for now.
Of course. Enjoy your day.
I need a one way flight, can you find me a flight from Las Vegas? I need four tickets.
What date are interested in traveling and what is your destination?
I wish to travel on the 1st of this month heading to Sydney Australia.
I have located 4 flights. One is with American Airlines, it leaves at 7:35 am and is a connecting flight that costs $278.
That sounds fine.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. I appreciate your help.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to find a one way flight with United Airlines starting my travel on the 7th of this month Premium Economy class tickets.
Where are you planning to go and where are you departing from?
I'm looking for flights from Chicago to Rio de Janeiro.
Do you wish to fly with United Airlines taking off 2:05 pm being a connecting flight costing $519.
When will the flight arrive at the destination and how many tickets did you get?
It would be for 1 traveler arriving at 8:37 am.
That sounds great.
Can I assist you with something else?
No, thanks so much for the help.
Have a nice day.
I need a one way flight
Where will you be departing from and going to?
I need flights from San Fran to Portland Oregon
And what date will you need to fly?
I need to leave on the 11th of March
There is a flight at 7:35 am with Alaska Airlines. The cost would be $120.
That sounds reasonable
Do you need something else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
Hello. Can you help me get two tickets for a one way flight from Los Angeles?
Certainly. On which date would you like me to look for flights?
Look on the 8th please.
Where would you like to go?
I need to get to Philadelphia.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? They have a connecting flight leaving at 12:05 pm, and the ticket costs $226.
That will work for me.
Okay. Will there be anything else you need?
No, that's all for now. Thanks.
You're welcome. Have a nice day.
I am looking for a one way flight with American Airlines from Seattle, WA to Los Angeles.
On which date would you like to travel?
I would like to start my travel on the 6th.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines that takes off at 6:15 pm. It is a direct flight and will cost $118.
It sounds good.
Is there anything I can help you with?
No. Thanks for all your assistance.
Have a nice day.
Can you find me four Economy class one way tickets from Washington?
When do you plan to travel?
I'm planning to depart on the 13th of this month.
Where are you going to?
I'm flying to San Fran.
There is a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 6:50 pm and a ticket costs $252. Does that sound okay?
Yes. That's perfect.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. Thank you. That'll be all.
Have a great day!
I'm looking for a one way flight ticket.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm going to Berlin.
What date would you like to travel on?
I'm leaving on the 1st of March.
Where are you departing from?
I'm looking for a flight from Chi-town.
I found 4 flights for you. There is a connecting American Airlines flight departing at 4:35 pm for $407.
That works for me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Find me a one way flight.
where are you going?
Going to KL.
What is the city of departure?
I need four tickets from Chi-town
whats the date of travel?
ok, find me me Southwest Airlines economy tickets for 14th of this month.
Ok, there is a Southwest Airlines connecting flight leaving at 6:40 am and $485
that is great, thats all.
have a good day!
Can you book me a one-way flight?
Where do you want to depart from?
From Los Angeles heading to Washington.
WHen would you like to travel?
On the 5th please.
I found 5 options. Would Alaska Airlines work? I found a flight leaving at 8:10 pm and costing $178.
That sounds good.
Do you need anything else?
No thank you.
Have a great day.
I'm taking a trip to Portland on the 6th of March. Can you find me a one flight? I will only be purchasing one ticket.
Okay no problem. What city are you departing from?
I will be leaving out of NY.
Okay, I've found 4 flights for you. Are you okay with flight American Airlines? There is a connecting flight taking off at 4:25 am. The ticket will be $278.
No that's not what I'm looking for. Find something else for me.
How about Delta Airlines? There is a connecting flight taking off at 5:30 am. Tickets are $313.
Is this economy or business class?
The ticket is for an Economy class seat.
Okay, well that sounds good. That's all I need for now.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
I'm after a one way premium economy flight to Chicago on united Airlines.
Where are you departing from?
Out of Ciudad de Mexico.
What date are you traveling?
I am leaving next Wednesday.
I have a flight with united Airlines departing 7:10 am. It is a connecting flight and the total cost is $485.
Okay that sounds good.
Can I help with anything else?
No that's it for now.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a flight, a one way flight.
When will you be travelling?
This flight is for March 14th.
And where will you be going?
I'll be going to New York.
And where will you be travelling from?
I'll be travelling from Vegas.
There are 3 flights that match. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:20 am, which is a connecting flight. It is $276 per ticket.
Okay, that works for me.
Do you need me to do anything else for you?
Nope, thanks a lot for the assistance.
Have a pleasant day.
I need you to find me a one way flight on the 2nd of this month. Please find me Premium Economy class tickets.
Where are you departing from and where is your destination?
I am going to SF from LA. Please look there.
There is a direct flight with Alaska Airlines that costs $130 and departs at 11:40 pm.
Please find me a different flight.
There is a flight with American Airlines that cost $154 and departs at 9:30 am.
That sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No. I am all set. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one-way flight for 2 to LA.
For what date?
For the 13th of this month.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from NY.
I found 4 possible flights. There's on with American Airlines for $199 that leaves at 1:40 pm.
Is it economy or business class? What time does it get to LA?
It's economy and arrives at 4:50 pm.
On second thought I want four tickets for the day after tomorrow.
Delta Airlines has one leaving at 7:50 am for $178.
That sounds good. That's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I have a plan to go for a trip. Will you find a one way flight?
From which city do you wish to depart from and at what date you like to travel? Where are you planning to go?
I need to depart from LA and i need to start my travel on this sunday. I planning to go to Toronto, Ontario and please find me any ticket class in that flight.
I found 5 flights as per your need. What about ALaska airlines? It will takes off at 11:05 am and it is a direct flight . it costs $202.
When does the flight arrive at my destinations? How many tickets should i get?
it is for 1 passengers. The flight arrives at 7:34 pm
ok that sounds good. that's all i need
Have a wonderful day, take care. bye
I need help finding a one way flight.
Please tell me your origin and destination cities.
Please find flights from Chicago to Mexico City.
What's your preferred travel date?
I'd like to leave on the 8th.
Among the 4 suitable flights I found is an American Airlines flight with a connection, leaving at 2:05 pm, at $326 per ticket.
That won't work. Please look for another flight.
How about Delta Airlines, which has a 4:10 pm flight, with a connection, at a price of $305 per ticket?
That should work.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Goodbye, and have a great day!
I'm looking for a flight that is one way.
Where will you be leaving from, on what date, and where you are heading to?
I'm leaving from New York on Tuesday next week, and I'm heading to Toronto, Canada.
I've found 3 flights that can work. There's an American Airlines flight at 7 pm, it's direct, and it is $124 per ticket.
Is the ticket from Premium Economy?
It's an Economy ticket.
Okay, cool. That's all for now, thank you.
Have a pleasant day.
Can you book me a one way flight on United Airlines the day after tomorrow to Seattle, WA?
Where will you be departing?
I need one ticket from Phoenix, please.
So you want to fly with United Airlines? Your flight will depart at 11:25 am. It's a connecting flight with a ticket price of $218.
Thank you, that'll be everything.
Have a wonderful day.
Hello! Can you help me find a one way flight?
I'd be happy to. Where will you be departing from and where are you going?
I'm looking for a flight from Paris to Los Angeles.
When will you be going?
I'd like to leave on the 12th.
There are 3 flights that may work for you. If you like Air France, there is a flight leaving at 7:35 am for $344. There is one connection.
What type of seat is it? Is that the cost for a Premium Economy ticket?
No, it is for a standard Economy seat.
Was that for 2 tickets?
No, that was the price for 1 ticket.
Okay, thank you for the help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Find for me a one way flight from Portland, OR.
Where you want to go and when?
I will start my travel on 11th of this month to Vancouver.
I have 2 options for you.What to you think about Delta Airlines?There is a connecting flight that takes off at 4:35 am and cost $230.
I want something at Economy class for four people.
I have 1 flight for you.A connecting flight with United Airlines at 9:50 am.Cost is $230.
Sounds very good.
With something else I can help you?
No.Thank you very much!
Have a great day!
Could you help me book a flight please, one way?
Where are you leaving from and where would you like to go?
I'll be going from Paris, France and I'm heading to Los Angeles.
On what date please?
That would be on the 5th.
I have 3 possibilities for you. There is a flight on Air France which leaves at 0:25 am and that is a connecting flight. The ticket price for that one is $377.
Is the ticket premium economy?
That would be an economy seat.
Terrific, sounds perfect. I think I'm all set.
Wonderful, have a great day.
Hey, I'm going on a short trip. Can you help me find a one way premium economy class ticket?
Sure! Where will you be departing from and what's your destination?
I'm leaving from NYC to Vancouver.
Whwn do you plan to go?
On the 9th if possible.
I found an American Airlines ticket for a flight that takes off at 4:25 am. It's a connecting flight that costs $542.
Please find me something else.
There's Delta Airlines flight taking off at 4:20 pm. Also a connecting flight. It costs $465.
Sounds real good.
Can I help you further?
No, thanks a lot.
Have an amazing day.
I need your help to find a one way flight to Chicago. Can you find the one with any classes as I don't mind about the ticket classes.
From Which City you are going to depart on which date?
I am going to start my trip from the 14th from NY.
How about an American Airlines flight which will take off at 7 pm. It costs $203 for a ticket and it it a connecting flight. How about your choice?
Yes, I prefer with this. Thanks and that's all.
Have a great day.
Could you find me a one way flight from NYC to Chicago?
When would you like to travel?
I'd like to takeoff the day after tomorrow
Would American Airlines work? There's a flight leaving tomorrow at 7 pm and costs $190.
Sounds good, thank you. I'm all set.
I hope you have a great day.
I'm looking for a one way flight and I'd like to fly in economy class.
Where will you be leaving from and what date will you be traveling?
I'll be going from Seattle, WA and that should be for Monday next week.
What is your destination please?
I'm going to Washington.
I have a flight on Alaska Airlines which departs at 6:15 PM. It's a direct flight with a $205 ticket price.
OK. Sounds good to me.
Is there anything else you need today?
Nothing I can think of, thank you.
Thank you very much.
I am planning a trip. I will need three tickets. The tickets will be for a one way flight on Thursday next week.
Which city would you like to fly out of.
I am hoping to find a flight out of Los Angeles.
Which city would you like to fly to?
Atlanta will be my destination.
Is Alaska Airlines acceptable for you. They have a plane leaving at 11:30 pm with no stops. The charge would be $171.
What time would the flight arrive in Atlanta.
The arrival time is projected at 7:29 am.
Awesome. That flight will work for me.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Nothing at the moment. Thanks so much for the assistance.
Your welcome. I hope you have a great day.
I need a premium economy class ticket on American Airlines from paris.
Where are you heading to and when would you like to leave?
I need three tickets to portland, OR for the 9th.
There is 1 flight available on American Airlines. It costs $649 and leaves at 2:35 pm.
That would be great.
Anything else you need assistance with?
No. Thanks a lot.
Enjoy your day.
Can you help me find a one way flight please
Where are you headed and on what day?
I wanna fly out to Las Vegas on the 12th please
Sure, and where are you coming from?
I'll be departing from Portland, OR
OK, I found 4 flights that might work for you including this Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 10:05 am for $187
Can I get three tickets for that?
No it's only for 1 person
Then find me something else that can accommodate three tickets
I found 3 flights with available seats including an American Airlines 9:35 am flight for $193
That sounds great then
Can I do something else for you
Right now we're ok, thanks
Take care and update me
I am on a short trip and I need your help to find an one way flight to London, UK.
From which date you are planning to travel?
I am planning to travel from the 3rd.
From which City?
I need it from Los Angeles.
What about an direct flight with American Airlines takes off at 7:10 am with ticket cost $259?
I think this is okay for me.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a one way flight to warsaw I want 2 to get with United Airlines
what date and to which city do you want to depart from
look for flights from chi-town I would like to travel on next Friday
do you like to fly with United Airlines at a cost of $257 at 4:35 pm
sounds great thank you that's all what I need
have a nice day
I would like to search for a round trip flight from Vancouver with three tickets available, please.
What are your travel dates for departure and return?
I would like to start the trip on the 3rd, and return on the 8th.
Where would you like to go?
I will be flying to Washington.
American Airlines has a connecting flight at 1:10 pm, with a return flight at 2:55 pm, for $442.
Would these be Economy class tickets? What time does the return flight land?
Yes, the seats are Economy. The return flight arrives at 9:56 pm.
OK, that all sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you for your help.
Have a great day!
Help me find a round trip flight.
Where will you be leaving from? And what day is your ideal return flight?
I'm leaving from Seattle, WA. And I want to return on the 14th of this month.
And what's the date of the flight? Also, where will you be heading to?
I want the flight to be on the 12th of March. And I will be heading to LA.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight with a takeoff at 7:05 am. It does have a connection. The return trip is at 11:55 am. And it's $271 for a ticket.
Okay, sounds like it could work. Thank you, that's all for now.
Have a fine day.
Can you find me a round trip flight from Washington to LA, returning on March 4th.
What date did you want to leave?
Make it for the 2nd.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:30 am with a connecting flight. The return flight leaves at 7:40 am. The ticket is $347.
That one sounds good.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, I'm good for now, thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a round trip flight?
Which city will you be departing, and which city will you be traveling to? What day will the return flight be?
I'd like to travel this Sunday until the 10th of March from Chi-town.
Where will you be traveling?
Atlanta, GA.
I found 4 matching flights. One is from American Airlines. The flight will leave at 1:25 pm. It's a connecting flight. The return flight will depart at 5 pm. Tickets are $258.
That's great, thank you. That'll be all.
Have a great day!
Can you find me find flights for a round trip?
Can I please have your destination and planned departure and return dates?
I want to fly to London tomorrow and return on March 13th.
Where will you be departing from?
Find me flights from Chi-town.
There are 2 options available. Would you be interested in an American Airlines connecting flight that departs at 1:25 pm with the return flight taking off at 12:45 pm? The ticket costs $596.
Can I know the arrival times of both the flights?
The onward flight arrives in London at 7:49 am and the return flight arrives at 3:32 am.
Sounds good to me. Thank you very much. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I am interested in finding a round trip flight, I will be going to LA, and I will have my returning flight on 10th of this month.
Can you tell me the date when you start your travel?
I will be leaving for my destination on next Monday.
Can you tell me the city from where you will leave for your trip?
I want to know about flights which leave from Las Vegas.
There are 3 flights which match what you asked for, with one of the being a direct flight with Delta Airlines, which takes off at 7:45 pm, and when it returns it leaves at 4:35 pm. The price of the ticket for this flight is $140.
That seems right.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a wonderful time!
I have a plan to travel . Please find a round trip flight. It should be Premium Economy class tickets and flight should be United Airlines.
from which city you wish to depart from?
I like to depart from chicago.
where are you planning to go?
i am planning to go to Philadelphia.
At what date you wish to travel?
I need to start my travel on March 6th
At which day do you need to take the return flight?
I wish to return on next Friday.
I found 1 flight which is a united airlines. The flight takes off at 4:25 pm and it is a direct flight and the returning flight takes off at 1:55 pm and the ticket costs $321.
oK that sound good to me and that's all i need.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a round trip flight from Phoenix, AZ.
What are your travel dates.
I want to depart on March 7th.
Where do you plan to go? What day would you like for your return flight?
I am going to Seattle and would like to return on 14th of March.
Would you prefer to travel on American Airlines? A connecting flight takes off at 4:10 pm and a returning flight takes off at 2:20 pm. The ticket price is $350.
Is the ticket Economy class? What is the arrival time for the returning flight?
The seating is Economy. The arrival time for the returning flight is 6:43 pm.
That sounds good.
Can I assist you with something else?
No thank you.
Enjoy your day.
I am looking to find a round trip flight.
Where are you planning to go? Also on which date would you like to travel and which day do you want to take return flight?
I want to start my travel on 9th of March and flying to ATL and will be returning on the 12th.
From which city are you planning to depart from?
I am looking for flight from Los Angeles.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines that takes off at 3:05 pm and return flight takes off at 7:25 am. It is a direct flight and will cost you $274.
It sounds good.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. Thanks for all your help.
Have a nice day.
Find for me please a round trip flight.
Tell me in what date you want to go and where.On which day you will return?
I plan to fly to Philly on March 8th and return on 10th of this month.
You will depart from which city?
From New Delhi will be okay.
What is your opinion about United Airlines?You can take the connecting fight at 1:20 pm and returning is at 9:35 pm.Cost per ticket is $582.
Sounds very good.That's what I wanted for the moment.
Have a great day!
I need to find a round trip flight please.
Ill be happy to help you with that. Where will you be leaving from?
I want to go out of ATL.
What is your destination and when would you like to return?
Going to San Fran and planning on coming back March 12th.
What is the travel date you were planning on?
That's going to be the 7th of March.
Very good. There are 4 possible flights to choose from. I have an American Airlines direct flight leaving at 3:45 pm with a 9:20 pm return. The fare is $295.
Yes, I'll take it.
Of course. How else may I help you?
I don't need anything else, thanks a lot.
It's always a pleasure, thank you.
I need to attend a conference and i wish to go through a flight. Will you find a round trip flight?
Where are you planning to go?
I am planning to go to SFO.
At which city you need to depart from?
Please search from Atlanta, GA
In which day do you wish to take the return flight?
I wish to return on March 14th.
At which date you wish to start your travel ?
I want to start my travel on Day after tomorrow.
I found 4 flights as per your need. What about American Airlines? the flight takes off at 3:45 Pm. It is a direct Flight and the returning flight takes off at 9:20 pm. and the ticket cost is $313.
Ok that sounds good. that's all i need.
Have a wonderful day
I would like to find a round trip flight.
What is the date you are wanting to travel. Which city do you want to leave from and where do you want to go?
I would like to leave on the 8th, departing from Berlin and going to NYC.
What is the day you want the return flight to be?
I am coming back on March 12th.
What do you think of flying with American Airlines? This flight will leave at 1:35 am and it's a direct flight. The return flight leaves at 4:45 pm and the price is $374.
That sounds fine. Thanks very much, that's all I wanted.
Have a great day.
I have a plan for a trip and I need a round trip flight. Can you find me the one?
Yes, for which date I have to search the flight?
Search it for my travel on this Saturday.
Which is your origin place and let me know the date of your return?
I need the flight from Portland and search for the return flight on Friday next week.
What is your destination?
I need the flight to Vancouver, BC and you can search for any class of tickets.
What about a connecting flight with Delta Airlines takes off at 4:35 am and the returning time at 6:35 am for the ticket cost $354?
Yes, that works for me.
How can I help you further?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I need to get out of the city and I need a round trip flight.
Where would you like to go and where would you be leaving from? When would you like to go?
I will be leaving SF and heading NYC. I want to return on March 8th.
When would you like to leave?
I want to go on March 5th.
Would you like a flight on American Airlines that costs $343 that leaves at 4:55 am and returns at 12:30 pm?
Yes, that would be great. Thanks, that's all.
Enjoy your day.
I wish to find a round trip flight.
When will you travel and where do you want to go? When will you need the return flight?
I will travel today to Las Vegas and will return on the 4th.
From which city do you want to start your travel?
I need flights from Atlanta, GA.
I searched and found 2 American Airlines flight and it will start at 3:45 pm. The price is $377 and the return flight will start at 10:25 am.
It is nice. Thank you so much. That is what I want.
Have a fantastic day.
Can you find me a nice round trip flight to LAX with Southwest Airlines?
No problem. When would you like your return flight?
Make the return flight for March 14th.
What city will you be departing from?
Find flights out of Chicago.
What is your travel date?
Find flights for the 9th of this month.
Okay, I've found 1 flight for you with Southwest Airlines. The flight takes off at 7:20 pm and will be a direct flight with no layovers. Your returning flight will take off at 12 pm and your tickets will be a total of $276.
Sounds good. Thanks for the help! That's all for now.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
I am going to need 2 tickets because I am visiting someone on March 4th. Look for a round trip flight.
When are you taking the return flight? What is your destination and what city are you leaving from?
I want flights from Atlanta to San Francisco and I will come back on 12th of March.
There are 4 flights that you will like. How about the American Airlines which is a direct flight and takes off at 3:45 pm. The return flight leaves at 9:20 pm. It will cost you $279.
What is the time of arrival for the returning flight?
The returning flight will land at 5:46 am.
That is perfect. Thank you. That is all.
Have a wonderful day!
I'm searching for a round trip flight.
What day do you wish to depart at?
I'd like to begin my trip on next Friday.
What metropolis do you wish to leave from, what day do you intend to take the return flight, and what location do you intend to visit?
Look for flights from Seattle to Atlanta, GA that return on the 10th.
Do you wish to travel with American Airlines? There is a connecting flight departing at 8:50 am with a return flight leaving at 1:50 pm, and it costs $386.
That sounds perfect.
Could I assist you with anything else?
Nope; thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Can you find me a round trip plane from Chi-town that is economy and returning on Wednesday next week?
When are you travelling and where are you headed?
I'm gonna be flying out on the 2nd to Delhi
There's a United Airlines flight that leaves at 11:15 pm and is a direct flight. The return flight leaves at 1:20 pm, and all this will cost $368
How many tickets will you get?
I am getting it for 1 person
When does that flight arrive at Delhi?
It arrives at 8:59 pm, so not too late
What if I fly to NYC instead?
You can fly for $222 via American Airlines with a 5:05 am connecting flight and a returning flight that takes off at 11:20 am?
That sounds great
Can I do something else for you right now?
Right now, no thank you, have a good day and thanks for helping
Sure, you too, take care
Can you help me find a round trip flight from Atlanta?
What is the travel date, and where will you be going?
I'd like to travel to Philly on the 2nd.
When would you like your return flight?
I'll be returning on the 9th of March.
I found 2 matching flights. Do you want to fly with Delta Airlines? The flight will depart at 6:05 am. It's a connecting flight. The return flight will leave at 3 pm. Tickets are $265.
That sounds great.
Do you need anything else?
No thank you, that will be all!
Have a wonderful day!
Hello, I am hoping to find 1 ticket for a round trip flight.
Hello, yes, I can help you with that. Where would you be departing from?
I will be departing out of New York.
What is your departure date and return date?
I would like to depart on the 9th of March and return on the 12th of March.
Where would you like to go?
I am flying to Chicago. Can you please find me Economy class tickets?
I have found 4 flights that match your search. There is an American Airlines flight that takes off at 11:20 am and it is a connecting flight. The returning flight takes off at 5:05 am. This ticket will cost $235.
That works for me. Please book it.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that will be all. Thank you for your help.
Have a good day! Goodbye.
I have a very important business conference coming up and need to find a round trip plane ticket going from NY to SFO and would prefer to fly with United Airlines if at all possible.
I should be able to easily help you with that but first can you tell me the dates you would like to depart and return?
I have to leave no later than the 4th and would like to return home on March 14th.
I was able to find a flight with United Airlines that leaves at 7:35 pm, the return flight departs at 8:20 am, and it would cost you a total of $302.
That's perfect, and was really easy.
Is there anything else you would like my assistance with?
Nope, you were a great help, thank you.
No problem, enjoy the rest of your day!
I am searching for a round trip flight to Seattle, WA
From which city you like to depart?
Search flights from Vancouver, BC
On which day you like to take the return flight? On what date you want to travel?
I like to start my journey on March 5th and want to take the return flight on next Thursday.
The connecting flight American Airlines which takes off at 11:20 am and returning flight takes off at 2:20 pm with ticket cost $373.
This is cool.
Do you need any other help?
No, thank you very much.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me to search for a round trip flight from Delhi
On which date you want to travel?
I like to travel on march 1st.
To which place you want to travel and when do you want to return?
I want to fly Atlanta with 2 tickets and coming back on march 10th.
The connecting flight United Airlines takes off at 1:20 pm and returning flight takes off at 9:30 am with ticket cost $585.
This is perfect for me.
Have a wonderful day
I am looking for a round trip flight to book
Where are you headed and what day do you leave?
I want to leave next Monday heading to Las vegas
OK, and when are you coming back?
I want to be back by the 11th of this month
What city are you leaving from again?
I'll be coming from Paris
I found 1 flight via American Airlines at 9:40 am with a 4:25 am return flight for $543 total
That sounds awesome
Can I do something else for you
No we're ok for now, thanks for assisting
I'm happy I could help, bye!
I'm about to leave and I need round trip tickets. I will depart from New York to land in Berlin. I want to return on the 14th of March
When are you leaving?
Tomorrow.
There are 2 suitable flights for you, one is from American Airlines and it will take off at 4:45 pm with 0 stops. The return trip is scheduled to leave at 1:35 am. You'll pay $373 for the ticket.
It can work for me.
DO you still need me?
No I don't.
Goodbye sir
Hi can you help me find a round trip flight? I'm leaving next Tuesday and I want to come back on the 13th. I don't really care about the class.
Which city are you leaving and where are you going?
I'll be starting in Los Angeles and I need to get to Portland, OR.
Great, I found 5 options for you. One flight on Alaska Airlines leaves at 4:40 am, with a connecting flight, and it returns at 5:10 pm. It would cost $228.
Can you find any other options? I actually need three Economy tickets.
How about Delta Airlines? They have a flight leaving at 10:20 am and returning at 9:25 am. It is a direct flight and only costs $191.
What time would that flight arrive in Portland?
It arrives at 12:50 pm.
That sounds good to me, I think that's all. Thank you.
Have a great day, then.
I'm needing help to book a round trip flight coming home on the 9th of March.
Alright first tell me about the departure: where from and on what date? Also where is your destination?
Oh yes, I need to leave next Monday out of SD and I'll be headed to SF.
Okay sounds good, there is an available flight with Alaska Airlines that's leaving at 6:15 am and returning at 12:25 pm. It costs $220, and there is also a connecting flight.
That should be good, that's all I need then.
Alright have a good day.
I need a premium economy round trip to Washington on United Airlines
What date are you departing, and from what city?
I'm flying out on the 11th of this month, from Ciudad de mexico.
What is your return date?
I'm coming back on the 13th of march.
I have a united Airlines flight departing at 1:40 am, which is a connecting flight. The return flight departs at 4:35 pm. Total cost is $574.
Okay thanks for the info.
Do you need anything else?
no that's it
Talk to you later.
Could you help me find Premium Economy class tickets for a round trip with a return date of March 5th?
Please tell me your destination.
My destination is Atlanta.
What's your departure city, please?
Search for flights originating from New York City.
What departure date would you prefer?
I'd like to depart today.
Among the 4 suitable flights I found is a direct, outbound American Airlines flight leaving at 9:45 am. The inbound flight departs at 10:30 pm. The ticket price is $304.
Could you tell me how many tickets you got? What's the inbound flight's arrival time?
I got a ticket for 1 passenger. The inbound flight lands at 0:52 am.
Cool! Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all.
Do have yourself a great day!
Hi! Can you help me find a round trip flight?
I'd be happy to. Where will you be departing from and when will you be returning?
I'd like to find a flight from Atlanta for the 13th of this month.
What day will you begin your trip and what is your destination?
I'd like an Economy ticket on a Southwest Airlines flight departing San Fran next Thursday.
There is 1 flight that matches your criteria. There is a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 10:20 am and returning at 6:45 pm for $287.
That will work. Thanks for your help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful trip.
Can you find me a round trip flight out of NYC? I would like to fly with Southwest Airlines and will be returning on the 14th of this Month.
Sure thing, what date will you be leaving?
I will be leaving on Tuesday next week.
What is your destination?
I am traveling to San Fran.
Alright. I've found 1 flight for you with Southwest Airlines. The flight takes off at 6:15 pm and will be a direct flight. The returning flight will take off at 4:45 am. Your total ticket cost will be $285.
Okay, sounds good. Thanks, that's all for now.
My pleasure! Have a good day.
Could you please find me three Economy class round-trip flight tickets?
What's your departure city?
Please search for flights originating from Toronto, Ontario.
Please tell me your destination, as well as your preferred departure and return dates.
I'd like to leave for Philadelphia on the 6th, and return on the 12th of March.
American Airlines has a 4:15 am outbound, connecting flight, with a 5:45 pm inbound flight at $286 per ticket. Will this flight work for you?
What time does the inbound flight land?
The inbound flight lands at 1:13 am.
What time does the outbound flight reach my destination?
the outbound flight lands at 8:01 am.
That works for me.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Do have yourself a fabulous day!
Hi, there! I need to book a round trip flight. I'm hoping to travel on the 4th. I'd like to buy three tickets on American Airlines.
Okay, great! Where are you planning to go?
We need to go to Atlanta.
Okay, nice! Where are you departing from?
Berlin, Germany.
Beautiful! Which day would you like to return?
On the 11th.
Perfect! I found a great American Airlines flight for you. It departs at 1:35 am. It does have a connecting flight. The return flight takes off at 3:45 pm. The tickets will be $581 each. How does that sound?
That sounds good. That's all I need!
Have a good day!
I'm going to visit some friends and am looking for a round trip flight. I need to return on March 9th.
Sure, I can help you with that. I just need to know what date you will be leaving, the city you are departing from, and the city that you'll be visiting.
Of course, I would like to start traveling on Wednesday next week. The easiest place for my to fly out of is Washington and I will be flying to London.
Ok, there is a flight available that you might be interested in. It is an American Airlines flight costing $571. The departing flight takes off at 3:15 pm and the returning flight takes off at 12:45 pm.
That will work perfectly. Thank you.
Do you need anything else today?
No, that's all I needed. Thanks again.
You're welcome. Have a great day!
I need a round flight plane ticket.
What day are you returning?
On March 9th.
What city are you leaving from? Where are you going? On what date?
I am traveling from SF to ATL on the 6th of March for 2 people.
I found 4 options including American Airlines. The flight departs at 4:55 am and it returns at 3:45 pm. The ticket price is $379.
Thanks, that is everything.
Have a nice day.
I need round trip tickets for four for the 1st of this month, returning on March 9th.
Where are you heading?
I am heading to Washington on March 5th.
Where would you be leaving from?
I will be traveling from Chicago.
You can take an American Airlines flight for $211. The flight leaves at 8:35 pm and returns on 7:10 pm.
That would be great.
Is there anything else you need assistance with?
No. Thanks very much
Enjoy your day.
Find for me please a round trip flight.I want to fly with American Airlines to Seattle.
Tell me the return date and from which city you want to depart.
From Vegas will be the return on 14th of this month.
On what date you want to start your travel?
On March 4th will be the start.
What do you think about American Airlines because I found 1 option for you.Is a connecting flight at 7:35 am and return at 4:15 pm.Cost per ticket is $343.
Sounds very good.Thank you. That's what I wanted for the moment.
Have a great day!
I need a round trip flight, and need 1 ticket with Delta Airlines. Also, I need a return flight on the 11th.
What is your travel date?
I'm leaving on the 3rd.
From which city will you depart? Where would you like to go?
I need some from Ciudad de Mexico. I'm going to Chi-town.
There is 1 flight for you, with Delta Airlines. It will depart at 6:55 AM and is connecting. The return flight will take off at 4:10 PM. The ticket price is $420. Is this okay?
Sounds good.
Is there anything else to help with?
No, but thanks!
Of course. Have a great day.
Would you kindly help me to find a round trip flight?
On which date you like to take the return flight?
I like to start my journey tomorrow and returning on the 12th.
Where do you want to go?
I want to fly NYC.
From which city you want to depart?
Search for flights from ATL.
I searched 4 flights of your choice and one among them is American Airlines which takes off at 10:55 pm and it is a connecting flight. The returning flight takes off at 7:10 am with ticket cost $258.
This is cool..thanks a lot..
Have a nice day.
I need a round trip flight.
What do would you like it on? What city are you coming from?
I'm leaving from Philadelphia and coming back on the 7th.
Where are you going? What date are you going?
I'm leaving next Tuesday. I wanna go to NYC. I'm fine with any class.
There are 4 flights for you. Is American Airlines okay? One flight takes off at 3:20 pm with the returning flight at 1:35 pm. The tick would cost $162.
That's good. Thank you. That's all.
Have a nice day.
Hey. Can you help me find a flight? I need something round trip.
Sure. On which date would you like to leave, and on which date would you like to come back?
I'd like to leave on the 1st of this month, and return on March 4th.
Okay. Where would you like to go?
To Vancouver, BC.
And from which city would you like to depart?
I'd like to leave from NY.
Would you be interested in a flight from American Airlines? They have a ticket that meets your criteria. The plane will take off at 9:45 am, and the return flight takes off at 11:20 am. It is a connecting flight, and the ticket costs $496.
Possibly. When would the flight arrive in Vancouver? Also how many tickets is that?
The flight is expected to arrive at 4:11 pm, and the ticket is for 1 traveller.
Alright, cool. That will be all for now thank you.
You're most welcome. Don't be afraid to ask for anything further.
Hey I need an Economy round trip ticket to Philly and I'll be returning on March 6th.
What city will you be departing from?
I will be leaving from Berlin.
And what date would you like to fly?
I need the travel to start on the 1st.
I found 2 flights for you with American Airlines.The ticket would be $499. The first flight departs at 2:55 am and the return flight leaves at 5:45 pm.
That sounds like what I need.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
No, that's it. Thanks.
Enjoy your flight.
Hi, could you get me a round trip flight with United Airlines?
Sure, where will you be departing from and what is your intended period of travel?
I will be travelling to Los Angeles from March 3rd to 14th of March.
And where do you plan to go?
Likely to New York City, I suppose.
There is 1 available United Airlines flight which departs at 11 am and returns at 11:50 am which will cost you $332.
I see, could you get three tickets please? When does the flight land at the destination?
This is for 1 and the flight will arrive at 8:10 pm.
That sounds perfect!
Could I further assist you then?
No, that is all. Thank you so much!
No worries, have a pleasant day ahead!
i like to travel to attend a conference. Will you find me a train?
At what date do you wish to travel?from which city you like to depart from and at what city are you plan to go?
i'm looking for tickets from Anaheim, CA. to Phoenix, AZ and the tickets date is for 7th of March.
THere are 4 trains that suits your need. it will depart at 6:30 am and it costs $123 in total.
At which station the train leave from and at which station does it arrive at?
THe train is leaving from Anaheim Intermodal Center and the train arrives at Phoenix Union Station.
Ok that sounds good.
Whether i need to book tickets in that train?
no,not for now.
Whether anything else i need to search for?
no, thanks a lot thats all i need
bye, have a great day.
I want you to find me a train.
Can you tell me the city from where you will leave, and the city which will be your destination?
I want to leave from NY, and I want to arrive at Chi-town.
Can you tell me the date of your journey?
I want to have tickets for the 1st.
There is a $115 ticket, with a 6 am departure.
That is right. That would be all.
Later then!
Hey, I need to go on a short trip. Can you help me find a train?
Sure! What's the destination?
The destination is Anaheim.
When do you plan to leave and from what city?
I plan to leave from Fresno on the 1st of this month.
I found a ticket there departing at 7 am. It costs $72 dollars in total.
In which stations does it departs from and arrives at?
It leaves from Fresno Station towards the Anaheim Intermodal Center,
Any other trains available? I just found out I'll actually be needing 4 tickets, the luxurious kind.
There are 3 trains that could also work. One of them departs at 9:30 am and it costs $397 total.
Sound great. That's all I need.
Talk to you later! Have a great day.
Could you look for a train for me?
What metropolis are you headed to, and what metropolis will you leave from? What day would you like to depart?
I am searching for tickets for SFO on the 10th of March, since I'm headed to Sacramento.
There's 9 trains that fit your criteria that depart at 6:10 am and costs $45.
Do you have some other alternative trains?
There is one that leaves at 6:20 am and costs $50.
What station does it go to?
It will head to the Sacramento Valley Station.
That's perfect for me.
Would you like for me to reserve tickets?
Nope, I do not plan on reserving tickets now. That's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I would like help selecting a train for a trip that I am taking.
What is your destination city?
My destination city is Phoenix
And on which day are you planning to leave?
I would like book tickets for day after tomorrow
And where will you be leaving from for this trip?
I will be leaving for my trip from LA
The fare is $86 for a train that leaves at 6:30 am
Great, that works
Would you like to go ahead and purchase tickets for this train?
No, not at this time. Thanks
Do you need any further assistance?
No, that's it for me. Thanks for all of your help!
Take care.
I have a plan for a short trip for which I need to find for a Train to travel. Can you find me the one in Portland, OR.
Yes, for which date you want to me to book the train.
I need it on March 9th.
From where you want to start your travel?
I think you can search for the train from Vancouver, BC.
What about a Train departing at 6:50 am with total cost $80 which is the suitable one for you I think from the 8 results I got.
What is the final Station to which the Train will arrive?
The destination is Union Station.
What is the origin station?
This train will leave from Pacific Central Station.
That is okay for me and thanks a lot.
Have a nice trip.
I am looking for one seat in a train.
Can you tell me the city of departure and the city you are traveling to?
I am traveling from SD to ANaheim.
What is the date of departure?
I will be leaving on 12th of this month.
I found 8 trains that might interest you. How about a train departing at 8:30 am and the cost of the ticket is $53?
That sounds nice to me. That will be all for now.
I am glad I could help. See you again.
Could you help me find a train?
What date do you wish to travel and which city are you departing from?
I'm looking for tickets from Vancouver on March 2nd.
What city are you going to?
I'm headed to Seattle.
It's leaving at 6:20 am costing $55 total.
That is great and all I need.
See you later.
I have planned for a short trip and I want you to find me for a Train tickets to Sacramento, CA. Find me economy premium tickets, that will be suitable for me.
Let me know from which date and from Which City you want me to book the tickets?
Search it for a Trip from Anaheim from 5th of March.
Found a Train departing at 6:50 am and the cost will be $151 in total.
I want to know the origin and destination Stations of this train.
This train is from Anaheim Intermodal Center and it will reach to Sacramento Valley Station.
That is great and thanks for it.
Have a good day.
Can you locate a train for me?
What is your destination city and where are you leaving from?
I would like tickets leaving out of Sacramento and going to SD.
What is the date that you would like to travel?
Find me tickets for the 5th of March.
I have found a train that leaves at 6:30 am and the total price is $154.
That sounds very good.
Would you like me to book the tickets for you?
No, I'm not wanting to book the tickets at the moment.
Is there any other thing I can assist you with?
No, this has been very helpful, I appreciate it.
See you again another time.
Would you look for a train?
When will you travel?
Find tickets for March 2nd.
What city will you go to?
I need tickets from Anaheim going to Sacramento, CA.
How about one that leaves at 6:50 am and costs $131?
WHt station does it leave from and arrive to?
Te train leaves from Anaheim Intermodal Center and arrives at Sacramento Valley Station.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to get the tickets?
Not right now.
Should I help with anything else?
No, but it was a great help.
See you later.
I'm going to be taking a trip soon. Please find me a train for transportation.
What city will you be leaving from? Also, what date and time will you want to travel?
I'll be leaving from Chi-town on March 2nd and going to New York.
Your train will be departing at 7:30 am on March 2nd and will cost $120 for a ticket.
What is the departure location?
The train will be departing from the Chicago Union Station in Chicago.
Actually, I may need something a bit different after all. Can you find me other tickets? I want 2 economy class seats.
I have found a train departing at 8 am. It will cost you $207 for 2 economy class seats.
That should work. Please go ahead and book with those details. That's all I need for now.
Anytime. See you next time.
Can you find me a train headed to Phoenix?
Sure thing, what date are you looking to travel?
I need tickets for the 9th of this month.
Okay, what city will you be departing from?
I need tickets for a train out of Anaheim.
I've found 4 trains that may work for you. How about the one leaving at 6:30 am? The ticket will be $126.
What station is leaving from?
The train departs from the Anaheim Intermodal Center.
Okay, that sounds good. Thanks.
Would you like me to book your ticket?
No, not right now. Thanks anyway.
My pleasure. Hope to hear from you again.
I'm trying to find a train going to LA.
On what date please?
I'm going to be going on the 3rd.
Leaving from what city please?
I'll be going from the city of Fresno.
I have 9 trains which fit your description. There is one departing at 7:20 AM which is a $76 ticket.
I'm sorry, going from where to where?
It departs from Fresno Station and the destination is Union Station.
Sounds perfect, thank you for your help.
It's my pleasure to be able to help you.
I am looking for a train.
What are your points of destination and terminus?
I'm just going from Anaheim, CA to San Diego.
Whey do you want to make this trip?
On the 13th of this month.
Well, if you depart at 6:30 am it only costs $52.
What stations are involved in this trip?
You'll leave from Anaheim Intermodal Center and go to Santa Fe Depot.
Fine, you've really helped me out.
Great, have a good trip.
I need to find train tickets to Anaheim, CA, Business class.
What date would you like to travel, and which city are you going to?
I am traveling to Sacramento, CA on the 4th of this month.
I found 10 train options. One departs at 6:50 am and costs $184 in total.
OK, thank you, I'm all set.
See you later!
Will you find me a train?
Which date would you like to travel and to which city?
Get me tickets for the 10th of March to Washington.
What city will you depart from?
I need tickets from NY.
I'm leaving at 7:20 am costing $65 total.
Will there be other trains that work?
Leaving at 8:20 am costing $72 total.
That is great.
Would you like me to book tickets?
No, I don't want to book tickets right now that is all that is needed.
See you later.
I am hoping to travel by train on my trip that is coming up. Can you help me with that?
Sure, which city will you be departing from?
I am hoping to leave from LAX.
Alright, there are may trains leaving from there. Which city will you be going to?
I am traveling to Fresno on the 6th.
Ok, there is a train that matches your description that departs at 7:10 am. The ticket cost is $72.
That sounds perfect! That is all that I needed today.
Glad I could help! Have a great day!
I have a high school reunion and I need to get a train to go there.
Where would you be going to and when would you like to travel?
I need tickets to Fresno for the 9th.
Where would you be leaving from?
I am leaving SD
There are 7 trains leaving that day. There is one that leaves at 6:50 am and costs $85.
Which station would it be leaving from and where would it arrive?
The train departs Santa Fe Depot and stops at Fresno Station.
That would be awesome.
Would you like to book the tickets?
Not at this time. Thanks for your assistance.
Take care of yourself.
Can you find a train for me. I need one seat and I'm looking to go from Washington to Philadelphia.
What is the day that you are wanting to travel?
Find tickets for me for Tuesday next week.
It leaves at 6 am and the price is $61 in all.
That sounds fine.
Would you like me to book tickets?
No, don't want to book tickets at the moment. That was all I wanted.
See you another day.
I'm hoping to find a train for a business trip I'll be making.
I can help with that! Which city will you be departing from and which city will you be traveling to. Also, I will need your travel dates.
Ok, I will need 1 seat from SFO to SD for next Thursday.
Sure, there are 6 options for you to choose from. One departs at 6 am. The price of that ticket is $89.
That one sounds good. I don't need to hear the other options. That's all I need help with today. Thanks!
No, problem. See you later.
I need to find a train, please.
On which date would you like to depart?
I want to leave on March 13th, preferably.
And which destination city would you like to depart to? Where from?
I need tickets from Phoenix on that day and to LA.
Please confirm the following: Flight set to depart at 7 AM. The ticket price is $87.
Yeah, that's exactly it.
Have a wonderful trip.
I'd like train tickets for next Thursday. I'll be going to San Diego.
Where are you coming from?
I'm coming from Phoenix, AZ. I'll need 3 tickets.
I've found 5 trains. One's departing at 8:30 am and costs $199.
That's a good one. That's all.
See you next time.
Would you look for a train for me?
What city will you leave from and which city are you going to? When will you travel?
I'd like to find tickets on March 11th leaving from Sacramento and arriving in Fresno, CA.
I have 7 possibilities. How about one that is $64 in total and leaves at 8 am?
Do you have anything else?
How about one that is $66 in total and leaves at 8:40 am?
What station does it depart from?
The train leaves from Sacramento Valley Station.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like me to book tickets?
No, I don't want to make the booking.
See you later.
I am planning for a short trip and I want to book a train tickets. Can you find me 1 Economy premium ticket from SD?
Yes, Of-course. To which City, you want me to book the train on which day?
I need the tickets for next Wednesday to San Francisco.
How about a Train which will be going to depart at 6:40 am for which the ticket cost will be $103 in total?
That is okay. Thanks and that's all.
Have a good journey.
I have to attend a meeting and I need to train tickets to leave SFO.
Where are you heading?
I am going to Sacramento, CA.
When would you like to leave?
For the 1st.
There is a train departing at 6:10 am and costs $42.
Hmm. At which station would it be departing and where would it arrive?
It leaves at Salesforce Transit Center and arrives at Sacramento Valley Station.
Is there anything else? I need 1 seat that is conditionally refundable.
There are 8 options. There is one leaving at 6:20 am and it costs $46.
That would be fine. That's all for now.
Take care of yourself.
Find me some tickets for a train going to Sacramento on the 6th of March.
I can do that, but first I'll need to know from which city you would like to depart.
I'll new two seats from San Francisco to Sacramento.
I've found a train that matches your criteria. It departs at 6:10 am and the tickets will cost $82 in total.
Which station does that train arrive at?
The train will arrive in Sacramento Valley Station.
And which station does it leave from?
The train will leave from Salesforce Transit Center.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like me to book the tickets?
No, not right now. I'll let you know if I need anything further.
Okay. I'll be here, just let me know.
I need a train with economy premium ticket for 1 person on 6th of this month.
Which is your preferred city?
I wish to go to Portland.
From which do you want to go?
I need tickets from Vancouver, BC on 1st of March.
Starting at 6:50 am. The price is $91.
Is there any other options available?
Starting at 8:10 am. The price is $95.
It is good. That is what I want.
Catch you later. Bye.
I need to get a train.
Where are you leaving and where are you goin?
I am going from Los Angeles Thursday next week. I'm headed to SD.
You can take the 6:50 am bus. It costs only $53.
excellent. Thank you.
Do you need me to get your tickets?
No, I don't want to do that quite yet.
What else can I get you today?
Nothing, thanks. I appreciate you asking.
Great, have a good trip.
Can you find a train for me. I want 1 ticket leaving from LA.
What is your destination and what is the day you want to travel?
I'm going to SFO and would like tickets that are for Wednesday next week.
I have one leaving at 7:50 am. The total price is $83.
That sounds fine.
Would you like me to book tickets?
No, I don't want to book tickets at present.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. That was very helpful, thank you.
Talk to you again.
I'm going to San Diego to visit family soon and need help finding a train ticket.
I can help with that but can you first tell me where you will be departing from?
I would like to leave Sacramento on March 3rd if possible.
I was able to locate one train, leaving at 6:30 am for $142, does that interest you?
Perfect, that's what i'm looking for.
Okay, glad I could help, let me know when you need anything else.
I'm looking for fully refundable train tickets departing from LA.
What date are you leaving and where are you traveling to?
I need 1 ticket going to San Diego and I want to depart on March 8th.
I found 10 trains for you. There is a train departing at 6:50 am for $77.
That sounds good.
Would you like to purchase the ticket now?
No, not right now. That is all I needed.
Have a great day.
Can you get me two fully refundable tickets on a train from SFO?
Sure, where are you going and when are you leaving?
I'm going to SD on the 11th of this month.
There's one leaving at 6 am that costs $232.
What stations does it leave from and arrive to?
It leaves from Salesforce Transit Center and arrive at Santa Fe Depot.
Great, that's it for now.
My pleasure, enjoy your day.
i need to go for a conference . will you find me a train?
to which city you are planning to go?From which city you wist to depart from?
I am looking for tickets from San diego to LAX
At what date you plan to travel?
Will you find tickets on 11th of March?
There are 10 trains as per your need, which are depart at 6:10 am and its costs $56 in total.
ok thats sound good .
Whether i need to book tickets in that train?
no, not for now. that's all i need.
have a wonderful day.
Can you locate a train for me? I want one seat.
What is the date that you wish to travel? Which city are you heading to?
See if you can find me tickets for 4th of March heading to Phoenix, AZ.
What is your point of departure?
I need tickets leaving from Anaheim.
There are 4 trains that might work for you. One leaves at 6:30 am and costs $122 in all.
Are there trains besides that one that might work?
There is one leaving at 6:40 am. This one's price is $123 in all.
That sounds fine, that was all I needed.
See you another day.
Shall I get train ticket from Portland, flexible one for 1 passenger?
Your destination and date of travel please?
To Vancouver, BC for next Monday.
There is one departing at 7:40 am and you have to pay $101.
That will be fine, thank you.
Shall I book the tickets.
Not needed now.
Any other help?
No, thats all.
Have a good day.
Can you find me two seats on a train
What city do you want this train to head to?
I want it to be going to Seattle
Sure, and for what date?
Let's look for tickets for the 10th of this month
What city are you coming from?
I'll be leaving from Portland, OR
How about one that departs at 9:10 am that will run you $117
That sounds like a good plan
Should I book that train then?
No right now I don't need the tickets yet
Can I do something else for you then?
No, for now that's it, you were great!
I appreciate that, take care!
I am looking for a train from Anaheim, CA with luxurious ticket on the 14th.
Which is your preferred city?
I wish to go to San Diego.
I searched and found 7 trains for you The train starting at 6:30 am with the cost $89.
It is nice.
Shall I book tickets for you?
Nope. I am not willing to book it now.
Do you need any other help from me?
Nope. Thank you so much for your kind help.
Catch you later. Bye.
Can you help me find a train to get to where I'm going?
Well where are you going?
I'm heading to LAX
Where are you coming from and what date do you plan to leave?
I am leaving on the 9th of March from SD
There are 10 trains that fit that route, including a 6:10 am train for $59
What other options do I have?
There's one that leaves a little later at 6:40 am and is $52
That's $7 cheaper, so that sounds great
Do you want me to book tickets then?
No I just wanted to know the options for now, thanks
See you and just update me if you need help
I would like to find a train.
Where are you departing from and what is your destination?
I'm leaving Washington to Chicago on March 6th.
There are 5 trains. There is one leaving at 9:40 am for $109.
Which station does it leave from?
The train leaves from Union Station.
I would like to purchase tickets.
How many tickets would you like?
I will need one seat.
Do you want travel insurance?
Yes, I want a trip insurance.
Booking 1 value ticket from WAshington to Chicago on March 6th at 9:40 am.
I would like a flexible ticket.
Booking 1 flexible ticket.
Yes, that works for me.
Your ticket was booked.
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Would you find me a train with 3 seats?
Which city do you want leave from and go to?
I will leave from LAX and og to Anaheim, CA.
What date will you leave?
I will leave 10th of March.
There are 10 trains that should be suitable. There's one that leaves at 6 am and costs $74.
Sounds good to me. Book me train tickets. I need trip insurance and want conditionally refundable tickets.
Could you confirm that you want a train ticket leaving from Los Angeles and going to Anaheim on March 10th at 6 am for 3 people? The train ticket comes with trip insurance and is a value ticket.
That sounds good. What station will it leave from?
I have made your booking successfully. The train leaves from Union Station.
What station will it go to?
The train goes to Anaheim Intermodal Center.
That's a great help. That is all.
See you later.
I'd like to find a train.
Where will you be departing from?
I'll be leaving from NY.
Where do you plan to go and on what date?
I need to go to Washington on the 12th of March.
Of the 9 suitable trains, there is one that departs at 7:20 am and a ticket costs $67.
That sounds like a good option.
Shall I book tickets for you?
Yes, please reserve tickets for me.
How many tickets do you need?
I'll only need one seat.
Would you like to include travel insurance?
Yes, that would be great.
Please confirm that you want 1 Value ticket from New York to Washington on the train that leaves at 7:20 am on March 12th.
That's perfect.
Your reservation is successful.
From which station does the train depart?
The train departs from the Grand Central Station.
Thank you very much for the assistance.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. Thank you. That's all I need.
See you and have a great day!
I need train tickets. I'll be riding from Anaheim, CA on the 13th of the month.
Can you provide me the arrival city?
Oh right. I'll be traveling to Sacramento, CA.
I have found tickets for you. There is a train departing to Sacramento, CA at 6:50 am. The tickets will cost $132.
Perfect. Go ahead and book those train tickets for me.
How many tickets do you require? It is recommended that you have travel insurance as well.
Travel insurance is a good idea. I'll take travel insurance along with one economy class ticket.
Your train will be departing from Anaheim on March 13th at 6:50 am. The arrival destination is Sacramento. You wish to purchase 1 Value ticket for this trip correct?
Yep. That's all correct.
I have successfully booked your train ride.
Great. Thanks for the help!
My pleasure. What else can I assist you with?
Nothing else. You were a big help to me. Thank you.
You are welcome. Let me know if you need anything else. Bye.
Can you help me find a train?
Which city are you going to?
Heading to LAX.
Which city are you looking to depart from and on what date?
I'm looking for tickets from SFO for 13th of March.
There are 9 trains that could work. One departs at 6:20 am and costs $96.
That sounds good, please book train tickets.
How many tickets do you need and would you like insurance?
I will need 1 seat with trip insurance please.
Please confirm the following details: you would like 1 ticket on the train leaving from San Francisco at 6:20 am heading to Los Angeles on March 13th. This is a Value ticket with insurance.
Sounds good to me.
Your tickets were booked successfully.
Can you tell me the departing and arrival station please?
The train is leaving from Salesforce Transit Center and arrives at Union Station.
Thank you. That is all for now.
Have a nice day.
I need to find a train.
Where are you leaving from and where would you like to go?
I am leaving Seattle and going to Vancouver.
When would you like to go?
I want to travel on March 2nd.
I found 9 trains. One costs $57 and leaves at 6:20 am.
That will work.
Would you like me to reserve the tickets.
Yes I would. I am already all set on trip insurance.
How many tickets do you want?
I only need one train ticket.
So you would like me to reserve 1 Value ticket leaving Seattle and going to Vancouver for March 2nd with 6:20 am departure?
Yes please. Can you tell me what station the train departs from?
The train will depart from King Street Station. Your ticket has been confirmed.
Thanks for all your help.
Is there anything else I can do?
No. I am all set. Thanks for all your help.
Have a great day.
Hey. I need to ride a train for a trip. Help me book some tickets.
What is the departure and arrival city for the trip? Please also provide the date for the tickets.
On the 9th of this month, I'll be traveling from Vancouver to Seattle, WA by train.
I have found tickets for you. The departure time is 6:20 am on the 9th of this month. The total cost will be $55.
Exactly what I needed. It's in my price range too. Buy the tickets for me if you can.
How many tickets do you wish to purchase?
I only need one ticket for the trip.
I can help you get travel insurance as well.
Yeah please do. That'll come in handy for my trip.
Confirm the details for your train ticket. On March 9th at 6:20 am, you will be leaving Vancouver to arrive at Seattle. The transaction will be for 1 Value ticket. Is this correct?
I'm sorry. I actually need two seats not one. Not sure what I was thinking.
Booking a 2 train tickets for the trip to Seattle. Travel Insurance will be included with the purchase.
That works fine for me. Please confirm as soon as possible.
Your two tickets to Seattle have been purchased.
Good. Can you tell me the departure station for the ride?
The train is leaving at 6:20 am from Pacific Central Station.
Okay and what is the arrival station?
The train will arrive at the King Street Station after departure.
Awesome. I couldn't have booked this trip so easily without you. Thank you very much.
Anytime. If you need anything else, please let me know. See you soon.
I would like to find a train.
What city do you plan to depart from?
I am planning to leave from NYC.
What city is your destination?
I am going to Chi-town.
When will you be departing on your trip?
We would like to board the train on the 9th of this month. We will need three seats.
There is a train departing at 6 am that will cost $305 in total.
What station does that train leave from?
The train leaves from Grand Central Station.
That sounds good, I would like to book tickets for that train.
Would you like to include travel insurance.
Yes, I would like the trip insurance, please.
You would like 3 Value tickets on the train from New York to Chicago leaving at 6 am on March 9th, is this correct?
Yes, that is all correct. What station does the train arrive in?
Your tickets were booked. The train arrives in Chicago Union Station.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, you have been very helpful, thank you.
Have a good trip!
Hey, I need to go on a short trip. Find me tickets for the 6th of this month. I'll need one seat on business class.
Where will you be leaving from and what's your destination?
I'm leaving from Vancouver to Portland.
I found 8 trains that could work. There's one departing at 6:50 am with a $117 ticket.
In which station does it arrives at?
It arrives at Union Station.
Sounds real good.
Should I book the tickets?
Yes, please do.
Would you like to get a travel insurance?
I already have one, thanks.
So 1 ticket for a train leaving Vancouver and going to Portland, departing at 6:50 am on March 6th. You'll be seating on business class. Is that correct?
Yes, it is. In what station will I arrive?
Your ticket is confirmed. You'll arrive at Pacific Central Station.
You really helped me, thanks a lot.
Can I help you further?
No, that was all. Thanks.
See you later. Have a great day.
I would like to go home and visit my family this spring. Can you help me find a train ticket to get there?
Sure, I just need to know where you would like to depart from and where you will be arriving at.
I would like to travel on March 9th from Vancouver, BC.
Okay, and where will you be going?
I will be travelling to my parent's house in Seattle, WA.
I was able to find a train that leaves at 6:20 am for $55.
Okay, that's not too bad. Which station does the train depart from?
That particular train leaves from Pacific Central Station.,
Okay, and can you also tell me which station it will be arriving at?
I can see here that it will be arriving at King Street Station.
Okay, that sounds like what I am looking for. Let's go ahead and reserve tickets for that train.
I just need to know how many tickets you would like and if you want the travel insurance that they offer.
I'm the only one traveling so just 1 ticket and I do want the insurance. I also would like the tickets to be conditionally refundable in case anything happens.
Great, so I have 1 Value ticket, leaving Vancouver on March 9th at 6:20 am, going to Seattle. Is that correct?
Yes, that sounds great!
I was successfully able to reserve those tickets for you, and you should be all set to travel.
Thank you so much, you made it so much easier than I could have done alone.
Can I help you with anything else?
Nope, that is all I need for now, thanks for asking.
It as my pleasure, let me know when you need anything else.
I would like to book train tickets from Sacramento.
What is your destination?
I am going to Fresno, CA.
What is your date of departure?
I would like to depart later today.
I found 7 trains that suits your requirements. How about a train which departs at 8 am and the cost is $65?
Which station is it's arrival and leaving point?
The train leaves from Sacramento Valley Station and goes to Fresno Station.
Okay, The train sounds good to me.
Would you like me to book tickets for you?
Yes, Please make a reservation for me.
Can you tell me the number of tickets required?
I want to book only 1 seat.
Would like to have travel insurance as well?
Yes, I would like to have a trip insurance as well.
Please confirm: You want me to book 1 Value ticket in a train leaving from Sacramento to Fresno on March 1st at 8 am.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked your ticket.
Thank you so much for all the help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Bye! See you again!
Would you find me a train?
What date would you like to travel on and what city are you leaving from?
Find tickets for 7th of March from San Diego.
What city will you go to?
I'm going to LAX.
The flight will leave at 6:10 am and costs $56.
Do you have any other trains that will work?
How about one that leaves at 6:40 am and costs $52?
Sounds good. Book me the train tickets.
How many tickets would you like? Is there travel insurance?
I'd like 1 seat on economy.
Could you confirm that you want to book a ticket on the train departing from San Diego and going to Los Angeles on March 7th at 6:40 am for 1? There is trip insurance and it's a value ticket.
That works for me.
I have made the reservation successfully.
Thank you, that was a great help. That's all that I needed.
See you later.
So I'm wanting to go to Washington. Could you get me a train ticket? I'd like it conditionally refundable if possible.
Okay, when would you like to go? Where are you departing from?
I'd like to leave from Philly on March 4th.
There's a departure for the tickets at 8:30 am for that date. Total cost is $56.
Okay, cool. What's the name of the station it arrives?
It will arrive at Union Station.
What about which station it leaves?
It will leave from 30th Street Station in Philly.
Okay, cool.
Would you like to reserve the tickets?
Yes, please make the reservation for the ticket.
How many tickets would you like to purchase? Additionally, do you want any travel insurance for this trip?
I'd like 1 seat and yes, I want insurance for the trip.
Okay. So you'd like a train ticket leaving from Philadelphia and arriving in Washington. This ticket is for March 4th, departing at 8:30 am. You are purchasing 1 Value ticket with trip insurance. Please confirm if this is okay.
Confirmed.
Okay, great. Your ticket was reserved successfully!
Thanks so much, you were a great help.
You're welcome. Anything else I can do?
Nope, that's it. Thanks again.
You're welcome. have a great day!
I want to go visit some relatives in NY. I need one seat on a train.
When would you be leaving and which city are you heading to?
I will be going to philly on the 10th of this month.
There are 8 trains available. There is one departing at 10:40 am and it costs $46.
That would be too later. I will be leaving from Chicago.
There are 7 trains available. There is one leaving at 7:30 am and it costs $118.
Which station would it be arriving in?
The train would be arriving at Grand Central Station.
Which station would it be leaving from?
It would be leaving Chicago Union Station.
That would be great.
You would like to get the ticket
Yes, I do.
Would you be needing any travel insurance.
Yes, I will have the trip insurance.
You want 1 value ticket on a train leaving Chicago and heading New York on March 10th at 7:30 am?
That would be great.
I have booked the ticket for you.
Thanks a lot. That would be all.
Take care of yourself.
I'm looking for a train
What is the city of arrival?
I want to go to Seattle
What is the city of departure? Which day do you want to leave?
I'm leaving from Portland, on 14th of this month
There's a train at 9:10 am that costs $66 in total
From which station does it start and in which station does it arrive?
The train leaves from Union Station and arrives at King Street Station
Is there a train from Vancouver?
There are 9 trains. There is one at 6:20 am that costs $58
Is there another train?
A train leaving at 6:40 am and costs $53
Yes, this is fine for me
Do I book a ticket?
Yes, please, with a trip insurance.
How many tickets do you want to book?
I need only one seats, thanks.
A Value ticket for 1 people on the train from Vancouver To Seattle, at 6:40 am on March 14th. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm, thanks. From which station does it start and in which station does it arrive?
It departs from Pacific Central Station and arrives at King Street Station. Your ticket has been booked!
Thank you so much! That's all!
Have a nice day!
I'm looking for one train ticket traveling from Vancouver, BC to Portland.
What date are you traveling on?
I'm departing on March 4th.
I found 8 trains that may work. There is one departing at 6:50 am for $76.
Okay, that sounds good.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yes, I would like to purchase conditionally refundable tickets.
Would you like to include travel insurance?
Yes, I do and I'd like economy premium tickets.
Okay, I have 1 flexible ticket with trip insurance for the train departing from Vancouver on March 4th at 6:50 am traveling to Portland, correct?
Yes, that works.
I have successfully purchased the ticket.
Thank you! That is all I needed.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you help me search for a train please?
Which city will you be departing from and rravelling to?
I will be travelling from LA to Anaheim, CA.
And which date will you be travelling on?
Likely on the 14th of March.
There are 10 trains available, one of which departs at 6 am and costs $35.
I see, and which station will I be departing from and travelling to.
You will be travelling from Union Station to Anaheim Intermodal Center.
That sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, could you do so please?
How many tickets do you need and do you require insurance?
Yes, help me 1 seat with insurance please.
Please confirm your value ticket for 1 travelling from Los Angeles to Anaheim on March 14th at 6 am.
That sounds great!
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you so much for your kind assistance, that is all I need.
Sure, have a great day ahead!
Hey, can you find get a ticket for 2 seats on a train?
Sure. Which locations would you like the train to depart from and arrive at, and when would you like to travel?
I'm going to Seattle from Vancouver on the 7th.
I've found 9 trains that meet your criteria. How about one that departs at 6:20 am and costs $101 in total?
What else is available.
There is also a train departing at 6:40 am that will cost $106 in total.
That sounds better to me. Can you book the tickets for me?
Certainly. Would you like travel insurance?
Yes I would. Also I would like the value tickets.
You would like 2 value tickets for a train from Vancouver to Seattle on March 7th at 6:40 am. Is that correct?
No, I changed my mind. Make it a fully refundable ticket.
You would like a flexible ticket on the train from Vancouver. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct. Please buy the tickets.
The tickets have successfully been purchased.
Great! Thank you.
You're welcome. Will that be all?
Yes that is all, i'll let you know if I need anything else.
Okay, goodbye.
I need to find a train.
I can help. Can you give me the dates of travel, departure city, and destination?
I need tickets from Vancouver, BC to Portland, OR for the 4th of March.
I found a 6:50 am departure that will cost you $76 in total.
Anything else that would work? I need economy tickets from Seattle, WA.
I found 10 trains that could work. One departs at 8 am and costs $59.
What station does it depart from? Where does it arrive?
The train leaves King Street Station and arrives at Union Station.
Sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I need to book 1 train ticket with trip insurance.
Confirming that you need 1 Value ticket from Seattle to Portland. You want to leave on March 4th at 8 am. Is this information correct?
Yes, it works for me.
Your tickets are successfully booked.
Thank you for your helpfulness.
Is there anything else?
No. Thank you.
You're welcome. See you again.
I'm about to plan my next trip and I need to find a train.
When are you leaving? What is your destination?
I need to reach Sacramento, CA and the date is march 12th
What is your departure location?
I'll leave from Anaheim, CA
Me research tells me that there are 10 trains meeting your needs. What about leaving at 6:50 am? The price to pay is $132.
Where am I leaving from? Where will I arrive?
You'll leave from Anaheim intermodal center and arrive at sacramento valley station
Fine
I can book the tickets on your behalf
awesome, do it then
how many tickets do you want me to buy?
1 is more than enough
You can add travel insurance if you like
I think it's a great idea.
Confirm the procedure before it's final. I'm about to buy 1 value train ticket that will leave from anaheim on march 12th at 6:50 am and will reach sacramento
yup
I confirm you that the tickets are yours.
You've been a great help, thank you
No problem, can I assist you furthermore?
No, it's fine.
Take care.
Can you find me a train with tickets for later today from New York City.
What city are you going to?
I'm going from Washington and need Business tickets.
There are 9 trains working that depart 7:20 am costing $110 total.
Would there be any other trains that work because I need economy premium tickets.
Leaving 8:20 am costing $88 total.
That sounds great and I'd like to book train tickets.
Do you like to have travel insurance?
I would like trip insurance.
How many tickets do you want?
I'm gonna want 1 seat.
Please confirm the following details that you want a ticket on the train leaving New York with a destination of Washington. The train is leaving March 1st at 8:20 am for 1 person with trip insurance is a flexible ticket.
That works for me.
The tickets were booked successfully.
That was very helpful from you and all I need thanks.
See you later.
There is an Expo coming up in Washington that I would like to attend and need to find a train ticket to get me there from Chicago.
I am happy to help, just tell me the date you are planning on leaving.
I would like to go there on the 9th of this month.
The first ticket I found leaves at 6:20 am costing $106.
I only need 1 seat, can you find me something else?
There are 5 others starting with one that leaves at 11:50 am costing $109. Does that interest you?
IT depends, what station does this train arrive at?
This train is scheduled to arrive at Union Station.
Okay, and what station does it leave from?
The information I see here shows it leaving from Chicago Union Station.
That works for me.
Is there something else I can look up for you?
Yes, I would like to go ahead and book the tickets for that train ride but I would like the tickets to be conditionally refundable if possible.
Okay, I can do that. First let me just make sure everything I have is correct. You would like 1 Value ticket for the train that is leaving Chicago on March 9th, at 11:50 am, and travelling to Washington. Does that sound right?
No, I would like economy premium tickets instead.
Alright, I have change that to a flexible ticket for you. Is that the only change you would like to make before submitting?
Yes, now everything sounds right.
I am happy to inform you that I have reserved those tickets for you.
Thank you, that was much easier with your help.
It was my pleasure, can I do anything else for you?
No, you've taken care of the only item on my agenda for now, thank you.
I'm here when you need me again.
I would like to get tickets on a train.
Where would you be leaving from and where are you heading. When would you like to leave?
I would like to leave Anaheim next Monday for Fresno, CA.
There are 6 options. The train departs at 7:10 am and the cost is $76.
That is awesome.
You would like to book tickets?
Yes, I would.
How many tickets and would you need travel insurance?
I want just 1 seat and I will have the trip insurance.
You would like 1 value ticket on a train leaving Anaheim at 7:10 am on March 4th, heading Fresno?
That would be great.
I have booked the tickets.
That would be awesome.
Anything else you need help with?
No. You have helped enough.
Ok. Take care.
i like to travel in order to attend a meeting. Will you find me a train?
In which city you like depart from? At what date do you wish to travel? TO which city you are planning to go?
Going to Anaheim, CA from SD. I need tickets on 13th of MArch.
There is one train which is departing at 8:30 am . Its costs $48 in total.
Not interested. Whether any other train available? I want value tickets.
There is one train which is departing at 9:10 am . Its costs $52 in total.
ok thats great. it suits for me.
Whether i need to book tickets in that train?
Yes, i want to make reservation. I need also trip insurance.
HOw many tickets do you need?
i need one seats.
Please check and confirm the following details. Train ticket need to be booked which will depart from San Diego. The destination place is Anaheim. The train leaves on march 13th and Leaves at 9:10 am. Number of Passengers is 1 people. It is a value ticket and it has trip insurance.
ok thats great. its suits for me.
Ticket has been booked successfully.
what is the station name from which train depart?
the train is leaving from Santa Fe Depot.
What is the destination station name?
The train arrives at Anaheim Intermodal Center.
THanks a lot for you immense help.
Whether i need to do anything else?
No, Not now . thanks for your care.
Bye , have a wonderful day.
I need help finding a train.
What city is your point of departure and what is your destination? What is the date that you are wanting to travel?
I am going to Portland, OR and would like tickets for 13th of March. I am leaving from Vancouver, BC.
I see 8 trains that work for this. One leaves at 6:50 am and the price is $83 total.
Which station will this train end up at?
The train will end up at Union Station.
That sounds fine. I would like to book tickets for this train. I need one seat that is conditionally refundable.
Would you like to buy travel insurance?
Yes I would like to get trip insurance.
Okay sir, can you confirm these details: you would like a ticket on the train departing out of Vancouver and going to Portland. This train departs at 6:50 am on March 13th. The ticket is a Value ticket for 1 person, with trip insurance.
That sounds good to me.
The tickets have been booked successfully for you.
You have been very helpful, thank you. That was all I wanted.
See you another day.
Can you search a train for me?
What is date and city of departure and your destination?
I am leaving from LAX to Anaheim on 13th of March.
There is train which departs at 6 am and costs $38.
Can you tell me the name of the station it leaves from?
The name of the station is Union Station.
Okay, The train sounds good to me.
Would you like me to buy tickets for you?
Yes, I would like to book a ticket.
Can you tell me the number of tickets and whether you need travel insurance?
I would like to book one seat and I would also like to have the travel insurance.
Please confirm: You want me to book 1 value ticket in a train leaving from Los Angeles to Anaheim on March 13th at 6 am.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked the tickets for you.
Can you tell me the name of the station where the train arrives?
The name of the station is Anaheim Intermodal Center.
Thank you for all your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. See you!
Can you find me luxurious train tickets heading to Chicago on the 12th please
What city are you coming from?
I am gonna be starting at Washington
There's one for $157 at 9:40 am if that works for you?
That works, book that for me
Do you want travel insurance for this?
Yes that would be lovely
How many tickets then?
I only need 1 seat please
Confirming you want 1 business ticket to Chicago from Washington on the 9:40 am train that leaves on March 12th?
Yes please, what station does this train leave from and arrive at?
Your tickets are booked! And it leaves from Union Station with a final destination at Chicago Union Station
Thanks for everything, you were super helpful
I am glad I could help, see you soon
I need a train.
Which cities will you leave and go to? What date will you travel?
I'm headed to Sacramento, Ca to San Diego on the 7th of this month.
You can go at 6:10 am for $148.
What station is it from?
It departs from Santa Fe Depot.
Aren't there later trains? I need two seats.
There are 8 others. Next departing would be 6:40 am for $274.
Which station does it depart from?
It also leaves from Santa Fe Depot.
Can't you get something later. I'm heading from Anaheim, CA.
There are 10 trains from there, starting as early as 6:50 am. The cost is $233.
That's perfect.
Shall I book your tickets now?
Yes, lets make it.
How about some travel insurance for you today?
Yes, give me trip insurance.
To confirm: 2 tickets for train leaving Anaheim going to Sacramento on March 7th at 6:50 am. You are getting a value ticket with trip insurance.
It's fine, thanks.
Your tickets are all set.
You really are the cat's meow.
Is something else needed?
No, absolutely not.
Have a great trip.
Could you look a locomotive for me?
What metropolis do you intend to leave from?
I'm searching for tickets leaving San Diego.
What metropolis are you headed to?
I'm headed to Sacramento; look for tickets on Friday next week.
There are 9 locomotives suitable for you, departing at 6:10 am with a price of $145.
What location does the train depart from?
It departs from Santa Fe Depot.
That's find with me.
Would you like me to reserve tickets?
Yeah, I'd like to make the booking. I'd like a conditionally refundable ticket for 1, with trip insurance.
Please verify the following information: you'd like a value ticket for 1 person departing from San Diego on March 8th, 6:10 am, and headed to Sacramento.
That's perfect for me. What location does the train come to?
Your tickets have been reserved, and the train will go to Sacramento Valley Station.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist with something else?
Nope; thank you for your assistance.
I hope to see you later.
I need 1 seat on a train on March 13th. I need to go to Washington.
What city are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Atlanta, GA.
A train is leaving at 1 pm. The ticket is $115.
Perfect, book me that train.
Do you want travel insurance?
Yes, I want to buy insurance.
Please confirm, 1 value ticket from Atlanta to Washington on March 13th at 1 pm.
That is perfect.
Your ticket has been purchased.
What is the name of the arrival station?
Union Station.
What is the departing station?
Peachtree Station.
That is all, thanks!
Goodbye!
I would like a train.
What date and departure city?
The 10th of March from Sacramento, CA.
What city is arrival?
It is Fresno.
I have 7, one departing at 8 am for $66.
I want to book it.
How many and do you want insurance?
One seat and yes for insurance.
Confirm 1 Value seat for March 10th at 8 am from Sacramento to Fresno.
What is arrival and departing stations?
Departure is Sacramento Valley Station and arrival is Fresno Station.
Thanks, that is all.
See you again.
I'm going to need 2 train tickets.
I can help you with that. Which city would you like the train to depart from, and where would you like to go? As well, It would help if I knew what date you would to travel on.
I'd like to get a train from Phoenix, AZ to Los Angeles on the 9th of March.
I've found 5 trains that match your criteria. How about one that leaves at 6:30 am and costs $157 in total?
That sounds good to me. Can you buy the tickets?
Would you like to have travel insurance?
Yes, I think that would be best.
Please confirm the following: 2 value tickets for train from Los Angeles to Phoenix on March 9th at 6:30 am.
No, I want a fully refundable ticket instead of a value ticket.
The train leaves at 6:30 am. You would like a flexible ticket. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct. What station will we arrive at?
Your tickets have successfully been purchased. The train will arrive at Phoenix Union Station.
Awesome. And what station does it leave from?
It will leave from the Union Station.
Great. You have been very helpful, I appreciate it.
I'm always glad to be of assistance. Will that be all?
Yes that is it for now. Goodbye.
See you again.
Could you look for a train for me?
On what date and what city are you going to?
I will be going to Anaheim and it will be for the 2nd of this month.
What city will you leave from?
I want Value tickets from Sacramento.
I will depart at 6:30 am and it costs $132.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to book tickets?
Yes, make the reservation for one.
Would you like travel insurance?
Yes, get me trip insurance.
Please confirm that you want to leave from Sacramento and go to Anaheim on March 2nd at 6:30 am for 1 person. You need trip insurance and it's a Value ticket.
That sounds good. What station does it arrive at and leave from?
Your ticket was successfully booked. The train will go to Anaheim Intermodal Center from Sacramento Valley Station.
That's a great help. Thank you.
Could I assist with something else?
No, that was really helpful. Thank you.
See you next time.
Would you help me with finding a train please?
Of course. Where will you be going and on what date?
I'll be traveling to LAX and I need to go on the 12th of this month.
Where will you be leaving from?
Heading out from SD.
I have 10 possibilities for you to consider. There's a train that leaves at 6:10 am and that's a $60 ticket.
Leaving from where please?
That departs from Santa Fe Depot.
Where does it end up?
Its destination is Union Station.
Sounds like a good one, I think.
Shall I reserve a ticket for you?
Sure, let's make the reservation.
How many tickets will you need? And would you like travel insurance, too?
I only need one seat and, yes, I would like to get insurance for the trip.
Confirming 1 reserved Value seat on the 6:10 am train departing San Diego for Los Angeles on March 12th. Trip insurance included.
You got it all correct, thanks.
The reservation processed successfully.
Thank you for all your help! I'm all set now.
You're very welcome, have a lovely trip.
Would you help me to search a train which going to Phoenix from Anaheim and i want 1 ticket.
On which date you want to travel?
Search luxurious ticket for march 12th.
I found 4 trains of your choice which departs at 6:30 am and the ticket cost is $164.
Can i know the leaving station?
Anaheim Intermodal Center is the leaving station.
Can i know the arrival station?
Phoenix Union Station is the arrival station.
This is cool. I like to book the tickets.
Do you need travel insurance?
Yes, I need travel insurance.
please give confirmation details: You need a train ticket leaving from Anaheim to Phoenix for march 12th at 6:30 am and ticket is for 1 people with trip insurance and business class ticket.
This is perfect for me.
Train ticket is booked successfully.
Thanks for your great help.
Any other help you want?
No, not now..thanks a lot
Bye for now..see you soon..
I need to travel along with my family through train. could you find a train for 3 seats ?the train should depart from Fresno.
At which city you plan to go? at what date do you need to travel?
Going to LA and The date is for the 12th.
I found one train which is depart at 8:30 am and its costs $188 in total.
Ok that sounds good.
Whether i need to book tickets in that train?
yes, i need to make the reservation and i want to have trip insurance and i need economy tickets.
Please check and confirm the details. Train ticket is needed and the train depart from Fresno and the destination is Los Angeles. The train leaves on march 12th and leaves at 8:30 am . Number of passengers is 3 and it comes with trip insurance and it is a Value ticket.
Ok That suits for me. please Book it.
Your tickets were successfully booked.
THanks a lot for your help.
Whether i need to find anything else?
No, Not for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I need a train going to LA.
On what date?
on the 8th of this month.
Where will you be leaving from?
From Sacramento city.
There is one departing at 6:30 am costing $90.
I like the sound of that.
Will I book you some tickets?
Yes that would be good.
How many tickets and do you require travel insurance?
I have insurance thanks and one seat please.
To confirm then that is a Value train ticket for 1, peaving Sacramento travelling to Los Angeles on March 8th at 6:30 am.
Sounds good. Which station does it arrive at in LA?
Union Station and your booking is now confirmed.
That is great thanks and that is all for now.
See you again soon.
I want a train.
When do you want to go?
I need tickets on the 11th
Where do you want to go?
I wish to go to Anaheim.
Where do you want to go?
I wish to go to Phoenix.
I found 4 trains for you. Starting at 6:30 am. It costs $118.
What is the name of the reaching station?
It will reach Phoenix Union Station.
What is the name of the starting station?
It will start from Anaheim Intermodal Center.
It is good.
Shall I book tickets?
Yes. I wish to reserve.
Number of tickets you need?
I need 1 ticket.
Do you need travel insurance?
Yes. I need trip insurance. I need conditionally refundable tickets.
Kindly ensure that, on March 11th, you need 1 Value ticket from Anaheim to Phoenix at 6:30 am. It is with insurance.
It is good for me.
Your tickets are booked.
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
Thank you. See you later.
I need to get a train.
Where would you be leaving from and where are you heading? When would you like to travel?
I would like tickets from Anaheim, CA to Los Angeles on the 10th of this month.
There is one departing at 6:30 am and the cost is $35.
Which station would it arrive at and where would it be leaving from?
The train would be leaving from Anaheim Intermodal Center and arriving at Union Station.
That would be ok.
Would you like to book tickets?
Yes, I would like to make the reservation.
How many tickets would you like? Would you need travel insurance?
I would like the trip insurance and 1 value ticket.
You would like 1 value ticket for a train that leaves on March 10th at 6:30 am from Anaheim to Los Angeles.
That would be great.
The tickets have been booked.
That would be all I need.
Take care of yourself.
I need a train ticket with a fully refundable feature.
Start by giving me the city you are leaving and where you are going.
I'm leaving San Fran and going to Sacramento, CA.
What date will you need tickets?
On the 9th of March please.
well, there are 9 options, first up is 6:10 am and it will cost $69 total.
Fine set me up with one ticket. Make sure I have trip insurance though.
Sure to confirm: 1 ticket for a train Leaving San Francisco and heading to Sacramento. The train takes off on March 9th and leaves at 6:10 am. Your ticket will have a flexible feature.
Sure, tell me what stations are involved in this ticket?
Your tickets are set, You'll leave Salesforce Transit Center and will arrive at Sacramento Valley Station.
That is totally ideal.
Nice, have a safe trip.
would you kindly help me to find a train?
From which city you want to depart?
I am starting from Sacramento, CA
On which date you want to travel?
Search tickets for Wednesday next week.
To which place you are going?
I want to go LAX.
Starting at 6:30 am with ticket cost $83.
This is perfect.
Can i book the tickets?
Okay..I want to book with trip insurance and ticket should be economy class.
Number of tickets you need?
I want only one ticket.
please give confirmation details: You need a train ticket from Sacramento to Los Angeles on march march 6th at 6:30 am and it is for 1 people. Want the ticket with trip insurance and it should be a value ticket.
This is cool. Can you tell me the departing and destination station?
Your train ticket booked successfully and the train leaving from Sacramento Valley Station and arrives at Union Station.
Thanks for your great help.
Any other help you need?
No, thanks a lot.
Bye..for now..see you..
I want to go to my favorite place and I like to travel in Train. Can you find me a suitable train?
Where are going to visit?
I am planning to visit NY.
What is your current location?
I am in Chi-town and I want the Train from this place also I need two seats in it.
For which date I have to book the tickets in the Train?
Book it for 2nd of this month.
What about a Train which is leaving at 7:30 am and the cost for the same will be $229 in total.
May I know the origin station for this Train?
Yes, it will be leaving from Chicago Union Station.
Okay. Search for some other available Trains and I need to book flexible tickets.
What about the one which is going to leave at 8 am for the total cost $248? Hope this will suit for you.
Yes, I think the same. Can you help me to book the tickets and I need trip insurance also.
Please confirm to book 2 Flexible tickets including Trip insurance on the Train from Chicago on March 2nd at 8 am to New York.
That is okay to proceed. Also let me know the origin station of this train.
I have successfully booked the tickets and the train will leave from Chicago Union Station.
That is okay and thanks for your help
Anything else you need?
Nothing for now and thanks.
Have a nice Journey.
I would like to go see my dad for his birthday and need to find a train ticket to get there.
Okay, can you tell me the name of the city you are traveling to?
I will be traveling to LA, where my dad lives.
Okay, next I need to know where you will be departing from and on what date.
I will be leaving my hometown of San Francisco on the 8th of this month.
The first of 9 tickets I was able to find leaves at 6:20 am and cost $88.
Okay, I would like to book that one please.
Are you interested in purchasing travel insurance and how many tickets will you need in total?
Yes, I would like the added insurance for protection and it will just be me traveling, so one ticket is fine but can you look into a value ticket?
Okay, so far I have you booking a value ticket for 1 person, traveling from San Francisco, to Los Angeles, leaving on March 8th at 6:20 am. Does that sound right?
I'm sorry no, can you change that to a Flexible ticket instead?
No problem, I've changed that to a Flexible ticket, leaving on March 8th.
That sounds good, can you tell me which station that train departs from?
The train ticket I have just reserved for you will be leaving from Salesforce Transit Center.
Great, that was easy, thanks.
Your welcome and I look forward to helping you again.
Hi, I need to book 1 seat on a train please. The fare class doesn't matter to me.
No problem, let me just get a few details from you. Where are you leaving from, where are you going to, and on what date?
I need a train from Atlanta to Washington and that should be on March 12th.
There is a train with a 1 pm departure for a fare of $118 total.
Works for me. May I reserve that one please?
Yes. Would like to purchase travel insurance for your trip?
Yes, I think I should.
Confirming a 1 pm train from Atlanta to Washington on March 12th, for a 1 person Value ticket.
Yes, that all sounds perfect.
The reservation has been completed.
That's a big help, thank you.
How else may I assist you today?
Nothing else right now, thank you.
You're welcome. I'm happy to have been able to help you.
Could you search a locomotive for me? I need 1 seat for a conditionally refundable ticket for one headed to Anaheim, CA.
What metropolis do you intend to leave from?
I'm searching for business tickets departing from San Diego.
When do you intend to depart?
Get me tickets on March 11th.
Tickets for a train leaving at 8:30 am costs $90.
That's fine with me.
Would you like me to reserve tickets?
Yeah, I'd like to make the booking.
Would you like to get travel insurance?
I'd like to get travel insurance.
Please verify the following information: you'd like a business ticket for 1 person with travel insurance that departs from San Diego on March 11th, 8:30 am, to Anaheim.
That's fine with me.
Your tickets have been reserved.
Thank you for your assistance; that's all.
I hope to see you later.
I want to find a Train to go for a short trip. Can you help to find the suitable one?
From when and where are you leaving and to which place are you planing to visit?
I want to search for the Train from Philadelphia on 3rd of March to Atlanta.
I got details of one Train which is departing at 9:20 am under the ticket cost $171. Is this okay for you?
What are the origin and Destination stations of this train?.
The origin station is 30th Street Station and it will reach finally at Peachtree Station.
Okay, search for something else and I need three seats.
Found another one at 11:40 am for the total cost $497. Do you choose this train?
No, please find some other Train.
What about the train departing at 12:20 pm for the total cost $502?
Yes, I choose this and thanks. Now I want to find a house there to stay and I need this for one person.
What about the house located at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest with 4.3 rating? I think this will the suitable one among the 10 results that I got.
Let me check and I want to know the contact number of this house.
Please note down it as +1 404-524-5555.
Okay, This will work for me. Thanks and that's all.
Have a good day.
Can you get me train tickets from Phoenix to SF?
When are you planning to travel?
I need to travel on the 11th.
There is a train that departs at 7 am and a ticket costs $193. Would you like to consider it?
That sounds good. Can you also find a house that has laundry service for me to stay while I'm there?
Of the 10 houses available the one located at 1095 Market Street is a nice one that has a rating of 4.0.
Are there any other houses suitable for 4 people?
Of the 9 suitable houses, the one at 1100 Market Street Hotel entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street, which has a rating of 4.4, is a nice one.
That sounds like a great place to live!
Shall I reserve the house for you?
No, not now. That's all I need. Thank you.
Have a great day! Bye!
I need 1 seat on the train.
What is your departure and destination city?
I need tickets from Seattle, WA to Vancouver, BC.
On which date will you be travelling?
I need tickets for March 7th.
I have 9 options. There is a train departing at 6:20 am for a total of $55.
That one is great.
Should I book your ticket?
No, but I need a place to stay.
There are 10 options. 1018 Granville Street has a 4.2 rating.
Is there laundry service?
No, there is no laundry service.
That home sounds great. Thanks for now.
You're welcome. Goodbye.
Could you look a locomotive for me? I require 1 spot.
What metropolis do you intend to leave from?
I'm searching for tickets departing New York city.
What day would you like to depart, and to what metropolis will you head to?
Get me tickets for later today that are headed to Philly.
What do you think about the locomotive leaving at 7:40 am, which costs $54?
That's fine with me.
Would you like me to reserve tickets?
Nope, I do not intend to reserve tickets for now.
Could I assist with something else?
I'd like to look for a residence to live there.
There is a lovely residence situated at 1 Logan Square with a 4.5 rating.
That residence is lovely; that is all.
I am happy to be of assistance; Farewell.
I need a train ticket.
What date would you like to travel?
I need tickets for 1st of this month.
What City is it that you are departing from?
I want to go from Los Angeles.
Which city are you going to?
I want to go to Anaheim, CA.
OK then there are 10 trains that you could get. What about this one that departs at 6 am? It will cost $37 in total.
That sounds great, can you also find me a place to stay there.
Yes, there is a house on 1050 West Ball Road. And the rating is 4.2.
This sounds perfect to me.
Would you like me to make the reservation?
No, I don't need you to do that now.
No problem goodbye.
Would you help me in searching for a train?
To which city you want to travel and from where you want to depart and when is your travel date?
I want to depart from Anaheim and destination is SFO. The travel date is the 1st.
I found 7 trains of your choice. What is your opinion of the train departing at 6:40 am with ticket cost $83?
This is perfect.
Can i book the tickets in this train?
No, i don't want it now.
Any other help you want?
Would you kindly help me to find a house with laundry service to stay for 1 person and the rating should be 3.9 or higher.
I found one beautiful house with 3.9 rating located at 1095 Market Street.
This is a nice house. I wanted this..
Glad to help you..bye..
Hi, could you get me a Value train ticket from Sacramento, CA on the 10th of this month?
Sure, and where are you heading to?
I will need 2 seats to San Diego, please.
Would you like the train departing at 6:30 am which will cost you $273 in total?
Are there any alternatives? Would prefer one departing from SFO.
How about the train departing at 6 am which costs $164 in total?
That sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation?
No thanks, could you get me a house for 1 with a 4.5 rating or higher? Would prefer one which has laundry service!
There are 10 houses you might like, how about a 4.5 rated house at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States?
That sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
No thanks, that is all I need for now.
Sure, it is my pleasure to help you. See you again!
I am searching for a train.
From which city do you want to depart and in which city will you reach? In what date will you travel?
On March 3rd, I am starting from Sacramento to Anaheim.
I found 6 trains for you. What is your opinion about a train staring at 6:30 am? The total price is $116 in total.
It is nice.
Shall I book tickets?
Nope. I don't want to book it now. I need a house to stay there.
An excellent house is situated at 1050 West Ball Road with 4.2 rating.
Do you any other house?
An excellent house is situated at 1057 West Ball Road with 4.0 rating.
It is nice.
Shall I book a reservation for this house?
No, I don't need it now.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
I am happy to help you. Bye.
I want to go for a short trip and I need to search for a Train. Can you help me?
What is the name of the City that you are going to visit?
I am going to visit LA and I need to book the train tickets for the date 9th of March.
I will book it for your for which I need to know your starting place.
Search for the Train from SD and book tickets according to my requirement.
I got 10 Train details. one is departing at 6:10 am under cost $59 in total. Do you choose this?
Yes, this time is convenient to me. Thanks.
Shall I book the tickets now?
No, not now. Will be later. Find me a house for four persons to stay there.
What about the one house located at 1020 South Figueroa Street which is the suitable one that I think among the 10 results I got for you. This house also got rating 4.1. Do you like it?
I think so. Please search for something better.
What about the one located at 10320 West Olympic Boulevard with rating 4.1?
Let me decide, before that I want to know their phone number and als I want to know whether they have laundry service.
Yes, they have laundry service and please note down their phone number as +1 310-556-2777.
This house is okay for me and thanks for everything. That's all.
Have a nice day.
I'm taking a trip soon from Philadelphia by train and I need help finding some tickets.
What's your destination and what date are you traveling?
I'm headed to NYC on the 7th.
There are 8 trains that might work. There's a train departing at 10:40 am that's $48 for the ticket.
What station does the train leave from and arrive at?
The train leaves from the 30th Street Station and arrives at Grand Central Station.
Okay, sounds good. I'd also like to find a house to stay at there.
I found a nice house at 100 Greenwich Street that received a 4.4 rating.
Can you get me the contact number for this place?
The number is +1 917-409-0800.
The house sounds great, that's it for now.
No problem, bye.
I need to travel on a train.
What city are you departing, and arriving and on what date are you travelling?
Get me some tickets for next Wednesday from Sacramento to San Francisco.
Search revealed 10 results. There is a train leaving at 7:30 am and costs $53.
That works for me. Find me a house to stay in for 1 person that has a 4.3 rating or higher.
Search revealed a house at 1100 Market Street Hotel entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street that has a 4.3 rating.
That works. That is all for now.
Have a great day.
I would like to take the train on the 2nd of this month.
Which city are you departing from and reaching?
I will be departing from Washington and traveling to Philly.
There is a train departing at 6 am for $61.
Which station does this train reach?
The destination is 30th Street Station.
Is there any other train available?
There is one leaving at 7:20 am and the cost is $50.
Is there another train available?
There is a train leaving at 8 am and the cost is $56.
I would like to rent a house that is 3.9 rating or higher.
There is a house located at 1 Logan Square that has a 3.9 rating.
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a train. Can you help?
Sure, but first please tell me your destination.
My destination is San Francisco.
Perfect, now tell me when and from where are you departing.
I'll be travelling on the 11th from LAX.
There's a train with tickets costing $86 departing at 7:50 am.
Can you please tell me the departure and destination stations?
Sure, it departs from Union Station, arriving at Salesforce Transit Center.
Sounds perfect. Now lets find a house to stay for three people at destination, with laundry service, rated at least 3.8.
I found a very nice house at 1095 Market Street, rated at 3.8.
Sounds perfect.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you?
No, not at this time.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, not at the moment. Thanks for everything.
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
I need to find a train
What is the day of the trip?
I have to travel on the 2nd of this month
What is the city of departure? What is the destination?
I leave Sacramento, CA and I have to go to LAX
There's a train at 6:30 am which costs $94
What is the station of departure and which one of arrival?
It leaves from Sacramento Valley Station. The arrival station is Union Station
Ok, It's fine for me!
Do you want to buy the ticket?
Not now. I would like to find a home there
At 1020 South Figueroa Street there's a nice house with rating of 4.1
Oh, it's perfect for me!
Do you want to book the house immediately?
No, it's all for now, thanks.
It's a pleasure helping you. Have a good day
I need help getting 1 ticket for a train leaving Philadelphia on the 8th.
Where are you headed?
I'm going to NYC.
There are 8 choices, first up is a 10:40 am. The price on the ticket is $43.
What about a later option?
If you take the 10:50 am train it will cost $52.
Why don't you offer a luxurious ticket option?
A more expensive train is the 12:20 pm. It costs $84.
I appreciate your options.
How about a ticket?
No, maybe later.
What more might you want?
Get me a nice house with laundry facilities. It needs to be 3.9 rating or higher.
You could try 100 Greenwich Street. It is rated 3.9.
Fine, I'll consider that. I have enough now.
I live to serve.
I need a train ticket.
Where are you traveling from and to, and when?
I would like to travel from Sacramento to Fresno, CA on March 8th.
There is a train leaving at 8 am for $69.
That is perfect.
Do you want to buy the ticket?
Not yet, but I need a place to stay.
There are 4 available houses including one with rating 3.8 at 1055 Van Ness Avenue.
That is perfect.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Not at this time.
See you soon!
Would you be able to find me a train?
Can you tell me the date that you will be having your trip, and the city which is you destination?
I am interested in tickets for March 10th to arrive in Phoenix.
Can you tell me the city from where you will start your trip?
I will be leaving for my journey from Fresno, CA.
I found 4 trains which you might consider. One of the trains which you might one to have departs at 6 am with it's ticket costing $174.
That seems nice to me.
Are you willing to have tickets booked?
No, I do not want to buy the tickets at this moment.
Is there something else I can do to help you?
I would like to find a houre where I can stay there
I found 10 houses which you can have according to your search. One of the good houses with a rating of 4.6 is 10 East Thomas Road.
This house seems as a good option. That would be all.
I enjoy helping you. Later!
I need a train ticket, I want to go to Sacramento from Anaheim, CA.
Do you know what day you want to leave?
I need seats for the 5th of March.
I have a list of 10 trains that fit your requirements, how about one for $132 that leaves at 6:50 am?
Where would I be leaving from and getting to?
You would end up at Sacramento Valley Station after leaving from Anaheim intermodal Center.
I like that one.
Should I reserve you a seat?
No, not just yet, I also want to locate a house there so I have a place to stay.
I found one rated 4.4, the address is 100 Capitol Mall.
That house would be wonderful.
Can I help you more?
No thanks for what you've done though.
I was happy to do so goodbye.
Could you find me one seat on a train?
Where are you going to and leaving from and on what date would you like to travel?
I'd like 2 seats from Portland going to Vancouver, BC on the 6th of March.
There are 7 trains that would potentially work. How does a train leaving at 7:40 am that costs $139 sound?
Where is it leaving from and where will it arrive at?
It's leaving from Union Station and will arrive at Pacific Central Station.
Are there other options going to Seattle?
There are 9 trains that might work. How about one leaving at 9:10 am that costs $105?
That would be great.
Would you like to book tickets?
No, not now. I'd like to find a house to stay at there.
There are 10 available. There's a nice one at 1000 1st Avenue with a 4.5 rating.
That would be great. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
I need a train arriving in Sacramento, CA under any class of ticket.
What is your departing city and departure date?
I am departing SD on the 8th of March.
There is a train leaving 6:10 am with a total cost of $145.
What is the departure station?
The departure station is Santa Fe Depot.
What is the arrival station?
The arrival station is Sacramento Valley Station.
That works for me. I need a house to stay in there too.
100 Capitol Mall has a 4.4 rating.
That is perfect. I don't need anything else right now.
I am glad that I could help you. Have a great day.
Can you find me a train headed to Philadelphia on the 4th of March?
Sure, where do you depart from?
I'll be coming from Washington
There's a $54 train that leaves at 6 am
That sounds awesome!
Do you want me to book you tickets?
No not right now, but I need to find a house with laundry service
There's a 4.5 rated place on 1 Logan Square
That's a great house!
Do you want to reserve it now?
No not right now, thanks for everything
Sure, update me!
Find me a train.
Whats the travel date, city of travel, and city of departure?
Looking for trains from Philadelphia to New York on 1st of March
There are 8 trains, One leaving at 10:40 am and costs $48.
Any other options?
Another one leaving at 10:50 am and costs $44.
Thats good, Find me a house to there.
There are 10 houses and there is a 4.4 rated at 100 Greenwich Street
Is there a Laundry Service and the contact number for it.
Yes, it has a Laundry service and the contact number is +1 917-409-0800
sounds great, thats all!
Its my pleasure, bye!
I am looking for a train.
What is date and city of your departure and your destination?
I will be leaving from LAX to SFO on Sunday this week.
What do you think of a train departing at 7:50 am with total cost $99?
Can you tell me the names of arrival and departure stations?
The train will depart from Union station and will arrive at Salesforce Transit Center.
The train sounds good to me. Can you find me a house for one people with 4.2 or higher ratings there?
I found 10 houses suitable to your choice. How about a nice house with 4.2 rating located at 1100 Market Street Hotel entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street?
That house sounds good to me.
Do you want me to make a reservation for this house?
No, Not now. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Bye!
I want to go to SD and I need 2 seats..Find me please a train.
In what date you want to travel?
March 9th will be good for me.
From which city will you depart?
From Anaheim I will depart.
7 option may work for you.What do you think about the train that go at 6:30 am and cost $82 in total?
At which station will arrive and leave?
The train will leave from Anaheim Intermodal Center and arrive at Santa Fe Depot.
Sounds very good.Find me a house there for 1 people with laundry service.
I found 10 options according to your requirements.A nice house located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States with rating 4.6.
This house sounds very good.
You want to meke a reservation?
No.Not now.That's all!
Happy to help.Bye!
I need train tickets on the 14th of this month.
Where do you need to go?
I want to be in SFO.
Where did you want to leave from?
I would like economy seating out of San Diego
I found one for $109 that leaves at 6:40 am what do you think?
What stations are involved?
You would be departing from Santa Fe Depot and would end up at Salesforce Transit Center.
That will do, I also need to find somewhere to stay, a house rated 3.9 or more with laundry service available for 1.
This one sounds right it has a 3.9 rating and can be found on 1095 Market Street.
That will work, you can go now.
I have enjoyed being of service, bye bye.
I am looking for a train.
What is the destination, date and the city of your departure?
I will be leaving from San Francisco to Sacramento, CA today.
How about a train departing at 6:10 am with the ticket price of $42?
That sounds nice to me.
Would you like me to book tickets for you?
No, not now. Maybe later.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I am looking for a house with laundry service and rating of 4.1 or higher.
I found 10 houses that might interest you. How about a house with 4.1 rating located at 100 Capitol Mall?
That house sounds great to me. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Bye!
Locate the train schedule, I would like to get details to catch a train to Fresno, CA.
Sure thing. Which city would you like to depart from?
I would really like to leave from San Diego.
Ok, and which date were you thinking?
How about Tuesday next week? Also please make sure the tickets are conditionally refundable.
I show a ticket for $85 departing at 6:50 am. Would that work?
That would be good.
Should we book now?
No! I was just looking for information.
Oh ok. Is there anything else I could help with?
Locate a house that has laundry service available while i'm there.
I've located a great recommendation located at 1055 Van Ness Avenue, with a average rating of 3.8.
That could work out great. Thanks for looking it up. That will be all for now.
It was my pleasure to help you out today. Good Bye!
Could you find me a train?
For what date, and what's your destination?
I want to go to Anaheim, CA thursday next week.
Where are you departing from?
San Francisco.
I have 7 options. How about this one leaving at 7:10 am for $94.
Where does it depart from and arrive at?
It departs from the salesforce transit center and arrives at the Anaheim intermodal center.
That sounds good.
Do you want to book tickets?
No but i'd like to find a house with a rating of 4.3 or higher to stay in.
I have 10 options. How about this one at 1160 west ball road with a rating of 4.3.
Do you have anything else, with at least a 4.2 rating?
I have 9 options. How about 1050 west ball road with a rating of 4.2
SOunds good, i'm all set.
Hope you have a great day.
Can you help me find one economy train ticket
Sure, where are you coming from?
I'm leaving Anaheim, CA
When do you want to leave
I want to leave on the 2nd please
And heading to which city?
I'll be going to Phoenix, AZ
I found 4 trains including a 6:30 am train for $123
Where does it leave and come from?
It leaves from Anaheim Intermodal Center and arrives at Phoenix Union Station
That's great, now find me a house to stay in
I found 1 4.6 rated place at 10 East Thomas Road!
OK that's all the info I need for now, thanks
Sure thing, let me know if I can help later!
Can you help me find a train out of Philly on the 8th of this month? I really need tickets at a good Value.
No problem. What city will you be traveling to?
I'm headed to Atlanta.
Okay, I've found 5 trains that could work for you. There is a train departing at 9:20 am. Tickets will be $158. Is this okay?
Yeah, that sounds good.
Would you like for me to order your tickets?
No, not right now. Maybe later.
Okay. Anything else I can help you with today?
Yeah. Can you help me find a house to stay at for two out there? I need something rated at least 3.7 or higher.
I've found 10 houses that match your search. There is a nice house rated at 3.7 located at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest. Sound good?
Yes! That house sounds great.
Would you like to make a reservation?
No, gathering info right now. That's all I need for today. Thanks.
My pleasure. Bye!
I need a hand today, I nned to buy train tickets from sacramento, I need 1 seat and I don't care the fare class of it.
when were you thinking to leave and which city do you need to reach by train?
I need to be in san francisco and the tickets must be dated 11th of march
I've looked at the timetables for you and there's a train departing at 7:30 am and it will cost you $45
tell me the next one
there's one train at 8:10 am and the ticket costs $45
can you tell me the name of the final station?
yes, it's salesforce transit center
it can work out.
great! May I assist you in another procedure?
yes, you can find a house there
there's this house in 1095 market street and it's rated 4.0
I like it. I don't need you any longer.
glad I could have helped you. have a great one
I want to find a train leaving form Phoenix.
What city are you traveling to?
I'm going to Fresno, CA.
When do you want to leave?
I want to leave on the 6th.
I found 4 trains. There's a train departing at 7:20 am for $172.
Are there any other trains? I need four seats.
I found 2 trains you might like. There's a train departing at 8:30 am that costs $643.
Any other trains?
There's a train departing at 9:40 am that costs $651.
Great. I want to find a house to stay in there for one person. I want to find something with laundry service and a rating of 3.9 or higher.
There's a house located at 2233 Ventura Street with a 3.9 rating.
That sounds wonderful.
Do you want to reserve the house now?
No, not right now. That's all.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a train. I need two seats from Portland going to Seattle.
When are you wanting to travel?
Please find tickets for the 5th of this month.
How about a train leaving at 9:10 am that costs $99?
Where is it leaving from and where will it arrive at?
It's leaving from Union Station and will arrive at King Street Station.
That would be great. I'd like to find a house to stay at there.
How about a house located at 1000 1st Avenue that has a 4.5 rating.
What other houses are there?
There's a house at 1006 Spring Street with a 3.9 rating.
That would be great.
Would you like to reserve it?
No, I don't want to now. That's all.
It was my pleasure to be of assistance. Have a great day!
Could you search a locomotive for me?
What metropolis will you head to, what day do you intend to leave, and what metropolis do you intend to leave from?
I'm searching for tickets leaving Portland, OR on the 2nd of this month that is headed to Vancouver, BC.
There are 7 suitable locomotives. What do you think about the locomotive leaving at 7:40 am, which has a price of $84?
What station does it come to, and which one does it depart from?
The locomotive is departing the Union Station and will come to Pacific Central Station.
That's fine. I'd like to search for a resident to live there, one for two people and a rating of 4.2 or greater.
There is a lovely residence located at 1018 Granville Street with a 4.2 rating.
The residence is lovely.
Do you wish for me to book the residence?
Nah, I do not wish to do that right now.
Could I assist with something else?
No, thank you for your assistance.
I am happy to be of service. Farewell.
Can you find me a train ticket from Fresno, CA for the 14th of this month? I will need tickets for one seat.
No problem. What city will you be traveling to?
I want to get a Business class ticket headed to Los Angeles.
Okay, there are 9 trains that could work for you. There is a train leaving at 7:20 am with a ticket price of $114 total. Sound good?
No, that won't work for me. Can you find anything else? I'm headed from SD to Anaheim.
How about the train departing at 8:30 am? The ticket will cost you $90 total.
Okay, that sounds great.
Would you like to book your ticket today?
No not right now. Can you help me find a house to stay out there? I need a room for 4 people. Can you find something rated 4.4 or higher? I also need laundry service.
Sure thing. There is a nice house located at 1160 West Ball Road that is rated at 4.4.
Okay, that sounds great.
Would you like to make a reservation?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thanks. That's all for now.
My pleasure. Bye!
I'm looking for train tickets.
When are you traveling and where are you traveling to?
I'm traveling on March 12th to LAX.
Where are you departing from?
I'm departing from San Diego.
There is a train departing at 6:10 am for $60, does that work?
What station does the train arrive at?
The train arrive at Union Station.
What station does it depart from?
The train departs from Santa Fe Depot.
Okay, that sounds good.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
No, not right now. I'd like to find a house to stay at.
How about a house at 1020 South Figueroa Street with a 4.1 rating?
Yes, that sounds great. That is all I need.
Have a great day.
I need 1 train ticket to travel from SD to Phoenix.
When are you traveling?
I want to go on the 11th of March.
There are 5 trains including one departing at 11:20 am with an $86 ticket.
Which stations does it depart from and arrive to?
The train leaves from Santa Fe Depot and arrives at Phoenix Union Station.
That is perfect.
Do you want to book the ticket?
Not at this time.
May I further assist you?
I need a place to stay.
There are 10 houses including a 4.6 rated house at 10 East Thomas Road.
That is good.
Do you want to reserve it?
Not at this time.
See you soon!
I need to find train tickets going to Phoenix, AZ to San Diego, can you help?
When would you like to travel?
I want to travel on the 6th of March.
I have found 5 results including a train that costs $80 and leaves at 11:20 am.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to make reservations?
No. Not at this time. Can you find me a house to stay at while I am there.
Yes. There is one with a 4.6 rating located at 10 East Thomas Road.
That's great, I am all set.
My pleasure. Goodbye.
I need help finding a train.
No problem! What city are you traveling to? What city are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Fresno, CA, and I'm traveling to San Diego.
Great! What date would you like to leave?
Actually, I need to depart from Anaheim. Can I get tickets leaving on the 9th of this month?
No problem! There's a train leaving at 6:30 am that costs $48. How does that sound?
That's great! Now I need to find a house to stay in. It must have laundry service.
Can do! I recommend a house located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States. It has a rating of 4.6.
That's great! That's all I need.
Bye!
I need to get a train ticket.
Can you tell me which city you will be going to and when you want to travel.
I want to go from SFO later today. I will be going to Fresno.
I have a train that will depart at 6:20 am and it costs $62.
Is there anything else I could get? I need one seat.
What about this one at 4 pm. It costs $70.
That sounds like the best option.
Would you like me to book the tickets?
No. I don't need that right this minute.
Can I help with something else then?
I need a house to stay there.
I have 4 places you might like, but this one at 1055 Van Ness Avenue is rated 3.8.
Does it have a laundry service?
Yes, it does have that.
That sounds perfect then, that will be all.
No, problem enjoy your trip.
I would like to buy a train ticket.
Which date would you like to travel and where are you traveling?
I'm going to San Diego on the 14th of this month.
Which city are you departing from?
I'm departing from Sacramento.
There is a train departing at 6:30 am for $155.
Which station does it leave from and arrive at?
It leaves from Sacramento Valley Station and the destination is Santa Fe Depot.
Is there another train available?
There is one departing at 7:20 am for $157.
Is there another train leaving from SF?
There is a train leaving at 6 am and the cost is $104.
Yes, I would like to find a house for two people and the rating needs to be 4.3 or higher.
There is a house located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States and the rating is 4.3.
Yes, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I want to go to LAX and i need you to buy me Flexible tickets at a train.
In what date you want to be?
Wednesday next week will be okay.
The depart will be from which city?
From San Diego I need 2 seats.
I have for you 10 option.What do you think about a train that departs at 6:10 am and cost $132 in total?
Sounds great.Find me a house to stay there for 2 people.
I have 10 option that you may like.First is a nice house located at 1020 South Figueroa Street with rating 4.1.
Sounds really good this house.That was all that I needed.
Happy to help.Bye!
Can you help me find tickets for a train headed from Lax to Phoenix, Az?
Sure thing. What is your travel date?
I need tickets for this Sunday.
Okay. There is a train departing at 6:30 am with a ticket price of $86. How does this sound?
Can you tell me the names of the stations the train will be departing and arriving at?
The train will depart from Union station and will be arriving at Phoenix Union Station.
Are there any other trains? Can you find something going to Anaheim, CA?
I've found 9 trains going to that destination. There is a train departing at 6 am with a ticket price of $36. Is this okay?
Sure, that sounds great.
Would you like to book tickets now?
No, not yet.
Okay. Anything else I can help you with?
Can you find me a house to stay in while I'm out there?
No problem. I've found 10 houses for you. How about the one located at 1050 West Ball Road. It's rated at 4.2 stars.
Okay, that sounds great! Thanks, that will be all for today.
My pleasure. Bye!
I would like a train ticket, 1 seat from Los Angeles to Anaheim, Ca.
When would you like to travel?
I would like to leave on Tuesday next week.
There is a train departing at 6 am for $34.
I'm looking for a train from Fresno.
There is one leaving at 7 am for $74.
That one sounds good.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
No, I would like to find a house to rent.
There is a house located at 1050 West Ball Road that has a 4.2 rating.
That house sounds good.
Would you like to reserve this house?
No, I just needed the information for now.
Have a good day.
Can you help me find a train going to san fran? I need one value seat
What date are you leaving and where are you coming from?
I want to leave Fresno, CA on March 9th
Sure thing, there are 7 trains including a $64 train that leaves at 6:50 am
That's cool, find me a house to stay there for two people while we're at it
How about this 4.0 rated place at 1095 Market Street
Do they have laundry service? Can I also get their number?
They do have laundry, and it's +1 415-829-0000
The house is good, thanks for now, that's it
OK, glad I could help, see you!
Think you could find me a train for a trip I'm going to be taking soon?
I think so. In which city would you like to catch the train?
I'm looking for tickets to a train that leaves from Fresno, CA.
On which date would you like to travel?
Uh, on Saturday this week.
Okay. And which city would you like to be the destination?
I need to get to San Diego.
I've found 7 trains that could work for what you need. How about a train that departs at 6 am and costs $93 in total?
Works for me. Can you also find me somewhere to stay there? Preferably a house.
There are at least 10 houses available that I can find. Would a house with a rating of 4.6 located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla California 92037, United States work?
Sounds great to me. That will be all for now.
Okay. Let me know if you need anything further, and good bye.
I am having a plan to go for a short trip and I need a Train for me and I need to book 2 seats on March 4th.
That is easy to find. Which City are you planning to travel?
I am planning to visit SD.
From which City you are going to depart?
Please search for the Train in Sacramento, CA from where I am planning to depart.
I got one Train which is going to depart at 6:30 am and the cost for the tickets will be $296 in total. What about your opinion?
Search for some other Trains as I need to book luxurious tickets and please search for the destination Fresno.
How about your convenience to travel in the Train departing at 8 am under cost $205 in total?
Yes, it seems okay to me. I want to stay there for a while and I need one house there for one person and the house should have laundry service and rating 3.9 or higher.
I got 2 house details among which one house located at 2233 Ventura Street is the good one with rating 3.9. How about your opinion?
Yes, that is okay and thanks for everything.
Have a good day.
Can you please find me a train? I need one seat on the 11th to Fresno.
What city do you want to depart from?
I am looking for tickets from San Francisco.
There are 8 trains that may work. I found one departing at 6:20 am that costs $63 total.
What station does it depart from and which one does it arrive at?
The train is leaving from the Salesforce Transit Center and arrives at Fresno Station.
That sounds good.
Shall I book the ticket?
No thank you, not now.
Is there anything else that I can help with?
I would like to find a house to stay there for 4 people that offers laundry service. The rating needs to be 3.9 or higher.
There is a nice house located at 2233 Ventura Street with a rating of 3.9.
This house is great. Thanks, that is all I need.
It's been my pleasure to help you. Good bye.
Could you find me a train please?
Where are you wanting to go?
I'd like to find business tickets for the 3rd to Anaheim, CA.
Where are you leaving from?
I'd like to find tickets from Sacramento, CA.
How about a train leaving at 6:30 am? It costs $156.
Where is it leaving from?
The train will be leaving from Sacramento Valley Station.
That would be great. I'd like to find a house to stay at there.
There's a nice house with a 4.2 rating at 1050 West Ball Road.
Are there other houses to choose from?
There's a house with a 4.0 at 1057 West Ball Road.
That would be great.
Would you like to reserve the house?
No, I don't want to right now. That's all for now.
I'm glad I could be of help. Have a great day!
I need help finding a train please.
Sure, what city are you traveling to?
I'm headed to Philly.
Wich city are you leaving from and on what day?
I'll be leaving from NYC on the 10th of this month. Oh and I'll need three seats.
I found 7 trains that may suffice. There's one that costs $125 and departs at 7:50 am.
Sounds fine. Can you find me a house to stay at when I arrive with a rating of 3.9 or higher with laundry service?
There's a house with a 3.9 rating at 1 Logan Square.
What else is there?
There's one with a 3.9 rating at 1001 Intrepid Avenue.
That's great, thanks.
Shall I make you a reservation.
Nope, not yet. That's all for now.
Great, happy to help!
Can you help me find a train please
When are you leaving?
I plan to leave on the 14th of this month heading to Chicago and there will be 2 of us
What city are you coming from?
I'll be coming from New York
There are 6 trains that work including a 6 am train for $243
That's cool, now find me a house to stay in
There are 10 places that fit, including a 4.4 rated place along 1 South Franklin Street
Can I get a phone number for that place
Sure, it's +1 312-558-1020
That's a great place
Do you want to reserve it then?
For now it's fine
Can I assist with something else?
No for now we're all set
OK then, have a great day glad I could help
I need to find a train.
Which city will you be departing from and on which date?
I need ticket from Anaheim, CA for the 14th.
What is your destination?
Headed to LAX.
There is a train departing at 6:30 am for a total of $32.
Do you have any other conditionally refundable options for one passenger.
There is a train departing at 6:40 am for a total of $36.
Okay, sounds good. I also need a home to stay at.
There is a home located at 1020 South Figueroa Street with a rating of 4.1.
That one sounds good.
Would you like me to reserve it?
Not at this moment. That will be all.
Okay, Have a great day! Goodbye.
Hi, i need a help, could you find me a train?
Sure, i will help you, Please tell me What date do you want to travel, where are you going to and where are you going from?
I am going to vancouver, BC from Seattle, i need tickets for this Sunday.
Okay, i have found 9 trains for you, what about the train departing at 6:20 am and it costs $58 in total?
Okay, Could you find another train for me?, i don't care about the fare class.
Okay, i have found a train for you, the train departing at 6:40 am and it costs $58 in total.
It seems good to me. I need to find a house to stay there
Okay, I have found 10 houses for you, one of the best house is located at 1000 1st Avenue and the rating is 4.5
Okay, Please give me their contact number, Does this place have laundry service?
Their phone number is +1 206-957-1000, This place has laundry service.
Okay, could you find another house for me?
Okay, there is a nice house located at 1006 Spring Street and the rating is 3.9
Okay, it is seems good to me.Thank you,
You are welcome, have a great day.
Get me economy premium train tickets from Anaheim
which city are you going?
Going from Sacramento to Phoenix, AZ on March 8th
There is a train departing at 6:30 am and costs $203
whats the arrival and departure station?
Its leaving from Sacramento Valley station to Phoenix Union station
great, find me a house for 3 people rated 4.6 or higher
there are 5 houses of which 10 east thomas road is ratde 4.6
find me a house for two people rated 4.2 or higher
there are 9 houses, of which there is one located at 10601 North 56th Street, Scottsdale, Arizona 85254, united states and is rated 4.2
that is great
it is my pleasure
I'd like to find a train going from Portland, OR with flexible tickets.
What's your destination, and when are you travelling?
The 1st of this month, heading to seattle, WA
I have 9 options. How about this one leaving at 9:10 am for $80.
Sounds good, can I find a house there?
There's 10 houses available. How about 1000 1st avenue, rated 4.5?
Do they have laundry?
Yes.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a good day!
I want to find a train, any fare class will do
Where are you leaving from and what date?
I want a ticket from Seattle on the 12th
Sure, where are you heading?
I'm gonna make my way to Portland
There are 10 trains that would work for you, so how about this 8 am train that costs $67?
That's good for me, now help me find a house to stay in
There are 10 houses I found, and one is rated 4.1 and it's at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street.
That's awesome, that's it for me right now
Sure, glad I could be of help
Can you find me some tickets for a train departing from New York?
Sure, but first I'll need to know some more information. In which city would you like to travel to, and on which date?
Find me tickets to Chi-town for Wednesday next week.
I've found 6 trains that could work for you. What about a train that costs $112 in total and departs at 6 am.
That will work for me.
Would you like me to book a ticket for you?
No, I'm not looking to book right now, but I would like to find a house to stay at while I'm there. I would like it if it had a rating of 4.3 or higher.
I've found 10 houses that match your search. How about a house with a rating of 4.3 located at 1 South Franklin Street?
Sounds great to me. That will be all I need for now. I'll let you know of I need anything else.
Okay. Enjoy the rest of your day, and good bye.
Please find me train tickets for the 13th.
Sure. Please tell me your origin and destination cities.
Please search for tickets from NYC to ATL.
Your search has yielded 7 suitable trains. There's a train leaving at 7:20 am and the total cost is $190.
The origin and destination stations, please?
The train leaves from Grand Central Station, destined for Peachtree Station.
That would work.
Should I go ahead and reserve tickets?
No, I don't want to by ticket at the moment. Please find me a house to stay there.
I have found 10 nice houses that might interest you, among them at 4.3 rated house at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest.
This house sounds good.
Should I go ahead and reserve this house?
No, At the moment, I don't want to. That will be all.
Glad to have been of service. Bye.
Can you find me a train please
Sure, when are you travelling and where are you leaving from?
I want to leave NY on the 5th of March
OK and headed where?
I need 1 flexible seat going to Philly
I found 8 trains including a 7:40 am train that will cost you $66
What else did you find?
I also found a 7:50 am train for $69
That sounds good to me
Do you want tickets then?
No not yet, but I do need to find a house to stay in for 1 person with laundry and a 3.9 rating or higher
How about this place at 1 Logan Square which has a 3.9 rating
That sounds good
Do you want to book it?
No, not as of yet, that's it
Thanks then, take care
I would like 4 train tickets on business class from Portland, OR.
When would you like to travel and where are you heading to?
I will be going to Seattle, WA on the 5th.
There is a train leaving at 9:10 am that costs $339.
That would be great. I would need a house to stay in when I get there.
There are 10 options available. There is a lovely house located at 1000 1st Avenue that has a rating of 4.5
I don't want to stay there. Is there anything else that is 4.4 or higher that has laundry service available?
There are 9 such houses available. There is a lovely house on 1007 1st Avenue that has a rating of 4.4
That house would be fine.
You would like to reserve it?
Not at this time. That would be all.
Take care of yourself.
Will you find me a train with tickets from Los Angeles that are flexible and for tomorrow?
What city are you travelling to?
I'm headed to San Francisco.
There would be 8 trains that would work. What do you think about the train leaving at 7:50 am for $106 in total.
Would there be any other trains that work. I need 1 seat.
There would be 7 trains that work. What do you think about the one leaving at 9:20 am costing $120 total.
What station does it leave from?
The train leaves from Union Station.
Would there be any other trains that work?
What about the train leaving at 11 am costing $113 total?
That is good. I'd like to find a house to stay there with 1 person needing laundry service and rated 4.5 or higher?
There's a nice house rated 4.5 at 138 King Street.
That house is good.
What else can I do for you?
No that is all and thanks for the help.
It's been my pleasure helping you. Goodbye.
I need to take a train trip.
What is your departure and arrival city and what date are you travelling?
I want to leave Sacramento, CA next Friday and go to SD.
There is a train leaving at 6:30 am with a ticket price of $149.
That works for me.
Shall I order you tickets now?
No, not right now. I need a house to stay in for one person, with a 4.4 rating or higher and that has laundry service.
Search revealed 10 results. What about 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States with a 4.4 rating?
What is their phone number?
You can reach them at +1 858-224-7600.
That is perfect. I don't need any more help right now.
Have a good day.
Can you find me a train from Philly to NYC
What date are you gonna do that?
I wanna leave Tuesday next week
There's a 10:40 am train that'll run you $53
Where does it leave from?
It leaves from 30th Street Station
And it arrives where?
It will arrive at Grand Central Station
That sounds perfect
Do you want tickets for that?
Right now not yet, but I do need a house to stay in
There's a place along 100 Greenwich Street with a 4.4 rating
That sounds really good
Can I do anything else at the moment
No that's it for now
Sure thing, take care!
I need an economy train ticket for March 14th to Phoenix, AZ.
Where will you be departing from?
I'll be departing from Los Angeles.
I have 5 trains that match. What do you think about a 6:30 am departure? It is $88.
What are the departure and arrival stations?
The departure is from Union Station and the arrival is at Phoenix Union Station.
I like the sound of that.
What else can I do for you?
I'll need a house to stay in. I want a 4.2 or higher rating. And it's just for 1 person.
There's a 4.2 rated house at 10 East Thomas Road.
That house will work. I don't need any more help.
It's been great helping you, take care.
I need to find a train please
Sure, where are you coming from and on what date?
I want to leave Fresno, CA on the 2nd of March
Where are you going again?
I am heading to LA
What about the 7:20 am train, it'll be $77 for that one
What stations does it leave and arrive at?
It leaves Fresno Station and arrives at Union Station
What other trains will work?
How about the 7:40 am that's $69
That's good, I want to also find a house for two people with laundry service with a 3.7 rating or highter
1020 South Figueroa Street has a 3.7 rating and the rest of your requests
OK, give me their number please
Sure, it's +1 213-748-1291
That house looks good, thanks for now
Alright ,see you!
I need your help finding a one way flight. I only need one ticket and I would like it to be an economy ticket.
I can help you with that but first i'll need to know a few things. Where would you like to go, from which city would you like to depart from, and on which date would you like to trave?
I want to travel on the 4th to Chi-town from NYC.
Would you be interested in an American Airlines flight that takes off at 11:20 am with a ticket price of $180? The flight also has a layover.
That is fine. I'll keep it in mind but I want to check out the options for trains as well.
Would you still like to leave on March 4th?
No, on Tuesday next week.
There are 6 trains that meet your criteria. How about a train that departs at 6 am and costs $122?
What else is there? I want a ticket for the 4th and anything will work I don't care about the fare class.
There are 5 trains that could work for you. How about one that departs at 6:10 am and costs $114?
That sounds great, not too expensive. I like a good train trip too.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes let me buy a ticket. Get me trip insurance too.
You would like 1 value ticket for a train from New York to Chicago on March 4th at 6:10 am. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct. Can you tell which station the train leaves from?
The ticket has been purchased. The train will leave from Grand Central Station.
And which station will it arrive at?
The train will arrive at the Chicago Union Station.
Great. You were very helpful, thanks. That will be all.
You're welcome. Good Bye.
Can you help me find a train ticket from Anaheim for one on the 14th of this month?
Which city were you going to?
I'm traveling to Phoenix, Az.
I found 4 trains for you. One leaves at 6:30 am and costs $112.
That sounds good. I'd like to book train tickets with trip insurance and fare class doesn't matter to me.
Please confirm you're booking a value ticket for 1 on the train from Anaheim to Phoenix leaving March 14th at 6:30 am.
That works for me. What is the destination station?
Your tickets have been booked. The train will arrive at Phoenix Union Station.
Thank you for your help. I'd also like to find something interesting to do there on 14th of this month and I really like Concert.
Dodie is a very popular event taking place at The Van Buren on March 14th starting 5:30 pm.
How much will one ticket be?
One ticket will be $55.
That works. Could you help share the location?
Who did you want to share it with?
I'd like to share it with Noah.
Please confirm you're sharing the location The Van Buren with Noah.
That is correct.
The location has been shared.
Thanks, that was very helpful. That will be all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Can you help me find a train?
No problem. Just let me know the date you wish to travel, your destination and where you are departing from.
I'm traveling to San Francisco from Phoenix, AZ. I'll need tickets for the 13th of this month.
Okay, I have located 5 trains that match your search. Would you like to take the 7 am train? The ticket will be $190 total.
No, that one won't work. What other trains do you have?
Okay, there is another train departing at 7:20 am. The tickets are $194 total.
Nah, that won't work either. What else can you find?
How about the 8:30 am train? Tickets for this train are $187.
Can you tell me what station this train is leaving from as well as the name of the station it will arrive at?
No problem. The train will depart from Salesforce Transit Center and will arrive at Phoenix Union Station.
Okay, thanks. That train sounds good.
Would you like to book your tickets now?
Yeah, can you reserve a seat for one for me. I'd also like to order insurance for the trip as well.
Okay, please confirm the following details. You would like to purchase 1 value ticket for the train leaving from Phoenix to San Francisco on March 13th at 8:30 am.
No, I want to order Flexible tickets.
Okay, please confirm the following. For the train leaving from Phoenix you would like to order a Flexible ticket. Correct?
Yeah, that's correct.
Okay, your ticket was booked successfully.
Okay, thanks for your help. Could you also help me find something interesting to do in the area that day?
Sure thing. Do you have anything particular in mind? You can say something like Music, Theater or anything else you enjoy.
I'd really to see something on Broadway.
Okay, I've 10 events that may interest you. How about Above Ground at the Mojo Theatre? I hear it's very popular. The event starts at 5 pm on March 6th.
Cool. Where is the venue?
The venue is at 2940 16th Street #217.
Okay, how much would a ticket cost me?
A ticket would cost you $35.
Okay that sounds great. Can you share the location with Edward for me?
No problem, just confirm the following for me. Sharing the location of Mojo Theatre with Edward. Correct?
Yup, sounds good to me.
Okay, the location has been shared successfully.
Okay, thanks a lot. You've been a great help.
Anything else I can do for you today?
Nope. That's all. Thanks a ton.
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
Can you locate me a train?
What city are going traveling to and depart from?
I am traveling from San Fran and going to Fresno
When would you like to travel
Please find me ticket for march 6th
What about ticket for $56 departing at 6:20 am
that is perfect
Would you like me to book the ticket for you
Yes please make the reservation for me
Do you require travel insurance? Also for how many ticket do you need
I need one ticket with trip insurance
Please confirm your booking for 1 value ticket departing on march 6th at 6:20 am from San Francisco to Fresno
This is perfect
Your ticket is booked
thank you very much for your help
what else can i do for you
i also want to find something fun to do
What would you like me to search? you can say music or theater
I like to go to broadway
what about The government inspector at california arts academy on march 8th at 6:30 pm
thats great for me
would you like me to purchase the ticket
Not yet, but can you share the location with laura for me
please confirm you want me to share california arts academy with laura
No i actually want to share with larry
Please confirm to share location california arts academy with larry
yes that is correct
your location is now sharing with larry
thank you for your help
what else can i do for you
no that is all i need
have a great day
I need 1 train ticket, departing from Portland and going to Seattle please.
What day are you departing?
I will be leaving the 10th of March.
I have located 9 tickets, did you want to leave at 9:10 am for $64?
What other times do you have available?
how about a ticket for 10:10 am for $61?
What is the departure station?
The train departs from Union Station.
And to what station will the trin arrived to?
The train we go to King Street Station.
Great, that sounds like a go.
Did you want me to purchased the tickets?
Yes would you please?
Sure, did you need travel insurance?
Yes, I will defintely want trip insurance.
That will be 1 value train ticket from Portland to Seattle. The train will depart on March 10th at 10:10 am. Does this sound correct to you?
Yes, that is all perfect.
Great! your ticket has been successfully
Thank you. Can you look up some interesting events I can attend while in Seattle.
Sure, do you like music or theater?
Yes, I love Broadway!
I have located 10 events you may enjoy. How about Beatleconcert at 12th Avenue Arts on March 10th at 5 pm?
What else do you have?
How about Blood Water Paint. This also will be held at 12th Avenue Arts. This event takes place March 2nd at 6 pm.
That sounds like a plan, can you please send the location to Kyle for me?
Sure I can send 12th Avenue Arts to Kyle.
No, actually send it to Virginia instead.
Okay, you want me to send 12th Avenue Arts to Virginia?
Yes please and thank you.
I have sent Virginia the location sucessfully.
Thank you for your help with that.
Did you need my help with anything else?
No that is all for me. Thank you again. Bye
You are welcome, Have a safe trip!
Could you help me find train tickets from Phoenix, AZ?
Where are you going and on which date did you want to travel?
I'm going to SF and I'd like to find tickets for next Thursday.
I found a train leaving at 7 am for $174.
Sure, that works.
Did you need me to book tickets?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation for one seat in economy and I want trip insurance.
Please confirm you're booking a Value ticket for 1 with trip insurance on the train from Phoenix to San Francisco on March 7th at 7 am.
That is correct. Which station will the train arrive at?
Your tickets have been booked. The train will arrive at Salesforce Transit Center.
I'd also like to find something interesting to do there on that day.
Did you have a category in mind? You can say Music, Theater, or something else.
I'd like something in Theater.
Above Ground will take place at Mojo Theatre on March 6th at 5 pm and it is very popular.
That sounds good, but did you have any other events? I'd like something on March 14th.
Above Ground Festival will take place at Mojo Theatre on March 14th at 7:30 pm and it is very popular.
Could you help me find something else? I'd like to find something on 9th of March and I like Songs.
Alex Cameron will take place at August Hall on March 9th at 6 pm and it is very popular.
That sounds awesome.
Did you want to buy tickets for this event?
Not as of now.
Did you need help with anything else?
Yes, could you share the location?
Who would you like to share it with?
I'd like to share it with Helen.
Please confirm you're sharing the location August Hall with Helen.
That is correct.
The location has been successfully shared.
Thank you. That was helpful. That's all I need.
Have a great day!
Will you find me a train?
What city are you going to and departing from?
I am going to San Diego and looking for tickets from LA.
Which date will you want to travel?
Can you find tickets for the 6th of March.
There will be 10 trains that work. How about the train leaving 6:50 am for $52?
What station does it arrive at?
The train comes at Santa Fe Depot.
That sounds nice, I'd like to book train tickets.
Will you want travel insurance and how many tickets do you want?
I would like trip insurance and need one seat.
Please confirm details that you want a ticket on the train departing Los Angeles to San Diego March 6th at 6:50 am for 1 person with trip insurance a value ticket.
That works for me and which station will it leave from?
The tickets were a success to be booked leaving from Union Station.
You have been of help. Thank you.
What else can I assist you with?
I would like some interesting things to do that day there.
Will you have a preference for event types?
I like Play a lot.
About time is popular and takes place at Talent to aMuse Theatre Co on March 9th 4 pm.
That sounds nice.
Will you want to buy tickets for that event?
No not now, but can you share the location with Lauren.
Please confirm details to share the location Talent to aMuse Theatre Co with Lauren.
No, I'd like to share it with Kyle.
Please confirm details to share location Talent to aMuse Theatre Co with Kyle.
That sounds nice.
You have shared the location successfully.
Thanks you have been helpful.
What else can I help with.
No, thanks for the help.
Have a good day.
Could you help me to find a train for 14th of this month to Anaheim, CA
From which city you want to depart?
I want the ticket from Sacramento, CA
What is your opinion about the train starting at 6:30 am with cost $125.
Can you tell me the arrival station and leaving station?
The arrival station is Anaheim Intermodal Center and train leaves from Sacramento Valley Station.
This is cool..I like you to book the train tickets.
Number of tickets you want and are you like to add insurance?
I need only 1 seat and there should be trip insurance.
Please give confirmation details: You like to book the train ticket which leaves from sacramento to Anaheim on march 14th at 6:30 am and it is for 1 people with value ticket with trip insurance.
Sorry..i want two seats.
Please give confirmation details: The train ticket is for 2 people with trip insurance.
Okay..this is perfect.
I booked your hotel successfully.
Can you search something interesting to do there?
In which category you want like music or theater or other thing?
I want Broadway.
I searched 1 event of your choice. There is a Jesus Christ Superstar which is very famous and it is taking place at Stage Door Repertory Theatre on march 1st at 7 pm.
This is cool.
Any other help you want today?
I want you to share the location with Jose.
Please give confirmation details: The location you want to share with Jose is Stage Door Repertory Theatre.
This is perfect.
Your location is shared successfully.
Thanks a lot.
Have a great day.
i am looking for a train ride
when are you traveling? where are you traveling to and from?
i am traveling from anaheim to phoenix on 9th of march
what about 6:30 am departure for $126
what station does this traveling from and to
you will be traveling from anaheim intermodal center and arrive at phoenix union station
what else can you find
what about 6:40 am departure for $125
ok that sounds perfect
would you like to book a ticket
yes please purchase a ticket for m
would you like travel insurance
yes i need trip insurance
how many seat do you need
this is for 1 ticket
please confirm your purchase of 1 value ticket from anaheim to phoenix on march 9th at 6:40 am
yes that is correct
your ticket is booked
thank you, i am also looking for something fun to do
what do you prefer
i want to go to broadway show
i found 3 broadway show. what about boondocks improv at dearing acting studio on march 10th at 6:30 pm
how much is the ticket
it is $50 per ticket
what else is good that you can find
what about chaos comedy improv show at dearing acting studio on march 7th at 5 pm
what is the price of the ticket
it will be $20 per ticket
ok that is great
would you like to purchase a ticekt
no, not right now. i want to share location with teresa
please confirm to share dearing acting studio with teresa
no please share it nicholas
please confirm to share dearing acting studio with nicholas
yes that is correct
your location has been shared
thank you thats all i need
have a great day
I would like 1 ticket from Anaheim, CA.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm going to San Fran on March 8th.
There is a train leaving at 6:40 am for $92.
Is there another train available?
There is another train leaving at 7:20 am for $88.
Yes, that sounds good. I would like to purchase a ticket.
Would you like travel insurance?
Yes, I would like a trip insurance.
Booking 1 value ticket from Anaheim to San Francisco on March 8th leaving at 7:20 am.
Yes, that works for me.
Your ticket has been purchased.
I would like to find an attraction in that area on that day.
What type of event do you prefer?
I would like to see a Show.
There are 10 events. There is Above Ground at Mojo Theatre on March 6th at 5 pm.
Where is the venue located?
The venue is located at 2940 16th Street #217.
That sounds good, thank you.
Do you want to buy a ticket for this event?
No, I would like to share a location.
Who would you like to share the location with?
I would like to share it with Katherine.
Sharing location Mojo Theatre with Katherine.
I would like to share it with Rachel instead.
Sharing location of Mojo Theatre with Rachel.
Yes, that is correct.
The location has been shared.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all I needed at the moment.
Have a nice day!
I would like to find a train, can you help me with that?
What date do you plan to depart? What city do you plan to depart from?
I will be leaving from Washington on March 3rd.
What is your destination city?
I am planning to go to Philadelphia.
There is a train departing at 6 am that costs $58 in total.
What other trains are available? There are four of us who will need seats.
There are 4 trains. One is departing at 7:20 am and will cost $187 in total.
That sounds good, I would like to book the train tickets. Please include the trip insurance.
You would like 4 Value tickets with trip insurance for the train from Washington to Philadelphia leaving March 3rd at 7:20 am, is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets have been booked successfully.
Thank you for your help. I would also like to find something interesting to do while there. I would like an activity on March 3rd.
Is there any particular category you prefer, for example Music or Theater?
Music would be my first choice.
Charlotte Lawrence is performing at The Fillmore Philadelphia on March 3rd at 5:30 pm.
Where is the venue located?
The venue is at 29 East Allen Street.
OK, that sounds great. Oh, can you share the location with Keith?
You would like to share the location The Fillmore Philadelphia with Keith, is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
The location has been shared successfully.
Thank you, that's very helpful. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Will you find me a train. I'm looking for one with tickets from Anaheim. I'd like luxurious tickets going to LA.
Which date do you wish to travel?
Please seek tickets for the 1st of March.
There are 10 trains that might work. What about the train leaving at 6:30 am costing $76 total?
Would there be any other trains that might work. Please find tickets for the 8th of this month that are for two seats.
What about the train leaving at 6:40 am costing $135 total?
Will there be any other trains that might work? I need tickets from SFO.
What about the train leaving at 6:20 am costing $242 total?
What station does it arrive at?
The train comes to Union Station.
What station does it leave from?
The train departs from Salesforce Transit Center.
That sounds nice. I'd like to book train tickets with trip insurance.
Please confirm details that you want a ticket on a train leaving from San Francisco with a destination of Los Angeles March 8th at 6:20 am for 2 people with trip insurance and a business ticket.
That will work for me.
The tickets were booked successfully.
You are helpful thanks.
Is there anything else I can assist you with.
I would like to find something interesting to do that day.
Would you like any particular category like music or theater or anything else.
Show is what I like.
I have 10 events including A Year in Dragonfly which is popular at Studio C Artists March 1st at 7:30 pm.
Where is the venue and how much does it cost for a ticket?
The ticket is $55 at the venue 6448 California 2.
These are nice but can you find me some other events?
Adieu Monsieur Haffmann is popular taking place at Theatre Raymond Kabbaz March 4th starting at 6:30 pm.
That sounds nice.
Would you like to buy tickets for this event?
No, not now could you share the location. I want to share it with Sophia.
Please confirm details that you are sharing the location Theatre Raymond Kabbaz with Sophia.
No, I'd like to share it with Eugene.
Please confirm details that you are sharing the location Theatre Raymond Kabbaz with Eugene.
That sounds good.
You have successfully share the location with me.
Thanks that is pretty helpful and all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I need to find a train.
Where are you travelling from?
I will be leaving from San Fran.
When will you be travelling?
Ideally I'd like to travel this Sunday if possible.
Where would you like to travel to?
I'm going to LA
I have found a train that departs at 6:20 am. What do you think? Tickets cost $83.
Which station does it leave from?
It leaves from the Salesforce Transit Center.
Please can you tell me the name of the destination station?
Sure, no problem. The train arrives at Union Station.
I like the sound of this option. Please can you go ahead and book me a ticket. I don't know if I'll definitely be travelling on that date so conditionally refundable tickets would be best.
How many tickets would you like to purchase?
Just one thanks.
Okay so just to check that I've got this correct. You would like to book 1 value ticket on the train leaving from San Francisco to Los Angeles on March 3rd at 6:20 am.
Actually can you make that a flexible ticket please. My plans may change.
Okay sure, I'll book 1 flexible ticket.
That's great thanks.
Your tickets have been booked.
Thanks for your help. Now can you help me find something to do while I'm there on March 13th. I'd really like to go out and see a show.
How about Asssscat? It's a show at Upright Citizens Brigade Sunset and there is a showing on March 13th at 6:30 pm.
Ok that's perfect. Can you please share the location with my friend Louis
Okay sure so you want to share the location Upright Citizens Brigade Sunset with Louis?
Yes that's correct.
I have successfully shared the location.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
Not right now thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Will you search for a train with 2 seats that's going to Seattle?
Can you give me your travel date and city departure location?
I will be leaving from Vancouver, BC and need the tickets for March 8th.
I found 9 suitable trains. Would you like a train that has a ticket price of $85 and leaves at 6:20 am?
What is the arrival station?
It will arrive at King Street station.
Could you check for comparable trains? Business tickets and heading to Portland.
I found 8 suitable trains. Would a train that leaves at 6:50 am and has a ticket cost of $227 work?
What are the departing and arriving stations?
It will depart Pacific Central Station and arrive at Union Station.
That would be great. I'd like to book tickets with insurance.
You need 2 business tickets for the train that is departing Vancouver on March 8th at 6:50 am and will arrive in Portland. There is travel insurance included. Are these details correct?
The details are correct.
I successfully booked the tickets.
You've been tons of helps so thanks. Will you look for some fun and interesting things to do there.
Is there a specific category of interest? You can tell me if it's Music, Theater or something else.
I love theater.
I have 10 events you will enjoy. There is a popular event at Newmark Theatre and is called Annual School Performance. It will be on March 2nd and begins at 5 pm.
Will you give me ticket price and venue location?
The tickets will be $45 and the venue can be found at 1111 Southwest Broadway.
That sounds really awesome.
Would you need more help?
Uh, actually, will you share the location?
Whom would you like to share it with?
Ethan is who to share with.
Sharing location of Newmark Theatre with Ethan. Is that right?
Yes, sounds right.
The location was shared.
That's it and thanks for all your wonderful help!
Hope you have a lovely day!
I'm looking for 1 flexible train ticket to Sacramento, CA.
When is the ticket for?
It's for Wednesday next week.
And where will you be departing from?
I'll be departing from San Francisco.
There's a $67 train at 6:10 am.
What's the station it departs from?
The station is Salesforce Transit Center.
And what's the arrival station?
The arrival station is Sacramento Valley Station.
Okay, good, I want to purchase a ticket.
Do you need travel insurance?
Yes, please add that.
I'll book you 1 Flexible ticket with insurance for San Francisco to Sacramento on March 6th at 6:10 am. Do you confirm this?
Yes, I confirm it.
The ticket has been purchased.
Thanks so much for the help. What are some interesting things to do when I'm there?
What kind of things do you enjoy?
I really enjoy Music.
There are 6 events that fit your preference. A lot of people like Aftershock Festival. It's at Discovery Park on March 5th at 5:30 pm.
I think I'd like that.
Do you want to purchase a ticket?
No, some other time.
What else can I do for you?
I want to share a location with Douglas?
Is it Discovery Park you want to share with Douglas?
Yes, it is.
The location has been shared with Douglas.
Thanks so much, that was helpful.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing else, thanks for the help.
Have a great day!
Is it possible for you to find me a train?
Can you tell me the date when you will have your trip?
I want to have tickets for a trip on the 10th.
Can you tell me your destination?
I want to arrive in Anaheim.
Can you tell me the city from where you will leave for your trip?
The tickets should be for a train leaving from Sacramento.
How would you like having the train which leaves at 6:30 am, and the ticket of which costs $117.
Can you tell me the station where the train will be going to?
This train's arrival station is Anaheim Intermodal Center.
It seems nice. I would like to buy tickets for this train.
Can you tell me the number of the tickets you would like to have, and also can you tell me if you need travel insurance?
I am interested to have trip insurance included, and I just need one seat.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy a Value ticket for 1 person for the train which leaves from Sacramento on March 10th at 6:30 am to go to Anaheim?
That is what I want. Can you tell me the station from where this train departs?
Your requested ticket has been booked. This train will depart from Sacramento Valley Station.
You have been quite helpful, thank you!
Is there something else I can do to help you?
I would like to know about some interesting things I can do there.
Is there some specific category you are looking for? It can be Music, Theater or something else.
I usually enjoy Broadway.
You might take into consideration Jesus Christ Superstar which is quite popular, and that will happen at Stage Door Repertory Theatre on March 1st at 7 pm.
Can you tell me how much the ticket cost for this event, and also can you tell me the location of the venue?
The address of the venue is 1045 North Armando Street, and the ticket has a price of $45.
It seems nice. Though is it possible for you to suggest some other event? More specifically look for a Musical performance which happens on March 13th.
You might consider Brown Sabbath which is quite popular, and it will happen at Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim on March 13th at 4:30 pm.
That seems good to me. Is it possible for you to share the location?
Can you tell me the person with whom you want to share the location with?
The person with whom I want to share the location is Scott.
Can you please confirm that you want to share the Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim address with the person called Scott?
That is not right, because I want to share the location with Raymond.
Can you please confirm that you want to share the address Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim with the person named Raymond?
That seems nice to me.
Your requested location has been shared.
Thank you. You have been very helpful.
Can I do something else to help you?
Nothing. Thank you! You have helped me a lot.
Have a good time!
I need help looking for a train.
Where will you be travelling to?
I'll be travelling to Anaheim, CA.
And where will you be departing from and on what date?
I'll be travelling from SF on the 6th of March.
There's a train departing at 7:10 am for $90, are you interested?
What's the departure and arrival station?
The departure is at Salesforce Transit Center and the arrival is at Anaheim Intermodal Center.
That will work.
Would you like me to reserve tickets?
Yes, please do.
How many tickets do you want? And will you need travel insurance?
I just want 1 ticket, and I'd like travel insurance.
I'll book you 1 value train ticket with travel insurance for San Francisco to Anaheim on March 6th at 7:10 am. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm.
I've booked the ticket.
Thanks a lot, you've been of great help.
What else can I do for you?
What are some interesting things to do there, I want to see a Play.
A lot of people enjoy Jesus Christ Superstar. It's at the Stage Door Repertory Theatre on March 1st at 7 pm.
I think I'd enjoy that.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
No, maybe later.
What else can I do for you?
I want to share the Play's location with someone.
Who would you like to share it with?
Share it with Jacob please.
I'll share the location of Stage Door Repertory Theatre with Jacob, is that okay?
Yeah, that's it.
I've shared the location.
Thanks so much. I need to go now.
Have a good rest of your day.
I need to book a train, help me out?
What's your destination, and from which city will you depart on train?
I am planning on heading out to Sacramento, and will be leaving from SD.
When will you be traveling on train?
I need tickets to depart from the 14th of March.
From 9 trains I found, would a train departing at 6:10 am work for you, it costs $145 in total?
At which station will the train arrive at?
Sacramento Valley Station is the destination of this train.
Sounds good to me, thanks for the information.
Would you like to book tickets to this train?
Sure, please make a reservation to this train, it should have trip insurance and I don't care about which fare class I get.
Would you be purchasing only 1 ticket for this train or more?
It will only be a purchase for 1 seat.
You wish to buy 1 value ticket with trip insurance for a train leaving from San Diego to Sacramento, it leaves on March 14th at 6:10 am, is that fine by you?
That all works for me, thanks.
The tickets were booked successfully.
Thanks for the help, can you also find me something interesting to do on the 14th of March, something music related.
There were 4 events you may like, what about the Aftershock Festival at Discovery Park, it is occurring on March 14th at 5 pm?
Sounds great to me, can you share the location for me?
To whom will you be sharing this event's location?
Please share the location with Judy.
Judy will receive the location of Discovery Park, correct?
That is correct, thanks.
The location was successfully shared.
Great, much appreciated. That's all I needed for today.
Your welcome, have a nice day!
Search for a train for me.
What city shall I search in?
I need any type of train ticket to get to Portland.
What is your departure city?
I am departing out of Vancouver.
What is your travel date?
I am departing on the 11th.
There is a train leaving at 6:50 am. It costs $81 and is 1 of 8 search results.
That is perfect. Get me a train ticket.
How many people are going?
I only need 1 ticket.
Do you wish to add travel insurance?
Yes, add travel insurance to the ticket.
You want 1 Value train ticket with insurance that departs Vancouver at 6:50 am on March 11th and heads to Portland, correct?
That is correct.
Your ticket is confirmed.
What cool things are there to do there?
Shall I search in Music, Theater, or some other type of genre?
Find me something in Songs for the 14th of March.
Bastille is happening at Theater of The Clouds on March 14th at 5 pm and is 1 of 6 attractions that I found.
That is okay. Find me some events in the Play category.
Beirut By Alan Bowne is playing at The Shoe Box Theater on March 14th at 4:30 pm.
That is perfect. Share the location with Kathryn.
You wish to share the Shoe Box Theater location with Kathryn, correct?
That is right.
The location has been shared with her.
Thanks for your help. That is everything for now.
Have a great day.
Will you search for a train for me?
Please give me your travel date and city of interest.
I'll be going to Fresno on the 12th of this month and will need two tickets.
What is your departing city?
The tickets will be from Sacramento, CA.
There are 7 trains that seem to fit your needs. Will a train leaving at 8 am work? The total price is $113.
That sounds just right.
Would you like for me to book your tickets?
Yes, let's make a reservation.
Would you like to get travel insurance?
I would prefer having travel insurance.
You would like 2 value tickets for the train that is departing Sacramento on March 12th at 8 am. It will arrive in Fresno. You have opted to have trip insurance. Are these details correct?
Yes, they work fine. What are the departure and arrival stations?
The departure station is Sacramento Valley Station and Fresno Station is the arrival location. The tickets have been booked.
I really appreciate all of your help. Search for some activities that are interesting to do there.
Are there preferred events?
I need something on the 14th and would love theater.
There is a very hip event called The Government Inspector going on March 14th at 5:30 pm. It is at the California Arts Academy.
They sound great, but will you find other things to do? I very much like songs.
The Rainbow Ballroom is having the event of Brockhampton on March 14th at 5:30 pm. It's quite popular.
Give me the ticket price and venue location.
You can go to it at 1725 Broadway Street and pay $45 per ticket.
Perfect. Will you share the location with Andrea?
You want to share the location for Rainbow Ballroom with Andrea. Right?
No, Natalie is whom to share it with.
You would like to share the location to the Rainbow Ballroom with Natalie. Is that correct?
Works great.
The location has been shared with success.
Thank you, that's so helpful.
Do you need more help?
Nope, your helps great and thanks.
Have a beautiful day!
Can you help me find a train ride for the 9th of March to San Diego?
Where are you leaving from?
I will be leaving form Sacramento.
I have a trainf for $158 that is leaving at 6:30 am.
Yes that works for me. I will need one conditionally refundable ticket.
Did you want to include travel insurance.
Yes, please include trip insurance.
Okay, I will be booking you 1 value ticket for your trip from Sacramento to San Diego. Your train will leave on March 9th at 6:30 am.
Yes that sounds right. What station will I be leaving from and arriving to?
You will depart from Sacramento Valley Station and arrive at Santa Fe Depot. Your reservation has been a success
Thank you for that. Can you help me find something to do round that area dealing with songs on the 14th of March?
I have 10 events that may interest you. How about the Bastille at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater. This event begins at 5 pm on March 14th.
What is the address?
The address is 5500 Campanile Drive.
Great, can you also sent that location to my friend Andrea?
You want me to send the address for Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater to Andrea?
Yes please and thank you.
I have sent the address to Andrea for you.
Thank for all your help. That will be all. Good Bye.
You are welcome, goodbye.
Search for a train for me on the 4th.
What is your departure and arrival city?
I am travelling from San Fran to Anaheim.
There is a train leaving at 7:10 am and costs $91.
What is the departure station?
Salesforce Transit Center is the departing station.
That is perfect.
Shall I get you train tickets now?
Yes, book me some train tickets.
How many people are going and do you need travel insurance?
I need 1 ticket with travel insurance.
Your want 1 train Value ticket with trip insurance departing San Francisco on March 4th at 7:10 am that goes to Anaheim, correct?
That is right.
Your ticket is ordered.
Thanks a bunch. Find me something to do there under the Theater genre on the 5th of this month.
Search revealed 1 result which is Jesus Christ Superstar at Stage Door Repertory Theatre on March 5th at 5:30 pm.
That is perfect.
Do you need any more help?
Share that location with Dorothy.
You wish to share the Stage Door Repertory Theatre with Dorothy, correct?
No, I want you to share it with Christian.
You wish to share the Stage Door Repertory Theatre with Christian, correct?
That is perfect.
The location is successfully shared with him.
Thanks. That was helpful.
Do you need more help?
No, that is all. Thanks for the help.
Have a great day.
I want to find a train on March 6th. I need one seat. Any fare class is fine.
What city are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Philadelphia.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm going to Chi-town.
I found 3 trains. There is a train leaving at 12:10 pm for $113.
Are there other trains? I want to find something from New York City.
I found 6 trains. There is a train leaving at 6 am for $112.
Sounds great. Can you book some train tickets for me?
Do you want to add trip insurance?
Yes, I want to add insurance.
Please confirm: a value ticket for 1 from New York to Chicago on March 6th at 6 am.
That sounds great.
Your ticket has been booked.
Can you find some attractions there? I like theater a lot.
Ada and the Engine is a popular theater play taking place at The Artistic Home on March 3rd at 5:30 pm.
Where is the venue?
It is located at 1376 West Grand Avenue #7761.
Sounds good. Can you share the location?
Who do you want to share the location with?
I want to share it with Emma.
Please confirm: sharing the location The Artistic Home with Emma.
That sounds good.
The locaiton has been shared.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can do?
No that's all.
Have a great day!
Could you help me to find a train?
can i know the travel date and city?
I want 1 ticket for today and want to go to Anaheim, CA.
From which city you want to depart?
I like to have the tickets from Phoenix, AZ.
I found 4 trains of your choice. One is departing at 7 am with $131 cost.
Can i know the arrival station?
The arrival station is Anaheim Intermodal Center.
This is perfect.
Any other help you want?
can you book the train tickets and i want trip insurance.
Please give confirmation details: You want to book the tickets from Phoenix to Anaheim for march 1st at 7 am and the ticket is for 1 people with trip insurance and i need value ticket.
This is perfect..can i know from where you leaving?
I booked the ticket successfully. The leaving station is Phoenix Union Station.
can you find something interesting to do there?
Do you prefer any particular category like Music or Theater or any other?
I want in the category of Concert.
I searched 1 event which you may like..There is a event called Brown Sabbath which is taking place at crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim on march 2nd at 7:30 pm.
Can i know the location address and the ticket cost?
The address is 1530 Disneyland Monrail System with cost of $55.
Okay..fine..I want you to share the location.
To whom do you want to share?
I want to share with Nathan.
Please give confirmation details: You want to share the location crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim with Nathan.
Sorry, i want to share with Brittany.
Please give confirmation details: You want to share the location crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim with Brittany.
This is great.
I have successfully shared the location.
Thank you so much..This much is okay for now.
Have a great day..
I have planned to go for a short trip and I want to travel through a Train. Can you find me the one from Portland for the date of the 14th?
Yes, Where do you want to visit? Let me know it, so that I can book the train as per your requirement.
Find the one to go to Seattle.
I got results about 9 trains and please note that the one departing at 9:10 am for the ticket cost $66 is the suitable one to you. What do you think?
I want to book something else. Can you search more?
Yes, what about another train departing at 10:10 am for the total ticket cost $68?
What is the origin and destination stations names of this train?
This train will leave from Union Station and reaches finally to King Street Station.
That is nice and thanks.
Shall I book the tickets now?
I think so. Pleas book the tickets to this train now.
Shall I book it with Travel insurance.
I need to book it with trip insurance.
Okay, one more detail I need to know that is number of tickets required by you. Let me know the same.
I want to book 1 seat only.
I need your confirmation to book 1 Value ticket to the train which is leaving at Portland on March 14th at 10:10 am to Seattle including trip insurance.
Yes, that's right. Go ahead.
Your tickets are booked and you can enjoy your journey.
Thanks for your help. Now, I want to search for some interesting events and especially I like Theater events. Can you find me the one on the 14th?
Yes, What about your opinion on Beatleconcert will be held at 12th Avenue Arts on March 14th at 5 pm.
Let me know the ticket cost and venue address.
The venue is located at 1620 12th Avenue and the cost of ticket will be around $25.
That is okay and thanks.
Shall I book the tickets to this event now? Or do you need it later?
No, may be later. I will ask it later. Now, I want only to share the location.
To Whom you want to do the same?
Share it with Austin.
I need your confirmation to share the location 12th Avenue arts with Austin.
That is confirmed to proceed.
I have shared the location successfully.
That is nice. Thanks for the same.
Anything else you need?
Nothing there for now. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I'm travelling for work on business and need to find train tickets from Sacramento, CA to Fresno on the 10th of March.
There is a train departing at 8 am, would this be a suitable option? The ticket price is $66.
What is the destination station?
The train is travelling to Fresno Station.
What station does the train depart from?
It leaves from Sacramento Valley station.
Okay sure that's fine.
Would you like to book tickets now?
Yes please but I might need to change my mind as it is a business trip. Can you find me one conditionally refundable ticket? I also need travel insurance.
Okay so just to check the details: You want to book 1 ticket for the train leaving at 8 am from Sacramento travelling to Fresno on March 10th. You would also like a value ticket with trip insurance included.
That's correct yes.
Your tickets have been booked successfully.
Thanks for your help. Now can you help me find something to do while I'm there.
What kind of thing are you looking for? Perhaps Music or Theater?
I'd prefer a stage show.
How about The Government Inspector at the California Arts Academy on March 8th at 6:30 pm?
I like the sound of that!
Do you want to buy these tickets now?
Not right now thanks.
Do you need anything else?
Yeah can you share the location please.
Sure, who do you want to share it with?
Please send it to Jennifer.
So that's the California Arts Academy location with Jennifer.
Actually Jennifer won't need the location, please share it with Abigail instead.
Sure. So that's the California Arts Academy with Abigail.
Yes that's correct.
The location has been shared.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
No thanks, that's all for now.
Enjoy your day.
Please look whether tickets are available on the 1st to go to Los Angeles by train?
From where do you start journey?
I am starting from Anaheim, CA.
There is one departing at 6:30 am. The fare of ticket is $34.
Ok, that will be good.
You wish to get tickets now?
Yes,get one ticket and not matter of fare class.
Travel insurance can be added, no?
Yeah, surely do it.
How many of you are travelling?
Only one seat,dear.
Ok, look if request is correct, You need 1 ticket on train leaving from Anaheim and reaching Los Angeles. It starts at 6:30 am on March 1st. The ticket is Value one with trip insurance.
Every detail is found correct.
You can enjoy your journey with the confirmed ticket.
Please search for any Musical shows there on 7th of this month.
There is Ain Gordon, popular show at Ralph Freud Playhouse. It is on March 7th and starts at 4:30 pm.
What about venue and cost?
The ticket charge is $45 and taking place at 245 Charles E Young Drive East.
Thats fine. please look where there are any Theater show on 13th of March.
10 events awaits you. One is Asssscat at Upright Citizens Brigade Sunset on March 13th at 6:30 pm.
I think that will work. Please share the location.
With whom do you want it shared?
Please do it with Ann.
Please confirm, you need to share the location Upright Citizens Brigade Sunset with Ann.
Fine, thats correct.
It is shared, have fun.
Great, your service is remarkable.
My pleasure, keep in touch.
Can you find a train ride for me
when are you leaving
i need ticket for the 11th
what are you departing from and traveling to
i will be traveling from anaheim, ca and going to phoenix, az
what about 6:30 am departure for $118
thats good. please book the ticket
would you also like travel insurance
yes i want travel insurance
how many ticket do you want
i just need 1 ticket
please confirm your booking for 1 value ticket from anaheim to phoenix at 6:30 am on march 11th
yes that is correct. what station will i arrive at
you will arrive at phoenix union station
thank you, i also want to find something fun to do
what do you like to do, you can say anything from music to theater
i want some musical shows on the 11th
i found 10 events. what about dreamers at the van buren at 7:30 pm on march 11th
how much is the ticket
it will be $50
ok, what else can you find
what about greensky bluegrass at the van buren at 5 pm on march 11th
perfect, can you find other show events
i found 2 events. what about boondocks improv at dearing acting studio at 7 pm on march 11th
that sounds good
would you like to book a ticket
no right now, i want you to share the location with larry
please confirm to share dearing acting studio with larry
no, please share it with walter
please confirm to share dearing acting studio with walter
yes that is correct
location has been shared
thank you for your help
what else can i do for you
no that is all i need
have a great day
I'm looking for 2 fully refundable train tickets departing from Sacramento.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm going to SFO.
When are you departing?
I'm leaving on Wednesday next week.
I found 10 trains for you. There is a train departing at 7:30 am for $134.
That sounds good. I'd like to purchase tickets with trip insurance.
Okay, you want 2 flexible train tickets for the train traveling from Sacramento to San Francisco on March 6th at 7:30 am, right?
Yes, that is correct.
I have purchased the tickets.
What station does it depart from?
The train departs from Sacramento Valley Station.
Thank you! I also need to find something interesting to do on that day.
Do you prefer any type of event?
I'd like a music event.
How about Alex Cameron at August Hall on March 8th at 7 pm?
What else is there?
There is Carmina Burana at the San Francisco Symphony on March 14th at 6:30 pm.
How much do the tickets cost and what is the address of the venue?
The tickets cost $20 and the address is 201 Van Ness Avenue.
Okay, that sounds good.
Do you want to purchase tickets for the event?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I want to share the address with Kyle.
Okay, you want to share the location of the San Francisco Symphony with Kyle, right?
No, I want to share it with Alan.
Okay, you want to share the location of the San Francisco Symphony with Alan, correct?
Yes, that is right.
I have shared the location.
Thanks, that is all I needed.
Have a great day.
I want to take a sightseeing trip along the countryside, and a nice train ride would be ideal. Would you be my travel agent and help me get 1 ticket, going from Philly to Chi-town, please?
I'm happy to help you with that. When do you want to take the train for your trip?
The 1st of this month would be great.
Okay. Would you like to get a ticket to catch a train at 12:10 pm, for a fare of $110?
Oh, what are the departure and arrival stations?
The train departs from the 30th Street Station and takes you to the Chicago Union Station.
Very nice. Please reserve a Value ticket for me and add insurance for the trip.
All right. Are you ready to confirm a reservation for 1 Value train ticket, going from Philadelphia on March 1st at 12:10 pm and traveling to Chicago?
Hmm, let's upgrade that ticket to economy premium, please.
Okay. I can confirm a Flexible ticket for 1 person. Would you like that?
Absolutely. Please confirm that.
Your train reservation is now confirmed.
Wonderful assistance. I appreciate you so much. And, can I ask you to check on some attractions I can go to when I get there, preferably a Theater on the 8th of this month?
I'm on it. Of the 10 attractions I'm showing, there's Ada and The Engine at The Artistic Home taking place on March 8th at 6 pm. Does that interest you?
Oh, what's the cost and where is that happening?
The cost is $50 per ticket, and the address is 1376 West Grand Avenue #7761.
Cool. I'd like that very much. Can I take a friend with me to the venue?
What's your friend's name?
Please add Pamela.
Okay. If you like, I can confirm that you and your friend Pamela will visit The Artistic Home.
Fabulous. Please confirm that.
Your visit to the venue with your friend is confirmed.
Great work, my friend. Your assistance is so much appreciated.
Would you like more assistance?
Nope, that'll do it for now. I'm so impressed.
My pleasure. Enjoy your day.
I need to catch a train.
Where are you going and what city are you leaving?
I want to go to Sacramento, CA and look for tickets from San Diego.
What is your date of travel?
I need tickets for the 14th.
Would you like the train leaving at 6:10 am? It will cost you $145 in all.
Do you think you can find any other train?
How about the train of 6:40 am? You will pay $142 in all.
What station is this departing from and where does it arrive?
This train departs from Santa Fe Depot and arrives at Sacramento Valley Station.
That is cool.
Shall I get you the tickets?
Sure, make that reservation.
What number of tickets shall I get you?
I will be needing only one seat.
Should I get you travel insurance?
I do want the travel insurance.
So do you confirm that you want a Value ticket for 1 person from San Diego to Sacramento on March 14th and the departing time is at 6:40 am.
That sound good.
I have your tickets booked.
Thank you for the help. Is there anything interesting that I can do there on the 14th?
Is there any type of event you particularly prefer?
I love Songs.
There are 4 such events. You should like the Aftershock Festival at Discovery Park. It starts on March 14th at 5 pm.
What is the address of the venue?
You can spot them at 1600 Garden Highway.
That is cool. Can you share that location?
With whom shall I share the location?
I want Beverly to get it.
So do you confirm that you want the location of Discovery Park to be shared with Beverly?
That is great.
I have your location shared successfully.
Thank you, that was a lot of help.
Shall I do anything else for you?
No thanks. That is all the help I wanted.
Have a wonderful day!
I need to find a train.
Where will you be departing from? when are you going?
I will be leaving on the 5th for Sacramento, CA.
Where are you travelling to?
I am visiting San Diego.
There are 10 trains going to San Diego. One is at 6:30 am and costs $154.
What else can you find?
There is another departing at 7:20 am and costs $158.
Which station does it depart from? Which station does it arrive at?
The train is leaving Sacramento Valley Station and arriving at Santa Fe Depot.
Sounds good thanks. I want to book train tickets for one in any fare class.
Do you need travel insurance?
I need insurance please.
You want a value ticket for 1 on the 5th at 7:20 am on March 5th from Sacramento to San Diego.
That works for me.
Your tickets are reserved.
I need to find an musical performance on that day.
Alejandro Sanz Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 7th at 7:30 pm.
That sounds good, can you share the address?
Who do you want to share the location.
I want to share with Cynthia.
You're sharing the Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater with Cynthia
I want to share it with emma.
You want to share the Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater address with Emma, correct?
That is correct yes.
You have successfully shared the location.
Thanks, that was helpful.
Have a great day.
Please search train tickets for March 10th from Fresno, CA please.
Sure thing, which city would you be traveling to?
I want to go to Anaheim.
There are 6 train options for you. There is one departing at 7 am for a cost of $75.
That will work. Let's book these but with a conditionally refundable ticket. I will only need one ticket.
Ok, I understand.Please confirm we are booking 1 ticket on March 10th for a train leaving from Fresno at 7 am and arriving at Anaheim. This is a value ticket. Is this information correct?
Yes this will work. Which station would I be leaving from?
Your tickets were booked successfully. The train will be departing from Fresno Station
Lets find something to do on march 14th while i'm there. I would prefer a Drama activity if possible.
On March 14th at 6 pm there is a very popular show called Jesus Christ Superstar is taking place at Stage Door Repertory Theatre.
How much would one ticket cost?
The tickets cost $30
Where is this venue located?
The address is 1045 North Armando Street
This will work fine.
Should we book now?
No, not at this time. Can you please share the location with Sean please.
I would be glad to. Please confirm you would like to share the location of STage Door Repertory Theatre with sean. Is that right?
No, nevermind share with Jesse
ok, please confirm you would like to share the location of Stage Door Repertory Theatre with Jesse, is that right?
yes that is correct
Ok, location has successfully been shared with Jesse.
Great. thank you.
your welcome.
Good bye.
Good bye
I need to travel by train and need help finding tickets, can you lend a hand?
Where are you travelling to and when?
I'd like to check out Chicago on March 7th.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'll be leaving from NYC.
There are 6 trains available that meet your criteria. How about one departing at 6 am? Tickets cost $119.
That's a little early for me to be honest. Are there any other options? I only need 1 ticket.
How about a slightly leter train at 6:10 am. The price per ticket is $124.
That's better thanks.
Do you want to book tickets now?
Yes please go ahead and book tickets.
Do you need any insurance?
Yes please, you never know what could go wrong.
Okay so that's 1 value ticket on the train from New York to Chicago on March 7th at 6:10 am?
That's correct thanks.
Your tickets have been booked successfully.
What is the departure station called?
It leaves from Grand Central Station.
What is the destination station called?
It will travel to Chicago Union Station.
Thanks for that. Now I'd like to find something interesting to do while I'm there on the 10th of this month. I like music and songs.
There are 4 events that I have found but I think you might like Conor Maynard. He is playing at the Chop Shop on March 10th at 6:30 pm.
That sounds perfect thanks. Can you share this location for me.
Sure, who do you want to share it with?
Send it to Bryan.
So that's the Chop Shop location with Bryan?
Yes that's correct.
The location has been shared.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
Not right now thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Find me a train please.
In what date you want to travel and from what city?In which city you go?
I want tickets from Los Angeles to San Diego on 11th of March.
What you think about the train that depart at 6:50 am and cost $54 in total?
Something else you have for me.I need 4 seats and I don't have preferences about the fare class.
What about the train that depart at 8:10 am and cost $172 in total?
From which station will leave?
From Union Station will leave.
Other train that could work you have?I would like Value tickets.
2 trains I have for you.What you think about a train that depart at 12:40 pm and cost $174 in total.
Sounds very good.Book for me tickets.
You want travel insurance too?
Yes.I want trip insurance.
You want 4 Value tickets at the train that leave from Los Angeles to San Diego on March 11th at 12:40 pm.
This works for me.
The ticket was bought.
Find me something interesting to do there in that day.I enjoy Musical performance on the 14th.
I have for you 10 options.Very popular is Bastille and is taking place at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 14th at 5 pm.
Tell me where is located the venue and what is the cost per ticket.
5500 Campanile Drive is the location and $60 is the cost.
Sounds great for me.
You want to buy tickets at this event?
No,not now maybe later.
Can I do something else for you?
Share for me please the location with Eric.
You share location Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater with Eric.I'm right?
No,share it please with Bruce.
You share location Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater with Bruce .Is okay for you?
Sounds very good.
The location was shared.
Thank you.You have been a great help to me today.
With something else I can help you?
No.Thank you very mush for all.
Have a great day!
I need a train from Phoenix. Can you help me get tickets?
What city will you be visiting?
I need to reach LAX.
When are you making the travel?
I need tickets for the 13th.
You can choose from 5 trains. How do you like the train leaving at 7 am? You will have to pay $87 in all.
That will work.
Shall I get you the tickets?
Sure make the reservation.
What is the number of tickets you want?
I want only one seat.
Shall I get you travel insurance too?
Get me luxurious tickets and the travel insurance.
So do you confirm that you want 1 Business ticket from Phoenix to Los Angeles on March 13th on the train leaving at 7 am?
Not really. I want 2 seats.
So can you verify that you want tickets for 2 people for the train departing Phoenix?
That will be nice.
I have your tickets booked.
Thanks very much. Now can you explore for something interesting to do on that day in that place?
Is there any preference of category you like? Maybe Music or Theater or something like that.
I love to see a Play.
There are 10 events that might suit your taste. A year In Dragonfly will start at 7:30 pm on March 1st at Studio C Artists.
What will a ticket cost me?
One ticket is priced at $55.
That is really cool.
Shall I get you the event tickets?
Nope, not now.
Shall I do anything else for you?
I want the location shared with Doris.
So do you confirm that you want the Studio C Artists location to be shared with Doris?
Nope. I need you to share it with Kathleen.
So do you confirm you want the location of Studio C Artists to be shared with Kathleen?
That is great.
I have shared that location successfully.
Thank you for all the help. That will be all.
Have a wonderful day!
I need a train ticket.
To where and when are you needing a train?
I need to get to SD on March 7th.
Where are you leaving from?
I need to leave from Anaheim, CA.
There is one that costs $48, it leaves at 6:30 am.
What station is it at?
That would be the Anaheim Intermodal Center.
That would work. Get me a ticket please.
How many seats do you want?
Just for 1 person.
Would you like to get travel insurance?
Trip insurance, yes.
Okay,let's see you want 1 Value ticket for March 7th for the train leaving Anaheim and going to San Diego at 6:30 am right?
Yes that's it.
The purchase went through you have your ticket.
Is there anything fun to do on March 7th there?
Like what? What do you like to do?
I enjoy a good Musical performance.
There are several, here are 10, this one is at 7:30 pm on March 7th it will be at the Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater they are featuring Alejandro Sanz.
What does a seat cost?
They are $50 each.
I think I'd really like that. Would you share that location for me?
With whom.
I want to let Emma know about it.
You want to let Emma know the location Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater is that right?
Yes it is.
The location has been shared.
Great, thank you, and goodbye.
Have a wonderful day.
I am planning a trip by train. Please fine one.
Where is the starting station?
Please find one from Vancouver, BC. The date is March 4th and destination is Seattle.
Do you like to depart at 6:20 am? the cost of ticket is $61
That will be fine.
Can I book your ticket?
yes, carry on.
How many passengers? Do you wish to add travel insurance?
Trip insurance can be added and only 1 ticket is needed.
Please confirm, You are leaving to Seattle from Vancouver on March 4th by train. The time of departure is 6:20 am. 1 person is travelling with Value ticket and trip insurance.
Right, carry on.
Your seats are reserved.
Are there any interesting thing to do on that day, preferably at Broadway.
10 events are there. One is Beatleconcert at 12th Avenue arts. it is taking place on March 10th at 5 pm.
What is the cost of ticket and name of venue?
The venue is 1620 12th Avenue and cost of ticket is $50.
OK, are there any event on March 9th.
on March 9th Blood water paint is there at 12th Avenue Arts at 4:30 pm. Or you can go to 9 other events.
Thats sounds apt.
Shall I reserve your ticket?
No, not needed now.
What other help do you need?
Please share the location with Victoria.
Please confirm, you wish to share the 12th Avenue Arts location with Victoria.
Yes, thats all.
It is shared with Victoria.
Thanks for you tremendous help.
Welcome sir, have a nice day.
I am looking for a train
when are you traveling? where are you going to and depart from
I am traveling from anaheim and to los angeles on march 13th
what about departure at 6:30 am for $34
what station does this arrive from and at
you will be leaving from anaheim intermodal center and arrive at union station
what other train can you find
what about 6:40 am departure for $35
this is perfect, please book 1 value ticket for me
please confirm 1 value ticket from anaheim to los angeles on march 13th at 6:40 am
this is fine. where does the train arrive at
you will arrive at union station
thats perfect. I am also looking for something fun to do
please name something. you can say music or theater
i want some broadway
What about A year in dragonfly at studio c artists on march 1st at 7:30 pm
where is this located and how much is the ticket
this is locaed in 6448 california 2 and the ticket is $55
perfect, can you share this location
who do you want me to share the location with
please share with rachel
please confirm to share studio c artists with rachel
yes that is correct
location has been shared
thank you for your help
what else can i do for you
no that is all i need
have a great day
I need to find a train, can you help me search for one?
Which cities are you departing from and going to?
I will need tickets from NYC to Chi-town.
What date are you leaving?
I would like tickets for the 1st of March, please.
There are 7 trains that meet your travel criteria. There is a train departing at 7:30 am with a total ticket price of $114.
What stations does the train leave from and arrive in?
The train departs from Chicago Union Station, and arrives in Grand Central Station.
Are there any other trains?
There is a train departing at 8 am with a total ticket price of $118.
That train sounds good. I would like to book a ticket for it.
How many tickets would you like?
I need one seat.
Would you like travel insurance?
I would like economy tickets, and yes, I would like trip insurance.
You would like 1 Value ticket on the train from Chicago to New York leaving March 1st at 8 am, is that correct?
Yes, that's right. What stations does that train depart from and arrive in?
Your tickets were booked successfully. The train leaves from Chicago Union Station and arrives in Grand Central Station.
I would also like to find something interesting to do while I am there.
Is there a particular type of event you prefer?
I like Broadway a lot.
I found 10 events like that. Acting For Teens is taking place at 520 8th Ave. - Personal Valet Parking on March 4th at 6 pm.
Where is that venue?
The venue is located at 520 8th Ave. - Personal Valet.
OK, that sounds great. Can you share that location?
Who would you like to share it with?
Please share it with Bryan.
You would like to share the location 520 8th Ave. - Personal Valet Parking with Bryan, is that correct?
No, I meant Donald.
You would like to share the location 520 8th Ave. - Personal Valet Parking with Donald, is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
The location has been shared.
Thank you for all your help. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Get met economy train tickets for the 2nd of March.
What are you departure and arrival cities?
I am departing New York City and headed to Chi-town.
There is a train leaving at 6 am with a cost of $130.
What is the departing station?
Grand Central Station is the departure station.
What other trains can you find?
There is a train leaving at 6:10 am and costs $103.
What are the departing and arrival stations?
Grand Central Station is the departing station and Chicago Union Station is the arrival station.
What else can you find?
A train is leaving at 7:50 am with a total cost of $125.
That works for me. Book that train for me.
How many people are going and do you wish to add travel insurance?
The trip is for 1 person and I would like to add travel insurance to my order.
You want a Value ticket with travel insurance for 1 person for a train ride departing New York at 7:50 am on March 2nd and goes to Chicago, correct?
That is correct. What are the arrival and departure stations?
Your ticket is confirmed. The train departs Grand Central Station and arrives at Chicago Union Station.
What fun things are there to do there?
What type of events should I search for?
Search for Drama events.
Ada And The Engine is showing at The Artistic Home on March 3rd at 5:30 pm and is 1 of 10 drama events that I found.
That is okay. Find me some event Songs on the 2nd of March.
Ashe is playing at the Chop Shop at 6:30 pm on March 2nd.
What is the price for a ticket?
The price of a ticket is $50.
What is their address?
They are located at 2033 West North Avenue.
That is perfect. Share the location for me.
Who are sharing the location to?
Share the location with Ralph.
You want to share the Chop Shop location with Ralph, correct?
That is right.
The location has been shared with him.
Thanks for the help.
Do you need more help?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a pleasant day.
I have planned to go for a short trip for which I need to find a Train. I want you to search for the one suitable to me.
From which City you want to book the train? Or let me know your current location.
Find me something in LA.
Where are you going to visit? and When do you start your travel?
I am planning to visit Anaheim, CA and find me a train on 10th of March.
I got a train which is going to depart at 6 am and the ticket cost for the same is $34. Do you want to travel in this train?
No, that time is not convenient to me. Search for something else.
What about the one at 6:10 am for the ticket cost $33 in total?.
No, please search for something else for the date on March 7th and I want to book 1 ticket.
Do you want to travel on a train at 6:30 am for the ticket cost $31 in total.
I have to decide. Let me know the origin station of this train.
This train will leave from Union Station.
That's okay.
What else do you want to do now?
I want to book the tickets now and I need Value tickets with trip insurance.
Please confirm to book 1 value ticket on the train which is leaving from Los Angeles on March 7th at 6:30 am to Anaheim with trip insurance.
That is correct to proceed.
I have booked the tickets successfully.
Thanks for your help. Could you search for some interesting events on that day that is March 14th. I prefer something like Play.
What about an event like Jesus Christ Superstar will be taking place at Stage Door Repertory Theatre on March 14th at 6 pm?
Yes, that is okay to me.
Shall I book the tickets to this event?
I will ask it later.
What do you want me to do now?
I want to share a location to Barbara.
I need your confirmation to share the location of Stage Door Repertory Theatre with Barbara.
Yes, please proceed.
I have successfully shared the location.
Thanks for your help and that's all I want.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a train to ride
What date are you traveling and where are you coming and going from?
I need tickets in Washington on the 14th heading to Chi-Town
There's a 9:40 am train for $104 how does that sound?
That sounds good for me
Do you want tickets?
Yes please, make a reservation?
For how many tickets? Do you want travel insurance?
Yes please, include insurance and I need 1 seat
Confirming you train from Washington to Chicago that leaves on March 14th at 9:40 am for 1 person, and it's a value ticket with insurance
Yes that works fine
It's been booked for you
Great, now find me some interesting things to do that day
Do you prefer any kind of event?
I want to catch a Broadway show if possible
I found 10 events including Ada And the Engine which is a popular show taking place at The Artistic Home, catch it on March 3rd at 5:30 pm if you want
Yes I want that
Do you want tickets then?
No, not at the moment
OK cool, what else can I do?
For now can you share a location
To who are you sharing it to?
I want to share it with Mark
Confirming you want to share to location of The Artistic Home with Mark
Sorry I meant Sophia, not Mark
OK so share the location of The Artistic Home to Sophia instead right?
Yes that's right
It's been shared
Great, that's a big help
What else can I do?
Nothing else, thanks so much
You're welcome see you
I want to go for a short trip for which I need a Train. Can you search for the suitable one?
Yes, Where do you want to find the train?
Search the one from Fresno.
When and Where do you want to go?
Find a train to go to San Fran on the 9th and I need conditionally refundable tickets.
Got 7 results based on your requirement. What about a train which is going to leave at 6:50 am and the cost for the ticket is $64 in total.
This is perfect and I want to travel through this train.
What else you want me to do now?
Book the tickets to the train now.
For how many persons you need the tickets and shall I include the travel insurance?
Please book 1 ticket with trip insurance.
Please confirm to book 1 Value ticket to the train leaving from Fresno on March 9th at 6:50 am to San Francisco including trip insurance.
That is confirmed to proceed. What are the stations names of origin and destination of this train?
Your train tickets are booked and this train will leave from Fresno Station and reaches finally to Salesforce Transit Center.
Thanks. Please find me some nice events will be held on 10th of March at Broadway.
Got 6 results. How about an event like Above Ground will take place at Mojo Theatre on March 10th at 6:30 pm.
That is great and thanks.
Shall I book the tickets now?
No, I will ask it later.
Anything else you want now?
Yes, I want to share a location to Olivia.
Please confirm to share the location Mojo Theatre with Olivia.
Yes, proceed as it is.
I have shared the location successfully.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a good day.
Would you help me set up a trip, leaving from San Diego on the 12th of March so I can attend the upcoming festival? A one-way flight is what I need to accomplish that, my travel agent friend.
I'll be happy to help you with that. Where are you going for this trip?
I'll be heading to SFO.
Does an Alaska Airlines flight, departing at 9:10 pm for a fare of $171 interest you?
Hmm. Would that be an economy or business fare?
Your ticket would be for Economy seating.
Okay, and what's the arrival time for the flight?
The flight is scheduled for a 0:50 am arrival time at your destination.
I see. Actually, I need to make a couple of changes. I'd like a United Airlines flight that departs on the 14th of March, please.
Okay. I'm showing that 1 seat on a United Airlines direct flight is available, departing at 11:15 pm, for a ticket fare of $99. Does that interest you?
That's great. Now, would you also see if I can catch a train going that way with seating for 1 person?
Sure. Is your date of departure March 14th?
Please make that departure date March 7th.
I'm showing 7 choices available, with the departure time of 6:40 am for one train at a cost of $100. Would you like that one?
What's the departure station?
The train would depart from the Santa Fe Depot.
And, what's the arrival station?
The train would take you to the Salesforce Transit Center.
Alrighty then. I'll go with that. Please reserve my ticket.
Shall I add insurance for your trip?
Yes, please, tack on some insurance.
Got it. Do you want me to confirm a Value train ticket for 1 person, departing from San Diego on March 7th at 6:40 am and going to San Francisco?
That's what I want.
Your train ticket is now confirmed.
Great help, my friend, and we're done.
Happy to assist you. Enjoy your day.
I am looking for a one way flight
where are you traveling to
i am traveling to atlanta
when would you like to travel
i am traveling on 4th of march
where are you traveling from
i am traveling from philly
i found 4 flights that are perfect for you. what about american airlines departing at 3:20 pm for $176 per ticket
that sounds good, can you also find me a train ticket to get there
is this for march 4th as well
please looking for 1 flexible ticket departing on the 13th
what about 9:20 am departure for $194
what station will i arrive at
you will arrive at peachtree station
what station am i deparitng from
you will depart from 30th street station
what other train can you find
what about 11:40 am departure for $187
that sounds good, please book a train ticket with travel insurance
please confirm your purchase of 1 flexible ticket from philadelphia to atlanta on march 13th at 11:40 am
yes that is fine. what station will i arrive at and leaving from
you will depart from 30th street station and arrive at peachtree station
ok thank you, this is all i need
see you soon
Can you find a one way flight for me?
where are you going and what day works best?
i'm going to philadelphia on the 7th of this month and i prefer united airlines.
where are you leaving from?
i'm leaving from chicago.
there's 1 flight from united airlines that leaves at 4:25 pm that costs $126.
is it just one ticket?
yes it's for 1 traveller.
when does it land?
the flight lands at 7:36 pm.
okay that works. can you find trains that go there?
do you want it to leave on march 7th?
no, look for the 12th of march.
there are 3 trains for you. there's one that leaves at 8:30 am and costs $108.
where does it leave from and where does it arrive?
it leaves from 30th street station and arrives at chicago union station.
are there no other trains?
there's a train that leaves at 2:40 pm for $97.
that works for me. can you book the train tickets?
do you want travel insurance on the tickets? how many tickets do you want?
yes i want insurance. i just need one seat.
so you want 1 value ticket from chicago to philadelphia on march 12th at 2:40 pm?
yes that's all correct. where does it leave from?
it's been booked. it leaves from Chicago union station.
thanks, that's everything.
see you soon.
I need a one way flight.
From which city to depart from?
Depart from Philly.
On which date and to where?
I am flying from New York City tomorrow.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines at 1:20 PM? The ticket price is $68 and it is direct.
No, I want Premium Economy seats.
There is 1 flight, such as with Delta Airlines and the flight takes off at 3 PM, with a ticket price of $83.
Okay, I need trains.
Would you like to begin travelling on March 2nd?
I need tickets on March 10th.
What about a train leaving at 10:40 AM with a ticket price of $46?
At which station does it reach? Which station does it leave from?
The train will reach at Grand Central Station and will leave from the 30th Street Station.
Any other trains?
There is one to depart at 10:50 AM and the ticket price is $49.
That sounds good.
Would you like to book tickets?
Yes, I would like to make a reservation.
How many tickets would you like and do you have any travel insurance?
I want trip insurance for 1 seat.
So, you would like a ticket on the train to depart from Philadelphia to New York. The train is to depart on March 10th and leaves at 10:50 AM, for 1 person. This has trip insurance and it is a Value ticket.
Yes, that works.
Your tickets have been booked.
You were very helpful. Thanks.
Of course. Take care.
Can you find me a one way flight?
What will be your departure city?
I am leaving from NY.
What are you travel dates? What is your destination?
I want to leave for Atlanta, GA tomorrow.
How about a flight with American Airlines? There is a 9:45 am departure for $133. It is a direct flight.
Is the ticket for one person? What is the arrival time?
The flight lands at 12:07 pm. The ticket is for 1 person.
Can you find me something else?
How about Delta Airlines? There is a direct flight leaving at 4:20 pm. The ticket costs $119.
Can you find me something else? I need four tickets on Economy class.
How about Southwest Airlines? They have a direct flight departing at 9:25 pm. It costs $130.
Sounds good. Can you find me some trains going there? Find some conditionally refundable tickets for the 4th.
How about a 8:20 am train? It costs $729 total.
That sounds good.
Would you like to book tickets?
Yes, make me a reservation.
Will you be needing travel insurance?
Yes, I want trip insurance.
Confirming that you want to book a ticket on the March 4th New York to Atlanta train. You need 4 Value tickets. You will be departing at 8:20 am. Is this information correct?
That works for me.
I have successfully booked your tickets.
What are the departure and arrival stations?
The train departs from Grand Central Station and arrives at Peachtree Station.
Thanks for your helpfulness. That's all I need.
You're welcome!
I need to find a one way flight.
What date would you like to travel?
I'd like to start my travel on March 14th.
Where are you departing from, and where are you planning to go?
I am flying from SD to Los Angeles.
I found a flight with Alaska Airlines that departs at 10:05 am and costs $70.
That sounds good. Can you find some trains going there? Can you find three luxurious seats for the 10th of March?
How about a train departing at 6:50 am that costs $243 in total?
Are there any other trains that may work, maybe on the 13th?
There are 7 trains that may work for you. How about a train departing at 12 pm that costs $241 in total?
That sounds good. I want to book the train tickets.
Do you want travel insurance?
Yes please, I would like insurance.
Please confirm the following details: Purchasing 3 train tickets leaving from Los Angeles to San Diego on March 13th at 12 pm. The seats are business class.
Correct. What station does the train leave from and arrive at?
Your tickets were successfully booked. The train departs from Union Station and arrives at Santa Fe Depot.
Thank you, you have been helpful. That is all I need.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
I will be having a trip so I need to find a one way flight.
Can you tell me the date when you want to have the flight for the travel?
I will be traveling on the 6th.
Can you tell me the city from where you will be flying from?
I will be taking my departure flight from Portland, OR.
Can you tell me your destination?
I want to arrive in Seattle.
How would you like having a direct flight with Alaska Airlines which leaves at 9:45 am, and the ticket of which costs $73.
Can you tell me when the flight will be arriving at the destination, and if it is for four people?
The departure flight will be arriving at 10:43 am, and it is for 1 traveler.
That is okay. Though I am interested to know about trains which go there, and more specifically the ticket should be for 4th of March.
Would you like having the train which leaves at 9:10 am, and the ticket of which costs $62?
That is nice. I would like to buy economy tickets for this train, and I also want to have trip insurance.
Can you tell me the number of tickets you want to buy?
I am in need of just one seat, and for the tickets to be Flexible one.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy a Flexible ticket for 1 person including the trip insurance for the train which leaves from Portland on March 4th at 9:10 am to go in Seattle?
That suits me well.
Your requested ticket has been reserved for you.
Can you tell me the name of the arrival station?
The station where the train will arrive at is King Street Station.
You have helped me a lot, and I want to thank you. That would be all.
Till the other time then.
Hi, could you get me some Premium Economy class one way flights please?
What date will you be departing and where are you heading to?
I will be flying to Washington on the 2nd of this month.
And where will you be departing from?
Likely from Chicago.
There are 2 flights you might like, how about an American Airlines flight departing at 8:35 pm costing $181?
Is this for two people?
No, it is only for 1.
And when does the flight arrive at the destination>
Your flight will arrive at 11:33 pm.
I see, could you find trains heading there too?
And will you be heading there on March 2nd?
No, I will be going over next Wednesday.
How about a train departing at 6:20 am costing $119?
That sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes please, could you get me one ticket with trip insurance, regardless of the fare class?
Please confirm your purchase of 1 value ticket from Chicago to Washington, departing on March 6th at 6:20 am with trip insurance.
Sorry, could you get me flexible tickets instead?
Sure, please confirm your purchase for flexible tickets to Washington.
That is fine with me. Which station am I departing from?
Your reservation has been made, and you will depart from Chicago Union Station.
I see, and where will I arrive at?
You will arrive at Union Station.
I see, thank you for your kind assistance.
Do you need further help then?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
No worries, have a pleasant day ahead.
I am planning to go to Chicago for which I need to find an one way flight. Please search for the one from Philadelphia and book two tickets for me.
What is your planned date of travel?
Search for the flight on next Thursday.
I got 4 flights. What is your opinion to travel on a direct onward flight from American Airlines which is going to take off at 7:30 am for the ticket cost $129?
Yeah, it is okay to me. I also want to search for a train and I need your help.
Please confirm to search for the train on March 7th.
Search it on Monday next week and any class is okay for me.
I got details of a train which is going to depart at 12:10 pm for the ticket cost $169 and what is your opinion about this train?
Let me decide and before that I want to know the origin and destination stations of this train.
This Train will leave from 30th Street Station and will reach finally at Chicago Union Station. Hope this is okay to you.
Yes, this is okay to me. Thanks.
Shall I book the tickets now?
Yes, do it for me and please include trip insurance.
I need your confirmation to book 2 Value tickets on March 4th at 12:10 pm from Philadelphia to Chicago.
Yes, it is confirmed and you can proceed now.
I have successfully booked the tickets.
Thank you so much and that's all I want.
Have a good day.
Hi, could you help me search for a one way flight please?
Where will you be travelling from and to? And when will you be departing?
I will be travelling from Washington to New York on March 12th.
There are 4 available flights, one of which is an American Airlines direct flight departing at 10:55 pm and costing $83.
May I know if this is a Business class seat?
No, this is an economy class seat.
I see, could you get me a train ride for two there instead? Any fare class will suffice.
Will you be departing on March 12th too?
No, on the 1st of march please.
There are 9 available trains, one of which departs at 6:20 am costing $123.
I see, which station will I depart from and arrive at?
You will be travelling from Union Station to Grand Central Station.
Sounds great to me!
Would you like me to book tickets for you?
Yes, could you do so please?
Do you have travel insurance?
Yes please, that will be great.
Please confirm you purchase of 2 value train tickets from Washington to New York on March 1st at 6:20 am.
That is fine with me.
Your tickets have been booked! Enjoy your ride.
Thank you for your help, that is all I need.
See you soon.
I need a one way flight on Alaska Airlines to San Fran.
On which date will you depart and from which city?
Leaving on the 14th from SD.
There is a flight on Alaska Airlines leaving at 9:10 pm with a layover for a total of $143.
At what time will I arrive at my destination?
The flight arrives at 0:50 am.
Great. Can you help me find trains going there?
Will you departing on March 14th?
I'll be departing Tuesday next week.
There are 7 trains. One leaves at 6:40 am for a total of $102.
Do you have any other options for 1 passenger?
There are 6 options. A train departs at 8 am for a total of $97.
Sounds good. Can you book the train for me?
Will you require travel insurance?
Yes, I need insurance.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 value seat on the train from San Diego to San Francisco on March 5th at 8 am.
That one is great.
Your tickets were successfully booked.
What is the departure and arrival station?
The train leaves from Santa Fe Depot and arrives at Salesforce Transit Center.
Thanks, that's all.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
I'm looking for a one way flight.
What is your arrival city?
I'm going to New York.
What is your departure city?
Departing from Washington.
What date are you travelling on?
Departing on the 14th of this month.
There are 4 flights available. There is a direct flight on American Airlines departing at 9:25 pm for a total of $86.
What is the arrival time of the flight and what class is the ticket?
It is an economy seat departing at 10:35 pm.
Great. Can you find me a train to go there?
Will you be departing on March 14th?
Can you search the 10th of March instead?
There are 9 options. A train is departing at 6:20 am for a total of $72.
Great. I need to reserve the train tickets.
Will you need travel insurance?
I already have travel insurance.
How many are in your group?
I only need 1 ticket.
Please confirm you want to reserve 1 value ticket on the train leaving from Washington and arriving at New York on March 10th at 6:20 am.
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets were successfully booked.
What are the departure and arrival stations?
Departing from Union Station and arriving at Grand Central Station.
Thanks for your help. That's all.
You're welcome. Have a nice day.
I need to buy 1 ticket for a one way flight
where are you leaving from and where's the place you need to reach?
I'm departing from new york to land in chicago
when will you start your trip?
on the 4th
there's 4 options you may consider. american airlines has a flight leaving at 11:20 am for $180
okay. look for trains with flexible tickets to reach that place
do you want to depart on march 4th?
sunday this week is okay
you could leave at 6 am by paying a $137 ticket
where am I leaving from?
you'll leave from grand central station
show me more trains that will match my request
you can leave at 6:10 am and it will cost you $145
look for trains leaving on the 13th of this month, I'll only need 1 seat
You can leave on the 7:50 am train and it will cost you $139
what's the final station?
it's called chicago union station
it can be okay
I can buy tickets then
yes, buy them
do you think you'll need the travel insurance
yes, I think it's the best option
confirm the data: you need 1 flexible train ticket to go from new york to chicago on march 13th at 7:50 am. you want to buy the insurance too
yes, you may proceed with the purchase
it's final, you got your ticket
where will I leave from?
grand central station, sir
you helped me bit time, thanks a lot! Goodbye
Talk to you soon! Bye!
Can you search for one way flight for me?
What is your date of departure?
I will be leaving on 11th of March.
What is your destination and the city of departure?
I will be leaving from Berlin to Phoenix, AZ.
How about Delta Airlines, whose onward flight takes off at 3:50 pm and the cost of one ticket is $405?
Can you look for any other flights from SFO?
How about Alaska Airlines, whose onward flight takes off at 11:50 pm and the cost of one ticket is $120?
Okay. That sounds nice to me. Now, I would like to book three fully refundable tickets in a train going there on 6th of March.
What do you think of a train departing at 6 am with the ticket price of $619?
Okay. That train sounds nice to me.
Would you like me to book tickets for this train?
Yes, Please make a reservation with trip insurance for me.
Please confirm: You want me to book 3 Flexible train tickets from San Francisco to Phoenix on March 6th which leaves at 6 am.
Yes, That is correct. Can you tell me the name of the stations it arrives and depart from?
I have successfully booked your tickets and the train departs from Salesforce Transit Center and arrives at Phoenix Union Station.
Thank you for your help!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Find me a one way flight
Whats the travel date and the city of departure?
Looking for flights from ATL on 9th of March
Where are you going?
Going to washington
I got 4 flight of American Airlines. The 2:55 pm departure flight without any layover and costs $123
It is an Economy ticket?
Yes, it is an Economy ticket
Is it for one person, also whats the arrival time at washington?
It is for 1 traveler and the arrival time is 4:46 pm
thats great, get me trains going there?
Is March 9th the start of travel ?
no, Its March 11th
Ok, there is a train leaving at 1 pm and costs $108
ok thats good
should i book the tickets?
yes, please book Value tickets
How many tickets?
I want 2 flexible tickets with insurance
Please confirm: Booking 2 flexible tickets to Atlanta from Washington on March 11th at 1 pm
it works, whats the arrival and departure station?
Your tickets are booked, It arrives at Union station and leaves Peachtree Station
thanks a lot
bye, have a good day!
I am planning a trip. I need help finding a plane ride there.
Where will your trip be? Do you have a preferred travel date in mind? Where will your travels begin?
My traveling plan is to start in SF and go to Phoenix. I want to start my trip on the 7th.
Is Alaska Airlines an acceptable choice for you? They have a flight leaving at 11 pm. It will only cost $116.
I like that suggestion. Thanks.
Are you in need of further assistance?
I'm thinking about taking a train there. See if passes are available for the 3rd of this month pleas passes.e. I will need two
One train available is schedules to leave at 6 am. Both seats will cost $379.
Exactly where will the train drop me off?
The train will take you to Phoenix Union Station.
Is that train my only choice?
No. I found a train that leaves at 6:20 am. This option will have a cost of $357.
Where would this train pick me up and drop me off?
You will be boarding the train at the Salesforce Transit Center. This option takes you to the Phoenix Union Station.
That would be perfect.
I can reserve seats for you if you are ready.
Yes. Please buy the tickets for me.
The option to purchase insurance is available.
That's a good idea. Add the insurance please.
With your permission I will purchase 2 Value tickets. The passes will be good for a train trip from San Francisco to Phoenix. The date of travel will be March 3rd. The time to board will be 6:20 am.
Actually I would like you to purchase fully refundable tickets please.
Do you want Flexible tickets to Phoenix?
Yes. That is what I am requesting.
The passes have been saved in your name for you.
I would like to express the deepest gratitude for your help.
I am here for you always. What else can I help with?
Nothing but thanks for offering.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you locate a one way flight please?
Detail are needed where to from where and when?
March 14th to San Diego and leaving from San Francisco.
Do you use Alaska Airlines they have a direct flight for $106 that departs at 4:20 pm.
When would I get there?
At about 6 pm according to the schedule.
Is that price for just one person and what class is it Business?
No it is Economy class and the price is for 1 person.
That might work okay can you find a train to there that has a Value ticket available?
Will you be heading out on March 14th?
I don't know the dates but I want it for Wednesday next week.
I found 6 contenders, the first leaves at 6 am and is $91.
That could work well.
Should I purchase your seats now?
Yes book 1 seat please.
Will you be getting travel insurance?
If it is the same as trip insurance, I do want trip insurance.
Let me know if this is right you want 1 Value seat o the train that leaves San Francisco on March 6th at 6 am and you are going to San Diego trip insurance is included. did I get it all?
Yes you did.
Your seat is secured.
Thanks much I don't need anything else.
Talk at you later.
i have a plan to travel so will you find me a one way flight.
in which date would you like to travel?
i want to start my travel on 1st of March.
from which city do you need to depart?
i need to depart from San Fran
to which place are you planning to go?
i need to go to LA. I need 1 tickets. Find me Economy class tickets.
i found 5 flights that suits your needs. I like to fly with Alaska Airlines. The onward flight takes off at 12:25 pm and it is a direct flight. the ticket costs $83.
ok that sounds good. i need to find trains going over there.
Whether you will start travelling on March 1st?
no i need to start my travel on the 10th.
there are 9 trains as per your needs. What about the train depart at 6:20 am ? it costs about $89 in total.
whether is there any other trains available?
what about the train depart at 8:40 am ? it costs $92 in total.
ok thats great.
Whether you want me to book tickets in that train?
yes, i want to make the reservation. i need to have trip insurance. i need value tickets.
please check and confirm the following details. Train ticket need to be booked from San Francisco and the destination is Los Angeles. The train leaves on March 10th. It leaves at 8:40 am. the number of passengers is 1 people and it comes with trip insurance and it is a Value ticket
Ok it suits for me. WHich is the origin station of this train ? which is the destination station for this train?
tickets have been booked successfuly. the origin station is Salesforce Transit Center and destination station is Union station.
thanks a lots for your immense help. that's all i need.
Have a wonderful day. bye
I need a one way flight.
What date is it for?
I want it for the 12th.
And what city will you be departing from?
I'll be departing from NY.
And where will you be travelling to?
I'll be travelling to Washington.
There's a 5 pm flight from American Airlines for $92 that is direct.
I'd prefer a different flight.
There's a 5:10 pm flight from Southwest Airlines for $82 that is direct.
That's a good one. How about train options for travelling there. Look for 1 economy ticket for later today.
There are 9 trains available. There's a departure at 7:20 am for $70 you might prefer.
What's the departure station?
The departure station is Grand Central Station.
And what's the arrival station?
The arrival station is Union Station.
I think that's good. Please book the ticket with trip insurance.
I'll book you 1 value ticket for New York to Washington for March 1st at 7:20 am, is everything correct?
Yes, please book it.
I've booked the ticket for you.
Thank you, you've been of great help.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing else, thanks again for being so helpful.
You're welcome, I'll talk to you later.
I am interested to find a one way flight which goes to NY.
Can you tell me the date when you will be having the travel, and the city from where you will be leaving?
I am planning to fly from Washington on the 10th.
How would you like to have a direct flight with American Airlines, which leaves at 9:25 pm, and the ticket of which costs $84.
Can you give me some other alternative?
You might also consider the Delta Airlines direct flight which leaves at 12:55 pm, and with a ticket that costs $85
This one seems nice, though I want to know also about trains that go there.
Will you be having the travel on March 10th?
I will be leaving for my trip on March 12th.
You can have the train which leaves at 6:20 am, and the ticket of which has a price of $66.
This is nice. I would like to make a reservation for 1 seat in this train.
Are you interested in having travel insurance?
Indeed I want to have insurance for the trip?
Can you please confirm that you want to have a Value ticket for 1 person for the train which leaves from Washington on March 12th at 6:20 am to go to New York?
This one suits me well. Can you tell me the station from where the train leaves, and the station where the train arrives at?
Your requested tickets have been reserved for you. The train will be departing from Union Station to go at Grand Central Station.
You have helped me very much, thank you.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. You did really help me, and I appreciate it.
We'll be in touch again!
Hi, could you get me a one way flight please?
And where are you planning to go?
I will need four tickets to Vancouver please.
And what date and which city will you be departing from?
I will be departing from Seattle, WA on March 3rd.
There are 2 flights you might like, how about a Delta Airlines flight departing at 4:10 am costing $250?
Sure, could you get me a train ride there instead?
And would you be travelling on March 3rd?
No, I will be travelling on the 10th instead.
Would you like the train departing at 9 am costing $183?
Are there any alternatives for Monday next week? Any fare class will do.
How about the train departing att 10 am costing $197?
Sounds perfect!
Would you like me to book tickets for you?
No, that is not needed. Could you help me get trip insurance please?
Please confirm your purchase of a Value ticket for 4 from the train departing at Seattle and arriving at Vancouver on March 4th at 10 am.
That is fine with me. May I know which station does this train depart from?
Your reservation has been made, and you will depart from King Street Station.
I see, and where will I arrive at?
You will arrive at Pacific Central Station.
Thank you for your kind assistance, that is all I need.
No worries, have a great day ahead!
I need to look up a one way flight please.
Sure, I can help you with that. Which city do you want to travel to? I would also need a departure date and city?
Ok, I am flying to Las Vegas from SF on the 1st of this month.
I found Alaska Airlines has a flight at 3:40 pm for a price of $95. Would this be acceptable?
No, give me more options. I am flying to SD and I will only require one ticket.
Ok, I understand. I've located 4 flights for you. I would like to recommend American Airlines onward flight departs at 9:20 am, this is a direct flight for a cost of $106. How does this sound?
Sounds good. I would like to also look up trains going there as well.
Sure, Would you be travelling on March 1st?
Search tickets for Wednesday next week and makes sure tickets are conditionally refundable.
Sure! There are 6 trains that may work for you. I show a train departing at 6 am for a cost of $91 total.
I would like Business class tickets. Please give me more options.
Ok, there are 5 trains that fit your request. There is a train departing at 9:20 am for $140 total.
Which station would I arrive at?
This train will arrve at Santa Fe Depot
Look up more option for March 2nd please.
Sure thing! there are 4 trains that may work for you. There is a train departing at 12 pm for a total of $126 total.
Which station does this train leave from and arrive at?
The train will arrive at Santa Fe Depot and will leave from Salesforce Transit Center.
That sounds great. Let's book tickets now, also add trip insurance as well please.
I understand, one moment. Please confirm we are purchasing 1 ticket from San Francisco headed to San Diego. This train will leave on March 2nd at 12 pm and is a Business ticket. It also has trip insurance added.
That is correct.
Your ticket is successfully booked.
That was super easy. thank you
your welcome. will there be anything else?
nope that was all.
ok, enjoy your day
I'd like to have four tickets for a one way flight.
What city would you like to leave from, and what location do you intend to head to? What day do you wish to go?
I am headed to Los Angeles, and I'd like to begin my trip at next friday. Search for flights coming from Phoenix Az.
Do you wish to fly on American Airlines? The onward direct flight leaves at 2:40 pm, and the ticket price is $78.
Get me some other alternative.
Do you wish to fly on Delta Airlines? The onward direct flight leaves at 9:15 am, and the ticket price is $101.
That sounds lovely. I'd like to look for locomotives leaving there.
Would you like to begin travelling on March 8th?
That's fine by me.
What do you think about the locomative leaving at 7 am? The price is $322.
What location does this come to, and what place will it depart from?
The locomotive comes to Union Station. The locomotive comes from Phoenix Union Station.
That sounds fine with me.
Would you like to reserve tickets?
Yeah, I'd like to make the booking with trip insurance.
Please verify the following information: you'd like a ticket from the locomotive departing from Phoenix to Los Angeles. The locomotive departs on March 8th 7 am, and it is a value ticket for 4 people.
That's fine with me.
Your tickets have been reserved.
Thank you for your help.
Could I assist you with something else?
Nope; thank you for your help.
I hope to see you later.
Can you find me a one way flight from Portland, OR for Tuesday next week? I would like a Premium Economy ticket.
Sure. Where would you like to go?
To Seattle, WA.
Would a flight with Alaska Airlines interest you? The flight takes off at 9:45 am and a ticket will cost $104.
That would work, but can you find me some trains going to the same place?
Would you like to travel on March 5th?
No, find me tickets for the 9th of this month.
There are 9 trains that meet your criteria. What about a train departing at 9:10 am with a ticket price of $63?
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to book tickets now?
Yes, let's do it now.
How many tickets would you like? And would you like travel insurance?
I would like to have travel insurance, and I'll only need 1 ticket.
Please confirm the following: You would like 1 value ticket for a train leaving from Portland to Seattle on March 9th at 9:10 am.
Yes, I confirm. Can you also tell me which station the train will leave from and arrive at?
Your ticket has been purchased. The train will leave from Union Station and arrive at King Street Station.
Great. You've been helpful, thanks.
You're welcome. Will that be all?
Yes, for now.
Okay, good bye.
I need to find a one way flight.
Which city will you be departing from?
I need a flight from Los Angeles for 1.
Where will you be flying to? On which day would you like to depart?
I want to leave on the 1st of this month to go to Phoenix, AZ.
Would you like a flight on Alaska Airlines for $84 at 9:45 am.
Sounds great, please find trains going there on the 6th of March.
There are 5 trains. One costs $87 and departs at 6:30 am.
That is perfect, please book conditionally refundable tickets in case something changes.
You want a value ticket for 1 person on March 6th from Los Angeles to Phoenix at 6:30 am.
That is great thanks.
Your ticket has been reserved.
Which station does it leave from? To which does it arrive?
The train arrives at Phoenix Union Station and is leaving from Union Station.
Thanks for all your help.
Can I assist with anything more?
No that is all thanks.
Okay, talk to you later. Enjoy your day.
I need a flight from New York City to Chi-town. I'd like the fly premium economy.
When are you traveling?
Sunday this week.
A flight on Delta Airlines would be $169 and it leaves at 8:55 pm.
What time does the flight arrive?
10:14 pm.
I want something else. And I need just 1 ticket.
I found 2 flights on Southwest Airlines. The first leaves at 11:45 am and the ticket price is $194.
That will be great. I'll need a train to get to the airport.
Are you traveling on March 3rd?
No, March 6th.
I found 6 trains beginning with a train leaving at 6 am for a ticket price of $112.
That will be perfect.
Are you ready to make a reservation?
Yes, I want economy seats.
Please confirm, 1 value ticket on the train leaving fron New York to Chicago on March 6th at 6 am.
Yes, that is great. What station does the train leave from?
Grand Central Station. Your ticket purchase is complete.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I want to go for a short trip for which I need to search for an one way flight. Do you help me.
Of-course. I need to know some more information to search it. What is your planned starting date and place of travel? Where are you going now?
I want to find a flight from San Diego on this Sunday and my planned destination is Phoenix, AZ.
Do you prefer Alaska Airlines? I got details of an onward flight with this Airlines. It will take off at 6:25 am and the cost for the ticket will be $85. Is this okay for you?
Search for some other flights and I want to book two tickets.
What about an onward flight from American Airlines? I got 2 flight details on is going to take off at 8:40 pm and cost of ticket will be $94. What is your opinion on this flight?
Please continue to search for some other flights.
Okay, how about a flight with Southwest Airlines which will take off at 12:45 pm for the ticket cost $92?
Yes, this is okay to me. Thanks. Now please search for a train to go there.
What is your expected leaving date? Shall I search it for March 3rd?
No, I want the train on March 11th.
Okay. There are 5 trains available for that date and what about the one which is going to leave at 11:20 am and the ticket cost will be $154?
That is okay and thanks.
Shall I book tickets in this train now?
Yes, do it for me. I want conditionally refundable tickets including insurance.
I need your confirmation to book 2 tickets in a train which is going to leave from San Diego on March 11th at 11:20 am to the destination at Phoenix. And note that this is a value ticket with trip insurance.
I need to book fully refundable tickets only.
Okay, please confirm to book Flexible tickets on the train which is leaving from San Diego.
That is correct and proceed. What is the destination station name?
I have successfully booked the tickets and it will reach finally at Phoenix Union Station.
And what about the origin station? Thanks for the tickets.
I will leave from Santa Fe Depot.
Thank you so much for your help and that's all for now.
Have a good day.
Hi, could you get me three Delta Airlines one-way flight tickets from Vancouver, BC?
Where to and when do you plan to travel?
I will be travelling to Seattle on the 1st.
Would you like a Delta Airlines flight departing at 6:35 am with 1 layover costing $241?
Sounds great, but could you help me find train rides travelling there too?
Will you be travelling on March 1st too?
No, could you search for tickets departing on the 5th instead?
Would you like a train departing at 6:40 am costing $131?
Are there any alternatives?
How about a train departing at 7:10 am costing $151?
May I know which station will I depart from and arrive at?
You will be travelling from Pacific Central Station to King Street Station.
I see, are there any alternatives then?
How about a train departing at 3:10 pm costing $140?
Sounds great! Could you get me economy tickets with trip insurance then?
Please confirm your purchase of 3 value train tickets from Vancouver to Seattle on March 5th at 3:10 pm.
Sorry, could you get me economy premium tickets instead?
Sure, please confirm your purchase of flexible tickets to Seattle.
That sounds great. May I know which station will I arrive at?
Your reservation has been made, and you will arrive at King Street Station.
I see, that is all I need. Thanks!
See you soon, have a great day ahead.
I have a journey, check one way flights are available
Please give details of destination, date and place of departure?
Going to Washington on 6th of this month from ATL.
Do you prefer American Airlines? It takes off at 2:55 pm and cost $110 and it is a direct flight.
That will be fine. Are there trains going over there?
You need it on March 6th?
No, find one for the 11th.
There is one departing at 1 pm with ticket fare $108
That will be ok.
Are you interested in booking tickets?
Yea, get a reservation with trip insurance.
How many persons travelling?
book 1 seat.
Please check, you need 1 ticket to Washington from Atlanta on the train leaving on march 11th at 1 pm, with trip insurance. The ticket is Value one.
Right, tell me the name of arriving station and departure?
you got seats booked. It arrives at Union Station and leaves from Peachtree Station.
Your service is awesome , thank you.
My pleasure, any more service.
No, thank you.
have a memorable journey.
I'm looking for a one-way flight.
What are your departure and arrival cities and on which date will be you depart?
I'm leaving from NYC and going to Atlanta on the 3rd.
There are 4 options. Is American Airlines okay? There is a direct flight departing at 9:45 am for a total of $139.
Can you please find me some trains going there on the 9th.
There are 7 options. There is a train departing at 7:20 am for a total of $196.
That's one sounds great.
Would you like me to book tickets?
Yes, please reserve for me.
How many in your party?
I only need one ticket.
Do you need travel insurance?
Yes, I do need insurance.
Please confirm you want me to book a value ticket on a flight from New York to Atlanta on March 9th at 7:20 am. for 1 person.
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks for all your help. That will be all.
You're welcome. Goodbye.
I am going on a trip. I'm in need of a plane ride there.
Where will your destination be? Where would you like your trip to begin. Do you have a certain date you prefer to travel on?
My trip will begin on March 1st. My destination will be NYC. I would like to catch a flight from Chi-town on the 1st of March. I only need one ticket.
One available flight I found is with American Airlines. Your plane would leave at 5:05 am. The plane flies direct to your destination. The charge for this flight is $148.
Do you have the time of arrival available.
Yes. You will get to your destination at 8:24 am.
That won't work. Do I have other options?
Another option is with Delta Airlines. There are no stops. The plane takes off at 8 am. The total charge shows as $128.
What time is the plane scheduled to land?
You will get to your destination at 11:19 am.
That is a great option, thanks for checking. Also look for a train going to my destination on the 12th of this month please.
I found a train that leaves at 7:30 am. The total charge is $105.
Do I have an option for an alternate train possible for this Sunday?
Another option I found costs $123. This train leaves at 8 am.
Thanks, that will work great.
I can reserve passes for you if you like?
That would be fantastic. Please book the train.
You are able to get trip insurance if you like?
That is a great idea. Yes, please.
With your permission I will reserve a pass for 1. The train will leave March 3rd at 8 am. You will begin your travels in Chicago and end your travel in New York. The pass will be a value pass.
You have my permission. What is the name of the station I need to catch the train at?
The Chicago Union Station is where your trip will begin. You now own a ticket.
Once again you have really helped me out. I am set for now.
Have a fun day!
I'm looking for 2 one way tickets on an economy flight.
What is your departure city?
Leaving from Washington.
On what date will you depart and what is your destination?
I will be going to Philadelphia Monday next week.
There are 3 flights. There is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 10:30 am for a total of $243.
What is the arrival time?
Arriving at 4:11 pm.
Is there anything else?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight departing at 8:40 am for a total of $232.
Great. Can you find me 3 tickets on a train going there on the 8th of March.
There is a train departing at 6 am for a total of $275.
Sounds good. Can you book me the tickets?
Will you need travel insurance?
Yes, please provide insurance.
Please confirm you want to book 3 value tickets on a train leaving from Washington on March 8th at 6 am and going to Philadelphia.
Yes, that's right.
Your booking was a success.
What are the departure and arrival stations?
The train depart from the Union Station and arrives at 30th Street Station.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all.
Okay. Have a great day. Goodbye.
Book me a one-way flight for tomorrow.
What is your departure and arrival city?
I am departing Seattle, WA and headed to Vancouver.
Delta Airlines has a departure at 4:10 am with a layover and a cost of $244.
That works for me. Find me two trains tickets in any class to get there on the 11th.
Search revealed 9 results. There is a departure at 6:20 am with a cost of $102.
That is good. Get me train tickets and some trip insurance too.
You want 2 Value train tickets from Seattle to Vancouver on March 11th with a departure time of 6:20 am with trip insurance, correct?
That is perfect.
Your order is complete.
Thanks a bunch. That is all.
Have a good day.
I want a one way flight!
Where are you heading?
I want to go to Philly.
On what day do you want to travel? And which city are you leaving from?
I am leaving from Chicago and want to leave on the 6th of this month.
American Airlines has an onward flight that costs $174 and takes off at 5:05 am.
What else is there?
Delta Airlines offers an onward flight that takes off at 1 pm and costs $109.
Sounds great. What trains are heading there?
Will you be departing on March 6th?
No, March 10th.
There are 3 trains that may work. One departs at 8:30 am and costs $109.
What else is there? I want value tickets and change the date to the 1st of this month.
There are 2 trains that may work. One train departs at 2:40 pm and costs $129.
Which station does it depart from? And where does it arrive?
The train arrives at 30th Street Station. The train is departing from Chicago Union Station.
What else is there?
How about the train departing at 5:20 pm. It costs $109.
That works. Book that train.
Do you want travel insurance?
Yes, I do.
How many tickets?
I want just 1 seat.
Please confirm the following: Booking 1 value ticket for the March 1st train that departs at 5:20 pm. The train departs from Chicago and arrives in Philadelphia.
That works. Which station does it arrive at and where does it depart from?
You reservation was successful! The train arrives at 30th Street Station and leaves from Chicago Union Station.
Thank you! Goodbye!
Have a fantastic day!
Find for me one way flight to Chi-town.
From which city you will depart?
From New York I will depart.
On what date you will travel?
I want that my travel to start on the 4th.
You like American Airlines?The onward flight takes off at 11:20 am and has a layover.$180 is the price for thicket.
Sounds very good.Find me trains that goes there on the 13th.
6 trains would be for you.What about one that depart at 6 am and cost $96 in total?
Tell me at which station will arrive.
Will arrive at Chicago Union Station.
Are there any other trains that are good for me?
What you think about one that depart at 6:10 am and cost in total $123.
Anything else you can find?
How about one that depart at 7:50 am and cost $116 in total.
Tell me from which station will leave.
Grand Central Station is the station .
Sounds good.Buy for me tickets with trip insurance.
Tell me how many tickets you want.
I need 1 seat.
You want 1 Value ticket at train that go from New York to Chicago on March 13th at 7:50 am.I'm right?
Yes that work for me.
The purchase is done.
At which station does this arrive?
At Chicago Union station will arrive the train.
Thank you for being so helpful to me.That's all!
See you next time.
Hi I'll be travelling from SF to Phoenix and I need to find a one way flight. I'll be leaving on the 14th.
How about travelling with Alaska Airlines? The departing flight will take off at 11 pm. It's a direct flight and the ticket cost is $123.
That works for me. I also need an economy ticket for a train there.
Will you be leaving on March 14th?
Please find me tickets for this Sunday.
How about leaving at 6 am? The cost for the ticket is $196 all together.
That works for me. Please book me 1 seat on the train. I'd also like trip insurance.
So you'd like 1 ticket for a train leaving from San Francisco and going to Phoenix. The train will be departing on March 3rd at 6 am. It includes trip insurance and it is a value ticket. Is this correct?
That's perfect. What station does it reach and where does it depart from?
The train will arrive at Phoenix Union Station and leaves from Salesforce Transit Center.
Thank you so much for all your help.
Will you be needing anything else today?
No that's all, thank you again.
Have a wonderful day, see you.
I'm looking for a one way flight. I need three economy class tickets.
When do you want to leave?
I'm leaving on the 11th of March.
What city are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from SF.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Phoenix, AZ.
I found 5 flights. There is an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 11:50 pm for $120.
What time does the flight arrive?
The flight arrives at 1:57 am.
Can you find me premium economy tickets?
I found 2 flights. There is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 8:30 am for $188.
That sounds great. I want to find a train there.
Are you leaving on March 11th?
I want to leave on the 1st of March.
What about a train leaving at 6 am for $508?
That sounds great.
Do you want to purchase the tickets?
Yes, thank you.
Do you want to add travel insurance?
Yes, I want to add travel insurance.
Please confirm: 3 value tickets leaving from San Francisco to Phoenix on March 1st at 6 am.
Sounds great. What station does the train arrive at and where does it leave from?
Your tickets have been reserved. The train leaves from Salesforce Transit Center and arrives at Phoenix Union Station.
Thank you, that's all.
Have a great day!
Hey, get me an American Airlines flight from Chicago please.
Where will you go and when will you leave?
I'm headed to Washington on the 5th.
I have only 1 option. It is American Airlines flight leaving at 8:35 pm. It has no stops and runs $102.
Fine, get me tickets on the 11th of March, two please.
On that date, what about departing at 6:20 am? Your total on that purchase will be $195.
Fine, get me train tickets with trip insurance, economy please.
To confirm: You want a train leaving Chicago on March 11th at 6:20 am, 2 tickets. You are going to washington and need a value ticket that is insured?
That's fine, thanks. What station do I board at?
You have tickets and you'll board at Chicago Union Station.
Great, you're helpful.
Have a great train ride.
I need a one-way economy flight from Philadelphia.
Which date are you departing and what is your destination?
I need to go to Chi-town tomorrow.
There is a direct American Airlines flight leaving at 5:45 pm for a total of $120.
Okay. Can you check tickets on a train on the 9th of March?
There is a train departing at 12:10 pm for a total of $107.
What are the departure and arrival station?
The train departs from 30th Street Station and arrives at Chicago Union Station.
Do you have any other options for two regardless of fare?
There are 2 trains available. One is departing at 3:40 pm for a total of $187.
That one sounds good.
Should I book tickets for you?
Yes, please reserve.
Would you need insurance?
No thanks, I have insurance.
Please confirm you want 2 value tickets on the train leaving from Philadelphia and going to Chicago on March 9th at 3:40 pm.
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks for all your help.
You're welcome. Goodbye.
I'd like to find a one way flight from San Diego.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm visiting Los Angeles.
When would you like to leave?
I'll be leaving on the 7th of March.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight leaving at 11:55 pm for $64.
Is there anything else available? That's pretty late.
Southwest Airlines has a flight at 12:20 pm for $67.
Is that an Economy ticket and when will it arrive at the destination?
It is an economy ticket and is expected to arrive at 1:14 pm.
That works for me. I'd like to compare train rates.
Would that be for March 7th.
No, show me what's available for the 1st.
There are 10 trains that meet your criteria. The first departs at 6:10 am and the tickets cost $57.
I'd like to hear some other options for 3 travelers.
The 6:40 am train would be $141 in total.
Are there any departing a little later?
For $131, there is a train leaving at 7:30 am.
Perfect. I'd like to buy tickets.
Would you like to add trip insurance?
Yes, I definitely want to add insurance.
You'd like 3 value tickets with insurance for the 7:30 am train on March 1st leaving San Diego bound for Los Angeles. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your ticket purchase was successful. You'll receive an email confirmation soon.
Where does this train depart from?
It will be departing out of Santa Fe Depot.
Where does it drop off?
You will arrive at Union Station.
Great. Thanks for all the help.
You're welcome. Is there something else I can help you with?
No, that will be all.
Have a wonderful day!
I am looking for buying Economy class tickets in a one way flight to New York on March 14th.
What will be your city of departure?
I am looking for flights from Washington.
There are 4 flights you may like. How about an American Airlines flight, whose onward flight takes off at 9:25 pm with the ticket price of $86?
Is there any other flights?
How about a Delta Airlines flight, whose onward flight takes off at 12:55 pm with the ticket price of $83?
That sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you find me three economy tickets in a train going there next Monday?
What do you think of a train departing at 6:20 am with the total cost as $166?
Can you show any other other trains with business tickets?
I found 7 trains you may like. What do you think of a train departing at 6:40 am with the total cost as $311?
Can you show any other other trains?
What do you think of a train departing at 10:40 am with the total cost as $287?
Can you tell me the names of the stations it arrives at and departs from?
The train departs from Union Station ad arrives at Grand Central Station.
That sounds nice to me. Book me the train tickets with trip insurance.
Please confirm: You want me to book 3 business tickets in train from Washington to New york on March 4th. And the train leaves at 10:40 am.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked your ticket.
Thank you so much for your help!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I need to find a one way flight, can you help me search for one?
What date would you like to depart?
I am planning to leave on Thursday next week.
What cities are you departing from and heading to?
I need to fly from Washington to Atlanta, GA.
I found 4 flights that match your travel plans. American Airlines has a direct flight that takes off at 4:30 pm, with a ticket price of $111.
Are the tickets Premium Economy class? Are there seats for 3 people?
There is 1 seat available, and it is in Economy class.
OK, let's look for a train instead.
Would you like to depart on March 7th?
Look for tickets on March 10th.
There is a train departing at 10 am that will cost $109 in total.
Are there any other trains that we could take?
Another train departs at 1:20 pm and will cost $94 in total.
What station does that train leave from?
The train leaves from Union Station.
What station does it arrive at?
The train arrives at Peachtree Station.
Are there any other trains that could work for my trip? It can be any fare class.
There are 4 trains that match your travel plans. There is a train departing at 1:50 pm that will cost $97 in total.
That one sounds good.
Would you like to book the tickets?
Yes, I would like to reserve 1 seat with trip insurance, please.
You would like to book 1 Value ticket on the train from Washington to Atlanta leaving March 10th at 1:50 pm, is that correct?
Yes, that's right. What stations does this train leave from and arrive at?
Your ticket has been booked. The train leaves from Union Station and arrives in Peachtree Station.
You have been very helpful, thank you, that's all for now.
Have a great day!
I will be flying to Portland, OR today and need a one way flight
Which is the place you will be starting from?
I need to fly from Seattle
I have selected 2 flights of your choice. One among them is Southwest Airlines which leaves at 5:15 am and the ticket cost is $64
I wanted Premium Economy tickets
I have selected 2 flights of your choice. One among them is Delta Airlines which is a direct flight leaving at 5:35 pm and the ticket cost is $121
Cool and i need to search for train to reach there
Are you planning to start traveling on March 1st?
I require tickets for 11th of this month
I have selected 10 flights of your choice. What is your opinion on train departing at 8 am costing total $61?
That is fine
You require ticket booking?
Yes i want ticket booking
Do you also require travel insurance and how many tickets you need?
I wanted 1 ticket and also i need travel insurance
Please give confirmation details: You need 1 ticket on train leaving from seattle to Portland on March 11th at 8 am. It will have travel insurance with value ticket
That is fine
Ticket booking is done
Which is the station you will be arriving?
The train arrival at Union Station
Which is the station train starting from?
The train starting from King Street Station
Thank you very much
Any other help?
No, thanks a lot
See you very soon
I need to find a flight on the 10th.
What is your destination?
I need 3 tickets to NY.
What is your departure city?
Departing from Washington.
There are 4 options. Is American Airlines okay? There is a 9:25 pm flight for a total of $84.
Sounds okay but can you check a train instead?
Would you be travelling on March 10th?
Actually, check for March 6th.
There is a train departing at 6:40 am for $147.
Please book conditionally refundable train tickets.
Will you need travel insurance?
Yes, I need trip insurance.
Please confirm you want 3 value train tickets departing from Washington to New York leaving on March 6th at 6:40 am.
Yes, that's right.
Your tickets were successfully booked.
Thanks, that's all for now.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
I want to go for a business trip and I need to find an one way flight from Vancouver, BC to Seattle. Search for one on the date of 12th of this month.
Is it comfortable for you to travel through American Airlines? I got an onward flight which takes off at 5:10 pm and the cost for the same is $268. Is it okay to you?
Did you search it for Premium Economy class tickets?
It is Economy class ticket and do you want the same?
Let me know the number of persons that you have searched for the tickets and the time of arrival of this flight to my destination.
It will reach to the destination at 2:17 am and I searched the same for 1 person only.
Okay. Search for some other flights which should match my requirement.
What do you think about an onward flight with Delta Airlines which takes off at 6:35 am with layover for the ticket cost $214?
I prefer this flight. Please search for a train.
When do you want to start your travel? Shall I search it for March 12th?
I want the train from March 14th.
Do you like to travel through a train departing at 6:20 am for the ticket cost $58?
Let me decide and I want to know the origin and destination stations of this Train.
Please note that this train will leave from Pacific Central Station and will reach finally to King Street Station.
Please continue your search and find some other trains for four Economy seats.
Got 5 results and what about a train departing at 7:10 am for the ticket cost $215 in total?
Yes, this is the one I want. Thanks.
Shall I book the tickets now?
Do it for me now.
Shall I include Travel insurance while booking the tickets?
I need to add trip insurance.
Please confirm to book 4 Value tickets on the train leaving from Vancouver on March 14th at 7:10 am to Seattle with trip insurance.
That is okay to proceed. Let me know the origin and destination station of this train.
I have successfully booked the tickets to the selected train and the same will leave from Pacific Central Station and reaches to King Street Station.
Thanks for all your information. That's all for today.
Have a good day.
I have to get a flight. I want to get out of Chi-town on Economy with Delta Airlines.
When do you want to go and what is your destination?
I need to get to Washington Friday next week please.
Do you want Delta Airlines on the 6:45 pm for $99?
Can you see what a train would cost me Next Tuesday, two seats, but I want fully refundable ones.
What about the train leaving at 6:20 am, for $249?
What about other trains?
Well, you could take the 11:50 am for just $224.
What is the terminating station there?
You're going to Union Station.
What about a different, more luxurious train?
Well, you could take the 12:50 pm, it costs $278.
What station does this end up at? What station will I depart from?
You're going from Chicago Union Station and going to Union Station.
Sounds fine, Get me train tickets with insurance please.
Can you confirm the detail on this: 2 tickets Business class from Chicago to Washington on March 5th at 12:50 pm, with insurance.
That works great.
You're tickets are all set.
You were really the best at this.
What more would you like?
Nothing, I'm good.
Have a great train trip.
I would like to book a one-way fight.
Where are you departing from and what is your destination?
I'm flying from Vancouver to Portland, OR on the 14th.
There is American Airlines flight leaves at 11:20 am and the cost is $226.
When does the flight arrive to my destination?
The flight reaches destination at 5:48 pm for 1 person.
I would like 2 economy premium seats for tomorrow.
There is a train leaving at 6:50 am for $173.
Which station does it depart from?
The train leaves from Pacific Central Station.
Which station does it arrive at?
The train reaches Union Station.
I would like to purchase train tickets.
Would you like travel insurance?
Yes, I want a trip insurance.
Booking flexible ticket for 2 people from Vancouver to Portland leaving at 6:50 am on March 2nd.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your tickets have been purchased.
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I would like to book a one way flight.
Where are you traveling and when are you leaving?
I'm traveling from SD to Phoenix and I'm leaving on March 2nd with Southwest Airlines.
There is 1 flight with Southwest Airlines leaving at 12:45 pm and the cost is $98.
Is this economy or business class?
It's a economy seat.
I would like to find a train to get there.
Are you traveling on March 2nd?
I would like to leave on the 14th of this month.
There is a train departing at 11:20 am for $84.
Which station does this train leave from?
The train leaves form Santa Fe Depot.
Which station is the destination?
The destination is Phoenix Union Station.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
Yes I would like to make a reservation.
How many tickets do you need and would you like a travel insurance?
I would need a trip insurance for 1 person.
Booking 1 value ticket for train going from San Diego to Phoenix on March 14th at 11:20 am.
Yes, that works for me.
Your tickets are purchased.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Can you please help me find a one way flight.
I can help, but first I'll need a bit of information. Where are you planning on going, which city would you like to depart from, and on what date would you like to travel?
I would like to fly from SFO to San Diego on March 1st. I think that's everything you asked for.
I've found 4 flights that match your criteria. Would a flight with American Airlines that takes off at 10:05 pm and costs $110 work?
Possibly. How many people is this flight for, and when does it arrive at its destination?
The onward flight will arrive at its destination at 11:45 pm and the trip is for 1 traveller.
That sounds fine, but let me check out the trains there.
Would you still like to start travelling on March 1st?
Yes. Find me tickets for the 13th of this month.
There are 7 trains that could work for you. How about a train that departs at 6:40 am and costs $88 in total?
That sounds fine to me.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, I would.
Would you also like to buy travel insurance?
Yes I would.
How many tickets would you like to purchase?
Just the 1.
Please confirm the following details: You would like 1 value ticket for a train from San Diego to San Francisco. The train leaves on March 13th at 6:40 am.
No, I do not confirm. Get me economy premium tickets instead.
You would like a flexible ticket and trip insurance. Is that correct?
No. Make it a business ticket instead.
You would like a business ticket for the train that leaves on March 13th. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct. Can you tell me which station the train leave from and which it will arrive at?
The tickets were purchased without issue. The train will depart from Santa Fe Depot and arrive at Salesforce Transit Center.
Great. You've been most help, I appreciate it.
I'm always glad to help. Will that be all?
Yes that will be all for now, thank you.
You are welcome. See you again.
I will be travelling soon and need a round trip flight, please help me find one.
On what day will you be travelling and which city are you departing from?
I plan to leave on March 6th from LAX.
What day will you be returning and where are you travelling to?
I will be going to ATL and returning on March 13th.
How about travelling with American Airlines? I found 4 flight for you. The departing flight leaves at 3:05 pm. It's a direct flight. The returning flight will be taking off at 7:25 am. The cost for the ticket is $265.
That works well for me. I'll also need a house to stay at.
I managed to find 10 houses that you may like to stay at. There's one with a 4.3 rating located at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest.
That sounds great. I'd like to book that one for 1 person. I want to check out on March 13th and check in on March 6th.
So you'd like to book it for 1 person in Atlanta and check in on March 6th and check out on March 13th. Is this correct?
No, actually I want to check out on the 10th of this month and there will be two people.
So there are now 2 people in your group and you'd like to check out on March 10th. Is this correct?
That's perfect. What is their phone number and what is the total price?
Your house has been booked! The cost is $1,152 and you can call them at +1 404-876-8888.
Are there any attractions you can show me?
I found 10 attractions that you may like. I suggest Al-Farooq Masjid, it's a place of worship.
Is there anything else you can find me?
I suggest a park called Atlanta Botanical Garden.
That's good. Ok that's all I needed, thank you.
Have a great day!
I need a round trip flight from New York City please
What date are you travelling and when are you coming back?
I want to start on the 4th of this month and return on the 14th
Where are you going?
I am flying to Seattle, WA via American Airlines
I found 1 flight on American Airlines that has a 1:40 pm onward flight with a layover and has a returning flight at 4:15 pm for $493, how's that sound?
That sounds good. Now find me a 4.5 rated place or higher to stay in with laundry service
There's a house at 1000 1st Avenue with a 4.5 rating you might be keen on
What's their number?
You can reach them at +1 206-957-1000
OK that's great
Do you want to reserve that house?
Yes please book it
Are you checking out on March 14th or another date?
I want to check out on the 10th, and there will be two of us
Do you want to Check in on March 4th?
I want to check in on Friday next week
Confirming your stay in Seattle for 2 on March 8th till March 10th
Yes confirm that
It has been reserved
How much will that cost me?
It'll be $396 total
Thanks for your help!
What else can I help with?
Find me an attraction to visit
I found 10 uncluding Alki Beach Park which is a beautiful park there
Is it child friendly? Is it free to visit?
No there's an entrance fee but it is a great place for kids
What else can you find for me then?
I found 9 attractions, how about Bill Speidel's Underground Tour, it's a neat Tourist Attraction
I see, ok thanks for the info, that's it for now though
OK got you, thanks!
I need to book a round trip flight please help.
Sure thing, First, I need to know where will you be traveling to and which city will you be departing from? Do you have a preferred date that you want to leave?
Let's search flights from CDMX departing on March 9th and returning on March 11th.
Great! Where would you like to travel to?
Seattle, WA please.
I found a flight on American Airlines departing at 4:25 pm and the return flight will leave at 4:15 pm. This ticket is $386.
I will only need one ticket. Find out if the ticket you quoted me a Business class ticket?
This is for 1 traveller and Economy class seating.
Great, I would also need to locate a house to stay at there. Make sure it is for two people.
I've located a great property at 1000 1st Avenue with a 4.5 rating.
This will be perfect, Let's book it now.
Ok, great, please confirm you would like to check in on March 11th or a different date?
Yes thats great.
Ok, would you like to check in on March 9th?
Yes, that is fine.
Please confirm we are booking 2 people in your group for a check in on March 9th and check out on March 11th in Seattle for a house rental. is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Great news, I was able to successfully reserve this rental for you.
Great, Pull up some attractions there as well.
There are 10 attractions that you may be interested in. Let's start with a park called Alki Beach Park.
Ok, thanks for your help, Good bye!
Ok, Good bye!
Help me book a round trip flight. I could use your assistance on this one.
Tell me what city you will be leaving from.
I'll be flying out of Atlanta for my trip.
Please tell me what city you are heading to. Also. name the dates of your departure and return flights.
I'm going to be flying to Toronto starting Monday next week. I'll fly back on Thursday next week.
There are 2 flights available. If you fly with American Airlines, the flight takes off at 5:10 am and returns at midnight for your return trip. The cost of the ticket is $315.
Is there any other options available? I just want one ticket.
Would you prefer flying with Delta Airlines? The onward flight leaves at 6:50 am in the morning. The return flight will deaprt at 12:50 pm. If you go with this option, the cost of the ticket is $309.
Is this an economy or business class ticket? Tell me when the return flight arrives as well.
This Economy class flight will be returning at 5:06 pm.
That sounds good to me. While I'm there, I want a house for one person with laundry service. See if you can help me.
I have found 10 homes for you. In particular, there is a 4.2 rated house at 108 Chestnut Street.
I'll be needing the contact number for this place.
If you wish to speak with the owner of the property, the number is +1 416-977-5000.
Are there any other options?
With a rating of 3.9, the home located at 111 Lombard Street may meet your needs.
You are correct. This house is exactly what I had in mind.
Would you like me to make a reservation for this home now?
Yes I would actually. I'd like to reserve it before some else does.
Will you be checking out on March 7th or another date? Please let me know.
That should work well with my schedule.
Before I book the reservation, when will you be checking into this home? March 4th?
I'll be staying at that home starting on the 6th.
Confirm your housing specifications. You are booking a house for 1 person in Toronto starting on March 6th. The date you will be leaving is March 7th. Is this correct?
Everything sounds right to me. How much will that cost?
The price of staying from March 6th to March 7th is $132. I have successfully booked your housing arrangements.
I want the contact information for this home.
The phone number for this home is +1 416-675-9444.
Great. Thanks for your assistance. How about showing me some attractions around there?
There are 10 popular attractions that may interest you. There is a 3D Toronto sign that is a very well-known Tourist Attraction.
That does sound interesting. Thank you.
Do you need anything other help?
That's all the help I'll be needing for now. Thanks.
Enjoy your trip. Bye for now.
Help me find a round trip flight.
I can help you with that. Tell me your destination and preferred return date.
My destination is Seattle, WA and I'd like to return on March 7th.
Your departure city, please?
Washington is my departure city, please find flights from there.
When would you like to leave?
I'd like to leave on March 4th. Find me 1 ticket in any class.
Among the 4 suitable flights I found is an outbound American Airlines flight with a layover, leaving at 10:30 am. The inbound flight leaves at 4:55 pm. The price of the ticket is $486. Does this work for you?
That works. Now, I'm looking for a house to stay while there. It must have a 4.5 or higher rating and also offer laundry service.
I found a nice, 4.5 star rated house situated at 1000 1st Avenue.
On what number can I reach this place?
The contact number is +1 206-957-1000.
What other houses for 1 person would you recommend?
How about the nice, 4.5 star rated house situated at 1007 1st Avenue?
This house works for me.
Should I go ahead and reserve this house?
Yes, please book me the house.
Will you be checking in on March 4th?
Yes, that's perfect.
Do you wish to check out on March 7th, or another date?
Yes, that is fine.
We're almost done. Please confirm that you'd like to check into a house for 1 person in Seattle on March 4th, and check out on March 7th.
Yes, that is correct. Tell me the total cost, please.
I have successfully made your reservation. That will be a total of $252.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. Please also recommend some attractions there. I'm fine with any kind.
I found 10 attractions that you may like. I recommend visiting the Park known as Alki Beach Park.
All right. Cool!
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Have a great time!
I want to find a round trip flight.
What day do you want to return?
I want to return on the 13th of this month.
Where are you traveling to?
I'm going to Portland, OR.
What date are you leaving?
I want to leave on the 1st of March.
What city do you want to leave from?
I'm leaving from LA.
Do you want to fly Alaska Airlines? There is an onward flight that leaves at 4:40 am with a layover. The returning flight departs at 5:10 pm. The ticket is $257.
Anything other flights?
What about the Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 10:20 am. It's a direct flight. The returning flight departs at 9:25 am. The ticket is $208.
When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 11:55 am.
Sounds good. I'd like to find a house to stay there.
I found 10 houses. 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street is a great house rated 4.1.
I want to find a house rated 4.7 or higher for 1 person.
There's a house at 425 Northwest 9th Avenue rated 4.7.
That sounds wonderful. I want to book the house and check out on March 9th.
Do you want to check in on March 1st?
I'd like to check in Friday next week.
Please confirm: House in Portland for 1 person. Check in March 8th and check out March 9th.
No I'd like to check out on the 13th of this month. I want to check in on Wednesday next week.
Please confirm: Check in is March 6th and check out is March 13th.
Yes, sounds good. What's the phone number? How much does it cost?
Your reservation has been made. The price is $784 and the phone number is +1 971-351-0230.
I want to find some attractions there. Something without an entry fee, preferably. And something child-friendly.
Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden is a popular park.
What's the phone number?
The phone number is 503-771-8386.
Okay, sounds great.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thank you so much.
Have a great day!
I would like to find a flight from Vegas on the 5th.
Where are you traveling?
I'm flying to LA.
Which day would you like to return?
I would like one ticket and I plan to return on the 12th of March.
There are 3 options. There is Delta Airlines leaving at 7:45 pm and the return is at 4:35 pm for $129.
When does the flight arrive? Is this a economy ticket?
The flight arrives at 5:45 pm and yes it's a economy seat.
I would like to find a house to stay while I'm there.
There are 10 houses. There is one located on 1020 South Figueroa street and the rating is 4.1
Does it have laundry service and what is their contact number?
Their phone number is +1 213-748-1291 and yes they have laundry service.
Is there another house?
There is 10320 West Olympic Boulevard that has a 4.1 rating.
I would like to book this house.
How many people are you checking in with and are you checking in on March 5th?
Yes, on that day and we are three people.
Are you checking out on March 12th?
I would like to check in on the 8th of this month.
Check in on March 8th and check out on March 12th for 3 people in Los Angeles.
Yes, that is correct. What is their phone number and is there a laundry service?
Yes, their is laundry service and the phone number is +1 818-980-8000
Can you find an attraction there?
There is Angels Flight Railway it's a historical landmark.
Ok, thanks for the information.
Can I help you with something else?
No, that is all for now.
Have a good day.
Can you look for round trip flights to SFO for me?
What is the city of departure and when do you plan to return?
I am looking for flights from Atlanta, GA. I need to travel back on the 14th
And what date would you be starting the journey?
I want to start on March 2nd
Is American airlines flight fine for you? There's a direct flight that leaves at 3:45 pm with a return flight at 9:20 pm. The cost is $318
Great. I also need a house with laundry service for one person above 3.5 rating
I have a 3.5 rated house for you at 1095 market street
sounds interesting. Get me its contact number
it is +1 415-829-0000
How about some houses rated 4.5 or higher
there is a 4.5 rated house at 138 king street
that sounds great
Should I make a booking for you there?
Sure, I would like to check out on the 10th
okay. Would the check in date be march 2nd?
No, it is 3rd of this month
Sure, confirm the details please. Booking a place in san francisco for 1 from march 3rd to march 10th
Cool. how much does it cost? I need the contact number as well.
Booking confirmed. The price is $182 and their phone number is +1 415-834-1000
Thanks, I need to find attractions like a historical spot there. Something child friendly and free.
I found 2 places for you. How about Alcatraz, a historical landmark?
Sounds good. That would be all. Thanks!
1My pleasure. Enjoy your trip
I need to book 1 ticket for a round trip flight for my upcoming trip. I prefer a flight on Delta Airlines
When are you traveling and what is your destination?
I will be traveling to Sydney on the 3rd of this month ideally.
And what is your departure city? And do you have a return date in mind?
I'm leaving from Atlanta and I'd like to come back on the 8th. I don't have a ticket class preference either.
There is 1 flight on Delta Airlines for with a ticket price of $542. The departure flight is at 5:50 am and has one stop. The return flight leaves at 10:55 am.
That works for me. I also need to find accommodations with laundry facilities for my visit there.
There's a great place with a rating of 4.1 at 1 Columbia Court, Baulkham Hills New South Wales 2153, Australia.
Can you tell me if there are additional options? The reservation is for 1.
There are 9 places that match your criteria. One is a lovely house with a 3.7 rating at 1 Hosking Place.
Is there a phone number there?
Their contact number is +61 2 9224 6400
Great. I would like to reserve this place!
Sure, with a check in date of March 3rd and until March 8th, or when?
I'd like to check out on the 7th of this month actually, and check in Monday next week
So you would like to reserve for 1 person for the Sydney house, checking in on March 4th and checking out on March 7th. Correct?
That is not right. My check out is Monday next week and check in should be the 3rd of this month
To confirm, check in date is March 3rd, checking out on March 4th, right?
Perfect. That's it. How much is that going to cost?
That booking has been completed. The cost for the reservation is $125
Great, thank you. Now I'd like to find activities and places to see while I'm there
There are 10 attractions you might like. One is a Sports Venue called ANZ Stadium.
Is this a place that is free to enter and can you tell me if it is kid appropriate
There is no entrance free and this venue is appropriate for children
Perfect. thank you!
Will there be anything further?
No, you answered all of my questions. Thank you
take care
I would really appreciate your assistance with this special task, my travel agent friend. Would you help me find a round-trip flight so I can meet my friends for our reunion?
I'll be happy to help you with that. What are the dates you want for your outbound and return flights, and where are you going?
The plan is to catch a flight on the 2nd out of Seattle and return next Wednesday, please.
What's the departure city you want?
Check for a Southwest Airlines flight leaving out of San Francisco.
All right. I'm showing that Southwest Airlines has 1 direct flight, leaving at 12:55 pm and returning at 1:35 pm, with a ticket price of $177.
I see. What's the destination arrival time, and is the fare for an economy or business flight?
The flight destination arrival is scheduled for 3:06 pm in Economy class.
That's a good one. Would you also check for a house that's available for a 1 person stay.
A home, located at 1000 1st Avenue, has 4.5 stars.
Does it have laundry service, and do you have a phone number for the home?
You have access to laundry service and the contact number is +1 206-957-1000.
That's a great choice. Please reserve that home for me.
Okay. Do you plan to check out on March 6th?
Correct, that's my plan.
Is March 2nd your choice for checking in the home?
It certainly is.
Got it. Are you ready to confirm that 1 person will check into the home in Seattle on March 2nd and check out on March 6th?
Oops, I need to change my check in to the 3rd and check-out to next Monday, please.
Okay. I can confirm your check-in date of March 3rd and check-out date of March 4th, if you like.
Please do confirm that, and tell me what my total bill is.
Your hotel reservation is confirmed, and your total charge is $372.
Super cool. Your help is priceless. Now, what can you tell me about a place of interest in that city, somewhere like a park?
Checking on a Park, would you like to consider Alki Beach Park?
Yep, fine suggestion.
Would you like more assistance?
Nope, we're done with that. Your help is much appreciated.
Certainly, and a pleasant day to you.
I would like to book a round trip flight.
What city are you departing from and when are you leaving?
I would like to leave on March 6th from Berlin.
On what day are you returning?
I will need four tickets and plan on returning on March 9th.
Where are you traveling to?
I need one ticket to travel to Phoenix, AZ.
Delta Airlines leaves at 3:50 pm and the return fight leaves at 6:15 pm for $557
Is there another option?
United Airlines leaves t 4:05 am and the return flight leaves at 1:25 pm for $547.
When does the flight reach destination?
The onward flight reaches destination at 4:03 pm.
Is this a business class ticket?
This is a economy class ticket.
I would like to find a house to rent in that area.
There are 10 houses. There is 10 East thomas road that has a 4.6 rating.
Is there another house?
There is 10601 North 56th street, Scottsdale, Arizona 85254, United States that has a 4.3 rating.
I would like to book this house.
Would you like to stay on March 6th to March 9th?
I would like to check out on the 8th.
How many people are staying in the house?
There is one person.
Booking house for 1 person in Phoenix on March 6th to March 8th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation was made.
Can you find a theme park child-friendly attraction?
There are 4 attractions. There is Castles N' Coasters that is a theme park.
Can you find a museum?
There is Arizona Capitol Museum it's, there is 5 museum.
What is their phone number?
Their phone number is 602-926-3620
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I am interested in finding a round trip flight.
Can you tell me the date when you are going to depart, and when you are going to return? Also could you tell me your destination?
I want to go to Chi-town, and I will be flying today, to return next Friday.
From which city will you be leaving for your flight?
I am interested in flights which leave from Washington.
How would you like having the direct flight with American Airlines which leaves at 7:10 pm, and when it returns it flies at 8:35 pm, the ticket of which costs $193.
Can you tell me for how many people you need tickets?
I just need ticket for 1 person.
Do you want your ticket to be an economy class one or a business class one.
The ticket I want should be an Economy class ticket.
Can you suggest something else?
How would you consider having the direct flight with Delta Airlines which leaves at 10:30 am, and when it returns it flies at 6:45 pm, the ticket of which costs $170.
That seems nice. Now I would like to find a house that I can stay in there, which also has laundry service.
A nice house which you consider is found at 1 West Wacker Drive, and has a rating of 4.5.
This house seems good, and I would like to book it. I will need the house till next Friday.
Will you be going there on March 1st?
I actually want to go on March 6th.
Can you tell me the number of people that are in your group?
It is just one person.
Can you please confirm that you want the house in Chicago for 1 person, and that you will go there on March 6th, and will leave the house on March 8th?
That would be nice. Can you tell me how much it will cost me? Which is their phone number that I can use to get in touch with them?
Your requested reservation has been made, and this house costs $504. If you want to call them you can at +1 312-930-0000.
I appreciate your help. Is there some attractions there that you can suggest, and I do not mind what kind of attraction it is.
I found 10 attractions for you to consider, with one of them being 360 CHICAGO, which is a Tourist Attraction.
Alright, though can you recommend some other attraction?
You might consider visiting Big Bus Tours Chicago (Tours begin at 98 E. Upper Wacker Dr.), which is a Tourist Attraction.
Can you give me their phone number, and could you tell me if this place is suitable for kids?
If you want to call them you can at 877-285-4796, and I can confirm that this place is quite appropriate for kids.
Alright, that is good.
Can I do something else to help you?
Nothing. I am grateful for your help.
Have a good time!
I require three tickets for a round trip flight and i will be returning on the 5th
Which is the departing city and when?
I will be starting from San Fran on 2nd of March
which city are you intending to move?
I will be flying to vegas
I have short listed 4 flights of your choice and what is your opinion on American Airlines which takes off at 1:20 pm which is also a direct flight? the returning flight is at 8:20 am with ticket cost $159
what time does flight reach my detination?
The onward flight will be arriving at 2:55 pm
do you mean this is a business class ticket and when is the returning flight arrive?
The returning flight arrival time is at 9:55 am and ticket is Economy class
Any other thing? returning on 6th of March
Do you prefer Delta Airlines which takes off at 5:50 pm and it is also a direct flight and returning flight will be at 4:55 pm with ticket cost at $158
Any other thing?
Do you prefer Southwest Airlines which takes off at 7:15 am and it is also a direct flight and returning flight will be at 12:35 pm with ticket cost at $156
Fine and i also need a house with rating 3.4 or higher for 1 people
I have found a house at 1215 South Las Vegas Boulevard with rating 3.4
Can i get their phone number ad do they provide laundry service?
They do provide laundry service and their contact number is +1 702-489-7500
The house is good
Do you want house booking?
Yes i require to make reservation of house as i will be checking in on March 3rd and checking out on the 5th
Please give confirmation details: The place is Las Vegas for 1 people in your group with check in date on March 3rd and check out date on March 5th
That is fine
Your booking is done
How much is the total cost?
The total cost is $76
Thank you. Can you also show me some attractions like child-friendly Museum
I have short listed 3 attractions of your liking and you can look into Las Vegas Natural History Museum and this is a Museum
That is fine
Any other help?
No, thank you very much
Enjoy and have fun
Get me a round trip plane ticket.
What is your departure and return date and what city are you departing from?
I am departing out of New Delhi Friday next week and will return on the 13th.
What is your arrival city?
I am going to Philly.
United Airlines has departure times of 1:20 pm and 9:35 pm respectively. There is a layover and the cost is $551.
That works for me. I need a house to stay in near there.
1 Logan Square has a 4.5 rating.
That is perfect.
Do you need any more help?
Book that house for 2 people. I will be arriving on the 9th of March and will leave on the 12th.
You want a house reservation for 2 in Philadelphia from March 9th to March 12th, correct?
That is right. Is laundry service available.
Your house is booked and the place does offer laundry service.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
What fun things are there to do there?
Barnes Foundation is a Museum and is 1 of 10 attractions that search found.
What other things can you find? I don't have any preference type.
Bartram's Garden is a neat Park.
How can I contact them?
You can contact them at 215-729-5281.
I see. What else can you find?
Ben Franklin Bridge is a Historical Landmark.
Do kids like it?
Yes, kids love it.
That is perfect. I don't need anymore help right now. Thanks.
Have a fun time.
I need a round trip flight to Chi-Town to return on the 11th of this month.
On which date for travel?
I would like to start on March 9th.
To which city to depart from?
I need flights from New York and need Economy class tickets.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? The onward flight will take off at 11:20 AM and has a layover. The return flight will take off at 5:05 AM and the ticket price is $216.
When will the return flight arrive?
The return flight will arrive at 8:24 AM.
Okay, I need a house with at least 4.6 rating and with laundry service.
There is a nice house at 1118 North State Street with a rating of 4.6
The house is great.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, I need to book a house.
How many people in your party and checking in on March 9th? Checking out on March 11th, or another date?
Yes, that is great. I need to check out on March 10th with one person.
So, location is Chicago with 1 person, check in on March 9th and check out on March 10th?
Yes that sounds good. What's the price?
Your reservation has been booked and the total price is $112.
Thanks for that, I need attractions now.
There are 10 attractions such as 360 Chicago, a tourist attraction.
Are there any other attractions?
You should see Big Bus Tours Chicago (Tours begin at 98 E. Upper Wacker Dr.), a Tourist attraction.
Is this place child-friendly and what is the number?
Their phone number is 877-285-4796. It is suitable for children.
Thanks for all that.
Of course. Enjoy.
Find me a round trip plane ride.
What is your destination and when are you departing and returning?
I am departing March 10th to Seattle, WA and will be returning on the 14th of March.
What is your departure city?
Get me Economy class seats flying out of Phoenix, AZ.
American Airlines has departure times of 4:10 pm and 2:20 pm respectively. The flight has a layover and has a total cost of $344.
What else do you have? Try to find something going to Atlanta.
Southwest Airlines has departure times of 5:15 pm and 5:50 am respectively. The flight has a layover, costs $343 and is 1 of 2 results that I found.
What other result do you have?
United Airlines has departure times of 7:25 pm and 11:50 pm respectively and costs $254 for direct flights.
When will the onward flight arrive and is the price for three tickets?
The price is for 1 person and your destination flight will arrive at 2:37 am.
That is perfect.
Do you need more help?
Find me a house near there for two people that has laundry service and has a rating of 4.3 or higher.
1065 Peachtree Street Northeast has a 4.3 rating and is 1 of 9 houses that I found.
What is their phone number?
You can contact them at +1 404-745-5000.
That is perfect.
Shall I reserve the place for you?
Yes, reserve the house for me.
Are your arriving March 10th?
No, I will arrive on the 13th.
Is March 14th your check out date?
Yes, that is right.
You want a reservation for 2 people at a house in Atlanta from March 13th to March 14th, correct?
That is right.
Your house is booked.
What fun things are there to do there?
Al-Farooq Masjid is a Place of Worship nearby.
Would kids like the place and is it free?
Kids love the place and they do have free admission.
That is perfect.
Do you need more help?
No, that is all. Thanks again.
Have a great time!
Get me an Economy class round trip filght.
What is your departure city and what date are you leaving?
I want 3 American Airlines tickets on the 1st from San Fran.
What is your destination and when are you returning?
I am going to Atlanta, GA and will be arriving back on March 10th.
Search revealed 1 result. American Airlines has a flight departing at 9:20 pm with the return flight departing at 3:45 pm for a total cost of $306.
That works for me. Now, I need a house to stay at while there.
101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest has a 4.3 rating and is one of 10 houses that search found.
That works for me. Book that date for me.
Are you arriving March 1st and leaving March 10th and how many people are in your party?
There are 3 people arriving the day after tomorrow and departing on the 5th of March.
You want a house in Atlanta for 3 people from March 3rd to March 5th, correct?
That is right and can you give me the total bill?
Your booking is complete and the total bill comes to $1,000.
Thanks a bunch. Can you find me some free attractions near there?
Al-Farooq Masjid is a a Place of Worship and is one of 10 locations that search found.
That is perfect.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good trip.
I'm going on vacation and I need to find a round trip flight.
What's your destination and what date would you like to travel?
I'm flying to London, England and I would like to depart on March 1st.
Okay, and what day will you return home? What city are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Philadelphia and would like to return on the 12th.
I found 2 flights that might work. There is an American Airlines flight that departs at 1:20 pm and has a layover. The return flight departs at 12:35 pm and the ticket costs $418.
Okay, sounds good. I would also like to find a house to stay in there.
I found 10 houses you might like. There is a nice house located at 1 Addington Street that received a 4.3 rating.
Any other houses?
I found a nice house located at 1 Baffin Way which received a 4.1 rating.
What other houses are there? I'm looking for something with laundry service and that sleeps two people.
I found 8 houses that meet that criteria. There is a nice house at 1 Ham Yard that was rated 4.5.
Can you give me the phone number for this place?
Sure the phone number is +44 20 3642 2000.
That house sounds great.
Would you like to reserve this house?
Yes, I'd like to book it.
Would you like to check in on March 1st and out on March 12th or a different date?
I'd like to check in on the 2nd of this month and check out on the 7th of March.
Okay, let's confirm the details: There are 2 people checking into the house in London on March 2nd and checking out on March 7th.
No, let's change it to checking in on the 3rd and checking out on the 6th of March.
Okay, just to confirm: Check in will be March 3rd and check out is March 6th.
Yes, that sounds great.
Okay, your reservation is set. The total cost is $504.
Thanks. Can you help me find some attractions there?
You may like 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin) which is a historical landmark.
Okay, great.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No that's great, thank you.
Enjoy!
I am planning on visiting friends and will need a flight. Will you find me a round trip flight?
What date do you plan on leaving?
I plan to leave on the 6th of this month.
When do you plan on returning?
I am coming back on the 8th of this month.
Where will you be departing from and are you going?
I will be traveling from SF to Sydney.
I have found 1 Delta airlines flight that is direct and leaves at 9:35 am. The return flight departs at 2:30 am and the cost of the ticket is $347.
Is this ticket economy or business?
This is an economy ticket.
That one sounds fine. I would like to to stay at a house while I am visiting. It will be for 1 person and I would like it to have at least a 4.2 rating.
I have found 10 houses that meet your criteria. There is one with a 4.2 rating and its address is 1 Kensington Street, Chippendale New South Wales 2008, Australia.
Can you tell if there is laundry service available?
Yes, there is laundry service available.
Perfect. This house should work for me.
Are you interested in reserving this house?
Yes, please reserve the house from the 6th of this month to the 7th of March.
Please confirm you will be reserving a house for 1 person in Sydney from March 6th to March 7th.
That is correct.
You reservation is confirmed.
What are some attractions there I may enjoy?
There is a sports venue that is interesting called ANZ Stadium.
Thank you. That sounds interesting.
Do you need any further assistance?
No, thank you. I appreciate your help!
Enjoy your trip!
I wish to find a round trip Airlines flight
When will you travel? When will you need the return flight? Where do you want to go?
I am moving to NYC on the 2nd and will return on next Thursday.
What is your departing city?
I will depart from Chi-town.
I searched and found 4 flights. Are you interested in layover American Airlines flight? It will take off at 5:05 am and the returning flight will start at 11:20 am. The ticket price is $242.
It is nice. I wish to search for a house to stay.
There is a beautiful house at 100 Greenwich Street with the rating 4.4
Shall I have the contact number?
Their contact number is +1 917-409-0800
Whether the laundry service is available there?
yes. That place has laundry service.
Please find some other house.
There is a beautiful house at 100-15 Ditmars Boulevard, East Elmhurst, NY 11369, USA with the rating 4.2
It is good. I wish to book the house.
Are you interested in checking out on March 7th or some other date? What about on March 2nd? Number of persons in your group is?
It is nice. I will check out on this Sunday. It is for one person.
Kindly ensure that, on March 2nd, 1 ticket has been reserved and the check out date is March 3rd at New York.
yes, It is nice.
Your reservation is done.
Thank you so much for your help. I wish to see some attractions there.
Your check out is 9/11 Tribute Museum. It is a Museum.
yes. Thanks.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
Enjoy the day. Bye.
I wish to have a American Airlines round trip flight from Vancouver, BC. I prefer Economy class.
Where do you want to go?
I wish to go to New York.
When will you like to travel and when will you want the return flight?
I wish to travel on next Friday and will return on March 14th.
Are you interested in flying with American Airlines which will takes off at 11:20 am and the returning flight will be at 9:45 am. The price of the ticket is $475.
What is the arriving time and returning time of flight?
The onward flight will start at 4:16 am and the returning flight will arrive at 4:11 pm.
It is nice. I wish to find a house with laundry service for two persons. It must have 4.0 or higher rating.
There is a beautiful house situated at 100 Greenwich Street with the rating 4.0
Can you search some other house?
There is a beautiful house situated at 100-15 Ditmars Boulevard, East Elmhurst, NY 11369, USA with the rating 4.0
It is nice.
Shall I reserve the house?
Yes. Please. I will check in on March 9th.
Whether you are check in on March 14th or any other date?
I will check out on 10th of March.
Kindly ensure that, on March 9th, 2 persons are going to visit the house at New York. You will check out on March 10th.
Yes. It will be better.
Your reservation is done.
What is the total cost? Shall I get the mobile number?
The total cost is $180. Their contact number is +1 212-248-1100
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other help?
I wish to see some attractions without entry fee. Any type of attractions will be nice.
Your check out is Alley Pond Park. It is a Park.
Okay. It is nice.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. That was highly helpful. Thank you so much.
Enjoy the day.
I need a round trip flight please.
From which city will you depart?
From Cape Town please.
What are your departure and return dates?
I am flying to New York on the day after tomorrow and returning on the 6th.
I found 1 flight on American Airlines at 4:20 am and returning at 6:20 am. It costs $257.
At what time will my outgoing flight arrive at the destination? When will the incoming flight arrive?
The incoming flight arrives at 2:11 am and the return flight will be here at 7:57 pm.
Sounds great, I need a house for three people.
There are 10 available at 100 Greenwich Street and is rated 4.4.
Are there other houses for 2 that are rated 4.0 or higher?
There are 9 house available. One is 100-15 Ditmars Boulevard, East Elmhurst, NY 11369, USA and is rated 4.0.
Can I get a contact phone number please?
The number is +1 718-512-0248.
Do they have laundry service?
Yes they do have laundry service.
Sounds great, I want to book a house from the day after tomorrow until the 6th.
You need tickets for 2 to New York from March 3rd until March 6th, is that correct?
Yes that is perfect.
Your reservation has been made.
What is the total?
The total is $1,044.
Thank you, can you also find me some attractions with no entry fee.
There are 10, one is a park called Alley Pond Park.
Great, that is all I need at this time.
Enjoy!
I need a round trip flight
What is the city of departure? What day do you want to leave and what day do you want to return?
The city of departure is Berlin. I want to leave on next Tuesday and I want to return on 13th of this month
What is the destination city?
I want to go to Chi-town
With American Airlines the onward flights takes off at 2:55 am, with layover, and the returning flights takes off at 4:35 pm. It costs $507 in total
Are there other flights available? Any class is fine
There are 2 flights. With Delta Airlines the onward flight takes off at 3:50 pm, with layover, and the returinig flights takes off at 7:35 am. It costs $515 in total
What time is the onward flight scheduled to land?
It's scheduled to 3:57 am
Very good! Now I need a house there, with a rating of 4.5 or higher.
There's a house at 1 west wacker drive with rating 4.5
Yes, It's fine for me! I want to book there
Is the check-out date March 13th?
Yes, It's correct.
For how many people?
I need for 1 people
Is the arrival date March 5th?
No, It's March 9th
A house for 1 people in Chicago, from March 9th till March 13th. Is it correct?
Yes, it's correct. Thanks
The house has been booked
I would like to find attractions for children, of any kind it's fine
There's 360 CHICAGO, a Tourist Attraction
Good. Do you have any other suggestions?
There's Big Bus Tours Chicago (Tours begin at 98 E. Upper Wacker Dr.), a Tourist Attraction
Yes, It's fine for me! It's all for now, thanks!
Have a good day
Can you please help me find a round trip flight?
Sure, but first please tell me when do you plan to return.
I plan to return on the 12th.
Now please tell me when do you plan on travelling as well as your departure and destination.
I want to fly out of New York towards Atlanta on the 9th of this month.
There are 4 flights matching your criteria, out of which I'd recommend a direct American Airlines flight taking off at 9:45 am, with the returning flight at 10:55 pm. Total ticket price is $201.
Anything else available in Economy class?
There are 3 flights matching your criteria, out of which I recommend a direct Delta Airlines flight taking off at 4:20 pm with the return flight taking off at 6:05 am. Total ticket price is $179.
Can you please tell me the landing times for both the onward and return flights?
Sure, the onward flight lands at 6:42 pm and the return flight at 8:27 am.
Sounds perfect. Let's now find a house to stay there.
I recommend a very nice, 4.3 rated house at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest.
Could you give me a contact number for the house?
Yes, you can reach them at +1 404-524-5555.
Anything else available, preferably rated 4.6 or higher?
There's a nice 4.6 rated house at 1414 West Peachtree Street Northwest.
This is perfect.
Do you want me place a reservation for you for this house?
Yes, please do.
OK, please tell me how many persons will be staying at the house, as well as the check in and check out dates. Are you planning to check in on March 9th and check out on March 12th?
2 persons will be staying at the house and I'd like to check in on the 10th and check out on March 11th.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book a house for 2 persons in Atlanta, checking in on March 10th and checking out on March 11th?
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me the total price as well as if they have laundry service?
I've successfully placed your reservation which is priced at $432, but unfortunately they do not provide laundry service.
Can you please find me some child-friendly attractions there, a Nature Preserve if possible?
There's a Nature Preserve you should definitely check out, the Georgia Aquarium.
Do they charge entrance? Do you know their contact number.
Yes, they do charge entrance and you can reach them at 404-581-4000.
Great, thanks! That will be all for now.
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
I need a round tripl flight from LAX to Paris returning on 14th of this month
What is the departure date?
I want to leave on 10th of this month
There's an American Airlines flight at 3:30 pm with a layover, the returning flight takes off at 7:15 am. It costs $513 in total
What time does the flight arrive?
It arrives at 1:48 pm
I want one ticket in economy class: what flights are available?
There's a United Airlines flight at 8 pm with layover, with return at 6:05 am. The ticket costs $517
What time is the landing scheduled? What time does the return flight arrive?
The onward flight is scheduled for 6:18 pm. The arrival of the return flight is scheduled for the 5:15 pm.
Good! Now I want to find a house for one people there, with laundry service. I prefer a rating of 3.9 or higher.
There's a house with rating 3.9 at 1 Rue Bayard, 75008
Are there houses with rating 4.4 or higher?
Sure! There's a house with rating 4.4 at 10 Rue de Passy, 75016
Very well! It's fine for me!
Do you want to book this house?
Yes, I want to book there from 10th of this month to 14th of this month
A house for 1 people in Paris, from March 10th till March 14th. Do you confirm?
No, I prefer to check in on 12th of March and check out on 13th of March. Thanks
Please confirm: check in on March 12th and check out on March 13th
Yes, It's correct! How much does it cost in all? What is the house phone number?
It costs $315 in total. The phone number is +33 1 43 87 10 10. The reservation has been made!
Can you find attractions there?
I found 10 attractions, for example there's American Church in Paris, a Place of Worship
Ok, I like it!
You need anything else?
No, It's all for now. Thank you!
Have a good time!
I am looking for an economy flight on the 6th of this month to LAX.
Where would you be leaving from?
I want three tickets and I will be leaving SFO.
When would you like to travel?
On March 1st.
There are 4 available flights. You can leave on Alaska Airlines at 12:25 pm and return on 11:55 am. The ticket costs $145.
Ok, great. I would need a house to stay in when I get there.
There are 10 options available. There is a lovely house on 1020 South Figueroa Street that has a rating on 4.1.
I do not like that street. Is there anything else available?
There is a lovely house at 10320 West Olympic Boulevard that has a rating of 4.1.
That would be great. I want to book a house for one on March 1st.
Do you want to check out on March 6th or another day?
I want to leave on the 4th.
You would like a house for 1 in Los Angeles. You want to check in on March 1st and check out on March 4th?
Yes, that would work.
I have made the reservation.
May I have a contact number and what is the total cost?
The number is +1 818-821-8031 and the price is $384.
Thanks a lot. Is there anywhere I can take my kids that has no entry fee?
There are 10 sites that they might like. There is a Historical Landmark called Angels Flight Railway.
Is there a contact number?
You can call 213-626-1901.
That would be fine. That's all.
Enjoy your time.
I need help finding a roundtrip flight.
OK, What are your travel dates and where would you like to go?
I want to fly to SFO on the 4th and fly back on the 10th of March.
What city will you be flying out of?
I will be leaving from Seattle the day after tomorrow and prefer Southwest Airlines.
Southwest Airlines has 1 direct flight that leaves at 1:35 pm. Your return flight would depart at 12:55 pm and the ticket price is $198.
Great. I also need to rent a house there for just 1 person.
I found a great house with a 4.0 rating at 1095 Market Street.
What is the phone number for that house?
They can be contacted at +1 415-829-0000
I like that place!
Should I reserve the house for you?
Yes, please make a reservation beginning on the 4th.
Will you be leaving on March 10th?
No, I only need the house until the 5th of this month.
Ok. You would like to reserve this house in San Francisco from March 4th to March 5th for 1 person, is that correct?
Yes.
Your reervation has been made.
Thanks! Is there a historical spot you can recommend to see?
Yes, Alcatraz is an interesting historical landmark you may like to visit.
That sounds good.
Great. Do you need anything else for your trip?
No, that was all.
Have a reat trip!
Can you buy me 3 tickets to a round trip flight on this Saturday.
What is your destination and the date of return?
My destination is Paris and I will be returning on the 14th.
Which is your city for departure?
I will be leaving from LAX.
How about an American Airlines flight, whose onward flight takes off at 3:30 pm and the returning flight takes off at 7:15 am and the total cost of the ticket is $521?
Can you tell me the arrival time for the return flight?
The time for the arrival of the returning flight is 5:15 pm.
That sounds nice to me. Find me a nice house to stay there.
I found 10 nice houses. How about a house with 4.5 rating located at 1 Rue Bayard, 75008?
Find me their contact number.
You can call them on +33 1 53 75 62 62.
Can you confirm whether they have laundry?
Yes, The house has laundry service.
Can you show me any other house?
How about a nice house with 4.1 rating located at 1 Rue Daunou, 75002?
Okay. This house sounds great to me.
Do you want me to reserve this house for you?
Yes, Please reserve this house for one people with check in date as Monday next week and check out date as 7th of March.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a house in Paris for 1 people with the check in and check out date as March 4th and March 7th respectively.
No, Please change the check out date to 9th of this month and the number of people to 4.
Please confirm: you want me to reserve a house for 4 people with the check out date as March 9th.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully made the reservation.
Okay. Find me some nice attractions there.
How about a place of worship called American Church in Paris?
Okay, That sounds great to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I am searching for a round trip United Airlines flight on Monday next week.
Where do you want to go? From which city do you want to start?
I am searching for flights from Atlanta to San Fran.
When will you return?
I need three tickets. I will return on March 10th.
Are you interested in flying with United Airlines flight? It will take off at 9:45 pm and the returning flight will take off at 9:20 am. The price is $421.
It is nice. I wish to search for a house.
I searched and find 10 houses for you. There is a nice house situated at 1095 Market Street with the rating 4.0.
It is nice. Please book the house.
Are you interested in check in on March 4th?
I will check in on 7th of March.
Whether your check out date is March 10th or some other date?
Yes. It is nice.
How many people are there?
I need it for two persons.
Kindly ensure that, The home is for 2 persons at San Francisco. Your check in is March 7th and check out is March 10th.
Nope. I wish to check out on the 8th and it is for one person.
Kindly ensure that, the check out is on March 8th and it is for 1 person.
Nope. I wish to check in on Monday next week.
Kindly ensure that, the location is San Francisco and the check in is on March 4th.
Yes. It is good.
Your reservation is booked.
Thank you so much for your help. I wish to see some attractions which are child friendly.
Your check out is Alcatraz. It is a Historical Landmark.
Okay, nice.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. You are highly helpful. Thank you so much.
Enjoy the day.
I need help finding a round trip flight on American Airlines for the day after tomorrow. I'm travelling from London.
Where are you travelling to? And when do you want the return flight to be?
I'm going to San Fran and I want to return on Friday next week.
There's 1 flight for $564 with American Airlines. The onward takes off at 12:45 pm and it does have a layover. The return flight takes off at 4 am.
What's the arrival time for the onward flight?
It is 1:05 am.
Okay, nice. I also need a house when I'm there for 4 people, something rated 3.9 or higher.
There's a nice 3.9 rated house at 1095 Market Street.
What's their phone number?
You can reach them at +1 415-829-0000.
Okay, that house seems pretty nice.
Do you want to reserve it?
Yeah, I do.
Will check in be on March 3rd?7
No, I want it starting on the 4th of March.
And will check out be on March 8th?
I want it until next Thursday.
I'll reserve you the house in San Francisco for 4 people, check in on March 4th and check out on March 7th, is that right?
Yes, please do that.
I've reserved the house.
How much is it altogether?
It is $528 altogether.
And is there laundry service there?
Yes, there is laundry service.
Thanks a lot. I also want to find attractions when I'm there, any kind, but it has to be okay for kids also.
There are 10 attractions that match. There's Alcatraz which is a Historical Landmark.
What's their telephone number?
You can call them at 415-561-4900.
Sounds good.
What else can I help you with?
Nothing else, thanks for the help.
Enjoy your trip!
I need to fly with Delta Airlines and require 3 tickets for round trip
Which is your preferred travel date and which place you start?
I will be traveling on later today and please look for LAX flights
Which place are you traveling and when are you planning to return?
i will be flying to San Francisco and will be back on March 10th
I have short listed 1 flight for you and how about direct flying with Delta Airlines which takes off at 9:05 pm and returning at 9:45 am with ticket cost $136
This is cool..Would you find me a house to stay there.
I have selected 10 houses of your choice. One among them is located at 1095 Market Street with 4.0 rating.
Do you know some other hotels with rating 3.5 or higher and it is for 1 people.
There are 9 houses of your choice. One nice hose is located at 1100 Market Street Hotel entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street with rating 3.5.
This is perfect.
Are you like to book this house?
Yes, i want to book this house and like to check out on march 6th.
You want to check in on march 1st?
No, i want to check in on the 2nd.
Please give confirmation details: Your house booking in the location San Francisco for march 2nd to march 6th and it is for 1 people.
Perfect...Is there a laundry service in this place? Could you tell me the contact number of this house?
Yes..there is a laundry service and phone number is +1 415-771-3000. Your house booking is confirmed.
Thanks for the help. Do you know some attractions there?
There is a Historical Landmark called Alcatraz.
Okay..fine..bye for now.
Have fun..
I need a round trip flight for the 10th. I'm leaving from San Francisco.
What day are you returning?
I'm returning on the 14th.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Phoenix, AZ.
Is American Airlines okay? One flight takes off at 12:50 pm with one layover. The returning flight leaves at 4:35 am. A ticket would cost $282.
Good. I want a place to stay there.
One is located at 10 East Thomas Road with a 4.6 rating.
That's a good one.
Would you like to reserve it?
Yes I would.
Are you checking out March 14th or another day? Are you checking in on March 10th?
Yes. I'm checking in on the 12th of March.
How many people is it for?
It's for 2 people.
A home for 2 in Phoenix. Checking in on March 12th and checking out March 14th. Is this right?
No, it's just for one person.
A home for 1. Checking in on March 12th. Is this right?
Yes, that's it.
Your reservation has been made.
I want to see some attractions there. I want something free.
Arizona Science Center is a museum there.
What else is there?
Dream City Church * Phoenix is a place of worship there.
That's a good one.
What else do you need?
That's all. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
I would like to search for flight information for a round trip I'm taking soon
What is your destination and return date?
I need to go to Seattle, WA and I plan to come back on Wednesday next week
And do you have a departure date?
Sure. I would like to leave later today
And what is the departure city?
I am leaving from Chicago
There is an American Airlines outbound flight leaving at 7 pm and flying non-stop, with a return flight that leaves at 5 am. The fare for this flight is $283.
Are there other choices?
Sure. There is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 5:50 am and coming back at 4:25 am. The price of this flight is $382.
Can you tell me if the ticket is economy or business class, as well as the number of persons included?
This is for an Economy class ticket for 1 passenger.
Are there more options?
Yes. Southwest Airlines has a non-stop flight departing at 6:40 am and coming back at 3:10 pm. The fare for this flight is $263.
Great. Can you also look for housing options there.
There are 10 places that you may be interested in. One is a house that has a 4.5 star rating and is located at 1000 1st Avenue.
Perfect. That works for me. I'd like reserve this option beginning Saturday this week and checking out Wednesday next week for 1 person.
Okay then. You want to make a reservation for the Seattle location, checking in on March 2nd and leaving March 6th, for 1 person, correct?
Perfect. That works for me
Your accommodations have been confirmed.
Excellent. Thanks so much. What about attractions in the area. Can you search for some free options?
There are 10 tourist attractions that you might like. One is Bill Speidel's Underground Tour which is considered a Tourist Attraction.
That's sounds good. That's everything at the moment. Thanks again.
Have a nice day.
find me a round-trip flight.
What date will you travel on?
I'll leave today.
What city will you leave from and where are you going?
I will go to Chi-town from London, UK.
What day will you return?
Make the return 3rd of March.
how about American Airlines? That outbound flight will take off at 12:45 pm. and it has a layover. The return flight leaves at 1:25 pm. This is a $627 ticket.
That's good. Find me a house stay there.
I have 10 houses that should work for you. How about a nice house with a 4.4 rating on 1 South Franklin Street?
Is there a laundry service there?
No, there is no laundry service.
That works though. Book me this house for the 2nd.
Would you like to check in on March 3rd or another day?
Yes, that will work.
How many people will be in your party?
There are two people in my party.
could you confirm that you want to go to Chicago and that there are 2 in your group? You will check in on March 2nd and check out on March 3rd.
Sounds good to me.
Your reservation was made successfully.
Could you give me a phone number?
The phone number is +1 312-776-2509.
what is the price in total?
The price and total is $348.
Thank you for helping. Will you show me some attractions there? I'd like a child friendly attraction.
How about 360 Chicago? It's a tourist attraction.
Cool, but do you have anything else?
check out the tourist attraction Big Bus Tours Chicago (Tours begin at 98 E. Upper Wacker Dr.).
Is there anything else that you can think of?
What about Burnham Park? That's a park.
Will you tell me their phone number?
The phone number is 312-742-8520.
Thanks.
Could I assist with anything else?
No, that's it. You've been a great help thanks
Have a good one.
Please help me to find a full circle flight.
I would be happy to assist. First I need to know the travel dates and the locations.
The trip will be to ATL from LA. The 3rd of this month is my preferred day of travel.
When are you hoping to catch the flight coming back?
The 10th of March will be my date to come back.
I have populate 4 suitable options. One is with American Airlines if that company is one you like. The itinerary states you would leave at 3:05 pm and come back at 7:25 am. This choice has no stops and costs $298.
I see. Will you also assist me in finding a house at the location.
Of course. 10 are showing up in my search. One home, with a rating of 4.3, is located at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest.
I like that home.
I am able to reserve the home for you if you like.
That is a great idea. Please make a reservation.
I need more details.How many people will be in your party? Will the reservation begin March 3rd?
The reservation should begin on March 4th. There will be 4 of us staying.
Will you need the reservation until March 10th or an alternate date?
I would like the reservation to be until the 9th please.
I am under the impression the reservation will be for 4 . You would like to start the reservation in Atlanta on March 4th and end the reservation on March 9th. Am I right?
That is exactly what I want, thanks.
The home is booked in your name.
That's a load off my shoulders. Are there any fun happenings in the area?
I found 10 interesting things to do. I would suggest going to Al-Farooq Masjid, a Place of Worship.
Nice. I will check back with you later. Bye.
Until we chat again.
I need help finding a flight.
what's your return date?
I'd like return on March 9th.
Tell me your departure and destination cities, please.
I'm travelling from SFO to ATL. Find flights on that route.
When would you like to leave?
I'd like to depart on Wednesday next week.
Your search yielded 4 suitable flights. There's an outbound American Airlines flight with a layover leaving at 4:55 am. The inbound flight leaves at 3:45 pm. The cost per ticket is $379. Would you like this flight?
How many people is it for? Two?
No. It is for 1 passenger.
All right. Now please find me a house for 3 people to stay over there. It must be rated 4.0 stars or higher, and must offer laundry service.
I found 10 houses meeting your requirements. How about the nice 4.0 rated house situated at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest?
Please let me have the phone number for this place.
You can call them at +1 404-524-5555.
This house is perfect.
Should I go ahead and reserve this house?
Yes, please reserve me the house.
When would you like to check out? March 9th or another date?
I'll be checking out on the 8th.
Will you be checking in on March 6th?
I plan on checking in on 7th of this month.
All right. Your party of 3 is checking into a house in Atlanta on March 7th, and checking out on March 8th. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
What attractions do you recommend there?
I found 10 attractions that you might like. I recommend Al-Farooq Masjid, which is a Place of Worship.
Do you have their contact number? Does this place welcome children?
Their contact number is 678-886-3457. Yes, the place is child-friendly.
All right. Cool.
Will there be anything else?
No. You've been very helpful. I appreciate it.
Have a good time!
I want to find a round trip flight.
Which is the date that you want to have the trip, and also which is the day that you are going to return? Can you tell me the city from where you will be leaving?
I will be having the flight on 1st of March, and I want to return on 13th of this month, my onward flight is from SFO.
Can you tell me your destination?
I want to have three tickets for a flight which arrives in Seattle.
How would you like having a flight with Alaska Airlines, which is a direct flight that leaves at 10:30 pm, and when it returns it departs at 3:35 pm, and that has a price of $193?
That seems nice, though I also need to find a house for three people so that we have a place to stay there.
There are 10 houses which you might consider, a nice house with a rating of 4.5 can be found at 1000 1st Avenue.
Can you tell me if this house has laundry service?
I can confirm that there is laundry service there.
This house seems as a good choice.
Do you want to book this house for you?
Yes I want this house booked for me.
Will you be going there on March 1st?
I actually want to go there on Saturday this week.
Will you be leaving the house on March 13th or some other date?
In fact I want to leave the house on the 8th.
Can you then please confirm that you want to have a house for 3 people in Seattle, and that you are going there on March 2nd, and will need the house till March 8th?
Yes, that is what I want.
Your requested reservation has been made.
Can you tell me about some attractions there?
You might consider visiting Alki Beach Park, which is a Park.
Does this attraction have a free entrance? Which is the phone number I can use to get in touch with the?
If you want to call them you can at 206-684-4075, though the entry to this attraction is not free of charge.
Alright, nice. That's all I needed for now, goodbye!
Have a good time!
I need a round trip flight.
When are you traveling? Where are you going?
I am going to New York on the 9th of March.
What day would you like to return?
The 11th.
What city are you leaving from?
London, UK.
Do you like Delta Airlines? They have a flight that leaves at 9:40 am. The returning flight leaves at 8:50 pm and the ticket is $360.
How many people? What is the ticket class?
It is the price for 1 person in economy seating.
Perfect. Please find me a home for 1 to stay in while I'm there that offers laundry service. The rating must be higher than 4.4.
111 North 12th Street, Brooklyn is rated 4.4.
What is the phone number?
+1 718-631-8400.
Please book me that home beginning on the 9th of March until the 11th.
Your reservation for 1 in New York begins on March 9th and ends on March 11th. Is that correct?
No, I need to check out on the 10th of this month.
Please confirm, reservation in New York, checking out on March 10th.
Yes, that is correct. What is the total cost?
Your reservation is complete. The price per night is $68.
I want to find something free to do there.
I found 10 free attractions like Alley Pond Park. It is a popular park in NYC.
Thanks! That is all I need
Have a nice day.
I'm searching for a round trip flight.
What metropolis would you like to leave from? When do you wish to go on the return flight?
Search for flights out of Philadelphia that return on the 10th of this month.
What location do you intend to go? When do you wish to go?
I am traveling to New Delhi and I'd like to begin my trip on next Monday.
I discovered 1 flight for you. Do you wish to fly on United Airlines? The onward flight leaves at 9:35 pm, and the return flight is at 1:20 pm. It has a layover, and the price is $545.
Is the flight for 4 people? What time will the returning flight come?
It is for 1 person, and the returning flight comes at 9:01 pm.
That's lovely. I'd like to look for a residence to stay there for 1 person.
There's 10 residences matching your query. There is a lovely residence situated at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi, with a 4.4 rating.
Does the residence possess laundry service? Could I get the phone number for this place?
This residence does possess laundry service, and the contact number is +91 11 3955 5000.
This residence is lovely; I'd like to reserve the place.
Do you wish to check in on March 4th?
Yeah, that's be lovely. I'd like to check out on the 10th of this month.
Please verify the following information: the place is Delhi, and there is 1 person in the group. The check in day is March 4th, and the check out date is March 10th.
Yeah, that'd be fine.
Your booking is complete.
How much does it cost?
The cost is $2,160.
Thank you for your assistance. Could you tell me about several attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that may be interesting. You ought to try the Adventure Island, which is a theme park.
Alright, that's fine.
Could I help you with something else?
Nope; thank you for your assistance.
Enjoy your day!
Can you find me round trip flights?
What will be the city of your departure, date of journey and return?
I will traveling from Seattle, WA on 4th of March and will return on Wednesday next week.
And what is your destination?
I will be traveling to SD.
There are 3 flights you might want to fly with. How about a delta airlines flight, whose onward flight takes off at 4:10 am and return flight takes off at 6:15 pm? And the total cost for the ticket is $358.
Can you tell me the timing for the arrival of the return flight?
The time for the arrival of the return flight is 11:31 pm.
That sounds good to me. Can you find me a house with laundry service and it should have a rating of 4.2 or higher?
I found 10 houses you may like. How about a house having 4.2 rating located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States?
Find me their contact number?
You can call them on +1 858-224-7600.
Okay, That sounds good to me.
Do you want me to reserve the house for you?
Yes, Please reserve the house for me.
Will you check out on March 6th or any other date?
There are four people in my group and will be checking out on 5th of March.
And Are you going to check in on March 4th?
Yes, That is correct.
Please confirm: You want me to book a house for 4 people in San Diego with the check in and check out dates as March 4th and March 5th.
Yes, That works for me. Also find me the total price.
I have successfully made the reservation and the total price is $560.
Okay. Now show me some nice child-friendly attractions there.
There is a nice theme park called Belmont Park.
Okay. That sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I have planned to go for a trip and I want your help to search for a round trip flight.
To which place you want to search for the flight?
I am planning to go to Phoenix, AZ. Search for the one to go there.
I want to know more information to search. Let me know the date and place from where you want to start your travel and what is your return date of trip.
Search for the flights from CDMX on Wednesday next week and I am planning to return on 8th of this month.
Searched and got 2 results. What about your opinion to fly on a onward flight from American Airlines which will take off at 3:05 am and take off time of return flight will be at 5:40 am under ticket cost $403?
Search for some other flights which should match my requirements.
What about your opinion to fly on a onward flight from Delta Airlines which will take off at 3:10 pm and take off time of return flight will be at 9:15 am under ticket cost $406?
What is the time of arrival of this place to the destination and tell me whether you have searched for Business class tickets?
It is Economy class ticket and the flight will reach your destination place at 10:47 pm.
That is okay. Now, I want to search for a nice house to stay there and I need the same with 4.1 rating or higher for one person.
got 10 results and what about a house at 10 East Thomas Road with 4.1 rating?
This is perfect.
Any other help you want from me?
Yes, pleas book the house for me.
Shall I book it from March 6th to March 8th?
Yes, go ahead.
Need your final confirmation to book a house for 1 person in Phoenix on from March 6th to March 8th.
That is confirmed to proceed.
I have successfully booked the house.
Thanks for your help and at last I want your help to search for some attractive places to visit.
What about a Museum. Do you like to visit Arizona Capitol Museum which is the best among 10 places I searched for you.
That is fine and that's all for now. Thanks. Bye.
Have a nice day.
Hi, could you get me a round trip to Philadelphia please?
Which date will you be travelling and returning and where will you be departing from?
I will be travelling to Chicago from the 8th to thee 11th of this month.
There are 3 flights you might like, how about an American Airlines flight departing at 5:05 am and returning at 5:45 pm costing $238 with 1 layover?
Is this a Premium economy class ticket? When will my return flight arrive?
No, this is an Economy class ticket, and your return flight arrives at 6:56 pm.
Sounds great. Could you get me a house to stay too?
How about a house at 1 Logan Square with a 4.5 rating?
This sounds good!
Would you like to make a reservation for this house please?
Yes, could you do so please?
And will you be checking in on March 8th?
No, on the 10th of this month please.
And will you be checking out on March 11th? How many people will be staying here?
Yes, there will be four people staying.
Please confirm your stay in Philadelphia for 4 from March 10th to March 11th.
That sounds great!
Your reservation has been made.
Are there any nice attractions there?
How about a Museum called Barnes Foundation?
And may I know if this attraction is free?
No, you have to pay to enter it.
I see, that is all I need. Thanks!
Have a great day ahead!
I want to find a round trip flight.
What day would you like to make the return flight and which date do you want to travel? What is the city you would like to fly out of?
I would like to start traveling on the 3rd of March, leaving from Sydney, Australia. I want to come back on the 13th of March.
Where do you want to go to?
I would like to go to Seattle, WA. I would like three tickets on Delta Airlines.
Do you want to fly with Delta Airlines? The onward flight leaves at 10:55 am and there is a layover. The return flight leaves at 4:10 am and it costs $495.
When does the plane get to the destination and when does the return flight arrive?
The onward flight gets there at 7:27 am and the return flight will arrive at 10:16 am.
That sounds fine. I would also like to find a house to stay in for 1 person and it should be rated 4.1 or above.
There are 10 houses that fit your search. There is a nice house at the address of 1000 1st Avenue that is rated 4.1.
Is there a contact number I can get? Does this place have laundry service?
Their phone number is +1 206-957-1000 and they do have laundry service.
This house looks really good.
Do you want to make a reservation for the house?
Yes, I want to book the house.
Would you be checking out on March 13th, or another date?
Yes, that would be fine.
Do you want to check in on March 3rd?
I would like March 7th to be my check in date.
Confirm these details for me: The location is in Seattle and you have 1 person in your group checking in on March 7th and checking out on March 13th.
No, I would like to check in on the 3rd of March and check out on the 4th.
Okay, confirm these details. The day you would check in is March 3rd and you will check out on March 4th.
Yes that would be fine. What is the total cost?
Your reservation has been successfully made and the total cost is $372.
Thank you very much for helping me. Can you show me some of the attractions there? I would be fine with any type of attraction.
There are 10 attractions that you might be interested in. One of these is a park called Alki Beach Park.
Is this place considered child-friendly and is entrance to this attraction free?
The entry is not free but the place is very nice to take your kids to.
Okay, that is great.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That was very helpful. I appreciate your help.
Have a great time!
I would like to find a round trip flight from SFO.
What date would you like to travel? What is your destination?
I plan to travel to NYC tomorrow. Any ticket class is fine.
What day would you like the return flight on?
I will be departing from Chi-town, and returning on the 8th.
American Airlines has a flight departing at 5:05 am. It has a layover. The return flight takes off at 1:35 pm. The ticket price is $223.
Are there other flight options?
Delta Airlines has a direct flight that departs at 8 am and returns at 9:05 am, with a ticket price of $212.
OK, sounds good. I would like to find a house to stay in while there.
There are 10 houses available during your stay. 100 Greenwich Street has a rating of 4.4.
That will be great, I would like to book the house for one person on Thursday next week. I plan to check in on the 3rd.
You would like to book the house for 1 person in New York from March 3rd until March 7th, is that correct?
Yes, that sounds great.
Your reservation has been created.
Thank you for your help. I would like to find some activities. Can you show me some attractions there without an entry fee?
There are 10 attractions that may interest you, including a Park, Alley Pond Park.
OK, that's great. That's all for now, thank you.
Have a great day!
I want to find three tickets for a round trip flight returning on the 8th of March.
What date are you leaving?
I'm leaving on the 5th of March. I want to find a Southwest Airlines flight.
Where are you going? Where are you departing from?
I am leaving from Chicago to Los Angeles.
I found 1 Southwest Airlines flight. The onward flight leaves at 7:20 pm and the returning flight leaves at 12 pm. The ticket is $266.
Sounds great. I want to find a house to stay at while I'm there.
I found 10 houses. There's a house at 1020 South Figueroa Street that's rated 4.1.
Any other houses? I want to find something rated 4.1 or higher.
I found 9 houses that match your search. There's a house at 10320 West Olympic Boulevard that's rated 4.1.
Sounds good. I want to book the house for two people. I want to check in on Wednesday next week and check out on the 8th of March.
Please confirm: a house for 2 people in Los Angeles. Check in is March 6th and Check out is March 8th.
Yes, sounds great. Is there laundry service? What's the contact number?
Your reservation has been made. Laundry service is available. The phone number is +1 310-825-2923.
What are some attractions there? I want to find a nice garden.
Exposition Park is a popular park in the area.
Okay, thank you.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thanks!
Have a wonderful day!
I would like a round trip flight.
When would you like to travel and where would you be leaving from?
I want to leave Atlanta on the 5th of March.
When would you like to return
On the 11th. I would be needing two tickets.
Where are you heading to?
I am going to SF.
You can get an American Airlines direct onward flight that departs at 3:45 pm and returns at 9:20 pm for $291.
That would be great. I would also need a house to stay in when I get there.
There are 10 suitable accommodation. There are a lovely house located at 1095 Market Street that has a rating of 4.0.
That house sounds ideal.
Is there anything else you need?
Yes, go ahead and book the house for three individuals. I want to check in on the 5th of March and leave on the 9th of this month.
You would like accommodation for 3 people at a house in San Francisco. You would be checking in on March 5th and checking out on March 9th?
Yes, that would be fine.
I have made the reservation.
What fun stuff can I do when I get there?
There are 10 possible places of interest. You can visit the Historical Landmark called Alcatraz.
Would my kids enjoy going there?
Yes, they certainly would.
Ok. I will try it. Take care.
Enjoy your day.
I have a plan for a trip to Los Angeles for which I want to search for a round trip flight. I am comfortable with Economy seats in Delta Airlines flight. Find me the suitable one.
Okay, I want more details to search for the flight. Let me know the start and return dates of your travel and What is your present location?
I need a flight from Sydney, NSW and my travel will start on Friday next week to 13th of March.
Got 1 flight with Delta Airlines. How about an onward flight which will take off at 10:55 am and the return flight take off time is at 5:15 am under the ticket cost $368?
May I know the number of ticket that you have searched for and also I want to know the arrival time of this flight at the final place.
It arrives at 0:22 am and I have searched for 1 person only.
That is okay and thanks. Can you search for a house to stay there?
Yes, what about the one at 1020 South Figueroa Street with rating 4.1?
I think I need to know whether they have laundry service in that house and also get met their contact number for my reference.
Yes, they have laundry service and please note down their contact number as +1 213-748-1291.
This looks good. Please book this house from the 13th of March to 9th of March for one person.
Once again please confirm to book a house for 1 person from March 9th to March 13th in Los Angeles.
Yes, confirmed and you can proceed. Let me know the cost.
I have booked the house and the cost is $1,200.
Thanks for your help. Also search for some attractive places there like a Tourist Attraction.
I got 8 results. Hope you like the one which is Hollywood Walk of Fame and same is a Tourist Attraction.
That's nice and thanks.
What else you want me to do?
No, thanks for everything.
With my pleasure. Enjoy your trip.
Hey I need a round trip flight from Seattle
When are you travelling and when do you want to go back? Also to where?
I want to fly out to San Fran today and return on the 9th of this month
I found 4 flights including one via Alaska Airlines for $178, it takes off at 11:10 pm and has a returning flight at 5:55 am
When does the returning flight arrive? Is this Premium Economy?i
It is an economy seat ticket that arrives at 8:06 am
Awesome, now find me a house to stay in
There's a 4.0 rated place at 1095 Market Street
What about another place good for two people?
There are 9 places that I found, but this one at 1100 Market Street Hotel entrance is at, 45 Mcallister Street has a 4.4 rating and looks good
Do they have laundry? Also what's their number
Yes they have laundry service and it's +1 415-735-7777
Any other houses with a 4.2 rating or higher?
This one at 12 4th Street has a 4.2 rating
That's great, I want to book a house to check in to today
Are you checking out March 9th? Or another date?
I want to leave the day after tomorrow
Confirm you want to book this place in San Francisco for 2 with a March 1st Check-in and March 3rd Check-out?
Actually I want to check-in on the 2nd instead
Confirming a March 2nd check in at the San Francisco place
Change my check-out to March 8th
Checking out on March 8th in San Francisco yeah?
Yeah! Give me their number please
It's successful, and it's +1 415-788-5604
Is there laundry there? How much is it?
It'll be $2,340 and yes there's laundry service
Great! Now find me a historical landmark I can visit with no entrance fee
Alcatraz is a neat historical landmark you'd enjoy
OK cool, thanks
What else can I do for you?
Nothing else for now, thank you!
You are welcome!
Hey, could you find 1 ticket for a round trip flight?
Sure I can help you with that. Tell me your departure date and city.
I'd like to leave from New York City on Saturday this week.
What is your destination?
My destination is Cape Town.
What's your preferred return date?
A return date of 13th of this month works for me.
All right. Your search yielded 1 suitable flight. How does flying with American Airlines sound? They have a 6:20 am outbound flight with a layover, and an inbound flight taking off at 2:05 pm. The ticket price is $328.
Is the ticket class Business? What time does the flight land at my destination?
The ticket class is Economy. The outbound flight lands at 7:57 pm.
That works. Please find a house for 3, over there. It must offer laundry service.
I found a nice, 4.5 -star rated house situated at 1 Cullinan Street, Cape Town City Centre.
What other houses are there?
There's a nice, 4.4 -star rated house situated at t 1 Lower Buitengracht, Cape Town City Centre.
What other houses are there?
How about the nice, 4.2 -star rated house located at t 1 Mountain Road, Chapmans Peak?
This house is perfect. The location works for me.
Shall I reserve the house for you?
Yes, please reserve it with a check-in date of the 4th.
Will you be checking out on March 13th, or another date?
A March 10th check-out date works for me.
All right. Please tell me whether the following is correct: Your party of 3 would like to check into the house in Cape Town on March 4th. You will be checking out on March 10th.
Yes, that is correct. Could you please tell me the phone number and total cost?
I have successfully made your reservation. You can reach them on +27 21 406 5000. The total cost is $3,480.
What child-friendly places would you recommend visiting?
I have 9 attractions that you might like. I recommend visiting the museum known as Bo-Kaap.
Is entry to this attraction free-of-charge? What phone number can I reach them on?
Yes, there is no admission charge. You can reach them on 21 481 3938.
All right, cool!
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Have a great time!
I will be going on vacation and will be flying out of Atlanta, GA on the 12th. Will you please search for a round trip flight?
What day will you be returning and what is your destination?
I will be flying to Berlin and plan on returning on the 14th of March.
I have an American Airlines flight that departs at 3:45 pm with a layover. The return flight departs at 2:55 am. The cost of this flight is $626.
What type of ticket is this: economy, business or class? Also, what time does my flight arrive at my destination?
This is an economy flight and the flight arrives at 6:30 pm.
Great. I also would like to find a house in that area, preferrably one with laundry service.
I have found a beautiful house, with a rating of 4.4, at Alt-Moabit 99, 10559.
Is there a phone number to contact someone about this place?
Yes, the contact number is +49 30 399200.
Wow, this house is gorgeous!
Are you interested in reserving this house?
Yes, most definitely I woud like to reserve this house. Please reserve it from the 12th to the 13th for 1 person.
Please confirm the location is Berlin and your reservation is for 1 person from March 12th to March 13th.
Yes, that is right.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Please provide me with the total cost.
Your total cost is $288.
Thank you for your assistane. I would like to find some attractions in this area.
There is a great museum you may enjoy called Alte Nationalgalerie.
Is this place kid-friendly and please provide with their phone number.
Yes, this is a kid-friendly place. The phon number is 30 266424242.
Great, that is all I need. Thank you!
Enjoy your trip!
I'm looking for round trip plane tickets.
Where are you departing from and traveling to? When do you want to depart?
I want to travel from Mexico City to Las Vegas on the 4th
When do you want to return?
I want to return on the 9th and I don't care about the airline.
I found 1 flight for you. It is a Delta Airlines flight that departs at 3:10 pm with a layover. The return flight takes off at 4:55 pm and it costs $369.
Okay, that sounds good. I'd like to find a house there for 1 person, with at least a 4.2 rating, and with laundry service.
There is 1 house that may work for you. It is a 4.2 rated house at 8669 West Sahara Avenue.
That house sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation at the house?
Yes, I want to check on on March 6th.
Are you checking out on March 9th or another day?
Yes, March 9th.
Okay, you want to book the house in Las Vegas for 1 person checking in on March 6th and checking out on March 9th, right?
Yes, that is correct. What is the price and phone number?
I have successfully confirmed the reservation. The total price is $1,350 and the phone number is +1 702-256-3766.
Thank you. What are some attractions there?
How about the museum Discovery Children's Museum?
That sounds good, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I need a round trip flight.
When are you traveling? Where are you leaving from?
I am leaving from SD for LAX on the 13th.
What day do you want to travel?
On March 4th.
I found 1 flight with Alaska Airlines that leaves at 1:05 pm. The returning flight leaves at 12:15 pm. The ticket price is $172.
What time does the flight arrive at LAX?
1:59 pm is the expected time.
I also need a home to stay that offers laundry service and is rated 4.5 or higher.
I found a great house at 1800 Argyle Avenue that is rated 4.5.
Anything else available?
Another house is 2151 Avenue of the Stars and it is rated 4.5.
What is the phone number?
The phone number is +1 310-284-6500.
Any other homes? I need accommodations for three people.
I found 8 additional homes, like 300 Doheny Drive. It is rated 4.5.
Please reserve me that house beginning on Wednesday next week and checking out the 13th.
Please confirm, reserving home for 3 people in Los Angeles on March 6th and leaving March 13th.
No, change it to the 8th of this month.
Please confirm, checking in March 8th in Los Angeles.
Yes, can you also give me the phone number and the total cost.
Your reservation is complete. The phone number is +1 213-443-9200. The price is $1,305.
Thanks, can you find me some things to do.
Angels Flight Railway, it is a historical landmark in Los Angeles.
Ok, that is all for now.
Have a nice day.
Are there any flights from Washington to San Francisco, round trip that return on the 13th?
What would be your departure date?
That 1st, that would be the 1st.
So far there are 3. One is with Delta Airlines departing at 6:50 pm there will be a layover on that flight and you would leave to come back home at 10:50 am at a price of $444.
When would I get where I am going and what class is it, economy, business?
It is Economy class and it would have you there at 11:25 pm.
That will probably work. Are there any houses 3.5 or more available?
Yes, one is 3.5 it's at 1095 Market Street.
What are some more options for houses?
This one is also 3.5 its called the 1100 Market Street Hotel entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street.
I want it, reserve it for 3 of us please.
Are these dates correct check in March 1st and check out March 13th?
Partially make March 5th the check out date.
You will be arriving March 1st and staying until March 5th in San Francisco and there are 3 in your group do I have that right?
Sorry, I want to change that again, make next Monday my arrival date and I will stay until the 10th of this month.
So I will change the check in and out dates to March 4th and March 10th, is that correct?
Yes, hey check for laundry service please.
Yes on the laundry and your room is booked.
Thanks and another thing what are some the attractions available around there?
There is the Historical Landmark Alcatraz.
Alright that's something.
Do you need me for anything else right now?
No that is all bye.
Take pleasure.
I am planning a trip and would like to look at round trip flights.
Which city do you which to leave from and on what day are you returning?
I will be flying from Portland, OR and traveling to LA. I plan to return on the 10th. Please search for an economy ticket.
What date are you leaving?
I plan to leave on Tuesday next week.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight, with a layover, that departs at 5:10 pm with the return flight leaving at 4:40 am. The cost of the ticket is $272.
What are my other options?
American airlines has a direct flight departing at 9:35 am with the return flight leaving at 7:15 pm. This ticket is $195.
That one sounds good. I would also like to find a house for 2 people in that area, preferrably with laundry service.
I found one that you may enjoy, with a 4.1 rating, located at 1020 South Figueroa Street.
That house would be great.
Would you like to reserve this house?
Yes, please reserve this house.
Are you planning to arrive on March 5th and leave on March 10th?
That is correct, however; I would like to leave next Wednesday.
Pease confirm you are reserving a house for 2 people in Los Angeles from March 5th to March 6th.
Yes, that is correct. Please provide me with the price and the phone number of this place.
Your reservation is confirmed. The price will be $252 and their phone number is +1 310-215-1000.
Thank you for your help. What are some attractions in that area?
There is an historical landmark you may enjoy called Angels Flight Railway.
Great. Thanks for your help!
Do you need anything further?
No, not at this time. You have been quite helpful!
Enjoy your trip!
I need a round trip flight to ATL returning on the 6th of March. I want it with American Airlines.
On which date to travel and which city to depart from?
I want it on the 2nd and from Chicago.
There is 1 flight for you with American Airlines and onward flight departs at 1:25 PM, with a layover. The returning flight is at 5 PM. The ticket price is $272.
Okay I want a house there with ratings of 4.3 or higher.
There is one located at 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast with a rating of 4.3 stars.
That's awesome then.
Would you like to reserve now?
Yes, now is good.
Would you like to check out on March 6th or another day?
Yes that's fine.
Would you like to check in on March 2nd? How many in your party?
I want to check in on the 3rd of this month and there are two people total.
So location is Atlanta, party size is 2, check in date is March 3rd and check out date is March 6th.
No I want to check out on the 5th of this month and there are 3 people.
So there are 3 people in your group and the check out date is March 5th.
Yes, that is awesome.
Your reservation is now successful.
Does this area have laundry service?
Yes, it does have laundry service.
What is the price and contact number?
The total price is $1,000 and the contact number is +1 404-237-2700.
Thanks a lot, and attractions?
There are 10 attractions such as Al-Farooq Masjid, a Place of Worship.
What is the phone number? is it child friendly?
The contact number is 678-886-3457 and the place is suitable for children.
Okay, awesome. Thanks!
Of course. Enjoy.
I want to take a round-trip flight starting on the 4th.
What day would you like the return flight to be? What city will you be leaving from?
Find flights from ATL returning on 12th of March.
Where will you be headed?
I'm going to be going to Seattle.
How about this flight with American Airlines that leaves at 1:50 pm? It has a layover. The return flight leaves at 8:50 am. This flight costs $383.
When will the flight arrive at my destination? Is this an economy or business-class ticket?
The outbound flight leaves at 4:22 PM. This is an economy.-class ticket.
Do you have anything else available?
how about flying with Delta Airlines? The outbound flight takes off at 12:05 PM. It's a direct flight. The return flight takes off at 12:40 pm. This ticket cost $272.
Anything else?
what do you think about Southwest Airlines? The outbound flight takes off at 11:05 am. There is a layover. The return flight leaves at 1:35 PM. This ticket costs $377.
Okay, find me a house to stay in there.
I have 10 houses that may suit your needs. How about this nice house on 1000 1st Avenue with a 4.5 rating?
What else do you have?
There's a nice house available at 1006 Spring Street with a 3.9 rating.
Is laundry service available? Do you have a contact number for this place?
Yes, there is laundry service. The phone number is +1 206-583-6453.
that sounds great.
Would you like me to book that house?
Yes, book that house.
Would you like to check out on March 12th or another day? How many people are there in your party?
we are a party of 2 and I want to check out on the 6th.
Would you like to check in on March 4th?
No, check me in on 5th of March.
Okay, so you want to go to Seattle and there are 2 people in your group. You will check in on March 5th and check out on March 6th.
No, actually I will check out on March 10th.
Okay, could you confirm this? You are going to Seattle and you will check out on March 10th.
Yes, perfect.
Your reservation was made successfully.
Thank you for helping. Would you like to show me some attractions there?
I think you should go to the park Alki Beach Park.
What is the phone number for that attraction?
The phone number is 206-684-4075
cool, but do you have any other ideas?
How about Bill speidel's Underground Tour? This is a tourist attraction.
What is the phone number for this attraction?
The phone number is 206-682-4646.
do you have any other Texans you can think of?
I think you should check out Bruce Lee and Brandon Lee Grave Sites. That's a tourist attraction.
Cool.
Would I be able to help with something else?
No, but thanks, it's been a good help
Have a good day.
I want to have 4 tickets for a round trip flight, which has the returning flight on March 9th.
Can you tell me the city from where you will be leaving?
I will be starting my journey from Berlin.
Which is your destination, and at what date do you want to have your trip?
I want to arrive to LA, and will be leaving for my trip on March 4th.
There are 2 flights which match what you want. One of the flights with Delta Airlines which has a layover, leaves at 3:40 pm and when it returns it flies at 6:35 am, with the ticket costing $458.
That seems nice. I also need to have a house that I can stay there for three people. This house has a rating of 3.2 or higher.
I found 10 houses which you might like. One of the nice houses which you might consider has a 3.2 rating and is found at 1020 South Figueroa Street.
Can you check if this house has a laundry service, and could you also tell me the contact number I can use to call them?
I can confirm that the house as a laundry service, and if you want to call them you can at +1 213-748-1291.
I really like this house.
Do you want to have this house booked for you?
Yes, I want this house to be booked for me, and I will need it till 7th of March, and I will be going there on Tuesday next week.
Can you please confirm that you want to have a house in Los Angeles for 3 people booked for you, and that you will go to it on March 5th, and will need it till March 7th?
Yes that is what I want. Can you tell me how much this will cost me?
Your requested booking has been made, and it will cost you $648.
Could you also inform me about some attractions there?
You might consider the Angels Flight Railway, which is a Historical Landmark.
Alright, nice. That's all I needed, goodbye!
Have a good time!
I would like a round trip flight.
What location are you planning to go?
I am flying to the location of Berlin.
What day would you like to take the return flight?
I'm returning the 13th.
Which date would you like to travel and what city are you departing from?
I would like to travel on Sunday this week looking for flights from LA.
Do you want to fly with Delta Airlines with an onward flight taking off at 6:35 am with a layover and returning flight at 3:40 pm costing $468 for the ticket.
When will the flight arrive at my destination?
The onward flight comes in at 5:11 am.
That sounds great. I'd like to find a house to stay there with laundry service.
There's a nice home at Alt-Moabit 99, 10559 rated 4.4.
This house is good. I'd like to book a house with check out on the 8th.
Do you wish to check in on March 3rd? What is the number of people in your group?
Yes, that is good and there is 1 person.
Please confirm details for a location of Berlin for 1 person in the group with check in date of March 3rd and check out March 8th.
Yes, that is great. Please get me a contact number and total price for the place.
The reservation is a success with a total price of $480 and phone number of +49 30 2000320.
Thanks for the help. Would you show me some attractions there? I'd like to have something which is child-friendly.
You should check out the Alte Nationalgalerie a museum.
Tell me the phone number.
The phone number is 30 266424242.
Okay that is great and bye for now.
Enjoy yourself.
I need help finding a round-trip plane ride.
I can help. Do you know which day you would like to leave? Also provide the day of the month you would like to return.
Yes. I have dates for you. My itinerary schedule is leaving on Monday next week and returning on the 6th of March.
What location is your destination?
I am planning visit to Portland, OR for this trip.
Is there a certain location that you would like your journey to begin in?
I would like this journey to start in New York City.
Is United Airlines a suitable company for you to fly with? One of their flights is scheduled to leave at 6:35 pm. The flight coming back is scheduled at 8:40 am. The current price is $493.
That flight is an excellent option. While I am there I will need you to help me find a residence to stay in. The adobe should be for only 1 person. I would like the abode to have a score of 3.6 or better.
I discovered a total of 10 residences that meet your criteria. One good one I found has a score of 3.6. This residence is located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street.
Is there a service at this location that washes and dries clothing. I would also like a contact number please.
One feature of this residence is Laundry service. The number to reach them at is +1 503-281-6111.
I am very pleased that you found this home for me.
I would like to book the home in your name if you agree.
That's a good suggestion. I would like you to make a reservation for me.
Will March 6th be the date you would like the reservation to begin?
The date is correct. Thanks for double checking.
I understand the reservation will end on March 4th. Correct me if I am mistaken.
No correction necessary. You have the date correct.
Before I book the home I want to make sure the details are correct. Your reservation will be for 1 starting March 4th and ending March 6th. The city is Portland.
You have the right details. Thanks fr checking. How much money will I be spending?
The home has been held in your name. Your expense total will be $558.
Can you also look for stimulating events for me to enjoy while I am at the location?
I found 10 sights that match your preferences. One is a Park I highly suggest visiting. It's named the Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden.Fantastic suggestion.
Thank you. I'll check back with you later. Take it easy.
Hope your day is filled with pleasant happenings!
I am searching for a round trip flight.
When will you take the return flight?
It will be on March 14th.
Where do you want to go? From which city are you start from? When will you travel?
On Monday next week, I will move to San Diego from SFO. I need Economy tickets.
Are you interested in Alaska Airlines layover flight and it will start at 12:25 pm. The return flight will start at 1:05 pm. The price is $204.
Shall I book it for 1 person?
Yes. You are correct. It is for 1 person.
What is the arriving time of the return flight?
It will reach at 4:25 pm.
It is nice. I wish to search for a house with 3.9 or higher rating to stay there. I prefer laundry service.
A fantastic house is situated at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States with the rating 3.9.
I need their contact number.
Their contact number is +1 858-224-7600
It is good.
Shall I confirm this house.
Yes. Please. I wish to check in on 6th of March. It is for 1 person.
Will you check out on March 14th or any other date?
I will check out on March 9th.
Kindly ensure that, On March 6th, the house is booked for 1 person at San Diego. You will check out on March 9th.
Yes. It is good.
Your booking is done.
I wish to see some attractions like Theme Park.
I searched and found 3 attractions for you. You will check out Belmont Park. It is a Theme Park.
Okay. Nice.
Shall I help you in some other things?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
Enjoy the day.
I would like a round trip flight that would return on March 14th.
When would you like to leave and where are you going to?
I will be flying to Chicago on March 2nd.
Which city would you be leaving from?
I would be leaving New York City.
You would like an American Airlines onward flight that leaves at 11:20 am and returns at 2 pm? There a layover and the price is $250.
That is expensive. Is it a business class ticket and when would the returning flight arrive?
It returns at 5:19 pm and it is economy class.
Ok, then. I would need a house to stay in when I get there that has a rating of 4.2 or higher.
There is a lovely house located at 1 South Franklin Street that has a rating of 4.2.
That house would be ideal.
You would like to reserve the house?
Yes, I do.
You would like to check out on march 14th or some other date? How many persons would be staying with you at the house?
I want to check out on the 6th of March and there would just be one person.
You would like to check in on March 2nd?
I want to check in the day after tomorrow.
You would like accommodation for 1 in Chicago and you would like to check in on March 3rd and check out on March 6th?
Great. May I have a contact number?
I have reserved the house and the number is +1 312-787-6000.
How much would that be in all?
It would cost $2,040.
Thanks. What fun thing can I do when I get there?
You could check out a tourist attraction called 360 chicago.
That sounds like fun. Thanks, that's all I need.
Enjoy your day.
Find me a round trip plane ticket.
What day will you be returning?
I want to return on the 14th of this month.
What are your departing and arrival cities?
I am departing London and headed to Los Angeles.
What day are you departing London?
I am departing London on March 2nd.
Search revealed 2 results. Delta Airlines has a departing flight at 3:55 am and a return flight at 6:05 am. It has a layover and the total cost is $591.
That is perfect. I also need a house to stay in Los Angeles.
1020 South Figueroa Street has a 4.1 rating.
Do they offer laundry service?
They do have laundry service.
The house works for me.
Shall I book the house for you now?
Yes, get me a house reservation for there.
Are you arriving March 2nd and how many people are going?
The booking is for 2 people and we will arrive on the 5th.
Will you be departing on March 14th?
I wish to arrive ont he 11th of this month and will depart on March 13th.
You want a house reservation for 2 people in Los Angeles from March 11th to March 13th, correct?
That is correct.
Your booking is complete.
What is their phone number and what did the total price come to?
You can contact them at +1 323-600-5396 and the total bill is $348.
Thanks a lot. What is there to do around there?
Angels Flight Railway is a Historical Landmark nearby.
I see. Thanks for everything. I don't need anymore help right now.
Have a great time!
I'm planning to take a trip beginning on the 8th of this month. Can you search for round trip flights?
When do you want to come back?
I plan to come back on the 12th of March
And what is your destination?
I'm heading to San Francisco
Where are you planning on leaving from?
I'd like to leave from London
There are 2 flights that match your search criteria. The first is an American Airlines flight that departs at 12:45 pm, making one stop. The return flight is at 4:55 am. The fare for this ticket is $658.
Great, thanks. I'd also like to find accommodations there.
There are 10 places that may suit your tastes. The first is a lovely 4.0 star rated home on 1095 Market Street.
That one sounds perfect. I'd like to reserve it for the 12th of March until the 8th of this month for 2 people.
So you would like to reserve the home in San Francisco for 2 people, from March 8th to March 12th, correct?
Actually, no. I would like to reserve it from the 10th of this month until March 11th.
To confirm, you want to book your stay from March 10th to March 11th, correct?
Yes, that is right.
Your accommodations have been booked
Can you tell me what the final cost will be?
The final cost is $216.
Great. Thanks! Now I'd like to find some fun attractions there that are free to see.
There is the Historical Landmark, Alcatraz which is worth seeing.
Perfect, thank you!
Will that be all?
Yes. I'm all set. Thanks for your assistance.
Have a nice day!
I need a round-trip flight.
When and where are you going?
I am going to NYC until March 12th.
When are you flying out?
I want to leave on the 6th of this month.
What city are you flying out of?
I am flying out of Cape Town.
I found 1 flight on American Airlines with one layover. The departure flight leaves at 2:05 pm and the return flight leaves at 6:20 am. The ticket is $297.
When does the return flight arrive?
The return flight arrives at 7:57 pm.
That is good.
May I further assist you?
I need a place to stay with laundry service.
There is a 4.4 rated house at 100 Greenwich Street.
What is the phone number?
The phone is +1 917-409-0800.
That is good.
Do you want to reserve it?
Yes, I want to reserve the house for 1 person on the 6th of this month.
Is the checkout still March 12th?
I am checking out on 11th of March.
Please confirm you are checking in for 1 person on March 6th and checking out on March 11th in New York.
That is correct. How much does it cost?
The reservation is confirmed and costs $1,080.
Is there any child-friendly theme park there?
Central Park Carousel is a theme park.
Is it free admission? Do they have a phone number?
They do have free admission and can be contacted at 212-439-6900.
Thank you.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
Have fun!
I am looking to purchase two tickets for a round trip flight from the 4th of March till Friday next week.
Sure thing. What is your destination?
I am traveling to Phoenix.
What city are you departing from?
I need to find a flight out of Chicago.
Okay, I've found 1 flight for you. There is a flight with Delta Airlines with an onward flight taking off at 4:10 pm and a return flight at 6:15 pm. The tickets will be $439.
Are these Business class tickets?
No, this ticket price is for Economy class seating.
Oh, ok. What time will the second flight return home?
Your returning flight will arrive at it's destination at approximately 3:57 am.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you also do a search for a house in the area for me.
I've found a nice house rated at 4.6 stars. It is located at 10 East Thomas Road.
What's their number?
Their number is +1 602-222-1111.
Okay thanks. Any other houses available in the area?
There is another house located at 10601 North 56th Street, Scottsdale, Arizona 85254, United States. They are rated at an average of 4.3.
Okay, that house sounds good to me. Let's go ahead and make a reservation.
Will you be staying from March 8th until March 4th? How many people will be in your group?
Yea that sounds good. Make a reservation for just 1 person, I want to check in on Thursday next week please.
Okay, please confirm. booking a stay for 1 person in the house in Phoenix from March 7th to March 8th. Correct?
Yeah, that's right. Can you tell me if they offer laundry service?
Yes, they do offer laundry service. Your reservation has been completed.
Okay, thanks for the help. Do you know of any good attractions in the area? I'd prefer something without an entry fee.
Okay, I've found 7 attractions you may enjoy. How about the Arizona Science Center? It is a very popular Museum in the area.
That sounds cool, but can you find anything else in the area?
How about the Dream City Church * Phoenix? It's a pretty popular Place of Worship in the area.
Sounds cool. What's their number? Is this a child-friendly place?
Yeah this is an excellent place to take children to. Their number is 602-867-7117.
Okay, thanks.
Anything else I can help you with today?
No, thanks for the help.
My pleasure. Enjoy!
I want 4 tickets on a round trip flight from ATL. Look for Economy class tickets.
Where are you going? When will you return?
I will go to SFO and return on the 13th of this month.
Which date would you like to travel?
Start my travel on 6th of March.
Do you want to fly with American Airlines? The outbound flight takes off at 3:45 pm with a layover. The returning fliht takes off at 4 am and costs $354.
When will my flight arrive at the destination and when it returns when will it arrive?
The outbound flight arrives at 6:11 pm while the returning flight arrives at 2:04 pm.
Sounds good. Find me a house to stay in there.
I have 10 houses available. There's a nice house at 1095 Market Street with a 4.0 rating.
What is the contact number for this place? Is laundry service available?
Yes there is laundry service and the phone number is +1 415-829-0000
That sounds great.
Do you want to book it
Yes, book the house.
How many people are there in your group? Are you checking in on March 6th and checkin out on March 13th?
Sounds good. I want to check out on 9th of March. There are 3 in my party.
Please confirm that you are going to San Francisco and that there are 3 in your group. You'll check in March 6th and check out March 9th. Is that right?
No, make the check out on March 11th.
Could you confirm that there are 3 people in your group and that you will check out on March 11th?
No, I would like to check in on 9th of March for 1.
Could you confirm that there ies 1 person in your group and that you will check in March 9th?
Sounds good.
Your reservation was successfully made.
Thank you for helping. WOuld you show me some attractions there? I want something free.
Check out Alcatraz. It's a Historical Landmark.
Sounds great. That's all, bye for now.
Have a good time!
Can you please help me find a round trip flight?
Sure, but first tell me your departure city.
I will be travelling on the 8th from LAX and I plan to return on the 12th of March.
OK, now please tell me your desired destination.
I plan to go to Seattle.
I found an Alaska Airlines flight for you taking off at 11:55 am, with a layover and with the return flight at 7:05 am. Tickets are priced at $264.
Anything else availabla in Economy?
There's also a direct American Airlines flight taking of at 11 pm, with the return flight at 6:15 pm. Tickets are priced at $218.
OK, this sounds perfect. Now please find me a house to stay at destination for 3 persons, that is rated at least 4.3 and that provides laundry service.
I found a very nice house for you at 1000 1st Avenue, rated at 4.3.
Anything else available?
There's also a pretty nice house at 1007 1st Avenue, also rated at 4.3.
Can you please give me the phone number of this house?
Sure, you can reach them at +1 206-624-4844.
Thanks. Now let's place a reservation for this house.
Will you be checking in on March 8th?
NO, I plan to check in on the 10th of March.
Do you plan to check out on March 12th?
Yes, I do.
Can you please confirm that you want me to place a reservation for 3 persons for a house in Seattle from March 10th to March 12th?
On second thought, I'll be checking in on the 11th.
Can you please confirm that you'll be checking into the house in Seattle on March 11th?
Yes, that's correct. Please tell me the price of the reservation.
I've successfully booked your reservation which costs $420.
Thanks a lot! Could you please also find me some attractions around there?
I recommend a great Park, the Alki Beach Park.
Thanks! That will be all for now!
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
I'm afraid of flying and need to travel soon. Could you help me find a train?
Sure, I can help you with that. Please say your destination.
My destination is Vancouver.
What is your preferred travel date?
I'd like to leave March 2nd. I'm looking for one luxurious ticket.
Please tell me your departure city.
Search for tickets from Portland, OR.
How does the 7:40 am train sound? The total ticket price is $123.
What's its origin station?
The train's origin station is Union Station.
What's its destination station?
The train's destination station is Pacific Central Station.
That works.
Should I go ahead and reserve tickets?
No. At the moment, I don't want to reserve tickets.
Would you like my help with anything else?
Yes. Search for something interesting for me to do there on the 12th. I love Broadway.
Your search yielded 6 events that might interest you. The first is the very popular Alice In Glitterland, taking place at The Wise on March 12th from 5 pm.
What's the price of a ticket?
The ticket price is $45.
What is the venue's street address?
The venue is at 1882 Adanac Street.
That works. Could you find some places to visit around that area?
I found 10 attractions that you may like. I highly recommend visiting the Bloedel Conservatory Park.
All right. Very cool. My friend will be joining me. Please find me a house for 2, over there.
Your search yielded 10 available houses. The first nice house has a rating of 4.2 and is situated at 1018 Granville Street.
This is a very good house. At the moment, that's all I need.
Glad to have been of service. Goodbye.
I want to find one luxurious seat ticket from LA.
What city are you traveling to?
I'm going to San Diego.
What date are you leaving?
I'm leaving on the 10th of March.
I found 10 trains. There is a train leaving at 6:50 am for $93.
What station does it arrive at?
It arrives at Santa Fe Depot.
What station does it leave from?
This train leaves from Union Station.
Sounds great. I want to find something fun to do there that day. I really enjoy music.
Alejandro Sanz is a popular musician playing at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 7th at 7:30 pm.
How much is one ticket?
The ticket is $50.
Great. Are there any other events?
Angel Olsen is playing at The Observatory North Park on March 4th at 5 pm.
Are there any other events?
Bastille is taking place at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 7th at 6:30 pm.
Sounds good. I want to find some attractions there. Is there anything without an entry free that's also kid-friendly?
I found 10 attractions. Belmont Park is a popular theme park.
What is the phone number?
The phone number is 858-228-9283.
Okay, thanks. Can you find me a house to stay there?
I found 10 houses available. There's a house rated 4.6 at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States.
That sounds great. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
I need train tickets to Sacramento for the 13th of March. And I want them to be luxurious tickets.
Where will you be departing from?
I'll be departing from SD.
There's a train at 6:10 am for a total cost of $194.
What are the departure and arrival stations?
Departure is from Santa Fe Depot. Arrival is at Sacramento Valley Station.
Alright, that's good.
Would you like me to purchase the tickets?
No, I don't need to do that just yet. I do want to find interesting things to do there.
What kind of things are you interested in?
I'm a big fan of Musical shows.
There are 6 events that you might enjoy. People seem to like Aftershock Festival. It's at Discovery Park on March 5th at 5:30 pm.
That seems cool. How about attractions over there.
There are 8 attractions you might enjoy. There's a Museum called the California State Capitol Museum that might interest you.
Sounds nice. Now I also need a house to stay in. It'll be for 2 people and I want it rated 4.4 or higher.
There's 1 house that matches. It's a nice 4.4 rated house on 500 J Street.
That seems very good.
Do you want me to book the house?
No, I won't do that now. That's all the help I need.
I'ts been my pleasure to serve you. Take care.
Please search for a train for me to take.
What are your departure and arrival cities, and when do you want to take the train?
I need tickets for March 14th. I am going to LA from San Fran.
There is one train that leaves at 6:20 am. The trip will cost $85.
What are the departure and arrival stations?
The train departs from Salesforce Transit Center and arrives at Union Station.
Please find a different train for me. I need one ticket, and I don't care about the class.
There is a train that leaves at 8:40 am, and the trip will cost $86.
That works for me.
Would you like to reserve a ticket?
Not at this time. Please look for things to do there on that day.
What kind of events do you like. There are things like Music or Theater or other events.
I like to see Musical Shows.
There are 10 results that meet your criteria. There is a popular event called Ain Gordon at the Ralph Freud Playhouse. This takes place at 7 pm on March 9th.
What is the address of that venue?
It is located at 245 Charles E young Drive East.
That works for me. Please find attractions in that area.
There are 10 results that meet your criteria. There is a Historical Landmark called the Angels Flight Railway.
What is the contact information for that attraction? Is the attraction good for children?
The attraction is child friendly. The contact information for the attraction is 213-626-1901.
That sounds good. Please find a rental house for me there.
There is a house with a 4.1 rating located at 1020 South Figueroa Street.
That sounds good.
Do you want to book that house?
No not right now.
Do you require any further assistance?
No thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I need a Value train ticket to Phoenix, AZ.
What is your departure city?
I am departing San Diego.
What day are you leaving?
I am leaving the day after tomorrow.
There is a train leaving at 11:20 am. It costs $83 and is 1 of 5 trains that I found.
What else do you have?
There is a train that leaves at 1:30 pm with a cost of $86.
What else can you find?
A train is leaving at 3:30 pm with a cost of $78.
What are the departing and arrival stations?
Santa Fe Depot is the departure station and Phoenix Union Station is the arrival station.
That works for me.
Do you need anymore help?
Find me something fun to do there.
Shall I search in Music, Theater, or some other category?
Search for Concert events.
Bad Suns is playing at The Van Buren on March 2nd at 4:30 pm and is 1 of 10 results that I found.
I see. Try to find me a Broadway event on the 9th.
Boondocks Improv is at the Dearing Acting Studio on March 9th at 7 pm and is 1 of 3 results that search found.
What is the price per ticket?
The price per ticket is $35.
That is perfect. What attractions are nearby?
Arizona Capitol Museum is a cool Museum nearby.
I see. What else can you find?
Arizona Science Center is another cool Museum nearby.
That is great. Find me a house near there for one person with laundry service and a rating of 4.5 or higher.
10 East Thomas Road meets all those requirements and has a 4.5 rating.
That is perfect.
Shall I reserve a room for you?
No, not right now.
Do you need more help?
No, not right now. Thanks.
I am glad to help you. Bye for now.
I need a train.
When are you leaving?
I'm leaving next Wednesday.
Where are you coming from? Where are you going?
I'm going from Sacramento to SD.
I found 10 trains. One is departing at 6:30 am and costs $138.
That's a good one.
Would you like tickets?
No, not right now.
Do you need anything else?
I want something to do. Look for music events for next Wednesday.
I found 10 events. Angel Olsen is performing at The Observatory North Park at 7 pm on March 6th.
Sounds fun. What attractions are there?
I found 10 attractions. Balboa Park is a park.
Good. I'd like a house near there.
I found 10 houses. One is located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States with a 4.6 rating.
I'd like their number. Do they offer laundry?
Their number is +1 858-224-7600. They offer laundry services.
That's a good one. That's all.
Have a nice day. Bye.
Hey, can you help me find a train? I'm going on a short trip.
For which date? Where are you departing from and where are you going?
I'm going from LA to Anaheim, CA on Friday next week.
I found 10 possible trains. There's a $35 one departing at 6 am.
Any other ones?
There's a $36 one departing at 6:10 am.
From which station does it depart and where does it arrive?
It leaves from Union Station towards Anaheim Intermodal Center.
Sounds like a good one.
Should I buy the tickets?
No, not now, thanks.
Can I help you with anything else?
Can you find me something to do then? Like a play I could go to.
There's 1 very popular play called Jesus Christ Superstar at Stage Door Repertory Theatre on March 1st at 7 pm.
How much is the ticket?
It costs $45 dollars.
Shoulda great. Any other attractions happening there too?
I found 10 others. There's a Sports Venue, the Angel Stadium of Anaheim, that's very popular.
Is it child friendly? What's their phone number?
It's very child friendly. Their number is 714-940-2000.
Okay, good. I also need help finding a house over there.
I found a great one with a 4.2 rating at 1050 West Ball Road.
Sounds awesome, that's all I need.
Glad to be of help, goodbye!
Could you find me a train to new york for march 13th? I don't care about the fare class.
Where are you heading?
Chi-town.
How about this one, it leaves at 6 am and costs $96 total.
Where does it arrive, and where is it leaving from?
It leaves from grand central station and arrives at chicago union station.
That works.
Would you like to book tickets?
No thanks. I'd like to find something interesting to do in chicago on that day.
What category of thing? You can say music, theater, or anything else.
I'd like something music based on the 14th of this month.
I have 3 options. How about Duster, it's taking place in the sleeping village on march 14th at 6:30 pm.
How costly is it, and where is the venu?
It's $55 for the ticket, and found at 3734 west belmont avenue.
Do you have anything else there?
I have 10 options. How about 360 CHICAGO, it's a tourist attraction.
Anything child friendly?
I have 9 options. How about Big BUs Tours Chicago (Tours Begin at 98 E. Upper Wacker Dr.), it's a tourist attraction.
Great, could you find me a house there?
I have 10 options. THis one is a 4.4 /5, at 1 south franklin street
What's their contact number, and do they have laundry?
They do not, and their number is +1 312-558-1020
That's great, that's all I need
Hope you have a great day.
I need your help finding a train please.
Please provide more details such as where you are leaving from and where you would like to go.
My trip will begin in Portland. March 5th is the day I would like to travel.
Where would you like the train to take you to?
I'm looking forward to going to Seattle, WA.
I found a train that costs $58. This option has a departure time of 9:10 am.
I like that choice. Can you find any stimulation events there on the day I arrive?
Do you have any type of event in mind?
Yes. Drama is one of my favorites.
Wow. You have 10 choices. My suggestion is one that a lot of people enjoy. The date is March 10th and it will begin at 5 pm. It is called Beatleconcert. It will be showing at 12th Avenue Arts.
I will love that. Would you please also locate some attractions in the area?
Of course. I suggest a Park known as Alki Beach Park.
This sounds like it would not have a cost.
There is a charge for this park.
Sweet. There will be two of us and we will need a house in the area.
One of 10 good homes I found is located at 1000 1st Avenue. This house has a 4.5 star rating.
The house you find must have laundry service. Anything rated 4.2 or higher is fine. Please give me some more choices.
Another good choice is at 1007 1st Avenue. This house is rated 4.2.
Is there a contact number for me to call the house at?
Yes. You can reach them at +1 206-624-4844.
This home seems like it will suit my needs perfect.
I can help you reserve the home if you like.
I'm set for now but thanks for offering.
No problem. Take it easy.
Hi can you find me 2 seats for a train to LAX leaving on the 12th of this month.
Which city will you be leaving from?
I'd like to buy a value ticket. I'm leaving from San Francisco.
How about the train leaving at 6:20 am? The price is $160.
Is there any other trains you can find? I'd like a ticket from Washington going to Atlanta.
I found 6 trains that could work. How about the train leaving at 10 am? It will cost $187 in total.
That works for me. Now I need some songs to listen to live. I'd like to go on the 14th.
I managed to find 10 events that you might enjoy. Benjamin Francis Leftwich is supposed to be good. It will take place at Vinyl on March 14th at 6 pm.
That sounds perfect.
Would you like to purchase tickets at this time?
No, not at this time.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Please show me some attractions. I want something that's free. I'm looking for a performing arts venue and something that is child-friendly.
How about the Fox Theatre? It's a performing arts venue.
Awesome. I also need a house for 2 to stay in with a 4.3 rating or higher. I need laundry service too.
How about 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast? It has a rating of 4.3.
What's their phone number?
You can call them at +1 404-745-5000.
That sounds good, that's all I needed.
It's been a pleasure to help you. Have a great day.
Can you look for a train?
when are you planing to travel and which city are you moving to? where is your departing place?
I have plans to go to SFO from LAX on March 12th
I have looked in to 8 trains of your choice and what is your opinion on the train moving at 7:50 am costing $87 in total?
Fine and i also have to find some other interesting things to do there
What is your choice of event type?
I really like songs on 14th of March
I have short listed 9 events of your choice and one among them is a very popular Alex Cameron taking place at August Hall on March 14th at 4:30 pm
Where is event taking place and what will be the ticket price?
The location of event is 420 Mason Street costing $45
That is perfect
Is there any other help?
Can you also look for some attractions there?
I have found out 10 attractions of your liking and you could check out Alcatraz which is a Historical Landmark
Fine and i also have to look for a house to stay there
I have found a house at 1095 Market Street with rating 4.0
This is fine
Do you need to make booking there?
No, i don't need now
It was good to talk to you and help you, bye
I am going to Anaheim, CA. I wish to travel in train with one Business ticket. Can you help?
From where you embark?
From Los Angeles and need economy premium ticket.
When are you travelling?
It is on 13th of this month.
10 trains are available. One is starting at 6 am with ticket fare of $56 in total. Do you prefer it?
Yes, that will do. Are there anything interesting to do like a Musical performance, on 13th of this month?
There is 1, at Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim on March 13th . It is Brown Sabbath beginning at 4:30 pm.
Venue and cost please.
Venue is 1530 Disneyland Monrail System and you will cost $40.
Great, matching one.
Shall I get your tickets?
NO, thank you.
What other help do you need?
Are there any attractions with no entry fee?
Yes, you please check out Angel Stadium of Anaheim which is a sports venue.
Do you have phone number? Is it child-friendly?
Yes it is child-friendly. their phone number is 714-940-2000.
Good, look for a house to stay there.
10 houses are there. one is with 4.2 rating and located at 1050 West Ball Road.
That will be ok.
Thank you, meet again.
I need to find a train. Can you help?
I'd be happy to. Let's get some details first. Where are you traveling from and where are you going? When will you begin your travels?
I'd like to find a ticket from LAX to San Diego on March 10th.
There are 10 options that may work for you. Would you be interested in the 6:50 am train for $50?
Can you tell me what station it will be departing from?
It leaves from Union Station.
That will work. Can you suggest some fun things to do in San Diego?
Would you be interested in music or theater events?
I'd be interested in Musical shows.
There are 10 events that you may be interested in. Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater is hosting Alejandro Sanz on March 7th at 7:30 pm. It's a very popular show.
I have been wanting to see that. Can you suggest some kid-friendly things to do as well?
I have 10 that meet your criteria. Belmont Park is a popular theme park.
Perfect! Can you help me find a house to stay at while I'm there? I really need somewhere that offers laundry service.
I have a list of 10 options that could work for you. With a strong rating of 4.6, 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States is a beautiful property.
What is the phone number for the house?
You can reach them at +1 858-224-7600.
That sounds like it will be perfect. Thank you for the help.
You're welcome. Enjoy your trip!
Will you find me a train?
What city are you leaving from and going to?
I'm looking for tickets from Sacramento to San Diego.
Which date will you want to travel?
I want to find tickets for March 6th.
What about the train leaving at 6:30 am costing $138 total.
What station does it leave from?
The train departs from Sacramento Valley Station.
What station does it arrive at?
It arrives at Santa Fe Depot.
Would there be any other trains that could work?
What about the train leaving 7:20 am costing $140 total.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to book tickets.
No, I'm not looking to book tickets, but I'd like to find something interesting to do there that day. I like Broadway and want something on March 6th.
About Time is popular taking place at Talent to AMuse Theatre Co. happening March 6th starting 5 pm.
Where is the venue?
The venue is located at 3919 Normal Street.
That sounds good.
Would you want to buy tickets for the event?
No, not now.
Can I assist you with anything else?
Will you show me some attractions there?
Check out Balboa Park a park.
Okay that is good. I'd like to find a home to stay there with laundry service.
There are 10 homes in your search including a nice one at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States rated 4.6.
That house is great.
What else can I assist you with?
No, thanks for the help.
It's my pleasure helping you goodbye.
I want a train with conditionally refundable tickets from Los Angeles to San Francisco.
What day are you travelling?
I am travelling on March 10th.
There is a train leaving at 7:50 am with a total cost of $94.
What are the departure and arrival stations?
The departure station is Union Station and the arrival station is Salesforce Transit Center.
That works for me. Find me some interesting Musical shows there on March 11th.
Finneas is playing at August Hall on march 11th at 5:30 pm and is one of 10 results that search found.
What is the price of a ticket?
The ticket price is $55.
What is their address?
They are located at 420 Mason Street.
That works for me. What other attractions are there?
Alcatraz is a neat Historical Landmark.
What is their contact information and would kids like it?
Kids think that it is a cool place and you can contact them at 415-561-4900.
That is great. I need a house for one person with laundry service near there.
1095 Market Street has a 4.0 rating.
That is perfect. That is all for now.
I am goad to help. Bye for now.
I need to find train tickets for the 12th, can you help me?
What cities are you departing from and going to?
I would like to travel from NY to Chicago.
There is a train departing at 6 am with a ticket price of $117 in total.
Are there any other trains? I need three seats with Business tickets.
There is a train departing at 6:10 am with a total ticket price of $485.
What other trains are there?
There is another train departing at 9:50 am with a total cost of $461.
What stations does this train leave from and arrive in?
The train leaves from Grand Central Station and arrives in Chicago Union Station.
OK, that sounds good, thanks.
Would you like to book tickets?
Not right now, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help with?
Yes, I would like to find something interesting to do while we are there.
Is there a particular type of event you prefer?
Yes, I like Musical shows best.
I found 9 events like that. Ashe is taking place at Chop Shop on March 11th at 7:30 pm.
OK, that sounds great.
Is there anything else I can help with?
What other attractions are there? Focus on ones with no entry fee.
There are 10 attractions like that, including Big Bus Tours Chicago (Tours begin at 98 E. Upper Wacker Dr.), a Tourist Attraction.
OK, I'll look into that. What is the phone number?
The phone number is 877-285-4796.
Is that a child-friendly activity?
Yes, the tour is child-friendly.
Cool, what other attractions are there?
There is a Park, Burnham Park.
OK, great, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help with?
Yes, I need to find a house to stay in while we are there.
There is a house at 1 South Franklin Street with a rating of 4.4.
Does it have laundry service?
No, it doesn't have laundry service.
It still looks pretty great.
Would you like to reserve the house?
No, not right now, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that's all, thank you for your help.
My pleasure, have a great day!
I am looking for conditionally refundable tickets in a train going from Anaheim, CA to Phoenix, AZ.
What is the date of departure?
I would like to depart on 4th of this month.
I found 4 trains that might be suitable for you. How about a train departing at 6:30 am with the ticket cost of $122?
Can you find me the names of the stations it arrives at and depart from?
It departs from Anaheim Intermodal Center and arrives at Phoenix Union Station.
Can you show me any other trains suitable to my requirements?
How about a train departing at 6:40 am with the ticket cost of $123?
Can you show me any other trains suitable to my requirements?
How about a train departing at 12 pm with the ticket cost of $137?
This train sounds good to me.
Would you like me to book the tickets for you?
No, I don't want to book the tickets now.
Can I assist with anything else?
Find me something interesting to do there.
What type of events do you prefer?
I mostly prefer Theater.
How about a very popular show called Boondocks Improv taking place at Dearing Acting Studio on March 10th at 6:30 pm.
This event sounds good. Are there any other available event?
How about a very popular show called Chaos Comedy Improv Show taking place at Dearing Acting Studio on March 7th at 5 pm.
Find me the address of the venue and the cost of one ticket?
The address of the venue is 10806 north 32nd Street and the cost of one ticket is $20.
It sounds good. But can you find me a musical performance event on the 11th?
There are 10 events you may like. How about a very popular event called Dreamers taking place at The Van Buren on March 11th at 7:30 pm?
Okay, That sounds perfect. Please find me museum there.
I found 7 museum. How about Arizona Capitol Museum?
Is this museum child friendly?
Yes, This museum is child friendly.
Can you check whether the fee for entrance is free?
No, The entry is not free.
Okay, cool. Find me a house to stay there.
I found 10 nice houses. How about a house with 4.6 rating located at 10 East Thomas Road?
Can you check whether this house has laundry service?
Yes, laundry service is there inside the house.
Find me the contact number of this house please.
The contact number is +1 602-222-1111.
Okay, This house sounds perfect. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I'm looking for a train to LA, Can you help?
When do you thing you will go? Do you know what city you'll be leaving?
I want to leave Phoenix on the 4th of this month.
You could try the first train out at 7 am. It costs $95.
What about something later, maybe try the 11th of this month. I just need one.
There are 4 then. What about the 7:20 am bus then? Tickets are $93.
Fine, what about something interesting to do in LA? Any ideas on my day there?
What type of thing catches your fancy? For instance Music or Theater?
I do like some songs.
Well, what about checking out Ralph Freud Playhouse, Ain Gordon is playing there on March 9th at 7 pm?
Fine but what about some type Broadway type show? I would like it to be on the 14th of this month.
There are 10 plays, starting with Anything Goes. It's at the Upright Citizens Brigade Sunset. It happens to be on March 14th at 4 pm.
Fine but try again please. I'm interested in March 13th now.
Well, you could try Asssscat. It's at Upright Citizens Brigade Sunset on March 13th at 6:30 pm. What do you think?
Great, what about some attractions or other things to see there?
There are 10 options for you, alphabetically starting with Angels Flight Railway, It's a Historical Landmark.
How much does it cost? What's their phone?
It is free and you can phone them at 213-626-1901.
Fine, get me a house to stay in while there, there are 2 of us and we need at least a 4.5 rating.
You could check out 1800 Argyle Avenue, it has a 4.5 rating.
That's a real beauty there.
Shall I reserve it for you?
No, I just require information now.
I do love helping you, bye.
Can you find me a train to catch
What date and what city are you going to and coming from?
I want to head to Sacramento, Ca on March 7th from SD
What about the 6:10 am train that costs $148
What station does it arrive at and leave from
The train is leaving from Santa Fe Depot and arriving at Sacramento Valley Station
Are there other trains that could work?
What about this $146 train that leaves at 6:40 am
Are there any other trains that work, any class ticket is fine
I found 7 trains including the 7:30 am train for $152
That sounds great
Do you want me to book that for you?
Not now thanks
Anything else I can help you with?
I want to find something interesting to do, I wanna watch some Musical Shows on March 7th
I found 4 events including the Aftershock Festival that's at Discovery Park and it's happening on March 7th at 5:30 pm
How much does one ticket cost and where is the venue?
It's $55 and located at 1600 Garden Highway
Thanks that sounds good
Do you want tickets to that then?
No not right now
OK what else can I do then?
Can you show me more attractions without an entrance fee?
You should check out a museum like the California State Capitol Museum
What is the phone number of the place and is it child friendly?
No it's not a good place for kids to be frank, and it's 916-445-2841
OK can you find me another museum then?
There are 2 attractions including another museum called the California State Railroad Museum
Cool, what else is there
Another Museum? How about the Crocker Art Museum
OK cool, now find me a house with laundry service and a 4.1 rating for one
There are 10 houses including the 4.1 rated 100 Capitol Mall
What about other houses?
How about this place at 1121 15th Street with a 4.1 rating
OK that's good
What else can I do
No that's it for now
OK thanks so much. Bye!
Can you find me a train with one business class ticket for the 3rd please
Where are you looking to leave from?
I'll be coming from Phoenix, AZ
Where are you going?
I'll be ending up in Los Angeles
There's a 7 am train that costs $137 you might want to take
What station does it leave from?
It leaves from Phoenix Union Station
OK cool now I want to find something interesting to do
Do you have a preference for what kind of event?
I want to watch Musical Shows!
I found 10 including Ain Gordon who is playing at Ralph Freud Playhouse on March 9th at 7 pm
That sounds ok but can you find me something else?
How about Aldous Harding? They're playing at the Lodge Room On March 14th at 7:30 pm
That sounds awesome
Do you want to buy tickets for that?
No thanks, not right now
Can I do anything else to help you?
Can you find me some attractions please?
There's a Historical Landmark at Angels Flight Railway you might like
Okay thanks for that
What else can I assist you with
I want to find a house to stay in with a 4.3 rating and laundry service, for one is good
How about this 4.3 rated place at 1224 Beverwil Drive
What's their number?
It's +1 877-334-5623
That house looks great
OK do you want to reserve it?
No that's ok for now, thanks for now
OK sure, bye!
I would like to find a train leaving from San Diego.
What date would you like to depart? What city is your destination?
I would like to go to Los Angeles on the 7th.
There are 10 trains that match those criteria. There is one leaving at 6:10 am that would cost $56 in total.
OK, sounds good, thanks.
Would you like to book tickets?
No, I'm not going to be booking tickets right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I would like to find something interesting to do there.
Do you have a preference for the type of events?
I would like to watch a Stage show while we are there. Try the 11th of March.
I found 10 events for you. Anything Goes will be playing at Upright Citizens Brigade Sunset on March 11th at 4 pm.
OK, that sounds great, thanks.
Would you like to buy tickets for the play?
No, not at the moment. What other activities are there in the area? I would like to find something child-friendly without any entry fee.
There are 10 attractions that match those criteria. Angels Flight Railway is a Historical Landmark to visit.
What is the phone number?
The phone number is 213-626-1901.
OK, thanks. I would also like to find a house to stay at in the city. It will be for 2 people, and I would like the rating to be 3.8 or higher.
There is a house at 1020 South Figueroa Street with a rating of 3.8.
The house sounds good. That's all I need for now, thank you.
It's my pleasure to help you, have a good day.
I'm looking for a train that I could take this Saturday please.
Where will you be leaving from and what is your destination?
I'm going from Anaheim, CA to Phoenix and I'll need three tickets.
There is a train with a 6:30 AM departure and a ticket price of $343.
OK, that works.
Would you like to purchase tickets now?
No, not at the moment. I'd also like to find an interesting thing to do there on the 12th of March.
Is there a particular kind of event or attraction you're looking for? Perhaps a music or theater event?
Yes, I'm a big fan of songs.
The Van Buren is presenting Dreamers, which is very popular. That is on March 12th at 5 pm.
Where is that please and what does it cost?
The theater is at 401 West Van Buren Street and the ticket price is $55.
OK comma I like the sound of that.
Would you like to purchase tickets now?
I don't think so.
How else may I help you today?
I wanna find a cool attraction to go to.
I recommend a museum called the Arizona Capitol Museum.
OK, do you have anything else?
There is another museum I recommend called the Arizona Science Center.
What's the telephone number please?
That is 602-716-2000.
Is that a place that's good for kids and is there a charge to get in?
Yes, it's appropriate for children and there is free admission.
OK, that's terrific. I also need to find a house in that area. I'd like something that has a rating of 4.1 or more and it's just for 1 person.
There is a home at 10 East Thomas Road which is rated 4.1.
That sounds perfect.
Shall I reserve that for you?
Not right now, no.
How else may I help you today?
I think that's everything.
Thank you very much.
Find a train for me please.
In what date you plan to travel?
Find me tickets for March 6th.
From which city you want to depart?
I want tickets form Seattle.
In which city you go?
I'm going to Portland, OR.
10 trains can be okay for you.How about the train that depart at 8 am and cost $59 in total.
Sounds good.find me something interesting to do on the 14th.I enjoy Songs.
I have 6 options that you may like.A very popular options is Bastille and is take place at Theater Of The Clouds on March 14th at 5 pm.
Sounds okay but find me something else, please.
A very popular event is Bryan Adams at Theater Of The Clouds on March 14th at 7 pm.
Tell me the location and the cost for one ticket.
1016-1098 North Center Court Street is the location and the cost is $55.
This are okay but find me something else.
Very popular is Dave Alvin Oregon at The Old Church Concert Hall on March 14th at 7 pm.
Sounds great for me.
You want to buy thickets ?
No,right now I don't want that.Find me some child-friendly attractions there.I would like a Historical Landmark.
You should check out a Historical Landmark called St. Johns Bridge.
Nice,Any other you can find?
I am sorry but others cannot find according to your requirements.Something else you need?
Try please again.I would like a Museum without an entry fee.
You should check a Museum called Pittock Mansion.
Tell me the phone number.
503-823-3623 is their phone number.
Great.Find for me a house to say there.
A nice house with rating 4.1 located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street.
Something else you have with laundry service?
9 house I have for you.A nice house with rating 4.5 located at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue.
Something else you have for one people?
8 houses I have for you.A nice house located at 11518 Northeast Glenn Widing Drive with rating 4.2.
I like this house.That's all for now.
Happy to help!Bye.
I have planned to go for a short trip and I need to book two tickets in a Train from Fresno, CA. Can you help me to find a suitable train?
Yes, Where are you going to visit?
To San Francisco.
I want some more details. Let me know on which date you want to book the train?
I want to book it for March 13th.
Okay. I got a Train detail. This train will leave at 6:50 am for the ticket cost $111 in total. Do you want to book this train?
Let me know the station name from where this train will leave.
The origin station of this train is Fresno Station.
Okay. noted. Thanks.
Shall I book the tickets now?
No, I will ask it later.
How can I assist you further?
Find some events to go on that day. I like the Music events and find me the one on 14th of March.
What about Alex Cameron? This event will take place at August Hall on March 14th at 4:30 pm. Do you like to go to this event?
Let me know the venue to decide.
The venue is located at 420 Mason Street.
Also I want to know the ticket cost.
It costs $45 per ticket.
That's fine. Thanks. But I want to find some other events like a Stage Show on March 13th.
Okay, I got 8 events. What about your opinion on an event named Above Ground Festival will be held at Mojo Theatre on March 13th at 6 pm.
Search for something else.
How about Bats Improv Comedy taking place at BATS Improv Theatre on March 13th at 7:30 pm?
I think I lie to prefer this one.
That's good. Shall I book the tickets now?
No, may be later.
What else you want now?
I want to find some attractive places there to visit. Find me the one like Museum which should have free entrance.
What about a Museum named Cartoon Art Museum?
Check for the safe of Kids there.
Yes, this place is safe for kids.
That's nice. find me a house to stay there and I need the one with 3.5 or higher rating.
I got 10 houses and what about the one located at 1095 Market Street with rating 3.5.
Search for some other houses.
What about a house located at 1100 Market Street Hotel entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street with rating 3.5?
This seems good. Thanks.
Shall I book this house now?
No, I will ask it later.
How can I help you now?
Nothing and thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a train?
Which city are you leaving from and going to? Are there specific dates that you want to travel?
I am looking to leave next Monday, going from Anaheim to Sacramento, CA.
I found a train departing at 6:50 am that costs $143 in total.
That sounds good. I want to find something interesting to do there.
Do you have any preferences on the type of event?
I really like a musical performance.
The Aftershock Festival is popular. It takes place at Discovery Park on March 5th starting at 5:30 pm.
That sounds great.
Do you want to buy tickets for the event?
Not right now. Can you show me some attractions there? I'd like to visit a historical spot.
You can check out Old Sacramento Waterfront District. This is an historical landmark.
What is there phone number? Would you say this place is kid-friendly?
Yes, it is kid-friendly and their number is 916-970-5226.
Okay, great. I would like to find a house to stay there.
There are 10 houses available. There is a nice house located at 100 Capitol Mall that has a 4.4 rating.
This house sounds great. That is all I need for now, thanks.
It's been my pleasure to help. Good bye.
Find me a train I want luxurious ticket for Tuesday next week
What's your preferred City to depart from and where are you going to
I am looking for a tickets from Seattle to Portland for one seat
What about the train departs at 8 am. and costs $103
That sounds great
Do you want to get the tickets
No I don't want to get the tickets now I am looking for some interesting things on the 11th of March
What's your preferred type you can says music for theater
I like songs
There are 5 events bastille is a popular one at theater of the clouds on March 11th at 7 pm.
sounds great
Do you want to get the tickets for the event
No not right now show me some attractions there
You should check out crystal springs rhododendron garden which is the park
Ok good
Do you need any more help
I want to find a house to stay there with an average rating 4.4 or higher
There are 8 houses available there is a good house at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue with an average rating 4.4
Is there any other houses for 4 people
There is a good house located at 1510 Southwest harbor way which has a rating 4.4
The house is good that's all I need
Thank you have a nice day bye
I need help looking for a train.
What is your origin city?
I'll be leaving from Sacramento, CA.
And what's your destination?
I want to go to LAX.
And what date is this for?
It's for the 11th of March. And I'm going to need three value seats.
There are 2 trains that match. There's a departure at 6:30 am for $237. Does that interest you.
What other trains are there? How about we try 1 seat to San Diego?
There's a departure at 7:20 am for $152.
And what's the station that it leaves from?
The origin station is Sacramento Valley Station.
And what's the station it arrives at?
The destination station is Santa Fe Depot.
Let's keep looking. How about tickets for the 6th of this month. The type of ticket doesn't matter.
There's a departure at 7:30 am for $162.
That could work.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
No, we don't need to do that just yet.
What else can I do for you?
What are some interesting things to do when I'm there?
What are you interested in, music, theater, or something else?
Music related things would be good.
Alejandro Sanz might interest you. They're at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 7th at 7:30 pm.
Hoe much is a ticket and what's the venue's address?
The venue's address is 5500 Campanile Drive and a ticket is $50.
I'm down with that.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
We can do that later.
What else can I do for you?
Let's also look for attractions there, any type is fine.
There are 10 attractions you might enjoy. Balboa Park is a park that's nice.
Is it okay for kids?
It is not recommended for kids.
Alright, cool. Now I also need a house to stay in.
There are 10 houses available in the area. There's a nice 4.6 rated house at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States.
That's a high rating, seems good.
Do you want to reserve the house?
No, not right now. That's all for now, thanks for the help.
It's been great helping you. Take care.
Can you find me a train from Los Angeles?
What is your departure date and city?
Departing from San Fran on the 10th of March.
8 trains available. There is a 7:50 am train for a total of $94.
Can you give me another option for two in Anaheim?
There is a train departing at 6 am for a total of $53.
What is the arrival station?
Arriving at Anaheim Intermodal Center.
I would like to find something to do with songs there as well.
Brown Sabbath will be at Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim on March 2nd at 7:30 pm.
That one sounds good.
Should I book tickets for you?
Not at the moment.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I would like to see some attractions near there.
There are 10 options. Angel Stadium of Anaheim is a sports venue in the area.
Is it free and kid-friendly?
It is free and kids will enjoy it as well.
Are there any other attractions I might be interested in?
Cars Land is another Tourist Attraction in the area.
I will also need a home there with a 3.6 or higher rating for three.
There are 10 homes available. 1050 West Ball Road is a home with a 3.6 rating in the area.
That home is great. That' will be all for now.
Okay. Have a nice day. Goodbye.
I need to find a train please.
When will you be leaving? From which city?
I need tickets for Anaheim, CA on the 2nd of this month.
Which city will you be going to?
I want 1 economy ticket to Phoenix.
There are 4 trains that would, one is 6:30 am and costs $123.
Sounds great thank you.
Do you want to book tickets?
Not at this time thanks.
Can I do anything more for you?
I need an interesting event on that day.
Do you like music, Theater, or anything else?
I really enjoy musical performance.
I found 10 events, one is Bad Suns at the Van Buren on March 2nd on 4:30 pm.
What else can you find?
Dodie is popular and will be at the Van Buren on March 4th at 7 pm.
Where is it located, and how much will it be?
Tickets are $20 and the venue is at 401 WEst Van Buren Street.
SOunds great, can you find some attractions?
There are 10, one is a museum called Arizona Capitol Museum.
Great I need a house as well.
There are 10, one is a 4.6 at 10 East Thomas Road.
Are there other houses rated 4.4 of higher?
There are 9 and, one located at 15 East Monroe Street and is 4.4.
Thanks that is all I needed.
My pleasure, have a great day.
I require assistance booking a trip on a train.
Please name the departure and arrival city as well the date you wish to leave.
I'm leaving Fresno and heading to Los Angeles on the 5th of this month.
There are 9 trains that are available on the 5th. There is one in particular that is leaving at 7:20 am and costs $66 for the ticket.
That sounds pretty good to me. Thanks.
I can book those for you right now. Is that alright?
No thank you. I just wanted the information for the time being.
Can I help you with something else then?
I want to find something fun and interesting to do while I'm there on that day.
Are you in the mood for Music or Theater? If you have something completely different in mind, just ask.
I'm a big fan of Drama. Try searching for that.
There are 10 events that fall under the category of Drama. On March 1st, there is a production called A Year in Dragonfly taking place at 7:30 pm at Studio C Artists.
What's the address of Studio C Artists?
The venue is located at 6448 California 2.
And the cost of the ticket is what?
The ticket costs $55.
Alright. Everything sounds in order then. Before I let you go though, can you tell me about attractions there?
I have found 10 that you may enjoy. The first is a Historical Landmark called Angels Flight Railway.
That sounds really interesting. Thanks for that. Can you find me a house to stay in as well?
10 houses match your criteria. One home has a rating of 4.1 and is located at 1020 South Figueroa Street.
Wow. That house seems amazing.
Would you like me to go ahead and reserve the home for you?
No thanks. I'm still working out some details on that. Thanks for the information though. That's all I need for now.
Please let me know if you need anything else. It's always a pleasure. Bye.
I would like to look for a train.
What are your travel dates? What city are you departing from, and what is your destination?
I am looking for tickets from Seattle, WA to Portland, OR on the 14th.
There is a train departing at 8 am with a cost of $60 in total.
Are there any other trains? I will need one seat.
There are 9 trains that meet your criteria, including one leaving at 8:10 am with a total ticket price of $55.
OK, that sounds good, thanks. I would also like to find something interesting to do while I am there.
Is there any particular category of activity you would prefer, such as Music or Theater?
Yes, I really like Musical shows.
I found 8 events in that category. Bastille will be at Theater of The Clouds on March 10th at 5:30 pm.
How much does one ticket cost? Where is the venue located?
One ticket costs $20. The venue is located at 1016-1098 North Center Court Street.
That sounds good, thanks. What are some other attractions there? Something child-friendly with no entry fee.
There are 7 attractions with those criteria, including Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden, a Park.
What is the phone number?
The phone number is 503-771-8386.
OK, great. I would also like to find a house to stay in there. I need a rating of 3.8 or higher, with laundry service.
There are 10 houses matching those criteria, including 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street, with a rating of 3.8.
That house is great.
Would you like to reserve it?
Not right now, I'm all set, thank you.
It's my pleasure to help you, have a good day.
Hey, can you help me get 1 seat on a train leaving from Chicago on the 8th please?
What's your destination?
It is NYC.
I found a train leaving at 7:30 am with a ticket that costs $124.
Sounds like a good one.
Should I book it?
Not now, thank you.
Can I help you with anything else?
Can you find me some stage show I can go to on the 10th of March?
I found 10 of them. On March 10th at 4:30 pm the Advanced Acting Scene Study will be playing at the TGW Acting Studio.
Sounds really great.
Should I buy the tickets?
Not now. Can you first find me some child friendly park I can go to?
Alley Pond Park is a great child friendly park.
Good to know. I also need help finding a house there.
There's a 4.4 on 100 Greenwich Street.
Do they have laundry service? What's their phone number?
They do and their number is +1 917-409-0800.
Sounds like a great house.
Should I make a reservation?
Not now, thank you. That's all I need.
Glad to be of help, goodbye!
I'm going on a trip soon. Can you find me train tickets for the 8th of this month? Any class is fine.
Sure, what city are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from San Francisco.
Ok, and where are you going?
I'm going to Sacramento.
Alright, I found 9 possible train rides. There's one for $48 that leaves at 6:10 am. How about that?
Sure, that sounds fine.
Ok, do you want me to book tickets?
No, not yet.
Ok, anything else I can do?
Yeah, can you look up some interesting things to do around there on the 10th of March? A music event would be nice.
Sure, I found 5 events that you might like. There's the Aftershock Music Festival in Discovery Park on March 10th starting at 5 pm. How about that?
Yes, that sounds fun.
Do you want to get tickets for it?
No, not right now.
Ok, anything else I can do then?
Yes, can you look up some other attractions that are kid-friendly, like a Theme Park maybe?
Sure, I found 2 theme park events you might like. How about Fairytale Town?
Is that free? And what's their number?
No, it's not free entry unfortunately. Their number is 916-808-5233.
Ok, that's fine. Can you look up houses to stay around there while you're at it?
Sure, I found 10 possible options. There's a nice 4.4 star house at 100 Capitol Mall. How about that?
Sure, that sounds great.
Ok, do you want to make a reservation?
No, not right now.
Ok, anything else I can help with then?
No, that's all for now. Thanks.
No problem, have a good day.
Hi I need to travel somewhere, can you find me a train?
Of course, which city will you be travelling to and where are you leaving from? Also, what day are you planning to travel?
I'd like to go to Washington, departing from Atlanta, GA. I'll be travelling on the 3rd of March.
I managed to find 6 trains that could work for you. How about the train leaving at 10 am? The ticket will cost $92.
Is there anything else you can find? I'd like tickets for the 13th of March, any class is fine.
How about the train that leaves at 1:20 pm? The ticket costs $104.
Is there anything else you can find? I'd like an economy premium ticket.
How about the train that leaves at 1:50 pm? The ticket will cost $124.
That works for me.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Are there any attractions I can go to on that day?
What kind of events are you interested in?
I would prefer some Musical shows.
I managed to find 10 events that you may like. I recommend a popular show called Adam Ant. It takes place at Atlanta Symphony Orchestra on March 11th at 5 pm.
What is the location of the venue?
You can find the venue at 1280 Peachtree Street Northeast.
What is the cost per ticket?
The ticket will cost $25.
That works for me.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the show?
Not at this time, no.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Can you suggest some other attractions? Something that doesn't have an entree fee, preferably a Historical Landmark. It also need to be child-friendly.
I managed to find 2 attractions you may like. I suggest Martin Luther King, Jr. National Historical Park. It is a historical landmark.
That sounds good. I'd like to find a house to stay at. Something with a rating of 4.4 or above. There will be 2 people staying there and I need laundry service.
How about this nice house located at 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast? It has a rating of 4.4.
Can you please give me their phone number?
The number for the house is +1 404-745-5000.
This looks like a great house.
Would you like me to reserve the house for you?
No, not at this time. That's all I needed for now.
Glad I could help, have a nice day.
I want you to find me a train which leaves from Philly, and I want to have 1 seat for it.
Can you tell me the date when you are going to have your travel?
The tickets I am looking for should be for the 12th.
Can you tell me your destination?
I want to go to NYC.
How would you like having the train which leaves at 10:40 am, and the ticket of which costs $47?
Can you tell me the station from where the train leaves, and the station where the train arrives at?
The train will be departing from 30th Street Station, and it's arrival station is Grand Central Station.
Is there some other train that you can suggest? More specifically I want to have a train which leaves from Washington, and I do not mind the class of the fare.
I found 8 trains which match what you want. One of the trains that you can consider leaves at 6:20 am, and that it costs $66.
That is what I want.
Do you want to have tickets booked for you for this train?
Actually I do not want to have tickets for this train bought at this moment.
Is there something else I can do to help you?
I also would like to know about some interesting things to do there, I usually enjoy the Musical shows.
You might consider going to Abbi Jacobson which is quite popular, and it will happen at Kaufmann Concert Hall on March 11th at 7:30 pm.
It seems fine, though is there some other event you can recommend?
Another event for you to consider is Alma Deutscher which is also popular, and it will happen at Stern Auditorium / Perelman Stage on March 3rd at 7 pm.
That is okay, but I want you to tell me about other alternatives for March 13th.
There are 8 events that you might want to go to. One of the events is Alpha Blondy which is a good one, and it will happen at Sony Hall on March 13th at 5:30 pm.
Can you tell me the location of the venu?
The address of the venue is 235 West 46th Street.
Can you tell me the price of the ticket?
The ticket has a price of $60.
That seems nice. Can you recommend some attractions there?
I found 10 attractions for you to consider, with one of the attractions being 9/11 Tribute Museum, which is a Museum.
Can you tell me the phone number of this attraction, and could you also tell me if the entrance to this attraction is free?
Unfortunately entering this attraction is not free of charge, and if you want to call them you can at 866-737-1184
Alright, though can you recommend some other attractions? More specifically I want something without entry fee, and that it is suitable for kids.
There are 10 attractions for you to consider, with one of them being Alley Pond Park, which is a Park.
Alright, is there some other alternative attraction, more specifically a Museum?
Matching what you want I found 10 attractions, with one of the attractions being Brooklyn Children's Museum, which is a Museum.
Alright, fine. Now I would like to find a house there, which has laundry service, and I need it for 1 person.
A nice house for you to consider can be found at 100 Greenwich Street, and it has a rating of 4.4
What is the phone number of this place?
If you want to call them you can at +1 917-409-0800
This house seems a nice choice to me
Do you want to make a booking for this house?
No, I do not want to have a booking be made at this moment.
Can I do something else to help you?
Nothing, I am grateful for the help you provided.
I enjoy helping you. Goodbye!
Get me a train ticket.
What is your departure date?
I wish to depart on the 13th of this month.
What are you departure and arrival cities?
I am departing SF and headed to Fresno.
There is a train departing at 6:20 am with a total bill of $70.
What else can you find? Find me something going to SD that is fully refundable.
There is a train leaving at 6 am with a total cost of $121.
What is the arrival station?
Santa Fe Depot is the arrival station.
What is the departure station?
Salesforce Transit Center is the departing station.
What else can you find?
There is a train leaving at 9:20 am with a total bill of $128.
That works for me. What fun things are there to do there?
Shall I search in Music, Theater, or another category?
Search for something under the Music genre on the 14th.
Bastille is playing at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 14th at 5 pm.
That is perfect.
Shall I reserve tickets for you?
No, not at the moment.
Do you need more help?
Search for some Park attractions.
Balboa Park is a neat Park.
I see. Search for a house for one person to stay in near there.
1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States has a 4.6 rating and meets your preferences.
That is perfect.
Shall I book the house for you?
No, not at the moment.
Do you need more help?
No, not right now. Thanks.
I am happy to help you anytime. Bye for now.
I need to get a train.
Where would you be departing from and when would you like to leave?
I will be leaving Anaheim, CA Saturday this week.
And heading to which city?
I want a luxurious ticket for 1 to Los Angeles.
There are 10 trains leaving that day. There is one leaving at 6 am and the cost is $71.
Which station would it be arriving at?
At Anaheim Intermodal Center.
That sounds like a great idea. What fun thing can I do when I get there on that day?
What are you interested in? Music, theater or something else?
I want to see a stage show.
There is 1 such event available. You should check out Jesus Christ Superstar. It would be taking place at Stage Door Repertory Theatre on March 1st at 7 pm.
That would be fine.
Would you like tickets?
Not right now. What else is there to do?
There are 10 events that day. You can take in a game at Angel Stadium of Anaheim. It is a sports venue.
Is there an entrance fee and would my kids have fun?
There is no cost to enter and I am sure your kids would have a good time.
Ok then. I would need a house for two when I get there.
There is a lovely house at 1050 West Ball Road and it has a rating on 4.2
Is laundry service provided and can I have a contact number?
The number is +1 714-860-4660 and there is laundry service available.
That house would be suitable. That's all I need for now.
Enjoy your day.
Look for a train
On when and to where are you looking for. From where do you want to depart?
Look the train from LA to Anaheim on the 12th
How about a train departing at 6 am. The cost is $35
Where does it arrive?
It arrives at Anaheim Intermodal Center
That's perfect
Can I book ticket?
No. I don't want to book ticket now
Do you need anything else?
Find me something interesting to do?
Do you prefer any category like Music or theater or anything else
Look for Musical performance on the 13th
There is 1 event which is Brown Sabbath at Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim on March 13th at 4:30 pm
That's perfect. Find me some attractions there which is child-friendly. It should be without entry fee.
I found 6 attractions. How about Angel Stadium of Anaheim which is Sports Venue
Nice. Look for another attraction. I want a place of interest
I found 2 attractions. How about Cars Land which is a Tourist Attraction
Get me the phone number
The number is 714-781-4565
That's nice. Find me a house to stay there. I also need laundry service
How about 1050 West Ball Road which has a rating of 4.2
Is there any other house?
How about 1057 West Ball Road which has a rating of 4.0
That's perfect
Do you want me to make a reservation?
No Not now. That's all for now. Thank you so much.
You are welcome. Bye
I am looking for a train from Anaheim, CA on the 10th.
What is your destination?
My destination is LA.
There is train which leaves at 6:30 am and the cost of ticket is $35.
Okay. Sounds nice. I am looking for something interesting to do on that day.
What category of event do you prefer like Music or Theater or anything else?
I mostly prefer Broadway.
There are 10 events you may like. How about a popular event called A Year In Dragonfly taking place at Studio C Artists on March 1st at 7:30 pm.
Okay, That sounds good. But Find me some music events taking place on 13th of this month.
There are 10 events you may like. How about a popular event called Aldous Harding taking place at Masonic Lodge at Hollywood Forever on March 13th at 4:30 pm.
Okay, That sounds good. But show me some other event.
How about a popular event called Altin Gun taking place at The Teragram Ballroom on March 13th at 5:30 pm.
That sounds great to me. Now, Find me some attractions there.
I found 10 attractions you may like. How about a Historical Landmark called Angels Flight Railway?
Can you confirm whether this place is child friendly?
Yes, This place is child friendly.
Okay. Now, Find me a house to stay there.
I found 10 house you may like. How about a house with 4.1 rating located at 1020 South Figueroa Street?
Find me their contact number.
You can call them on +1 213-748-1291.
Can you check whether this place has laundry?
Yes, This place comes with laundry service.
The house sounds nice to me.
Do you want me to reserve the house for you?
No, Maybe some other time.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I need a train.
Where will you you depart from, where are you going and which date?
Leaving on the 6th from San Fran to SD.
There are 6 options. One departs at 6 am for $91.
What is the departure and arrival stations?
Leaving from Salesforce Transit Center and arrivnig at Santa Fe Depot.
OK, I also want something fun to do.
Do you prefer music, theater or something else.
Music is good.
There are 10 events. Alejandro Sanz is playing at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 7th at 7:30 pm.
That would be great.
Would you like tickets?
Not now. Any other attractions?
A good park is Balboa Park
Is it free and what is the phone number.
Unfortunately, it is not free. The number is 619-239-0512.
Good, I also need to rent a house.
There are 10. One rated at 4.6 is at 1003 Coast Boulevard La Jolla, California 92037, United States.
Does it offer laundry and what is the number?
Yes, it has laundry service and the number is +1 858-224-7600.
OK thank you.
Would you like to book it?
No, not now.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
Find me a train from Washington. I need 2 seats
Where do you want to go?
I want to go to NYC
On what date?
Look for the tickets on 9th of this month
I found 9 trains. How about the train that departs at 6:20 am? The cost is $127 in total
Is there any other train? I want the train from Chicago with fully refundable tickets
How about the train which departs at 7:30 am and the cost is $273 in total
Find another train. Look for economy tickets on 7th of this month
I found 6 trains. How about the train that departs at 8 am and the cost is $202 in total
On which station it arrives and fro where does it leaves?
The train leaves from Chicago Union Station and arrives at Grand Central Station
That's nice one
Can I book the tickets?
No Not now
Do you need anything else?
Find me something interesting to do there on that day
Is there any particular category you prefer like Music or theater or anything else?
Look for Drama
There are 10 events. How about Acting For Teens at 520 8th Ave. - Personal Valet Parking on March 4th at 6 pm
That's good one
Can I buy ticket?
No I don't want to buy ticket now
Do you need anything else?
Find me some attractions there which should be child-friendly
I found 10 attractions. How about 9/11 Tribute Museum which is a museum
That's great. Find me a house to stay there with laundry service. Look for the room with 4.4 rating and for one person
I found 10 houses. How about the house at 111 North 12th Street, Brooklyn. The rating is 4.4
That's nice one. That's all for now
I am glad to help you.
I need one train ticket. I'm coming from Fresno, CA.
Where are you going?
I'm going to Anaheim.
When are you traveling?
I'm leaving on the 9th of this month.
I found 6 trains. One's leaving at 7 am and costs $66.
What station does it come to? What station does it leave?
The train is coming from Fresno Station and arrives at Anaheim Intermodal Center.
That's good. I want something to do there on the 10th of this month.
What are you interested in? What about music or theater?
I like musical shows.
Brown Sabbath are performing at Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim on March 10th at 7 pm.
Sounds fun. What other attractions are there? I want something free.
I found 8 attractions. Angel Stadium of Anaheim is a sports venue there.
What else? I want a theme park.
Disneyland Park is a theme park there.
Okay. I want a house to stay at there.
I found 10 houses. One is located at 1050 West Ball Road with a 4.2 rating.
What's their number?
Their number is +1 714-860-4660.
Do they offer laundry?
They offer laundry services.
Good. That's all.
Have a nice day.
Let's search for a train ticket please.
I can help with that, but first I need to know which city you want to travel to and depart from. Also do you know the date you want to leave on?
I need a ticket from San Francisco to Fresno, CA for the 7th.
I understand, There are 8 trains that may work for you. There is a train departing at 6:20 am for a total of $56.
Are there any other options?
There is a train departing at 4 pm for a total of $62.
What is the name of the station i would arrive to?
you would arrive at Fresno Station.
I would like to find some fun stuff to do on that day. what can you recommend?
Any particular preference such as music or parks?
I would really enjoy a Musical performance
There is 1 event in Brockhampton that is pretty popular. This event is taking place at Rainbow ballroom on March 12th at 6 pm.
What is the address of the venue and how much is 1 ticket?
The tickets are $25 each, and located at 1725 Broadway Street
That sounds pretty good to me. Can you show me some other attractions as well.
Sure, there is also Blackbeard's Family Entertainment, this is a theme park.
Is this place kid friendly? also is there a fee to get in?
Yes, there is an entry fee. This venue is not appropriate for kids
Thanks for that. Locate other attractions, I would prefer a historical spot if possible.
I found 1 attraction that may work for you. There is Forestiere Underground Gardens. This is a Historical Landmark.
ok thanks. I would need to locate a house to stay at out there. This rental would be for just one person. Please make sure there is a laundry service available.
There are 4 houses that meet your search requirement, i would suggest first 1055 Van Ness Avenue with a rating of 3.8.
This sounds perfect
Should we book it now?
NO, i was just curious. that will be all for now.
ok, have a good day
I need to get tickets for a train from Washington to Chi-town. I need the tickets to be fully refundable just in case.
Okay. On which date would you like to travel?
I would like to leave on March 14th.
How about a train that departs at 9:40 am and costs $128?
That would work for me. Can you also find me something interesting to do there on that day?
Are there any particular categories of events that you would be interested in? Such as Music, Theater, or anything else.
I really like Songs and Music.
I've found 9 events you might like. How about Ashe which is taking place at Chop Shop on March 11th at 7:30 pm.
They are good, but find me something else. I'm not really interested in that.
Conor Maynard is a very popular event. It's also taking place at the Chop Shop, but on March 4th at 7 pm.
That's sounds more like my style.
Would you like to purchase tickets to this event?
Nah. Another time. Find me some attractions there that I can have a good time checking out.
I've found 10 attractions which I believe will interest you. You should check out 360 CHICAGO which is a tourist attraction.
Sounds cool, I'll check it out. Can you find me a house to stay at while i'm there? Something with a rating of 4.2 or higher.
There's a nice house located at 1 South Franklin Street with a rating of 4.2. Would that work for you?
Probably. I would like to see some pictures but I'll check it out later.
Would you like to make a reservation for the house?
No. Like I said, not right now.
Is there anything else that I can assist you with then?
Not right now. That you for your help though, you've been great.
I'm always glad to help out. Enjoy the rest of your day.
Hey, can you get me a conditionally refundable ticket on a train leaving from Anaheim on the 1st of this month?
What's your planned destination?
It is Sacramento.
There's a train departing at 6:50 am and the ticket costs $134.
Any other option?
There's one departing at 7:10 am costing $148.
Sounds like a good one.
Should I book the tickets?
Not now, thanks. First find me something fun to do then.
What kind of events do you like the most? Like something with Music or a Theater...
I love anything with Songs.
Great. The Aftershock Festival at Discovery Park should be a great option for you, it will occur on March 5th at 5:30 pm.
Oh, good. Any other event?
The Aftershock Music Festival at Discovery Park will also take place on March 5th at 4 pm.
How much is the tickets?
It costs $55.
Good to know. Any other events available?
Popa Chubby at the Sofia Tsakopoulos Center for The Arts is also very popular, it will happen on March 3rd at 6 pm.
Sounds real good.
Should I book the tickets?
Not now, but thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
Can you show me some attractions I could go to there?
The California State Capitol Museum is a great Museum over there.
Is it child friendly? So they charge an entrance fee?
They don't charge an entrance fee but unfortunately it's not a great place for kids.
Oh, okay. Help me find a house for two I can stay in over there please.
I found 10 options. There's a nice one rated 4.4 at 100 Capitol Mall if you're interested.
Sounds great. This is all I need for now, thanks.
Have an amazing day.
I'm looking for a train travelling from Sacramento, CA on the 1st.
What's your destination?
My destination is Anaheim.
There's a train that departs at 6:30 am for $116 altogether, how does that sound?
What other trains are there? I just want one economy ticket.
There's a train that departs at 7:20 am for $121 altogether.
I want to keep looking. How about something from San Fran that's a business ticket.
There's a train that departs at 7:10 am for $128 altogether.
I like that one.
Do you want to purchases the ticket?
Not right now, but I do want to know about things I can do when I'm there that day.
Is there anything in particular you're looking for, like Music or Theater?
Music related things interest me.
Brown Sabbath might be for you. It's at Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim on March 2nd at 7:30 pm.
What's the price of a ticket?
A ticket is $55.
And what's the address of the venue?
The venue is located at 1530 Disneyland Monrail System.
That sounds pretty good, but let's keep looking. I'd like to find a show on the 10th of this month.
You might enjoy Jesus Christ Superstar. It's at Stage Door Repertory Theatre on March 10th at 7:30 pm.
I'd enjoy that a lot.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
No, we can do that later.
What else can I help you with?
How about looking for an attraction like a stadium?
There are 2 attractions that match the criteria. Angel Stadium of Anaheim is a Sports Venue that you might enjoy?
Is it okay for kids to go there?
Yes, kids would enjoy it too.
Okay, that can work.
What else can I do for you?
I also need a house for three people to stay at there, it should be rated 3.9 or high with laundry service.
There's a nice 3.9 rated house at 1050 West Ball Road.
What's their phone number?
You can reach them at +1 714-860-4660.
Okay, thanks. The house seems good. I'll be going now.
It's been enjoyable helping you, take care.
I want a train to go to Seattle.
What city are you coming from? What day are you leaving?
I'm coming from Portland, OR and am leaving on the 7th of this month.
I found 9 trains. One is leaving at 9:10 am and costs $59.
Good. I want to do something that day.
What type of events do you like?
I like play events.
I found 10 events. Beatleconcert is taking place at 12th Avenue Arts on March 10th at 5 pm.
I want something else.
Blood Water Paint is taking place at 12th Avenue Arts on March 2nd at 6 pm.
Good. I want to see some attractions there. Any type is fine.
Alki Beach Park is a park there.
Is it child-friendly?
Yes, you can take your kids.
I also want a place to stay there.
One is located at 1000 1st Avenue with a 4.5 rating.
Does it offer laundry services?
It does offer laundry services.
What else is there?
One is located at 1006 Spring Street with a 3.9 rating.
Does it offer laundry services?
It does not.
That's a good one.
Would you like to reserve it?
Not right now.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
can you find a train for me? i want a luxurious ride.
when and where do you want to travel? where are you leaving from?
i want tickets from anaheim to sacramento, ca for march 6th.
there's a train that leaves at 6:50 am for $154.
that works for me.
do you want to book tickets?
not at the moment?
what else can i help with?
can you find me some music events to do on march 8th?
rhett and link are at the sacramento memorial auditorium on march 8th at 7 pm.
how much is a ticket?
a ticket will be $35.
that's cool, but are there any others? i like Play a lot.
there's 1 event for you. Nick Jr Live is at the Sacramento Memorial Auditorium on march 8th at 6 pm
that sounds cool.
do you want tickets for it?
not right now. is there something that's free entry?
you can go to california state capitol museum which is a museum.
what's their number?
you can call them at 916-445-2841.
are there any other places?
you can go to california state railroad museum which is a museum.
okay cool. can you find me a house there?
there's 10 places. one has a 4.4 rating and is on 100 capitol mall.
that sounds perfect. thanks, that's everything.
okay, have a great day.
I need some assistance finding a train please.
What is your destination and when are you looking to travel? Also where will you be leaving from?
I'll be going from Sacramento, CA to Anaheim and I'll be doing that next Tuesday.
I have a train with a 6:30 am departure and a ticket price of $121.
Yes, that's fine. I'm also interested in finding something worthwhile to do on that day.
Is there a specific type of event you're looking for, such as a music or theater activity?
I would like to do something theater related and let's look on the 10th please.
Stage Door Repertory Theatre is presenting Jesus Christ Superstar on March 10th at 7:30 pm.
What is the ticket price please and where is the theater?
The tickets cost $45 do the location of the performance is 1045 North Armando Street.
That's a good possibility, but what else is there? Maybe a concert.
I can recommend Brown Sabbath playing at Crossroads at House of Blues Anaheim. That's at 7 pm on March 10th.
I like the sound of that one. What about some interesting attractions that are appropriate for kids? Maybe a theme park.
I have 3 options to tell you about. Disney California Adventure Park is a popular theme park.
Yes, perfect. And I'm going to require a house where I can stay, just for one person.
I have 10 houses that I can recommend. One of them is 4.2 rated and that's at 1050 West Ball Road.
May I have the telephone number and I'm also wondering if they have laundry service.
Yes they do have laundry service and the phone number is +1 714-860-4660.
Thanks, I like that.
Shall I make a reservation for you there?
No, I don't think so.
Very well. How else may I help you today?
I'm all set, thank you.
I'm happy to be able to help you, goodbye.
Can you please help me find a train?
Sure, but first please tell me your departure date and city.
Please find me tickets out of Sacramento, CA on the 14th of this month.
OK. Now please tell me your desired destination.
I'm travelling to SFO.
I found 10 trains matching your criteria. How about the one at 7:30 am with tickets priced at $48?
Sounds OK. Now let's find something interesting to do there.
Any particular interest? Maybe Music or Theater?
I would like something involving Songs.
There are 10 events which I think you might like. How about Alex Cameron playing at August Hall on March 8th at 7 pm?
Can you please tell me the ticket price?
Sure, tickets are priced at $25.
Sounds perfect. Now please show me some attractions there.
You shouldn't miss seeing Alcatraz, an awesome Historical Landmark.
OK, got it.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
Yes, please find me a house to stay there, for 4 persons.
I found 10 matching your criteria out of which I recommend the one t 1095 Market Street, rated at 4.0.
Sounds perfect for me. That will be all for now! Thank you!
My pleasure, as always. Have a nice day!
I need help looking for a train.
Where will you be travelling from and to?
I'll be travelling from Sacramento, CA to SFO.
And what date will that be on?
I want to go on the 6th of this month.
There's a train leaving at 7:30 am for $53. How does that sound?
I like the sound of that. I'm also looking for things to do over there, on the 9th of this month. Something like a stage show.
A lot of people like Above Ground. It's at the Mojo Theatre on March 9th at 6:30 pm.
That sounds good, but what else is there?
A lot of people like As You Like it. It's at the Main Post Lawn on March 9th at 5 pm.
That's good too, but how about some events with songs.
There are 7 events you might enjoy. A lot of people like Alex Cameron. It's at August Hall on March 9th at 6 pm.
That sounds very good. Now how about some child friendly attractions that are over there.
There are 10 attractions that you might like. How about Alcatraz which is a Historical Landmark?
That sounds interesting. And I also need a house to stay at that is suitable for two people. It should rated 4.4 or higher.
3 Houses match your criteria. There's a nice 4.4 rated house on 138 King Street.
That sounds like a great house. Thanks for helping, that's all I need right now.
It's been my pleasure, take care.
I would like to find a train. I need 4 Business seats for the 8th.
What city are you going to?
We will be travelling from Sacramento, CA to SD.
There are 10 trains for that route. There is a train departing at 6:30 am that would cost $721 in total.
What station does the train leave from and arrive at?
The train departs from Sacramento Valley Station, and arrives at Santa Fe Depot.
OK, that sounds great, thanks.
Would you like to book the tickets?
No, thank you. I would like to find something to do while we are there. Something with songs on the 14th of March.
Bastille will be at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 14th at 5 pm.
That sounds great. What other attractions are there?
There are 10 attractions that might interest you, including a Park called Balboa Park.
Is that place child-friendly? What is the phone number?
There is not a lot at that location for kids to do. The phone number is 619-239-0512.
OK, thank you. I would like to find a house to stay in while we are there.
There are 10 houses available in the area. 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States has a rating of 4.6.
What is the contact number? Is there laundry service on site?
The phone number is +1 858-224-7600. There is laundry service at the house.
OK, thank you, that sounds great.
Would you like to reserve the house?
No, not right now. Thank you, that's all I need.
It's my pleasure to help you, have a great day.
I want to find a train.
What city are you traveling to and where are you leaving from? What date are you leaving?
I want to find tickets from Chi-town to ATL for the 10th of March.
I found 1 train. There's a train at 6:20 am for $241.
What station does it leave from?
The train leaves from Chicago Union Station.
That sounds great.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
No, not right now.
Anything else I can do for you?
I want to find something cool to do there that day.
What kind of events are you looking for?
I like drama.
Babyshower For The Antichrist is a popular drama at Fulton County West End Performing Arts Center on March 12th at 7:30 pm.
That works for me.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
No, maybe later. What are some other attractions there?
Al-Farooq Masjid is a popular Place of Worship.
Is it kid-friendly? What's the phone number?
Yes, it is child-friendly. The phone number is 678-886-3457.
What are some other attractions? I want to find a museum.
Atlanta History Center is a popular museum.
Can you find me a house to stay there? I want something rated 4.4 or higher.
There's a house rated 4.4 at 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast.
That sounds great. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
Can you help me find a train?
Which city will you be departing?
I'd like tickets from Anaheim, CA.
Where will you be going? Which dates will you be traveling?
I'll be heading to Sacramento, CA on the 11th of this month.
How about a 6:50 am departure? It'll be $127.
That sounds great. Can you find me something interesting to do there?
Do you prefer a certain type of event?
I do like songs.
How about Aftershock Festival at Discovery Park? It'll be happening on March 5th at 5:30 pm.
That's good, but can you find me something else? Maybe Play, and maybe on the 14th of this month?
You might also like Dear Evan Hansen. It'll be happening at Sacramento Memorial Auditorium on March 14th at 6 pm.
I like the sound of that.
Do you want me to get you tickets?
No thanks, not right now. Can you find nearby attractions?
There are 8 attractions nearby that might be of interest. Perhaps a museum? I found California State Capitol Museum.
Okay, that sounds great. Can you find me a house with laundry serve with a 4.4 rating or higher?
I found 1 house at 500 J Street with a 4.4 rating.
Can you give me a number to contact them?
Sure, it's +1 916-545-7100.
That sounds great, that'll be all then.
It's been a pleasure, thank you!
I want you took for a train, can you find me one?
which is the city you need to travel?
I have to go to Fresno
Which is the city you are departing from and when?
I need tickets from Anaheim on the 7th
I have found 6 trains for you and how about the train starting at 7:10 am and costing total $85?
that is fine
You need ticket booking?
No, i don't need tickets now
Any other help you need?
I have to find something interesting around 14th of this month
Do you have choice of events?
I really wanted show
I have short listed 1 event of your liking and what is your opinion on popular The Government Inspector at California Arts Academy on March 14th at 5:30 pm?
What is the venue location?
The venue location is 1401 North Wishon Avenue
That is fine
Do you need event tickets?
No, not now
Can i help you with any other thing?
I want you to search for child-friendly attractions there
You have to look into Christmas Tree Lane as it is a Tourist Attraction
Ok, are there any other attractions?
You have to check out Fresno Chaffee Zoo which is a Nature Preserve
Ok, are there any other attractions you find as i need a Theme Park
There is 1 attraction of your liking and you can check out Island Waterpark which is a theme park
Can i know their contact number and is it entrance free?
Their contact number is 559-277-6800 and it is entrance free
Okay fine and i need to look for a house to stay there
I have found 4 houses and one among them is a house located at 1055 Van Ness Avenue with rating 3.8 is a nice one
This is perfect
You want house reservation?
No, not now. Nothing more
Bye and my pleasure helping you
can you fine me train tickets leaving from portland?
where are you going?
i'm going to seattle, wa.
when did you want to leave?
i want tickets for the 6th of march.
there's 9 trains for you. how about one that leaves at 9:10 am and costs $61.
that works for me.
do you want to reserve them?
not at the moment. can you find me something fun to do on that day?
do you like music or theater or any topic like that?
i like theater. can you find me something for march 7th?
there's a beatleconcert happening on 12th avenue arts on march 7th at 6:30 pm.
that sounds cool.
do you want tickets?
no, not at the moment.
is there something else i can do?
can you find me a kid-friendly garden?
there's a park there called alki beach park.
is it free? what's the number?
no, there's a fee. you can call them at 206-684-4075.
are there any other places you know of?
there's also a park called carkeek park.
okay, can you find me a house around there?
there's 10 i found for you. there's a house with a 4.5 rating on 1000 1st avenue.
does it offer laundry service?
yes it does.
what is their number?
you can call them at +1 206-957-1000.
okay, looks perfect.
do you want to reserve it?
no thanks.
is there anything else?
no that's it.
have a great day.
I need a train from SF.
When will you be leaving?
I want Flexible tickets on the 9th please.
Which city will you go to?
Sacramento, CA is my destination.
How about a 6:10 am train that costs $69?
Are there any other trains from Los Angeles for 1.
There are 5 trains, how about the $109 at 9:20 am?
Which station does it leave from? Which does it arrive at?
The train leaves from Union Station and arrives to Sacramento Valley Station.
Sounds good, I also need something interesting to do.
What type of event? Perhaps Music or Theater?
I would like a musical performance.
Aftershock Festival at Discovery Park on March 5th at 5:30 pm is a popular event.
How much are tickets?
One costs $20.
Could you find some other events?
Aftershock Music Festival at Discovery Park on March 5th at 4 pm is a popular event.
Can you find something on March 10th please?
I found 4 events. One is Popa Chubby which takes place at the Sofia Tsakopoulos Center for the Arts on March 10th at 6:30 pm.
How much are tickets?
The ticket is $40 and it's going to be at 2700 Capitol Avenue.
Sounds good, can you find child friendly attractions?
There are 6. How about the museum called Crocker Art Museum?
Great, I also need a house to rent for 1 that has laundry service.
There is a nice house at 100 Capitol Mall and is rated 4.4.
Great that is all I need.
You are welcome, goodbye.
I need a train ticket to ATL from Philadelphia.
What date will you be travelling?
I will be travelling on the 2nd of March.
There's a train at 9:20 am for $173. How does that sound?
What's the departure station?
The departure station is 30th Street Station.
And what's the arrival station?
The arrival station is Peachtree Station.
Okay, nice. What are some interesting things to do next Wednesday, something Songs related.
There are 9 events you might enjoy. Adam Ant is well liked and will be at Atlanta Symphony Orchestra on March 6th at 6 pm.
I think I'd like that.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
We can do that later.
What else can I help you with?
Tell me about attractions there also.
You can go to Al-Farooq Masjid. It's a Place of Worship.
Is it free to go there? And I'd like to call them, what's their number?
It is free to go there. Their number for calls is 678-886-3457.
Nice. Now I'll need a house for when I'm there.
I've found 10 houses. There's a nice 4.3 rated house at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest.
That sounds really good.
Do you want to reserve the house?
No, not right now.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing else, thanks for the help.
It's been my pleasure, take care.
Can you find me train from Vancouver? I need two seats in economy premium.
Where will you be traveling? And on which date?
I'll be going to Seattle on the 6th.
I found 9 potential trains for you. How about a $145 option departing at 6:20 am?
That one sounds good. Can you find something interesting to do in Seattle when I arrive?
Do you prefer a certain type of event?
I like a good stage show.
At 12th Avenue Arts, on March 10th at 5 pm, Beatleconcert is happening.
That one sounds good. Can you show me some nearby attractions?
I found a Park for you called Alki Beach Park.
Is it free? And is it child-friendly?
It's child-friendly, but it is not free.
Okay, that's great. I need to find a house to stay in with laundry services.
There's a 4.5 rated house at 1000 1st Avenue you might like.
That one works great. That'll be all!
Have a great day!
I need to make a train reservation.
What is your departure and arrival cities and your dates of travel?
I am going from Chicago to New York City on the 5th.
There are 7 trains from Chicago to New York City on the 5th. One leaves at 7:30 am and the cost is $107.00.
That sounds like a plan. Now can you find me something to do on the 14th of this month?
What type of entertainment would you like? Would you like Music or Theater or Movie or something else?
How about some musical shows?
Alma Deutscher is performing on March 14th at 7 pm at the Stern Auditorium / Perelman Stage. There are 10 other events that are similar.
No that one sounds pretty good.
Would you like to make a reservation for the Alma Deutscher performance?
I don't think so. Not right now.
Do you need help with anything else?
Is there a garden there?
There are 10 attractions that include the word garden. You might be interested in Alley Pond Park, a park.
Is there a museum nearby?
There are 10 attractions that include the word museum. Would you be interested in the 9/11 Tribute Museum?
Maybe. That sounds okay.
Is there something else that I could help you with?
I guess I need a house to stay there. It's just me, so a house for 1 and it needs to be rated 4.1 or higher.
There is a house that is rated 4.1 at 100 Greenwich Street. If that is not what you want, there are 10 other houses available.
That sounds like a good house.
Do you need me to book the house for you?
No, not now. I need to think about it.
Is there any other information you need?
No, not now. Thanks for your help. I'll check back.
Enjoy the rest of your day. Good-bye.
I want to find a train.
What city do you want to leave from and when? Where are you going?
I want to find tickets to Seattle, WA from Portland next Wednesday.
I found 9 trains. There is a train departing at 9:10 am for $61.
Sounds great. I want to find something cool to do that day.
Do you want to find music, theater, or something else?
I want to find a play.
I found 10 events. Beatleconcert is a very populer play at 12th Avenue Arts on March 10th at 5 pm.
How much is a ticket?
One ticket is $50.
Are there other events? I want to find a concert next Wednesday.
I found 2 events. Claudia Oshry is playing at Illsley Ball Nordstrom Recital Hall on March 6th at 7 pm.
How much is a ticket and where is the venue?
One ticket is $25 and the venue is at 200 University Street.
Sounds good. What are some attractions there? A park is great.
Alki Beach Park is a great park.
What are some other attractions?
Carkeek Park is a cool park there.
I want to find a house there. Something rated 4.5 or higher for four people. Laundry service would be great.
There's a great house at 1000 1st Avenue rated 4.5.
What is the phone number?
The phone number is +1 206-957-1000.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
No, not now.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all.
Have a great day!
I need to get a train for a work trip
What is your departure and arrival cities?
Can you check for trains from NY to chi-town
What's your travel date?
Can you look for the 9th of this month
I have found 6 services including a 6 am departure for a total cost of $111
Okay sounds good
Do you want to book a seat?
No not right now
Is there anything else I can help with?
Yeah I want to find something fun to do in chi-town
Would you prefer music, theater or something else?
Music is good, check out stuff on the 9th of this month
I have found 6 events including conor maynard playing at the chop shop on March 9th at 6:30 pm
How much are tickets, where is chop shop exactly?
The venue is located at 2033 west north avenue, and tickets are $35
Cool, any attractions nearby?
360 chicago is a popular tourist attraction
Awesome, can you find me a house to stay in while I am there, something 4.5 stars or higher. It's just for one person
I have found 10 options for you including a nice place at 1 west wacker drive. It's rated 4.5 stars.
Okay thanks so much
Would you like me to make you a reservation?
No not right now
okay, happy to help
I'm looking for one business ticket for a train going to Los Angeles.
And where will you be leaving from?
I'm leaving from Fresno. And can you update the request to 2 tickets.
And what date will you be travelling on?
I'll be travelling on March 1st.
There's a train leaving at 7:20 am. It is $215.
What station is it leaving from and what station does it arrive at?
It leaves from Fresno station and arrives at Union station.
That works for me. Now I need recommendations for interesting things to do on that day over there.
Is there anything in particular that interests you such as music or theater?
I'm a big fan of Musical Performance.
People seem to enjoy Ain Gordon. It's at Ralph Freud Playhouse on March 9th at 7 pm.
I think I'd like that.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Maybe later. Now what about some attractions there also?
You can visit the Angels Flight Railway, it's a Historical Landmark.
Alright, nice. What about something like a historical spot that's also good for kids.
The Bradbury Building is a Historical Landmark that matches what you want.
Sounds nice. I also need a house for one person to stay at while I'm there.
There's a nice 4.1 rated house at 1020 South Figueroa Street.
That sound really good.
Do you want me to book the house for you?
No, that's not necessary. I don't need anything else right now.
It's been enjoyable to help you. Take care.
